<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20030423215347.txt.gz
TIME:20030423215347
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 April 23, 2003 -------------- Date of Report: (Date of earliest event reported) ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 1-9761 36-2151613 ---------------------- -------------------- ------------------- (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Number) Identification Number) Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141, (630) 773-3800 ------------------------------------------------------------- (Address, including zip code and telephone number, including area code, of registrant's principal executive offices) Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (including information being provided under Item 12) The following information is furnished pursuant to Item 9 "Regulation FD Disclosure" and Item 12 "Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition". The information furnished pursuant to Item 12 is included under this Item 9 in accordance with SEC Release Nos. 33-8216 and 34- 47583. On April 23, 2003, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("AJG") issued a press release setting forth AJG's first quarter 2003 earnings. A copy of AJG's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit (99) and hereby incorporated by reference.
Exhibit Index (99) Press release, dated April 23, 2003, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. /s/ Douglas K. Howell By: --------------------------- Douglas K. Howell Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: April 23, 2003
[GRAPHIC OMITTED] Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACT: Marsha J. Akin Investor Relations (630) 773-3800 www.ajg.com ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ANNOUNCES FIRST QUARTER 2003 FINANCIAL RESULTS ITASCA, IL, April 23, 2003-- Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2003. A printer-friendly format is available at www.ajg.com. In the first quarter 2003, the company decided to exit from its investments in venture capital, development stage enterprises and turn-arounds and recorded an after-tax charge of $19.3 million, or $0.21 per share, to reduce the carrying values to the estimated realizable value. The company does not intend to make future investments in these investment classes. Of the company's $700 million investment portfolio, the net carrying value of these investments totaled $31.7 million and $4.4 million at December 31, 2002 and March 31, 2003, respectively. The company believes its other investments are sound. In addition, late in the first quarter the company signed a new synthetic fuel deal, which is expected to keep the effective tax rate in the mid-20s for the year. Brokerage Segment Highlights o Very strong first-quarter revenue growth. o Record first-quarter earnings. o The company's 2001 and 2002 organic hiring strategy is delivering better-than-expected results. o Rate environment continues to be strong. Risk Management Segment Highlights o Claim counts recovering to pre 9/11 levels leading to improved revenue growth rates. o Outstanding new business growth in the quarter and over 98% account retention levels. "We are extremely pleased with the outstanding 22% revenue growth achieved within our Brokerage segment, of which 15% is organic," said President and Chief Executive Officer, J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. "In this very tough environment for our clients, our niche strategy and alternative market expertise are proving very effective in addressing their needs. We believe that we now have a full complement of talent in place. The hiring restrictions we implemented at the end of the third quarter have been successful and remain in force. The new producers we added over the last two years are doing an excellent job. As a group, they are on track to be fully self-supporting by the end of 2003, which is slightly ahead of last year's expectations. It should take only one more renewal cycle to bring their compensation ratio in line with our historical levels. Accordingly, we remain confident that our strategy of investing in people during 2001 and 2002 will contribute substantially to our long-range growth." (1 of 4)
Proforma results for the Brokerage segment, excluding revenues, compensation and other operating expenses associated with producer expansion, are: "Gallagher Bassett Services, the property/casualty portion of our Risk Management segment, has improved its growth rate. Claim counts have returned to pre 9/11 levels, new business production is very strong and retention levels exceed 98%," said Mr. Gallagher. "In conclusion, the rate environment is currently strong and our acquisition pipeline remains full. We are pleased with our growth and much credit is due to our talented team of professionals as they deliver hard-fought results in a very tough marketplace." The company will host a Webcast conference call on Thursday, April 24, 2003 at 11:00am EDT to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to www.ajg.com. * * * * * Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange. Additional information about Gallagher may be found at www.ajg.com. This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. (2 of 4)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Segment Statement of Earnings (1) (unaudited) ($ in millions except per share data) (1) The information presented above has been reclassified to reflect the current year presentation. In prior years, the Company has presented a "Corporate" segment. For purposes of this and future presentations, the Corporate segment has been allocated to each of the three operating segments. (2) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of depreciation and amortization expense divided by the weighted average number of shares outstanding during the period. (3 of 4)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Statement of Earnings (unaudited) ($ in millions except per share data) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Balance Sheet (unaudited) ($ in millions except per share data) (4 of 4) # # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20030424174712.txt.gz
TIME:20030424174712
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K-A CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 April 24, 2003 ------------------------ Date of Report: (Date of earliest event reported) ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 1-9761 36-2151613 ---------------------- ---------------- -------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission File (I.R.S. Employer of incorporation or organization) Number) Identification Number) Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141, (630) 773-3800 ------------------------------------------------------------- (Address, including zip code and telephone number, including area code, of registrant's principal executive offices) Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (including information being provided under Item 12) The following information is furnished pursuant to Item 9 "Regulation FD Disclosure" and Item 12 "Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition". The information furnished pursuant to Item 12 is included under this Item 9 in accordance with SEC Release Nos. 33-8216 and 34- 47583. On April 24, 2003, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("AJG") issued a press release setting forth certain corrections to its April 23, 2003 earnings release. A copy of AJG's April 24, 2003 press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Exhibit Index No. 99. Press release, dated April 24, 2003, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. By: /s/ Douglas K. Howell ---------------------------------------- Douglas K. Howell Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: April 24, 2003

Exhibit 99.1 [LOGO] Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACT: Marsha J. Akin Investor Relations (630) 773-3800 www.ajg.com ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. FILES AMENDED 8-K Itasca, IL, April 24, 2003 - -Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. announced today that it is filing an amended Form 8-K with the SEC to correct certain errors in the March 31, 2003 Balance Sheet that accompanies the Company's April 23, 2003 earnings press release. The Balance Sheet contains certain errors which are corrected as follows: Category As Reported Corrected Number -------- ----------- ---------------- ($ in millions except per share data) Other investments and notes receivable $ 167.2 $ 142.2 Total assets 2,517.4 2,492.4 Income taxes payable 12.4 2.1 Total current liabilities 1,769.6 1,759.3 Retained earnings 371.4 356.7 Total stockholders' equity 559.5 544.8 Total liabilities and stockholders' equity 2,517.4 2,492.4 Tangible net worth 406.1 391.4 Book value per share 6.22 6.06 Tangible book value per share 4.52 4.35 A copy of the corrected Balance Sheet together with the statement of earnings for the first quarter, which is unaffected by these corrections, accompanies this press release. In addition, the proforma presentation on the April 23, 2003 press release for the Brokerage Segment contains an error in the line "Excluding new hires". The corrected number is "144.3" which replaces "14.3". Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol "AJG." # # # #
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Statement of Earnings (unaudited) ($ in millions except per share data) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Balance Sheet (unaudited) ($ in millions except per share data) (4 of 4) # # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20030625132744.txt.gz
TIME:20030625132744
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K Current Report Pursuant to Section 13 or 15 (D) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 June 25, 2003 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 1-9761 36-2151613 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File Number) (I.R.S. Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code) (630) 773-3800 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
Item 5. Other Events. Beginning with the Form 10-Q filed by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2003 (the "First Quarter 10-Q"), Gallagher has changed the way it reports segment information. For all periods ending on or prior to December 31, 2002, Gallagher had reported financial information for three operating segments, Brokerage, Risk Management and Financial Services, and a Corporate segment. Beginning in 2003, Gallagher's segment disclosures only report information for the three operating segments and no longer include information for Corporate. The identifiable assets and income and expense amounts that were previously reported in the Corporate segment are now allocated to the three operating segments. Consistent with the requirements of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 131, "Disclosures About Segments of an Enterprise and Related Information," and to enhance comparability with prior periods, Gallagher is filing this Form 8-K for the purpose of providing financial statement and other historical financial information that show segment information as of and for the three year period ended December 31, 2002 on the new basis of segment reporting that was adopted by Gallagher in its First Quarter 10-Q. In addition to the foregoing, beginning with the First Quarter 10-Q, Gallagher has changed the way it reports commissions paid to sub-brokers on its retail property/casualty (P/C) brokerage business. Such commissions had been reported as other operating expenses in Gallagher's consolidated statements of earnings, but are now reported as offsets to gross revenues in the consolidated statements of earnings in order to conform to a more common industry practice. Accordingly, the consolidated financial statements included herein have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation. This reclassification had no impact on the previously reported net earnings or stockholders' equity. The impact on total revenues and expenses of this reclassification is presented in the consolidated statements of earnings included herein. Operating Segments Gallagher has identified three operating segments: Brokerage, Risk Management and Financial Services. The Brokerage segment represents three operating divisions: Retail Brokerage Services, Wholesale Brokerage Services and Gallagher Benefit Services. The Brokerage segment, for commission or fee compensation, places commercial P/C and employee benefit-related insurance on behalf of its customers. The Risk Management segment provides P/C and health claim third-party administration, loss control and risk management consulting and insurance property appraisals. Third-party administration is principally the management and processing of claims for self-insurance programs of Gallagher's clients or clients of other brokers. The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's diversified investment portfolio to maximize long-term after-tax returns. The two major sources of operating revenues for Gallagher are commissions from insurance brokerage operations and service fees primarily from risk management operations. Information with respect to all sources of revenue, by operating segment, for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2002, is as follows (in thousands): - -------------- * Restated to conform to the current year presentation. See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements. 2
See Note 18 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional financial information, including earnings before income taxes and identifiable assets, by operating segment, for 2002, 2001 and 2000. During 2002 and 2001, Gallagher's total revenues and expenses increased sequentially from quarter-to-quarter within the calendar years, except for the second quarter of 2001 and the third quarter of 2002, the latter of which was negatively impacted by $28.9 million of investment write-downs. However, commission and fee revenues and the related expenses can vary from quarter-to-quarter as a result of the timing of policy inception dates that traditionally are heaviest in the third and fourth quarters. On the other hand, salaries and employee benefits, rent, depreciation and amortization expenses tend to be more uniform throughout the year. In addition, the timing of acquisitions accounted for as purchases will also impact the trends in Gallagher's quarterly operating results. See Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for unaudited quarterly operating results for 2002 and 2001. Brokerage The Brokerage segment comprises the following operations: the Brokerage Services Division (BSD) and Gallagher Benefit Services (GBS). BSD encompasses two operating divisions: Retail Brokerage Services, Wholesale Brokerage Services BSD places insurance for and services commercial, industrial, institutional, governmental, religious and personal accounts throughout the United States and abroad. BSD acts as an agent in soliciting, negotiating and effecting contracts of insurance through insurance companies worldwide, as a broker in procuring contracts of insurance on behalf of insureds, and in setting up and managing self-insured programs. BSD has the capability to handle insurable risks and related coverages for all forms of property/casualty products. BSD also places surplus lines coverages, which are coverages for various specialized risks not available from insurance companies licensed by the states in which the risks are located. In addition, BSD's reinsurance intermediary operations place reinsurance coverages for its insurance company clients. GBS specializes in the management of employee benefit programs through fully insured and self-insured programs. GBS provides services in connection with the design, financing, implementation, administration and communication of compensation and employee benefit programs (including pension and profit-sharing plans, group life, health, accident and disability insurance programs and tax deferral plans), and provides other professional services in connection therewith. The primary source of Gallagher's compensation for its Brokerage segment is commissions paid by insurance companies which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds. Commission rates are dependent on a number of factors including the type of insurance, the particular insurance company and the capacity in which Gallagher acts. In some cases, Gallagher is compensated for brokerage or advisory services directly by fees from clients. Gallagher may also receive contingent commissions which are based on the estimated profit the underwriting insurance company earns and/or the overall volume of business placed by Gallagher in a given period of time. Occasionally, Gallagher shares commissions with other brokers who have participated with Gallagher in placing insurance or servicing insureds. GBS receives a fee for acting in the capacity of advisor and administrator with respect to employee benefit programs and receives commissions in connection with the placement of insurance under such programs. Risk Management The Risk Management segment comprises two wholly-owned subsidiaries, Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc. (GB) and Gallagher Benefit Administrators, Inc. (GBA). GB provides a full range of risk management services including claims management, risk control consulting services, information management, property appraisals on a totally integrated or select, stand-alone basis. GB provides these services for Gallagher's clients through a network of service offices located throughout the United States, Canada, England, Scotland and Australia. GB primarily markets its risk management services directly to clients on an unbundled basis independent of Gallagher. GB also markets these services to BSD's clients who are interested in P/C risk management related services. In connection with its risk management services, GB provides "self-insurance" programs for large institutions, risk sharing pools and associations, and large commercial and industrial customers. Self-insurance, as administered by GB, is a program in which the client assumes a manageable portion of its insurance risks, usually (although not always) placing the less predictable and larger loss exposures with an insurance carrier that specializes in these less predictable exposures. GBA is a third-party administrator that serves the self-funded employee health benefit marketplace by integrating effective managed care and quality assurance programs with claims administration services. The employee health benefit services provided by GBA are, in many instances, directly supported by GBS. 3
GB's and GBA's revenues for risk management services are substantially in the form of fees. These fees are typically negotiated in advance on an annual basis based upon the estimated volume of the services to be performed. Financial Services Financial Services is primarily responsible for Gallagher's diversified investment portfolio which includes investment strategies--trading, marketable securities--trading, tax advantaged investments, real estate partnerships, an investment in Allied World Assurance Holdings, Ltd., venture capital equity investments, a minority investment in an alternative fund manager, notes receivable from investees, and an investment in an airplane leasing company that leases two cargo airplanes to the French postal service. Financial Services manages the invested assets of Gallagher in order to maximize the long-term after-tax return to Gallagher. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements of Gallagher's for a summary of Gallagher's investments and notes receivable and for a summary of the assets and liabilities related to Gallagher's unconsolidated investment portfolio, accounted for using the equity method. Gallagher's equity investment philosophy generally consists of investing in tax advantaged investments and venture capital equity projects which take a long-term view toward private sale or public offering. Gallagher uses the limited partnership or limited liability company forms of legal ownership to fund many of its investments in order to obtain favorable tax treatment with respect to gains, losses and distributions, while limiting its liability. Based on the ownership structure of these investments, management believes that Gallagher's exposure to losses related to these investments is limited to the combination of its net carrying value, funding commitments, letters of credit and financial guarantees. In the event that certain of these limited partnerships or limited liability companies were to default on their debt obligations and Gallagher's net carrying value became impaired, the amount to be written-off could have a material effect on Gallagher's consolidated financial position or operating results. See Note 4 and Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for a summary of outstanding letters of credit, financial guarantees and funding commitments and Note 7 for a summary of outstanding debt and contingent commitments. 4
Selected Financial Data The following selected consolidated financial data for each of the five years in the period ended December 31, 2002 have been derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial statements. Such data should be read in conjunction with Gallagher's audited Consolidated Financial Statements and related notes thereto. - ---------- (1) Restated to conform to the current year presentation. See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements. (2) Based on the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the year. (3) Based on the weighted average number of common and common equivalent shares outstanding during the year. (4) Based on the total dividends declared on a share of common stock outstanding during the entire year. (5) Represents annual net earnings divided by stockholders' equity as of the beginning of the year. (6) Based on the number of employees at year end. 5
Results Of Operations -- Segment Information As discussed in Note 18 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, Gallagher operates in three business segments; Brokerage, Risk Management and Financial Services. Brokerage Total revenues for this segment increased $162.7 million, or 28%, to $740.1 million in 2002. Total domestic revenues were up $134.9 million, or 26%, to $661.0 million in 2002 and total foreign revenues, principally in the United Kingdom, Australia and Bermuda, were up $27.8 million, or 54%, to $79.2 million in 2002. These increases are due principally to new business, renewal rate increases and the effect of acquisitions accounted for as purchases that were made in the fourth quarter of 2001 and throughout 2002, partially offset by lost business. Earnings before income taxes increased $31.2 million, or 27%, to $148.7 million in 2002 due primarily to the new business production and rate increases mentioned above. Total revenues increased $61.5 million, or 12%, to $577.4 million in 2001. This increase is due primarily to new business production offset partially by lost business and a $5.6 million reduction in interest income generated from the float on fiduciary funds in 2001. The decrease in the fiduciary interest income is due to the decrease in short-term interest rates during 2001. Total domestic revenues were up $53.6 million, or 11%, to $526.1 million in 2001 and total foreign revenues, principally in the United Kingdom, Australia and Bermuda, were up $8.0 million, or 18%, to $51.3 million in 2001. These increases are due primarily to new business production offset partially by lost business. Earnings before income taxes increased $20.0 million, or 21%, to $117.5 million in 2001 principally as a result of increased revenues. Risk Management Total revenues for this segment increased $16.6 million, or 6%, to $281.3 million in 2002 due primarily to new business production substantially offset by reductions in existing business volume and by lost business. Total domestic revenues were up $14.3 million, or 6%, to $256.7 million in 2002 and total foreign revenues, principally from the United Kingdom and Australia, were up $2.2 million, or 10% to $24.5 million in 2002. The slowdown in total revenue growth from historical double-digit percentages to recent single-digit percentages, is primarily the result of the events of September 11, 2001, combined with a general economic slowdown in the United States. GB provides services to several airline, hospitality and restaurant-related clients, all of whose businesses were particularly hard hit following September 11th. Because those clients experienced declines in their business, including reductions in their headcount, the rate of increase in new GB claim counts slowed, and for some clients, actual claim counts decreased from the same period in 2001. In addition, the hard market had an unfavorable impact on GB as several of its managing general agent programs were unable to renew their coverages in the reinsurance marketplace during 2002. GB's 2002 operating results were also negatively impacted by several insurance carrier insolvencies in 2002 and 2001. As GB's revenues are generally based on the number of new claims it handles, the reduction in claims has had a direct impact on revenue. As revenues slow, expenses in the short-term do not experience the same immediate reduction. The net result of the above is that earnings before income taxes for the segment of $31.5 million in 2002 were flat compared to 2001. Total revenues were up $32.4 million, or 14%, to $264.7 million in 2001 due to strong new business production and favorable retention rates on existing business. Total domestic revenues were up $32.0 million, or 15%, to $242.4 million in 2001 and total foreign revenues, principally from the United Kingdom and Australia, were up $382,000, or 2%, to $22.3 million in 2001 due primarily to new business and substantially less lost business than in 2000. Earnings before income taxes of $31.3 million in 2001 were flat compared to 2000. 6
Financial Services Total revenues for this segment decreased $7.1 million, or 15%, to $38.8 million in 2002. This decrease is primarily due to the following previously discussed items: . Other-than-temporary impairments that resulted from the sharp decline in the equity markets during 2002, most of which occurred in the third quarter. During 2002, Gallagher recognized other-than-temporary impairments of $10.6 million in the consolidated statements of earnings related to its marketable securities portfolio. . An unrealized loss of $425,000 that was recognized in the third quarter of 2002 related to reclassifying the marketable securities portfolio from available for sale to trading. . Aggregate write-downs of loans and equity holdings of $19.6 million related to venture capital investments that were recognized in 2002. In addition, Gallagher incurred a $3.6 million loss in 2002 on the sale of a venture capital investment. . The $3.0 million loss that was recognized by Gallagher in the fourth quarter of 2002 through the equity method of accounting for Asset Alliance Corporation's (AAC) write-down of its investment in Beacon Hill. . A one-time gain of $4.5 million generated from the sale of land by Harmony that was recognized in the first quarter of 2001. These decreases are partially offset by installment gains from the sales of Gallagher's interests in limited partnerships that operate synthetic fuel facilities that were completed in the third and fourth quarters of 2001 and the first and fourth quarters of 2002. These installment gains increased $22.9 million, or 195%, to $34.6 million in 2002. In addition, the $11.8 million gain on the sale of a portion of Gallagher's minority interest in AAC also offset the 2002 decreases discussed above. Earnings before income taxes increased $12.2 million, or 175%, to $5.2 million in 2002. This increase is primarily due to the $14.9 million reduction in the operating expenses of alternative energy partnerships, the $22.9 million increase in installment gains and the $11.8 million gain on the sale of a portion of Gallagher's minority interest in AAC, all of which were significantly offset by the impairments and write-downs discussed above. Total revenues increased $19.6 million, or 74%, to $45.9 million in 2001 due primarily to realized gains of $2.8 million generated from Gallagher's investment strategies and marketable securities portfolios, increased installment gains on the alternative energy sale transactions discussed above and to income generated from commitment fees paid to Gallagher for providing letters of credit and financial guarantees to three of its investees. Also contributing to the increase in total revenues was income from real estate ventures related to the $4.5 million gain from Harmony mentioned above and the $2.4 million gain recognized on the sale of a benefits administration book of business in 2001. Earnings before income taxes decreased $11.5 million, or 255%, to a loss of $7.0 million in 2001 due primarily to the increase in operating expenses of alternative energy partnerships of $21.1 million in 2001, which represents Gallagher's portion of the production costs associated with the operations of the synthetic fuel facilities. The increase in these expenses in 2001 relates to the production costs incurred by the alternative energy partnerships that generated a substantial portion of the tax credits earned by Gallagher in 2001. The tax credits generated by these investments are included in the provision for income taxes, which is not allocated to Gallagher's operating entities. The impact of the increase in operating expenses of alternative energy partnerships on 2001 earnings before income taxes was partially offset by the revenue increases discussed above. Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements This current report contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of that term in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 (the "Act") found at Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"). Additional written or oral forward-looking statements may be made by Gallagher from time to time in filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), press releases, or otherwise. Statements contained in this report that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of the Act. Forward-looking statements may include, but are not limited to, discussions concerning revenues, expenses, earnings, cash flow, capital structure, financial losses, as well as market and industry conditions, premium rates, financial markets, interest rates, foreign exchange rates, contingencies and matters relating to Gallagher's operations and income taxes. In addition, when used in this report, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Such forward-looking statements are based on available current market and industry material, experts' reports and opinions and long-term trends, as well as management's expectations concerning future events impacting Gallagher. 7
Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment, and changes in income tax laws. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on any forward-looking statements contained in this report, which speak only as of the date set forth on the signature page hereto. Gallagher undertakes no obligation to publicly release the result of any revisions to these forward-looking statements that may be made to reflect events or circumstances after such date or to reflect the occurrence of anticipated or unanticipated events. Item 7. Exhibits. 23.1 Consent of Ernst & Young LLP, independent auditors. 99.1 Gallagher's 2002 Audited Financial Statements. 8
Signature Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15 (d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized on the 25th day of June, 2003. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. /s/ Richard C. Cary --------------------------------------- Richard C. Cary Controller and Chief Accounting Officer 9
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Current Report on Form 8-K Exhibit Index 23.1 Consent of Ernst & Young LLP, independent auditors. 99.1 Gallagher's 2002 Audited Financial Statements. 10

EXHIBIT 23.1 CONSENT OF INDEPENDENT AUDITORS We consent to the incorporation by reference in the Registration Statements (Form S-8, No. 33-604 and Form S-8, No. 33-14625) pertaining to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Incentive and United Kingdom Incentive Plans, in the Registration Statements (Form S-8, No. 33-24251, Form S-8, No. 33-38031 and Form S-8, No. 333-57155) pertaining to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 1988 Incentive and 1988 Nonqualified Stock Option Plans, in the Registration Statement (Form S-8, No. 33-30816) pertaining to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Non-Employee Directors' Stock Option Plan, in the Registration Statements (Form S-8, No. 33-64614 and Form S-8, No. 33-80648) pertaining to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 1988 Incentive, 1988 Nonqualified, and Non-Employee Directors' Stock Option Plans, in the Registration Statements (Form S-8, No. 333-06359, Form S-8, No. 333-40000 and Form S-8, No. 333-87320) pertaining to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 1988 Nonqualified and Non-Employee Directors' Stock Option Plans, in the Registration Statement (Form S-8, No. 333-62930) pertaining to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 1988 Nonqualified and Non-Employee Directors' Stock Option Plans and the Gallagher Healthcare Insurance Services, Inc. 2001 Nonqualified Stock Option Plan, in the Registration Statements (Form S-4, No. 333-75197, Form S-3, No. 333-84139 and Form S-4, No. 333-55254), and in the related Prospectuses, of our report dated January 29, 2003 with respect to the consolidated financial statements of Gallagher included in this Current Report on Form 8-K. /s/ Ernst & Young LLP ------------------------ Ernst & Young LLP Chicago, Illinois June 25, 2003

EXHIBIT 99.1 Audited Consolidated Financial Statements Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Years Ended December 31, 2002, 2001 and 2000 INDEX
.. REPORT OF INDEPENDENT AUDITORS .................................................. 1 .. CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS Consolidated Statements Of Earnings ........................................ 2 Consolidated Balance Sheets ................................................ 3 Consolidated Statements Of Cash Flows ...................................... 4 Consolidated Statements Of Stockholders' Equity ............................ 5 .. NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS Note 1: Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies ........................ 6 Note 2: Business Combinations ............................................. 9 Note 3: Reclassifications Of Previously Reported Financial Statements .....10 Note 4: Investments .......................................................11 Note 5: Fixed Assets ......................................................15 Note 6: Intangible Assets .................................................15 Note 7: Credit And Other Debt Agreements ..................................16 Note 8: Capital Stock And Stockholders' Rights Plan .......................17 Note 9: Earnings Per Share ................................................17 Note 10: Stock Option Plans ................................................18 Note 11: Deferred Compensation .............................................19 Note 12: Restricted Stock Awards ...........................................19 Note 13: Retirement Plans ..................................................19 Note 14: Postretirement Benefits Other Than Pensions .......................21 Note 15: Commitments, Contingencies And Financial Guarantees ...............22 Note 16: Income Taxes ......................................................24 Note 17: Quarterly Operating Results .......................................25 Note 18: Segment Information ...............................................26
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT AUDITORS The Board of Directors and Stockholders Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) as of December 31, 2002 and 2001, and the related consolidated statements of earnings, stockholders' equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2002. These financial statements are the responsibility of Gallagher's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audits. We conducted our audits in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion. In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. at December 31, 2002 and 2001, and the consolidated results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2002, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. /s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP Chicago, Illinois January 29, 2003 1
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EARNINGS See notes to consolidated financial statements. 2
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS See notes to consolidated financial statements. 3
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS See notes to consolidated financial statements. 4
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY See notes to consolidated financial statements. 5
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES NATURE OF OPERATIONS Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) provides insurance brokerage and risk management services to a wide variety of commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. Commission revenue is principally generated through the negotiation and placement of insurance for its clients. Fee revenue is primarily generated by providing other risk management services including claims management, information management, risk control services and appraisals in either the property/casualty market or human resource/employee benefit market. Investment income and other revenue is generated from Gallagher's investment portfolio, which includes fiduciary funds, equity securities and tax advantaged and other strategic investments. Gallagher is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. BASIS OF PRESENTATION The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Gallagher and all of its majority owned subsidiaries (50% or greater ownership). Investments in partially owned entities in which Gallagher's ownership is less than 50% are accounted for using either the lower of amortized cost/cost or fair value, or the equity method, whichever is appropriate depending on the legal form of Gallagher's ownership interest and the applicable percentage of the entity owned. For partially owned entities accounted for using the equity method, Gallagher's share of the net earnings of these entities is included in consolidated net earnings. All material intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior years' financial statements in order to conform to the current year presentation. USE OF ESTIMATES The preparation of the consolidated financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in the financial statements and accompanying notes. Such estimates and assumptions could change in the future as more information becomes known which could impact the amounts reported and disclosed herein. REVENUE RECOGNITION Gallagher's revenues are derived from commissions, fees and investment income. Commission revenues, as well as the related premiums receivable and premiums payable to insurance companies, are recognized at the latter of the billing or the effective date of the related insurance policies, net of an allowance for estimated policy cancellations. Commission revenues related to installment premiums are recognized periodically as billed. Contingent commissions and commissions on premiums directly billed by insurance companies are recognized as revenue when the data necessary to reasonably determine such amounts has been obtained by Gallagher. Typically, these types of commission revenues cannot be reasonably determined until the cash or the related detail is received by Gallagher from the insurance company. A contingent commission is a commission, paid by an insurance company, that is based on the overall estimated profit and/or volume of the business placed with that insurance company. Commissions on premiums billed directly by insurance companies relates to a large number of small premium transactions, whereby the billing and policy issuance process is controlled entirely by the insurance company. The income effects of subsequent premium adjustments are recorded when the adjustments become known. Fee revenues are recognized ratably as the services are rendered. Fee revenues generated from the Insurance Brokerage Services segment primarily relate to fees negotiated in lieu of commissions, which are recognized in the same manner as commission revenues. Fee revenues generated from the Risk Management Services segment relate to third-party claims administration, loss control and other risk management consulting services, which are provided over a period of time, typically one year. The income effects of subsequent fee adjustments are recorded when the adjustments become known. Premiums and fees receivable in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets are net of allowances for estimated policy cancellations and doubtful accounts. The allowance for estimated policy cancellations was $3,000,000 and $2,500,000 at December 31, 2002 and 2001, respectively, which represents a reserve for future reversals in commission and fee revenues related to the potential cancellation of client insurance policies that were in force as of year end. The allowance for doubtful accounts was $2,025,000 and $1,730,000 at December 31, 2002 and 2001, respectively. Gallagher periodically reviews the adequacy of the allowances for estimated policy cancellations and doubtful accounts and adjusts them as deemed necessary. Investment income and other primarily includes interest income, dividend income, net realized and unrealized gains (losses), income (loss) from equity investments, and gains on sales of operations and invested assets. Interest income is recorded as earned. Dividend income is recognized as income based on the date that the underlying security trades "ex-dividend." For revenue recognition policies pertaining to net realized and unrealized gains (losses), see the accounting policy on investments below. Income (loss) from equity investments represents Gallagher's proportionate share of income or losses from investments accounted for using the equity method. EARNINGS PER SHARE Basic net earnings per share is computed by dividing net earnings by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the respective period. Diluted net earnings per share is computed by dividing net earnings by the weighted average number of common and common equivalent shares outstanding during the respective period. Common equivalent shares include incremental shares from dilutive stock options, which are calculated from the date of grant under the treasury stock method using the average market price for the period. CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS Short-term investments, consisting principally of commercial paper and certificates of deposit that have a maturity of 90 days or less at date of purchase, are considered cash equivalents. RESTRICTED CASH In its capacity as an insurance broker, Gallagher collects premiums from insureds and, after deducting its commissions and/or fees, remits these premiums to insurance carriers. Unremitted insurance premiums are held in a fiduciary capacity until disbursed by Gallagher. Various state and foreign 6
1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (CONTINUED) agencies that regulate insurance brokers provide specific requirements that limit the type of investments that may be made with such funds. Accordingly, Gallagher invests these funds in cash, money market accounts, commercial paper and certificates of deposit. Gallagher earns interest income on these unremitted funds, which is reported as interest income from fiduciary funds in the accompanying consolidated statements of earnings. Premiums collected from insureds, but not yet remitted to insurance carriers, are restricted as to use by laws in certain states and foreign jurisdictions in which Gallagher's subsidiaries operate. These unremitted amounts are reported as restricted cash in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets, with the related liability reported as premiums payable to insurance companies. Additionally, one of Gallagher's United Kingdom subsidiaries is required by Lloyd's of London to meet certain liquidity requirements. INVESTMENTS Investment strategies and marketable securities are considered trading securities. Investment strategies consist primarily of limited partnerships, which invest in common and preferred stocks and bonds. Marketable securities consist primarily of common and preferred stocks and bonds. Investments designated as trading are carried at fair value in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets, with unrealized gains and losses included in the consolidated statements of earnings. The fair value of investment strategies is determined by reference to the fair values of the underlying common and preferred stocks and bonds, which are based primarily on quoted market prices. The fair value of marketable securities is based primarily on quoted market prices. Effective September 30, 2002, Gallagher reclassified its marketable securities portfolio which consists primarily of common and preferred stocks and bonds, from available for sale to trading based on changes in its investment philosophy. Prior to September 30, 2002, marketable securities were considered available for sale and were carried at fair value in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets, with unrealized gains and losses, less related deferred income taxes, excluded from net earnings and reported as accumulated other comprehensive earnings (loss). Gains and losses were recognized in net earnings when realized using the specific identification method. The fair value of marketable securities held as available for sale were based primarily on quoted market prices. As a result of this reclassification, $425,000 of net pretax unrealized losses, previously classified in accumulated other comprehensive earnings (loss), was recognized in earnings before income taxes in the third quarter of 2002. FIXED ASSETS Fixed assets are carried at cost in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Gallagher periodically reviews long-lived assets for impairment whenever events or changes in business circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable. Under those circumstances, if the fair value were less than the carrying amount of the asset, a loss would be recognized for the difference. Depreciation for fixed assets is computed using the straight-line method over the following estimated useful lives: YEARS --------------------------------------------------------------------------- Furniture and equipment 3-10 years Buildings and improvements 3-40 years Airplanes of the leasing company 15 years Leasehold improvements Lesser of remaining life of the asset or life of lease INTANGIBLE ASSETS Intangible assets consist of the excess of cost over the value of net tangible assets of acquired businesses, expiration lists and non-compete agreements. Expiration lists and non-compete agreements are amortized using the straight-line method over their estimated useful lives (5 to 15 years for expiration lists and 5 to 6 years for non-compete agreements). In accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 142 (SFAS 142), "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," goodwill and indefinite lived assets are not amortized, but are subject to periodic reviews for impairment (at least annually or more frequently if impairment indicators arise). Gallagher reviews goodwill and other intangible assets for impairment periodically and whenever events or changes in business circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable. Under those circumstances, if the fair value were less than the carrying amount of the asset, a loss would be recognized for the difference. STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION At December 31, 2002, Gallagher has four stock-based employee compensation plans, which are described more fully in Note 10. Gallagher primarily grants stock options for a fixed number of shares to employees, with an exercise price equal to the fair value of the underlying shares at the date of grant. Gallagher accounts for stock option grants under the recognition and measurement principles of Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees," and related Interpretations and, accordingly, recognizes no compensation expense for these stock options granted to employees. The following table illustrates the effect on net earnings and net earnings per share if Gallagher had applied the fair value recognition provisions of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards Board No. 123 (SFAS 123), "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation," to stock-based employee compensation. As presented in the table above, had Gallagher applied the fair value recognition provisions of SFAS 123, diluted net earnings per share as reported would have been reduced by $.03 in 2002, $.06 in 2001 and $.01 in 2000. The pro forma disclosures above only include the effect of options granted subsequent to January 1, 1995. Accordingly, the effects of applying the SFAS 123 pro forma disclosures to future periods may not be indicative of future effects. 7
1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (CONTINUED) FAIR VALUE OF FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS The carrying amounts of financial assets and liabilities reported in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets for cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash, premiums and fees receivable, premiums payable to insurance companies, accrued salaries and bonuses, accounts payable and other accrued liabilities, unearned fees and income taxes payable, at December 31, 2002 and 2001, approximate fair value because of the short maturity of these instruments. The financial assets that comprise investment strategies and marketable securities are carried at fair value in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Fair values for other investments and notes receivable are disclosed in Note 4. The carrying amount of borrowings outstanding under Gallagher's credit agreement approximates fair value at December 31, 2002 because the borrowings are at floating interest rates. EFFECT OF NEW PRONOUNCEMENTS GUARANTEES In November 2002, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued FASB Interpretation No. 45 (Interpretation 45), "Guarantor's Accounting and Disclosure Requirements for Guarantees, Including Indirect Guarantees of Indebtedness of Others," which will significantly change current practice in the accounting for, and disclosure of, guarantees. Interpretation 45 requires certain guarantees to initially be recorded as a liability at fair value, which is different from the current practice of recording a liability only when a loss is probable and estimable, as those terms are defined in Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 5 (SFAS 5), "Accounting for Contingencies." Interpretation 45 also requires a guarantor to make significant new disclosures, even when the likelihood of making any payments under the guarantee is remote, which is also a change from general current practice. The Interpretation's disclosure requirements are effective for all guarantees, regardless of the initiation date, for financial statements of interim or annual periods ending after December 15, 2002, while the initial recognition and initial measurement provisions are applicable on a prospective basis to guarantees issued, renewed or modified after December 31, 2002. Gallagher implemented the disclosure requirements of Interpretation 45 in 2002, which is presented in Note 15. Gallagher is currently evaluating the impact Interpretation 45 will have on Gallagher's consolidated financial statements for those current guarantees that are anticipated to renew in 2003. The adoption of Interpretation 45 could have a material effect on Gallagher's consolidated operating results or financial position. CONSOLIDATION OF PARTIALLY-OWNED ENTITIES In January 2003, the FASB issued FASB Interpretation No. 46 (Interpretation 46), "Consolidation of Variable Interest Entities." Interpretation 46 generally defines a variable interest entity (VIE) as a corporation, partnership, trust, or any other legal structure used for business purposes that either (a) does not have equity investors with voting rights or (b) has equity investors that do not provide sufficient financial resources for the entity to support its own activities. Prior to Interpretation 46, a partially owned entity was only consolidated into the investor company's consolidated financial statements if it was controlled by the investor company through voting interests. Regardless of voting interests, Interpretation 46 generally requires a VIE to be consolidated by an investor company if that VIE's equity is less than 10% of its assets and the investor company is subject to a majority of the risk of loss from the VIE's activities or entitled to receive a majority of the VIE's residual returns or both. Interpretation 46 also requires disclosures about VIEs in circumstances where the investor company is not required to consolidate but in which it has a significant variable interest. The consolidation requirements of Interpretation 46 apply immediately to VIEs created or invested in after January 31, 2003. The consolidation requirements apply to entities created or invested in as of January 31, 2003 or earlier, in the first fiscal year or interim period beginning after June 15, 2003. Certain of the disclosure requirements apply in all financial statements issued after January 31, 2003, regardless of when the VIE was created or invested in. Gallagher has a number of investments it believes may be deemed to be VIEs. These investments include qualified affordable housing and alternative energy projects intended primarily to be income tax credit generators, a synthetic fuel facility intended to produce both tax credits and pretax income, real estate development projects intended to generate gains and venture capital investees intended to generate equity income and realized gains. Total assets of these investments approximates $650,000,000 in the aggregate. Gallagher's maximum exposure to losses related to these investments is approximately $14,000,000 including net book value, letters of credit, financial guarantees and funding commitments. Management is currently evaluating the impact Interpretation 46 will have on Gallagher's consolidated financial statements. However, management anticipates that the adoption of Interpretation 46 will not have a material effect on Gallagher's consolidated net earnings or stockholders' equity. INTANGIBLE ASSETS In 2001, the FASB issued Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 141 (SFAS 141), "Business Combinations," and SFAS 142. SFAS 141 requires that all business combinations initiated after June 30, 2001 be accounted for using the purchase method of accounting. In addition, SFAS 141 further clarifies the criteria to recognize intangible assets separately from goodwill. The requirements of SFAS 141 were effective for business combinations accounted for by the purchase method completed after June 30, 2001. Under SFAS 142, goodwill and indefinite lived intangible assets are no longer amortized, but are subject to periodic review for impairment (at least annually or more frequently if impairment indicators arise). Separable intangible assets that are not deemed to have an indefinite life will continue to be amortized over their estimated useful lives. The amortization provisions of SFAS 142 initially applied only to goodwill and intangible assets related to business combinations accounted for by the purchase method that were completed after June 30, 2001. With respect to goodwill and intangible assets acquired prior to July 1, 2001, companies were required to adopt SFAS 142 in their fiscal year beginning after December 15, 2001 (i.e., January 1, 2002 for calendar year companies). Because of the different transition dates for goodwill and intangible assets acquired before June 30, 2001 and those acquired after that date, pre-existing goodwill and intangible assets were amortized during the transition period from June 30 to December 31, 2001. Effective January 1, 2002, Gallagher adopted the remaining provisions of SFAS 142 with respect to pre-existing goodwill and intangible assets, the effect of which was not material to Gallagher's consolidated operating results or financial position. 8
2. BUSINESS COMBINATIONS PURCHASE ACQUISITIONS In 2002, Gallagher acquired substantially all of the net assets of the following insurance brokerage and risk management firms for its common stock and/or cash using the purchase accounting method for recording business combinations (in thousands): Common shares exchanged in connection with these acquisitions were valued at closing market prices as of the effective date of the respective acquisition. Escrow deposits returned to Gallagher as a result of purchase price adjustment provisions are recorded as downward adjustments to intangible assets when the escrows are settled. The contingent payables that are disclosed in the foregoing table represent the maximum amount of additional consideration that could be paid per the purchase agreements. These contingent obligations are primarily based upon future earnings of the acquired entities and were not included in the purchase price that was recorded for these acquisitions at their respective dates of acquisition. Future payments made under these arrangements will be recorded as upward adjustments to goodwill when the contingencies are settled. The following is a summary of the estimated fair values of the assets acquired at the date of each acquisition based on preliminary purchase price allocations (in thousands): These acquisitions allow Gallagher to expand into desirable geographic locations, further extend its presence in the retail insurance brokerage services and risk management industries and increase the volume of general services currently provided. The excess of the purchase price over the estimated fair value of the tangible net assets acquired at the acquisition date for the 2002 acquisitions was allocated to goodwill, expiration lists and non-compete agreements in the amounts of $30,697,000, $20,200,000 and $8,784,000, respectively. With the exception of the intangible assets related to the MountainView Software Corporation acquisition, which were allocated to the Risk Management segment, all of the goodwill, expiration lists, and non-compete agreements were allocated to the Brokerage segment. Purchase price allocations are preliminarily established at the time of the acquisition and are subsequently reviewed within the first year of operation to determine the necessity for allocation adjustments. Expiration lists and non-compete agreements related to the 2002 acquisitions are currently being amortized on a straight-line basis over a weighted average useful life of 14 years and 6 years, respectively. Of the $20,200,000 of expiration lists and $8,784,000 of non-compete agreements related to the 2002 acquisitions, Gallagher expects $3,727,000 and $880,000, respectively, to be deductible for tax purposes. Accordingly, $10,530,000 of goodwill and a corresponding deferred tax liability related to the nondeductible amortizable intangible assets were established in the Financial Services segment, which is not included in the above table. 9
2. BUSINESS COMBINATIONS (CONTINUED) Gallagher's consolidated financial statements for the years ended December 31, 2002 include the operations of these companies from the dates of their respective acquisitions. The following is a summary of the unaudited proforma historical results, as if these entities had been acquired at January 1, 2002 and 2001, respectively (in thousands, except per share data): YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, ------------------------ 2002 2001 ------------------------------------------------ ----------- ----------- Gross revenues $ 1,119,978 $ 968,442 Net earnings 130,321 128,028 Basic net earnings per share 1.48 1.48 Diluted net earnings per share 1.41 1.40 The unaudited proforma results above have been prepared for comparative purposes only and do not purport to be indicative of the results of operations, which actually would have resulted had the acquisitions occurred as of January 1, 2002 and 2001, respectively, nor is it necessarily indicative of future operating results. In the second quarter of 2002, a 90% owned subsidiary of Gallagher acquired a leasing company that leases two cargo airplanes to the French postal service. As part of this acquisition, the subsidiary acquired assets of $47.0 million and assumed non-recourse long-term debt of $38.2 million, in exchange for $3.1 million of cash and $5.7 million of other assets. During the second quarter of 2002, Gallagher consolidated the financial results of this leasing company into its consolidated financial statements. POOLINGS OF INTERESTS ACQUISITIONS In 2001, Gallagher acquired substantially all of the net assets of the following insurance brokerage firms in exchange for shares of its common stock: The Galtney Group, Inc. dba Healthcare Insurance Services, 3,330,000 shares; MDM Insurance Associates, Inc., 752,000 shares; The InWest Group, Inc., 407,000 shares; SKANCO International, Ltd., 263,000 shares; Nelson/Monarch Insurance Services, Ltd., 109,000 shares: E.S. Susanin, Inc., 109,000 shares; Burgess & Associates, Inc., 73,000 shares; Madison Scott & Associates, Inc., 34,000 shares; Midwest Surety Services, Inc., 32,000 shares; and Central Surety Agency, Inc., 26,000 shares. These acquisitions were accounted for as poolings of interests and, except for three of these acquisitions whose results were not significant, the consolidated financial statements for all periods prior to the acquisition dates were restated in 2001 to include the operations of these companies. 3. RECLASSIFICATIONS OF PREVIOUSLY REPORTED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS Prior to 2003, commissions paid to sub-brokers on Gallagher's retail P/C brokerage business were reported as other operating expenses in Gallagher's consolidated statements of earnings. During 2003, Gallagher determined that it would be appropriate to report these amounts as offsets to gross revenues in the consolidated statements of earnings in order to conform to a more common industry practice. Previously reported financial statements have been reclassified to conform to this current year presentation and this reclassification had no impact on the previously reported net earnings or stockholders' equity. The impact on total revenues and expenses of this reclassification is presented in the consolidated statements of earnings. During the first quarter of 2003, Gallagher reviewed its historical segment disclosures and determined that it would be appropriate to change how the segment information is reported. Prior to 2003, Gallagher reported three operating segments, brokerage, risk management and financial services, and a corporate segment. For the 2003 segment disclosures, Gallagher has only reported the three operating segments and has allocated the corporate balances to the three operating segments. Allocations of investment income and certain expenses are based on reasonable assumptions and estimates. Reported operating results by segment would change if different methods were applied. Certain assets are not individually identifiable by segment and, accordingly, have been allocated based on formulas. Previously reported segment information has been reclassified to conform to the current year's presentation. During the first quarter of 2002, Gallagher undertook a review of how it was accounting for all of its partially owned entities. Given the current environment regarding ownership/control relationships with respect to partially owned entities, Gallagher determined that it would be appropriate to consolidate three operations that were previously accounted for using the equity method of accounting. In addition, prior to 2002, the premiums and claims receivable and payable of a reinsurance intermediary subsidiary of Gallagher were reported on a net basis in Gallagher's consolidated balance sheets, with the gross amounts disclosed in the notes to the consolidated financial statements. During 2002, Gallagher determined that it would be appropriate to include these amounts on a gross basis in its consolidated balance sheets in order to conform to a more common industry practice. Reclassifications have been made to the previously reported financial statements in order to conform them to the current year presentation. These reclassifications had no impact on the previously reported net earnings or stockholders' equity. The following summarizes the reclassifications that were made to the 2001 consolidated financial statements (in thousands, except per share data): 10
4. INVESTMENTS EQUITY INVESTMENTS Gallagher's equity investment philosophy generally consists of investing in tax advantaged and other investment projects that take a long-term view toward private sale or public offering. Gallagher uses the limited partnership or limited liability company forms of legal ownership to fund many of its investments in order to obtain favorable tax treatment with respect to gains, losses and distributions, while limiting its liability. Based on the ownership structure of these investments, management believes that Gallagher's exposure to losses related to these investments is limited to the combination of its net carrying value, letters of credit, financial guarantees and funding commitments. The following is a summary of Gallagher's investments and notes receivable and the related outstanding letters of credit, financial guarantees and funding commitments (in thousands): - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (2) Equals sum of (1)'s above. 11
4. INVESTMENTS (CONTINUED) Tax advantaged investments represents amounts invested by Gallagher in 32 limited partnerships (36 in 2001) that operate qualified affordable housing and alternative energy projects that are generating tax benefits to Gallagher on an ongoing basis. These benefits are in the form of both tax deductions for operating losses and tax credits. The tax advantaged investments are primarily accounted for using the effective yield method and are carried at amortized cost in the consolidated balance sheets. Under the effective yield method, Gallagher recognizes the tax credits as they are allocated by the partnerships, which are included, net of amortization of the investments as a component of the provision for income taxes. Gallagher's 25% equity investment in Asset Alliance Corporation, an alternative fund manager, is accounted for using the equity method of accounting. Accordingly, Gallagher's share of net earnings of this entity is included in consolidated net earnings. Venture capital investments at December 31, 2002 and 2001 consist primarily of minority investments in 14 and 17, respectively, real estate, asset management, insurance, energy, software and e-commerce companies, only one of which exceeded $5,000,000 individually at December 31, 2002. Venture capital investments included limited partnerships and other equity projects where Gallagher's ownership is between 3% and 50%. As a result, these investments are accounted for using either the lower of amortized cost/cost or fair value, or the equity method, whichever is appropriate, depending on the legal form of Gallagher's ownership interest and the applicable percentage of the entity owned. For the investments accounted for using the equity method, Gallagher's share of the net earnings of these entities is included in consolidated net earnings. The equity investment in Allied World Assurance Holding, Ltd, represents Gallagher's minority investment in a Bermuda based insurance and reinsurance company founded in 2001 by American International Group Inc., The Chubb Corporation and affiliates of Goldman, Sachs & Co. Notes receivable from investees primarily represent secured loans made by Gallagher of 10 of its investees (12 in 2001). Interest rates on the loans at December 31, 2002 and 2001 ranged form 4.75% to 10.0%. The carrying value of these loans at December 31, 2002 and 2001 approximated fair value. Investments accounted for on a consolidated basis include two real estate partnerships and an leasing company (2002 only). The real estate partnerships represent an investment in a limited partnership that owns the building that Gallagher leases for its corporate headquarters and several of its subsidiary operations, and an investment in a limited partnership that owns 11,000 acres of land under development near Orlando, Florida (Harmony). The airplane leasing company is a 90% owned subsidiary that owns the net assets of a leasing company that leases two cargo airplanes to the French postal service. These three investments are consolidated into Gallagher's consolidated financial statements because Gallagher's voting control in each of these investments is greater than 50%. The following is a summary of the assets and liabilities of Gallagher's unconsolidated investments, accounted for using the equity method, reconciled to Gallagher's net carrying value (in thousands): DECEMBER 31, --------------------------- 2002 2001 --------------------------------------------- ------------ ------------ Net current assets $ 84,321 $ 98,241 Other noncurrent assets 315,859 249,110 Net fixed assets 31,438 25,182 Net intangible assets 86,454 135,104 Debt outstanding (306,711) (327,281) Other noncurrent liabilities (120,901) (78,735) Interests of other shareholders (32,864) (45,778) ------------ ------------ Gallagher's net carrying value $ 57,596 $ 55,843 ============ ============ 12
4. INVESTMENTS (CONTINUED) The following is a summary of the total debt outstanding and Gallagher's commitments related to Gallagher's unconsolidated investments accounted for using the equity method (in thousands): See Notes 7 and 15 for additional commitments and contingencies. INVESTMENT INCOME AND OTHER Significant components of investment income and other are as follows (in thousands): 13
4. INVESTMENTS (CONTINUED) INCOME FROM TAX ADVANTAGED INVESTMENTS Income from tax advantaged investments in 2002 and 2001 primarily relates to the sales of interests in three alternative energy related limited partnerships. During the third quarter of 2001, Gallagher completed the sale of a 95% interest in one of its synthetic fuel facilities located in South Carolina. Under the sale agreement, Gallagher received an initial nonrefundable down-payment of $6,700,000 and will receive additional installment payments over time through 2007 based on qualified fuel production generated by the facility. Gallagher recognized installment gains of $18,208,000 and $8,242,000 on this sale transaction in 2002 and 2001 respectively. Gallagher retains a 5% partnership interest in this synthetic fuel facility. During the fourth quarter of 2001 and the first and fourth quarters of 2002, Gallagher completed the sales of 95% of its interest in a partnership that owns a 59.9% interest in a synthetic fuel facility also located in South Carolina. Gallagher received aggregate down-payments of $4,493,000 and will receive additional installment payments over time through 2007 based on qualified fuel production generated by the facility. The buyer has the option to put the purchased interests back to Gallagher if certain adverse tax consequences occur through 2007. In the event of a put, Gallagher would retain all installment payments made through the put date and a pro-rated portion of the initial down-payments. Gallagher recognized installment gains of $15,360,000 and $2,050,000 respectively on this sale transaction in 2002 and 2001 respectively. Gallagher retains a 3% partnership interest in this synthetic fuel facility. Effective December 31, 2000, Gallagher completed the sale of its interests in several partnerships that operate landfill gas facilities. Gallagher received an initial down-payment of $8,706,000 and will receive additional installment payments over time through 2007 based on qualified fuel production generated by the facilities. Gallagher recognized installment gains of $1,012,000 and $1,411,000 on this sale transaction in 2002 and 2001 respectively. This transaction had no impact on Gallagher's 2000 results. In 2000, Gallagher recognized $7,200,000 of income related to the forfeiture of a non-refundable down-payment from the termination of an installment sale of a synthetic fuel facility and $2,000,000 of income related to an investment development fee generated from one of Gallagher's alternative energy investments. INCOME FROM CONSOLIDATED INVESTMENTS Income from consolidated investments in 2002, 2001 and 2000 primarily represents rental income related to the airplane leasing company (2002 only) and the two real estate partnerships previously discussed. Rental income of the corporate headquarters limited partnership was $7,165,000, $7,428,000 and $2,351,000 in 2002, 2001 and 2000, respectively. Total expenses associated with this income, including interest and depreciation expenses, were $7,479,000, $7,712,000 and $2,508,000 in 2002, 2001 and 2000, respectively. In 2002, rental income of the airplane leasing company was $1,943,000 and total expenses associated with this income, including interest and depreciation expenses, was $2,904,000. GAINS ON SALES OF OPERATIONS In 2002, Gallagher sold a P/C book of business and recorded a gain on the sale of $2,500,000. In 2001, Gallagher sold a benefits administration book of business that was underperforming and recorded a gain on the sale of $2,375,000. In 2000, Gallagher sold several underperforming or geographically undesirable operations and recorded aggregate gains on these sales of $1,823,000. The net assets sold and the operating results included in the consolidated statements of earnings related to these operations were not material to the consolidated financial statements. OTHER INCOME Other income in 2002 and 2001 consists primarily of investment related fees paid to Gallagher for providing letters of credit and financial guarantees to its investees. Other income in 2000 consists primarily of other income attributable to the restatement effects of the 2001 and 2000 acquisitions accounted for as poolings of interests. MARKETABLE SECURITIES The following is a summary of marketable securities -- available for sale (in thousands): COST OR GROSS GROSS AMORTIZED UNREALIZED UNREALIZED FAIR DECEMBER 31, 2001 COST GAINS LOSSES VALUE --------------------- ----------- ------------ ------------ --------- Preferred stocks $ 11,567 $ 215 $ 991 $ 10,791 Common stocks 6,635 228 2,161 4,702 Fixed maturities 4,461 20 1,684 2,797 ----------- ------------ ------------ --------- $ 22,663 $ 463 $ 4,836 $ 18,290 =========== ============ ============ ========= The gross realized gains on sales of marketable securities -- available for sale totaled $527,000, $2,420,000 and $884,000 for 2002,2001 and 2000, respectively. The gross realized losses totaled $414,000, $690,000 and $750,000 for 2002,2001 and 2000, respectively. In addition, in 2002 and 2001, Gallagher recognized other-than-temporary impairment losses of $10,571,000 and $577,000, respectively, related to its marketable securities -- available for sale portfolio. Effective September 30, 2002, Gallagher reclassified its marketable securities portfolio from available for sale to trading based on changes in investment philosophy. The components of other comprehensive earnings (loss), including the related income tax effects, consist of the following (in thousands): 14
5. FIXED ASSETS Major classes of fixed assets consist of the following (in thousands): DECEMBER 31, ------------------------------ 2002 2001 --------------------------------------------- ------------- ------------- Furniture and equipment $ 137,837 $ 122,325 Buildings and improvements 96,678 96,647 Land and improvements 54,306 43,254 Airplanes of leasing company 51,793 -- Leasehold improvements 26,659 21,581 ------------- ------------- $ 367,273 $ 283,807 ============= ============= 6. INTANGIBLE ASSETS Major classes of amortizable intangible assets of the following (in thousands): DECEMBER 31, ------------------------------ 2002 2001 - ---------------------------------------------- ------------- ------------- Expiration lists $ 45,150 $ 11,233 Accumulated amortization -- Expiration lists (5,686) (1,444) ------------- ------------- 39,464 9,789 Non-compete agreements 13,146 235 Accumulated amortization -- Non-compete agreements (1,765) (158) ------------- ------------- 11,381 77 ------------- ------------- $ 50,845 $ 9,866 ============= ============= Estimated aggregate amortization expense for each of the next five years is as follows: 2003 $ 7,745 2004 7,576 2005 7,244 2006 6,300 2007 5,625 ------------- Total $ 34,490 ============= The changes in the carrying amount of goodwill for the year ended December 31, 2002 are as follows (in thousands): 15
7. CREDIT AND OTHER DEBT AGREEMENTS In 2000, Gallagher and its financial services subsidiary entered into an unsecured Revolving Credit Agreement (the Credit Agreement), which expires on September 10, 2003, with a group of five financial institutions. The Credit Agreement provides for short-term and long-term revolving credit commitments of $100,000,000 and $50,000,000, respectively. The Credit Agreement provides for loans and letters of credit. Letters of credit are limited to $75,000,000, of which up to $50,000,000 may be issued under the long-term facility and up to $25,000,000 may be issued under the short-term facility in the determination of net funds available for future borrowing. The Credit Agreement provides for borrowings to be denominated in either U.S. dollars or Alternative Currencies, as defined in the Credit Agreement. In addition, the Credit Agreement has two borrowing options, Domestic Rate Loans and Eurocurrency Loans, as defined in the Credit Agreement. Interest rates on borrowings under the Domestic Rate Loan option are based on the prime commercial rate and interest rates on borrowings under the Eurocurrency Loan option are based on LIBOR plus .40% for short-term and long-term revolving credit commitments. The facility fee related to the Credit Agreement is .10% of the used and unused portions of the short-term and long-term revolving credit commitments. Terms of the Credit Agreement include various covenants that require Gallagher to maintain specified levels of net worth and restrict the amount of payments on certain expenditures and debt outside the facility. Gallagher was in compliance with these covenants as of December 31, 2002. As of December 31, 2002, under the Credit Agreement, Gallagher has contingently committed to funding $54,250,000 through letter of credit arrangements related to its corporate insurance programs and several of its equity and other strategic investments. Also, as of December 31, 2002 and 2001 respectively, there were $25,000,000 and $35,000,000 of short-term borrowings outstanding under the Credit Agreement. Accordingly, Gallagher had $70,750,000 available at December 31, 2002 for future borrowing. The following is a summary of Gallagher's Credit Agreement and limited partnership consolidated debt (in thousands): See Note 15 for additional discussion on commitments and contingencies. 16
8. CAPITAL STOCK AND STOCKHOLDERS' RIGHTS PLAN CAPITAL STOCK The table below summarizes certain information about Gallagher's capital stock at December 31, 2002 and 2001 (in thousands, except par value data): AUTHORIZED CLASS PAR VALUE SHARES ---------------------------------------------- ----------- ---------- Preferred stock No Par 1,000 Common stock $ 1.00 400,000 STOCKHOLDERS' RIGHTS PLAN Non-voting Rights, authorized by the Board of Directors on March 10, 1987 and approved by stockholders on May 12, 1987, are outstanding on each share of Gallagher's outstanding common stock. The Rights Plan was amended in 1996 to extend the expiration of the Rights to May 12, 2007. Under certain conditions, each Right may be exercised to purchase one share of common stock at an exercise price of $25. The Rights become exercisable and transferable after a public announcement that a person or group (as defined) has acquired 20% or more of the common stock or after commencement or public announcement of a tender offer for 30% or more of the common stock. If Gallagher is acquired in a merger or business combination each Right exercised gives the holder the right to purchase $50 of market value of common stock of surviving company for the $25 exercise price. The Rights may be redeemed by Gallagher at $.0125 per Right at any time prior to the public announcement of the acquisition of 20% of the common stock. 9. EARNINGS PER SHARE The following table sets forth the computation of basic and diluted net earnings per share (in thousands, except per share data): Options to purchase 252,000, 231,000 and 313,000 shares of common stock were outstanding at December 31, 2002, 2001 and 2000, respectively, but were not included in the computation of the dilutive effect of stock options. These options were excluded from the computation because the options' exercise prices were greater than the average market price of the common shares during the respective year and, therefore, would be antidilutive to earnings per share under the treasury stock method. 17
10. STOCK OPTION PLANS Gallagher has incentive and nonqualified stock option plans for officers and key employees of Gallagher and its subsidiaries. The options are primarily granted at the fair value of the underlying shares at the date of grant. Options granted under the nonqualified plan primarily become exercisable at the rate of 10% per year beginning the calendar year after the date of grant or earlier in the event of death, disability or retirement. Options expire 10 years from the date of grant, or earlier in the event of termination of the employee. In addition, Gallagher has a non-employee directors' stock option plan, which currently authorizes 1,025,000 shares for grant, with Discretionary Options granted at the direction of the Compensation Committee and Retainer Options granted in lieu of the directors' annual retainer. Discretionary Options shall be exercisable at such rates as shall be determined by the Committee on the date of grant. Retainer Options shall be cumulatively exercisable at the rate of 25% of the total Retainer Option at the end of each full fiscal quarter succeeding the date of grant. The excess of fair value at the date of grant over the option price for these nonqualified stock options is considered compensation and is charged against earnings ratably over the vesting period. Gallagher also has an incentive stock option plan for its officers and key employees resident in the United Kingdom. The United Kingdom plan is essentially the same as Gallagher's domestic employee stock option plans, with certain modifications to comply with United Kingdom law and to provide potentially favorable tax treatment for grantees resident in the United Kingdom. All of the aforementioned stock option plans provide for the immediate vesting of all outstanding stock option grants in the event of a change in control of Gallagher. A change in control of Gallagher is defined as the acquisition by a person (or entity) of the beneficial ownership of 50% or more of Gallagher's common stock; the cessation, for any reason, of a majority of directors of Gallagher to serve as directors during any two year period; or the approval by the stockholders of Gallagher of the sale of substantially all of the assets of Gallagher. For purposes of the pro forma disclosures (see Note 1), the estimated fair values of the stock option grants are amortized to expense over the options' expected lives. The fair value of stock options at the date of grant was estimated using the Black-Scholes option pricing model with the following weighted average assumptions: YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, ----------------------------------- 2002 2001 2000 -------------------------------- ------ ------ ------ Dividend yield 3.0% 3.0% 2.5% Risk-free interest rate 3.8% 5.0% 5.1% Volatility 26.1% 24.5% 24.6% Expected life (in years) 6.0 5.3 6.0 The Black-Scholes option valuation model was developed for use in estimating the fair value of traded options which have no vesting restrictions and are fully transferable. In addition, option valuation models require the input of highly subjective assumptions including the expected stock price volatility. Because Gallagher's employee and director stock options have characteristics significantly different from those of traded options, and because changes in the selective input assumptions can materially affect the fair value estimate, in management's opinion, the existing models do not necessarily provide a reliable single measure of the fair value of its employee and director stock options. The following is a summary of Gallagher's stock option activity and related information (in thousands, except exercise price data): Options with respect to 6,686,000 shares were available for grant at December 31, 2002. 18
10. STOCK OPTION PLANS (CONTINUED) Other information regarding stock options outstanding and exercisable at December 31, 2002 is summarized as follows (in thousands, except exercise price data): 11. DEFERRED COMPENSATION In 2001, Gallagher implemented the Deferred Equity Participation Plan, which is a nonqualified plan that provides for distributions to certain key executives of Gallagher upon their normal retirement. Under the provisions of the plan, Gallagher contributes shares of its common stock, in an amount approved by Gallagher's Board of Directors, to a rabbi trust on behalf of the executives participating in the plan. Distributions under the plan normally may not be made until the participant reaches age 62 and are subject to forfeiture in the event of voluntary termination of employment prior to age 62. All distributions from the plan are made in the form of Gallagher's common stock. In 2002 and 2001, Gallagher contributed $4,031,000 and $4,000,000, respectively, to the plan through the issuance of 123,000 and 152,000 shares of Gallagher common stock. Gallagher accounts for the common stock issued to the plan in accordance with the provisions of Emerging Issues Task Force (EITF) Issue No 97-14, "Accounting for Deferred Compensation Arrangement Where Amounts Earned are Held in Rabbi Trust and Invested." EITF 97-14 requires that the Gallagher common stock issued to the trust be value at historical cost (fair market value at the date of grant) and the unearned deferred compensation obligation be classified as an equity instrument, with no recognition of changes in the fair value of the amount owed to the participants. The unearned deferred compensation balance is shown as a reduction of stockholders equity in the accompanying 2002 and 2001 consolidated balance sheets and is being amortized ratably over the vesting period of the participants. During 2002 and 2001, $925,000 and $562,000, respectively, were charged to expense related to this plan. 12. RESTRICTED STOCK AWARDS In 2001, Gallagher adopted an incentive compensation plan for several of its key executives and management personnel. The compensation under this plan is determined by a formula applied to the pretax profitability of certain operating divisions and may include an equity award as part of such incentive compensation. Effective on March 31, 2002 Gallagher contributed 274,000 shares of Gallagher common stock to the plan, with an aggregate value of $8,972,000 as of that date. Also, effective on March 31, 2002, Gallagher granted, to its Chief Executive Officer, a restricted stock award of 32,000 shares of Gallagher common stock with an aggregate value of $1,059,000 at the time of grant. All of the 2002 restricted stock awards vest over a three-year period at the rate of 33 1/3% per year beginning on March 31, 2003. Gallagher accounts for restricted stock at historical cost, which equals its fair market value at the date of grant. When restricted shares are issued, an unearned restricted stock obligation is recorded as a reduction of stockholders' equity, which will be ratably charged to salary expense over the vesting period of the participants. During 2002, $2,508,000 was charged to expense related to these awards. 13. RETIREMENT PLANS Gallagher has a noncontributory defined benefit pension plan that covers substantially all domestic employees who have attained a specified age and one year of employment. Benefits under the plan are based on years of service and salary history. Plan assets consist primarily of common stocks and bonds invested under the terms of a group annuity contract managed by a life insurance company. Gallagher accounts for the defined benefit pension plan in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87 (SFAS 87), "Employers' Accounting for Pensions." The difference the present value of the pension benefit obligation at the date of adoption of SFAS 87 and the fair value of plan assets at that date is being amortized on a straight-line basis over the average service period of employees expected to receive benefits. 19
13. RETIREMENT PLANS (CONTINUED) A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances of the pension benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets and the funded status of the plan is as follows (in thousands): YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, ------------------------- 2002 2001 ----------------------------------------------- ----------- ----------- CHANGE IN PENSION BENEFIT OBLIGATION: Pension benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 98,787 $ 92,792 Service cost 11,368 9,108 Interest cost 7,575 6,316 Plan amendments 2,958 -- Net actuarial loss (gain) 4,558 (7,711) Benefits paid (1,960) (1,718) ----------- ----------- Pension benefit obligation at end of year 123,286 98,787 ----------- ----------- CHANGE IN PLAN ASSETS: Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year 66,231 66,137 Actual return on plan assets (6,129) (3,481) Company contributions 24,573 5,293 Benefits paid (1,960) (1,718) ----------- ----------- Fair value of plan assets at end of year 82,715 66,231 ----------- ----------- Funded status of the plan (underfunded) (40,571) (32,556) Unrecognized net actuarial loss (gain) 14,080 (3,069) Unrecognized prior service cost 3,345 772 Unrecognized transition obligation 219 275 ----------- ----------- Accrued pension benefit cost $ (22,927) $ (34,578) =========== =========== The components of the net periodic pension benefit cost for the plan consists of the following (in thousands): The following assumptions were used in determining the plan's pension benefit obligation: Gallagher has a qualified contributory savings and thrift (401(k)) plan covering the majority of its domestic employees. Gallagher's matching contributions (up to a maximum of 2% of eligible compensation) are at the discretion of Gallagher's Board of Directors and may not exceed the maximum amount deductible for federal income tax purposes. Gallagher contributed $5,347,000, $4,605,000, and $4,638,000 in 2002, 2001 and 2000, respectively. Effective January 1, 1999, Gallagher implemented a nonqualified deferred compensation plan for certain employees who, due to Internal Revenue Service rules, cannot take full advantage of the Gallagher matching contributions under the savings and thrift plan. The plan permits these employees to annually elect to defer a portion of their compensation until their retirement. Gallagher's matching contributions to this plan are also at the discretion of Gallagher's Board of Directors. Gallagher contributed $430,000, $471,000 and $316,000 to the plan in 2002, 2001, and 2000, respectively. The fair value of the plan's assets as of December 31, 2002, and 2001 respectively, including employee contributions and investment earnings thereon, was $16,040,000 and $12,461,000, respectively, and has been included in other noncurrent assets and the corresponding liability has been included in other noncurrent liabilities in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Gallagher also has a foreign defined contribution plan that provides for basic contributions by Gallagher and voluntary contributions by employees resident in the United Kingdom, which are matched 100% by Gallagher, up to a maximum of 5% of eligible compensation. Net expense for foreign retirement plans amounted to $4,332,000 in 2002, $3,392,000 in 2001 and $2,921,000 in 2000. 20
14. POSTRETIREMENT BENEFITS OTHER THAN PENSIONS In 1992, Gallagher amended its health plan to eliminate retiree coverage, except for retirees and those employees who had already attained as specified age and length of services at the time of the amendment. The retiree health plan is contributory, with contributions adjusted annually, and is funded on a pay-as-you-go basis. A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balance of the postretirement benefit obligation and the funded status of the plan is as follows (in thousands): The components of the net periodic postretirement benefit cost include the following (in thousands): The discount rate used to measure the postretirement benefit obligation was 6.75% at December 31, 2002, and 7.50% at December 31,2001 and 2000. The transition obligation is being amortized over a 20-year period. For measurement purposes, a 6.50% annual rate of increase in the per capita cost of covered healthcare benefits was assumed for 2003. This rate was assumed to gradually scale down to 4.50% for 2009 and remain at that level thereafter. The assumed healthcare cost trend rate has a significant effect on the amounts reported and disclosed herein. A one percentage point change in the assumed healthcare cost trend rate would have the following effects (in thousands): 21
15. COMMITMENTS, CONTINGENCIES AND FINANCIAL GUARANTEES Gallagher generally operates in leased premises. Certain office space leases have options permitting renewals for additional periods. In addition to minimum fixed rentals, a number of leases contain annual escalation clauses generally related to increases in an inflation index. Total rent expense, including rent relating to cancelable leases and leases with initial terms of less than one year, amounted to $49,900,000 in 2002, $46,721,000 in 2001 and $40,231,000 in 2000. In connection with its investing and operating activities, Gallagher has entered into certain contractual obligations as well as commitments to fund certain investments. Gallagher's future cash payments, excluding interest, associated with its contractual obligations pursuant to the Credit Agreement, limited partnership debt obligations and operating leases as of December 31, 2002 are as follows (in thousands): The debt of the limited partnerships and the airplane leasing company disclosed in the table above represents the debt of three of Gallagher's investments that are accounted for on a consolidated basis in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. This debt is secured by the partnerships' assets and supports their operations. Approximately $32.4 million of the limited partnership debt is recourse to Gallagher through the letters of credit and financial guarantees which are included below. Gallagher's commitments associated with outstanding letters of credit (LOC), financial guarantees and funding commitments as of December 31, 2002 are as follows (all dollar amounts in table and related footnotes are in thousands): 22
15. COMMITMENTS, CONTINGENCIES AND FINANCIAL GUARANTEES (CONTINUED) (1) Plus interest and collection expenses. (2) Plus interest and collection expenses on $20,000 of the total. (3) The land. (4) The property secures the loan. (5) A portion of the property secures one of the lines of credit and the two bond issues. (6) Gallagher is in the process of negotiating a retroactive, annual, cumulative fee for $30,100 of the LOCs and guarantees. The remaining $12,575 LOC has a fee of $750 plus an interest rate differential. (7) Lien on real property with an appraised value of approximately $12,500. (8) The majority owners of the operation that has $3,100 of the LOCs pledge their percentage ownership portion of any draw. Since commitments may expire unused, the amounts presented in the table above do not necessarily reflect the actual future cash funding requirements of Gallagher. LITIGATION Gallagher is engaged in various legal actions incident to the nature of its business. Management is of the opinion that none of the litigation will have a material effect on Gallagher's consolidated financial position or operating results. Gallagher's financial services subsidiary is party to a lawsuit relating to its investment in the synthetic fuel industry which, if determined adversely to the subsidiary on substantially all claims and for a substantial amount of the damages asserted, could have a material adverse effect on Gallagher. However, Gallagher believes that the plaintiff's claims lack merit. The subsidiary is vigorously defending such claims and has asserted counterclaims against the plaintiff. See Notes 4 and 7 for additional discussion on commitments and contingencies. 23
16. INCOME TAXES Significant components of earnings before income taxes and the provision for income taxes are as follows (in thousands): A reconciliation of the provision for income taxes with the United States federal income tax rate is as follows (in thousands): 24
16. INCOME TAXES (CONTINUED) Deferred income taxes reflect the net tax effects of temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities for financial reporting purposes and the amounts used for income tax purposes. Significant components of Gallagher's deferred tax liabilities and assets are as follows (in thousands): At December 31, 2002 and 2001, $57,622,000 and $53,145,000 respectively, of deferred tax assets have been included in other current assets in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. AMT credits and other have an indefinite and 20 year life, respectively. Gallagher expects to fully utilize the amounts carried forward. During the period from 1994 to 1996, Gallagher provided for United States federal income taxes on the undistributed earnings of its foreign subsidiaries. Due to changes in the United States federal income tax laws effective in 1997, Gallagher no longer provides for United States federal income taxes on the undistributed earnings ($42,000,000 at December 31, 2002) of certain foreign subsidiaries which are considered permanently invested outside of the United States. The amount of unrecognized deferred tax liability on these undistributed earnings is $9,000,000 at December 31, 2002. 17. QUARTERLY OPERATING RESULTS (UNAUDITED) Quarterly operating results for 2002 and 2001 were as follows (in thousands, except per share data): 25
18. SEGMENT INFORMATION Gallagher has identified three operating segments: Brokerage, Risk Management and Financial Services. The Brokerage Segment represents three operating divisions: Retail Brokerage Services, Wholesale Brokerage Services and Gallagher Benefit Services. The Brokerage segment, for commission or fee compensation, places commercial property/casualty and employee benefit-related insurance on behalf of its customers. The Risk Management segment provides property/casualty and health claim third-party administration, loss control and risk management consulting and insurance property appraisals. Third-party administration is principally the management and processing of claims for self-insurance programs of Gallagher's clients or clients of other brokers. The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's diversified investment portfolio to maximize long-term after-tax returns. Allocations of investment income and certain expenses are based on assumptions and estimates. Reported operating results by segment would change if different methods were applied. Certain assets are not individually identifiable by segment and, accordingly, have been allocated based on formulas. Financial information relating to Gallagher's operating segments for 2002, 2001 and 2000 is as follows (in thousands): 26
18. SEGMENT INFORMATION (CONTINUED) 27


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20030722170815.txt.gz
TIME:20030722170815
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 July 22, 2003 Date of Report: (Date of earliest event reported) ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 1-9761 36-2151613 ---------------------- -------------------- ------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission File Number) (I.R.S. Employer of incorporation or organization) Identification Number) Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141, (630) 773-3800 (Address, including zip code and telephone number, including area code, of registrant's principal executive offices) Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (including information being provided under Item 12) The following information is furnished pursuant to Item 9 "Regulation FD Disclosure" and Item 12 "Disclosure of Results of Operations and Financial Condition". The information furnished pursuant to Item 12 is included under this Item 9 in accordance with SEC Release Nos. 33-8216 and 34- 47583. On July 22, 2003, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("AJG") issued a press release setting forth AJG's second quarter 2003 earnings. A copy of AJG's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit (99) and hereby incorporated by reference.
Exhibit Index (99) Press release, dated July 22, 2003, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. By: /s/ Douglas K. Howell ------------------------------------------ Douglas K. Howell Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: July 22, 2003

[LOGO] Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACT: Marsha J. Akin Investor Relations (630) 773-3800 www.ajg.com ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ANNOUNCES SECOND QUARTER 2003 FINANCIAL RESULTS ITASCA, IL, July 22, 2003 -- Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today reported its financial results for the three- and six-month periods ended June 30, 2003. A printer-friendly format is available at www.ajg.com. 3 Months Ended June 30 6 Months Ended June 30 Brokerage Segment Highlights - Second Quarter 2003 o Record second quarter net earnings per share - up 41% over second quarter 2002. o 32% increase in pretax net income. o Improved compensation ratio - down to 55% from 58% in first quarter 2003. o The company's 2001 and 2002 organic hiring strategy is delivering better-than-expected results. o Solid 17% revenue growth, of which 14% is organic. Risk Management Segment Highlights - Second Quarter 2003 o Outstanding second quarter revenue growth of 16% - all organic. o Claim counts have returned to pre-9/11 levels. o Continued customer retention levels in excess of 98%. Financial Services Segment Highlights - Second Quarter 2003 o New synthetic fuel project up and running. o Prior year second quarter included net non-recurring investment gains of $9.3 million after tax, or $0.10 per share. (1 of 5)
"We are extremely pleased with the pretax margin improvements seen in our Brokerage segment during the second quarter - up 2% over second quarter 2002 and up 4% over first quarter 2003," said President and Chief Executive Officer, J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. "These margin improvements contributed to our Brokerage segment's 32% growth in pretax earnings in the second quarter and 19% growth in the six months ended June 30, 2003. Our entire production force, including new hires and merger partners, are all performing well. Our clients are pleased that our niche strategy and alternative market expertise continue to provide them with great value during this challenging pricing environment." "Our Risk Management segment continues to improve its growth rate. Claim counts have returned to pre-9/11 levels largely due to strong new business production, and client retention levels continue to exceed 98%," added Mr. Gallagher. The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 23, 2003 at 9:00am EDT to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to www.ajg.com. * * * * * Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange. Additional information about Gallagher may be found at www.ajg.com. This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. (2 of 5)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Segment Statement of Earnings (1) (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) See notes to the second quarter 2003 earnings release on page 5 of 5. (3 of 5)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Statement of Earnings (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) Consolidated Balance Sheet (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) See notes to the second quarter 2003 earnings release on page 5 of 5. (4 of 5)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Unconsolidated Investment Summary (Unaudited - in millions) Notes to Second Quarter 2003 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures - ----------------------------------------------------------------------------- (1) The information presented above has been reclassified to reflect the current year presentation. In prior years, the Company has presented a "Corporate" segment. For purposes of this and future presentations, the Corporate segment has been allocated to each of the three operating segments. (2) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of depreciation, amortization and investment gains (losses) divided by the weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding during the period. (3) Represents the percentage increase in revenues before the impact of the 2003 and 2002 acquisitions accounted for as purchases. (4) Represents total stockholders' equity less goodwill - net and amortizable intangible assets - net. (5) Represents tangible net worth divided by the common shares outstanding at the end of the period. (5 of 5) # # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20031021172847.txt.gz
TIME:20031021172847
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 Form 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15 (D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 October 21, 2003 ------------------------------------------------- Date of Report: (Date of earliest event reported) ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ------------------------------------------------------ (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 1-9761 36-2151613 - --------------------------------- ---------------- ---------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission File (I.R.S. Employer of incorporation or organization) Number) Identification Number) Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141, (630) 773-3800 -------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address, including zip code and telephone number, including area code, or registrant's principal executive offices) Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition On October 21, 2003, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("AJG") issued a press release setting forth AJG's third quarter 2003 earnings. A copy of AJG's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit (99) and hereby incorporated by reference.
Exhibit Index (99) Press release, dated October 21, 2003, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. By: /s/ Douglas K. Howell ------------------------ Douglas K. Howell Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: October 21, 2003

Exhibit 99 [LOGO] Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACT: Marsha J. Akin Investor Relations (630) 773-3800 www.ajg.com ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ANNOUNCES RECORD THIRD QUARTER 2003 FINANCIAL RESULTS ITASCA, IL, October 21, 2003-- Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today reported its financial results for the three- and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2003. A printer-friendly format is available at www.ajg.com. Brokerage Segment Highlights - Third Quarter 2003 o Record third quarter net earnings per share - up 25% over prior year. o Pretax margin up to 24%. o Improved compensation ratio. o 2001 and 2002 organic hiring strategy delivering better-than-expected results. o Solid 12% revenue growth for the quarter, of which 9% is organic. And 16% growth YTD, of which 12% is organic. Risk Management Segment Highlights - Third Quarter 2003 o Third quarter pretax earnings up 74% over prior year and up 22% YTD. o Claim counts continue to grow - now exceeding pre 9/11 levels. o Pretax margin of 14% - up 5% over third quarter 2002. o Excellent 16% revenue growth in the quarter and 14% YTD - all of which is organic. (1 of 6)
Financial Services Segment Highlights - Third Quarter 2003 o We continue to reduce our investment holdings. o Synthetic fuel production for the quarter was ahead of prior quarters, resulting in a 24% effective tax rate versus 30% in 2002. o Prior year third quarter included non-recurring net investment losses of $20.2 million after tax, or $0.22 per diluted share. o Adoption of FIN 46 - In the third quarter of 2003, the company early adopted a new accounting pronouncement, FASB Interpretation No. 46 (FIN 46) - "Consolidation of Variable Interest Entities," which required the company to consolidate one partially-owned investment partnership not previously consolidated because it is not controlled by the company through a majority voting interest. The adoption of FIN 46 did not result in any additional debt on the company's balance sheet nor did it have any impact on its consolidated net earnings or stockholders' equity. The effect of consolidating this one investment partnership on the company's consolidated statement of earnings and balance sheet is shown on pages 3 and 6, respectively, of this earnings release. "We are extremely pleased with the quarter-to-quarter improvement in our Brokerage segment's pretax margin - up 6% over second quarter 2003 and up 10% over first quarter 2003," said President and Chief Executive Officer, J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. "A solid quarter of 12% revenue growth on top of third quarter 2002's growth of 36% is an outstanding achievement by our Brokerage operations. In the first 9 months of 2003, we grew revenues by 16% over the same period in 2002. When compared to the first 9 months of 2001, our Brokerage revenues have grown $205.2 million, or 50%. Organic growth continues to be strong at 9% for the quarter and 12% for the first 9 months of 2003. We applaud the success of our employees, especially the new hires who have contributed greatly to this growth." "Our Risk Management segment has improved its growth rate and margins despite the post-9/11 economic slow-down. This confirms Gallagher Bassett's continued recognition as the best and most stable claims management services provider in the business. Gallagher Bassett's clients receive great value from our efficient operating platform and from the service provided by its rock-solid adjustors and seasoned management team," added Mr. Gallagher. "AJG is stronger than ever," said Mr. Gallagher. "We have a solid balance sheet with over $400 million in tangible net worth. And, we distribute a significant portion of our earnings back to our shareholders every year. Since our IPO, we've increased our cash dividend, on average, 19% per year, and so far this year we've used $51 million to repurchase 1.9 million of our shares." The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 22, 2003 at 9:00am EDT to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to www.ajg.com. * * * * * Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange. This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. (2 of 6)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Segment Statement of Earnings (1) (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) See notes to the third quarter 2003 earnings release on page 5 of 6. (3 of 6)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Statement of Earnings (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) Consolidated Balance Sheet (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) See notes to the third quarter 2003 earnings release on page 5 of 6. (4 of 6)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Unconsolidated Investment Summary (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) Notes to Third Quarter 2003 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (1) The information presented above has been reclassified to reflect the current year presentation. In prior years, the company presented a "Corporate" segment. For purposes of this and future presentations, the Corporate segment has been allocated to the remaining three operating segments. (2) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of investment gains (losses), depreciation and amortization divided by the weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding during the period. The company's consolidated cash earnings for the three- and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2003 we computed as follows: (3) Represents the percentage increase in revenues before the impact of the 2003 and 2002 acquisitions accounted for as purchases. (4) Represents annualized net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity less net goodwill and net amortizable intangible assets. (5) Represents total stockholders' equity less net goodwill and net amortizable intangible assets. (6) Represents tangible net worth divided by the common shares outstanding at the end of the period. (5 of 6)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Investment Summary (Unaudited - in millions) (6 of 6) # # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20040127171735.txt.gz
TIME:20040127171735
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 Form 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15 (D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 January 27, 2004 ---------------- Date of Report: (Date of earliest event reported) ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 1-9761 36-2151613 - --------------------------------- ------------- ---------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (I.R.S. Employer of incorporation or organization) File Number) Identification Number) Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141, (630) 773-3800 ------------------------------------------------------------- (Address, including zip code and telephone number, including area code, or registrant's principal executive offices)
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition On January 27, 2004, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("AJG") issued a press release setting forth AJG's fourth quarter 2003 earnings. A copy of AJG's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit (99) and hereby incorporated by reference. Exhibit Index (99) Press release, dated January 27, 2004, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. By: /s/ Douglas K. Howell ------------------------ Douglas K. Howell Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: January 27, 2004

Exhibit 99 [LOGO] Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE CONTACT: Marsha J. Akin Investor Relations (630) 773-3800 www.ajg.com ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. ANNOUNCES RECORD FOURTH QUARTER AND FULL YEAR 2003 FINANCIAL RESULTS ITASCA, IL, January 27, 2004-- Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today reported its financial results for the fourth quarter and full year 2003. A printer-friendly format is available at www.ajg.com. Brokerage Segment Highlights - 2003 o Record full year and fourth quarter net earnings per share - up 24% and 19%, respectively, over prior year. o Solid 15% revenue growth for the year, of which 10% is organic, and 10% growth in fourth quarter, of which 6% is organic. o Pretax margin at 19% and 21% for the full year and fourth quarter, respectively. o Improved fourth quarter compensation ratio to 52% despite margin drag of 1% related to expensing stock-based compensation (see below) and the adverse impact of foreign currency translation. Risk Management Segment Highlights - 2003 o Record full year and fourth quarter net earnings per share - up 46% and 125%, respectively, over prior year. o Excellent revenue growth of 14% and 16% for the year and fourth quarter, respectively, all of which is organic. o Increasing claim counts reflect excellent new business sales and recovering economic conditions. o Pretax margin of 13% for the year and fourth quarter - up 2% and 6% respectively, over prior year. o Client retention remains strong and client use of Gallagher's proprietary Risx-Facs system now exceeds 11 million page views per month. (1 of 7)
Financial Services Segment Highlights - 2003 o Synthetic fuel production for the year and fourth quarter was ahead of prior periods, resulting in a 24% effective tax rate in 2003 versus 30% in 2002. o Gallagher has an interest in a synthetic coal partnership that is under examination by the IRS for the year 2000. The IRS has advised Gallagher that their examination will be closed without any changes being proposed. Gallagher continues to believe that all of its synthetic coal partnerships have properly claimed tax credits. o Significant reduction in investment holdings net of related borrowings - down to $205.2 million at December 31, 2003 versus $297.7 million at December 31, 2002. o Substantial reduction in off-balance-sheet investment related letters of credit, financial guarantees and commitments - down to $35.1 million at December 31, 2003 from $64.6 million at December 31, 2002. o Full year results include net after tax investment losses of $18.5 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, in 2003 and $15.4 million net after tax, or $0.17 per diluted share, in 2002. o Adoption of FIN 46 - In the third quarter of 2003, Gallagher early adopted a new accounting pronouncement, FASB Interpretation No. 46 (FIN 46) - "Consolidation of Variable Interest Entities," which required the company to consolidate one investment not previously consolidated because the company does not control the investment through a majority voting interest. The adoption of FIN 46 did not result in any additional debt on the company's balance sheet nor did it have any impact on its consolidated net earnings or stockholders' equity. Adoption of New Accounting For Stock-Based Compensation - In the fourth quarter of 2003, the company early adopted the fair value method of accounting for employee stock options and its employee stock purchase plan pursuant to Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 123. This change in accounting method is being applied prospectively to all awards granted since January 1, 2003 resulting in a fourth quarter charge of $1.4 million after tax, or $0.02 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter 2003. The impact on prior 2003 quarters was not material. "Given the current insurance rate environment, we are extremely pleased with our Brokerage segment's growth of 10% in the fourth quarter and 15% for the full year 2003. Brokerage revenues are up 47% since 2001 - a great testament to Gallagher's sales culture," said President and Chief Executive Officer, J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. "Our Risk Management segment finished off a spectacular year by posting 16% revenue growth in the fourth quarter and 14% for the full year 2003. Margins continue to improve and our client retention rates remain strong. Gallagher Bassett continues its 40 year history of being the best and most stable claims management services provider in the business. "Together, our Brokerage and Risk Management segments' revenue grew 12% in the fourth quarter, of which 9% is organic, and 15% for the year, of which 11% is organic. Pretax income for these two combined segments grew 22% in the fourth quarter 2003 and 19% for the full year 2003. Since 2001, pretax income for these two segments is up 45%. "The Gallagher team accomplished a great number of positive initiatives during 2003. We validated our hiring strategy, returned $142.7 million in cash to our stockholders - $61.9 million in dividends and $80.8 million by repurchasing 2.9 million of our shares, increased our first quarter 2004 dividend 39% (announced on January 22, 2004), substantially exited our venture capital investments, significantly reduced our concentrations in other investment categories, improved the transparency of our financial reporting, reconstituted our Board of Directors to comprise a majority of independents (announced January 23, 2004), paid off all of our corporate related debt, executed an increased three-year $250 million line of credit, closed 14 acquisitions, and kept our tangible net worth at nearly $400 million," said Gallagher. The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, January 28, 2004 at 10:00am EDT to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to www.ajg.com. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in nine countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange. This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. (2 of 7)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Segment Statement of Earnings (1) (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) See notes to the fourth quarter 2003 earnings release on page 6 of 7. (3 of 7)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Segment Statement of Earnings (1) (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) Consolidated Statement of Earnings (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) See notes to the fourth quarter 2003 earnings release on page 6 of 7. (4 of 7)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Balance Sheet (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) See notes to the fourth quarter 2003 earnings release on page 6 of 7. (5 of 7)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Unconsolidated Investment Summary (Unaudited - in millions except per share data) Notes to Fourth Quarter 2003 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures (1) The information presented above has been reclassified to reflect the current year presentation. In prior years, the company presented a "Corporate" segment. For purposes of this and future presentations, the Corporate segment has been allocated to the remaining three operating segments. (2) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of investment gains (losses), depreciation and amortization divided by the weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding during the period. The company's consolidated cash earnings are computed as follows: (3) Represents the percentage increase in revenues before the impact of the 2003 and 2002 acquisitions accounted for as purchases. (4) Represents net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity less net goodwill and net amortizable intangible assets as of the beginning of the year. (5) Represents total stockholders' equity less net goodwill and net amortizable intangible assets. (6) Represents tangible net worth divided by the common shares outstanding at the end of the period. (6 of 7)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Consolidated Investment Summary (Unaudited - in millions) (7 of 7) # # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20040220165043.txt.gz
TIME:20040220165043
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) Exhibits. The following exhibits are furnished as part of this report.
 
99.1 Slides for the Company's presentations at investor conferences
 
99.2 Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Investment Profile
 
 
The slides and investment profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at the Company's website (). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 9, "Regulation FD Disclosure". These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on the Company's website at .
www.ajg.com
www.ajg.com
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: February 20, 2004
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
January 2004
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though perhaps not to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment, and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of existing in income tax laws. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
2
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm
Public since 1984
Market capitalization of $2.9 billion
Shares outstanding of 90.0 million
Dividend yield of 3.1% * (indicated as of Jan `04)
52-week range  $23.28$32.74
Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 12/31/03, unless otherwise indicated
* Yield given January 22, 2004 Board of Directors declaration of a $0.25 per share first quarter dividend.
4
 
Our Mission
We are an international Sales and Marketing company that plans and administers cost-effective, differentiated property/casualty and human resource risk management programs as brokers, consultants and third-party administrators.
Our mission is to: yProvide superior, cost-effective risk management products and services that meet the ever-changing needs of our current and prospective clients, while continuing to strive for the highest professional excellence in the delivery of those products and services. yProvide our employees with an opportunity for professional growth, personal satisfaction and financial security. yBuild and maintain long-lasting, consistent, honest and profitable relationships with our insurance markets, who we recognize play a crucial role in meeting our clients` risk management needs. yGrow shareholder value by increasing our client base, dedicating ourselves to increased productivity, profitability and professionalism resulting in long-term earnings-per-share growth.
We will accomplish our mission with the kind of leadership that will ensure perpetuation of our corporate culture. We will also adhere to rigid moral and ethical standards in all of our dealings as we look to the challenges of the future with confidence in our ability to create and maintain a Gallagher Team that is the very best at what we do.
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Stock Performance** vs. S&P
350% Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG]
S&P 500 (SPX)
300%
250%
200%
150%
100%
50%
0%
December-98 December-99 December-00 December-01 December-02 December-03
6
*excludes dividend reinvestment
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Competitors and Marketplace
COMPANY COMM/FEES U.S. / INT'L TARGET MARKET
Marsh 55% / 45% 55% / 45% Full Spectrum
Aon 65% / 35% 50% / 50% Full Spectrum
Gallagher 70% / 30% 90% / 10% Full Spectrum
Willis 70% / 30% 38% / 62% Full Spectrum
Brown 95% / 5% 100% / 0% Small/Middle
Hilb, Rogal 95% / 5% 100% / 0% Small/Middle
Percentages (per CSFB) are approximate
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$ 1,400 R R
$ 1,200 % CAG $200 CAG
1 9 2 6 %
$ 1,000
$150
$ 800
$ 600 $100
$ 400
$50
$ 200
$ 0 $ 0
1999 Gross Revenue 2003 1999 Cash Earnings 2003
$ 1.00 R *$ 1.00
$ 0.80 CAG
19%
$ 0.60
$ 0.40
$ 0.20
$ 0.00
1984 Dividends 2004
2003 cash generation of $196 M, or $2.10/share
5-year average ROE of 34% is highest in peer group
Highest dividend yield in peer group  3.1% indicated in 2004
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) Dec 31, 2003
Stock Price $ 1.72 $ 32.49
Market Cap $57 M $2.9 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $396 M
Annual Dividend/Share $ .03 $1.00 * (indicated)
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 18%
* On January 22, 2004, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.25 per share first quarter dividend.
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals
$ 1.9$2.2 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Beginning Stockholders' Equity
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven
Team-oriented
Open
"Small company" feel
Client-focused
Competitive
No "C" players
11
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Employee Survey Results
78% participation
96% understand the need to grow and are committed to helping grow the Company
92% Agree Customer is top priority
92% "I am proud to work for this Company"
90% of men and women felt they were treated with respect by co-workers
80% felt the Company could run more efficiently
The Gallagher Culture is Alive and Strong
12
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Achievements
Record revenues of $1.3B and earnings of $146M
Total Brokerage and Risk Management revenues increased 15%
Total Brokerage and Risk Management pre-tax income increased 19%
Validated organic hiring strategy
13
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Achievements (continued)
Returned $143M in cash to stockholders
$81M of share repurchases or 2.9M shares
$62M of dividends
Paid off all corporate related debt
Increased GAAP Book Value to $619M
Maintained tangible net worth at nearly $400M
14
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Achievements (continued)
Reduced concentrations of non-liquid investments and off balance sheet items by $122M
Navigated synfuel tax credit waters
Improved transparency of financial reporting
Early Adopted
FIN 46  Consolidation of Variable Interest Entities
SFAS 123Accounting for Stock Based
Compensation
15
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2003
Revenue Pretax Earnings
Brokerage Brokerage
69% 79%
Financial Services Financial Services
Risk Management Risk Management
6% 1%
25% 20%
Revenue excludes FIN 46 impact and investment write-off's
Pretax earnings exclude investment write-off's (no impact of FIN 46)
16
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher Competition
Gallagher's largest Marsh
business segment
Aon
Acts as intermediary 
Willis
no underwriting risk
Top 20 distributors only
Niche driven
control 25% of market (1)
Alternative market leaders
Merger opportunities
abound
(1) Business Insurance/JP Morgan
17
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities
Over 115 acquisitions since 1986 in this segment
Almost $460 million of 2003 revenue from acquired entities
The rules: financial health, similar culture
Gallagher is merger partner of choice
18
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth, Profits & Cash
R $172M
1000 $849M 180 A G
R 160 C
900 A G 2 0 %
800 % C 140
2 0
700 120
600 $381M 100 $75M
500 80
400 60
300 40
200 20
100 0
99 00 01 02 03 99 00 01 02 03
Revenue Pretax Earnings
2003 pretax cash earnings of $194 million
2003 pretax cash margin of 22%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
19
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage
62%
(Jim Gault)
Employee Benefits Specialty Marketing &
15% International
(Jim Durkin) 23%
(Dave McGurn)
20
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
21
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness Public Entity
Aviation Real Estate
General Commercial
Construction
Habitational
Energy Hospitality
Global Risk Management Shopping Centers
Healthcare Religious/Nonprofit
Higher Education Restaurant
Management Liability Scholastic K-12
Marine Transportation
Mergers & Acquisitions Worldwide Risk Services
Wrap Ups
Personal Insurance
22
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size
Acquisitions and hiring
Alternative market
Captives
Rent-a-captives
Deductible plans
Self-insurance
23
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices, Joint Ventures & Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Reinsurance Brokerage
International P&C Brokerage
Programs/Program Administration
CoverageFirst.com
Wholesale Brokerage
Captives/Rent-a-Captives
25
 
Specialty Marketing & International
High Growth & Profit Potential
Reinsurance brokerage
Programs and program administration
International business
Wholesale brokerage
26
 
Employee Benefits Offices
27
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Executive Benefits/ Brokerage/Consulting Financial Planning
Healthcare Data Human Resource Services Analysis/Benchmarking
Retirement Plan Services
Compliance Consulting
Employer Administrative
Merger & Acquisition Services Analysis
Business Continuation
Actuarial Services
Compensation Program Design/Analysis
28
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Brokerage Services
Merger and acquisition opportunities
Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs
Providing better retirement tools/information
Benefits communication and administration
Compliance with federal and state regulations
29
 
Risk Management Segment
Two Primary Operations
Property/Casualty Claims Management Medical Claims "Gallagher Bassett" Management 91% 9% (Rich McKenna) (Jim Durkin)
Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims.
30
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth, Profits & Cash
R R
CAG $322M G $43M
C A
350 5 % 45
1 %
300 40 2 3
35
250
30
200 25
150 20
15
100
10
50 5
0 0
99 03 99 03
Revenue Pretax Earnings
2003 pretax cash earnings of $52 million
2003 pretax cash margin of 16%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
31
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
 
Risk Management Segment
Capabilities
Real-time Claims Managed Care Services
Reporting
Loss Control Services
Recoveries (subrogation,
Safety Programs
salvage, etc.)
Settlement Management
Appraisal Services
Education and Training
Litigation Management
Information Management
33
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments
Captives
Program business
Expanding global capabilities
Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage
Security
Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet
Employer communication/plan administration
34
 
Financial Services Segment
$836 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($ 205 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($ 495 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($ 136 M)
* As of December 31, 2003  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
35
 
Financial Services Segment
Assets at December 31, 2002 & 2003
Assets Under Management Asset Classes 12/31/03
$ 80 Low Income Housing $20M
$ 298 $ 70
Alternative Fuel $74M
$ 310 $ 60
$ 290 $ 50 Trading Securities $5M
$ 270 $ 40 Asset Alliance $ 51M
$ 250
$ 205 $ 30
$ 230 Real Estate, incl HO $ 24M
$ 210 $ 20
$ 190 Bermuda Insurance $ 20M
$ 10
$ 170 VC, Airplanes & Other $11M
$ 0
$ 150
2002 2003 Tax Adv. Asset
Real Other
Mgmt. Estate
$            In millions
36
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007
Asset management  monetize
Real estate  optimize cash flows
Venture capital  substantially exited in 2003
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
Gross Revenues As Originally Reported ($            M)
$ 1,400 $ 1,304
G R
C A $ 1,101
$ 1,200 9 %
1
$ 1,000 $ 910
$ 741
$ 800
$ 606
$ 600
$ 400
$ 200
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
Pretax Earnings As Originally Reported ($            M)
R G $ 193
$ 200 C A $ 186
$ 180 18%
$ 160 $ 142
$ 140 $ 126
$ 120 $ 104
$ 100
$ 80
$ 60
$ 40
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
Revenue Per Employee As Reported
$ 181,000
G R
$ 180 C A
8 %
$ 170
$ 155,000
$ 160
$ 150 $ 140,000
$ 137,000
$ 140 $ 127,000
$ 130
$ 120
$ 110
$ 100
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
41
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted EPS As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01
G R $ 1.57
C A
$ 1.60 1 5%
$ 1.39 $ 1.41
$ 1.40
$ 1.20 $ 1.05
$ 1.00 $ .88
$ 0.80
$ 0.60
$ 0.40
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
42
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Annual Cash Earnings
As Originally Reported ($            M)
$ 196
G R
$ 200 C A
6 % $ 168
2
$ 150 $ 129
$ 91
$ 100 $ 74
$ 50
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
43
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Industry-Leading ROE
Largest Positive Tangible Net Worth in Peer Group*
35.0%
30.0% 5-Year
Average
25.0%
ROE
20.0% 34%
15.0% 5-Year
10.0% Average
ROE
5.0% 18%
0.0%
Peers Gallagher
* As of 9/30/03
44
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.1 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($ 337 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($ 416 M)
Shares Repurchased
($ 386 M)
Built a balance sheet with $4.40 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 12/31/03
45
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Dividends Per Share
Average Annual Increase 20%
$1.00 *
$ 1.00
$ 0.80
$ 0.60
$ 0.40
$ 0.20 $ 0.03
$ 0.00
84 86 88 90 92 94 96 98 02 04
9 19 19 19 19 0 20
19 19 19 1 2000 2
IndicatedOn January 22, 2004, Gallagher's Board of Year
Directors declared a $0.25 per share quarterly dividend.
46
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$ 1,400 R R
$ 1,200 % CAG $200 CAG
1 9 2 6 %
$ 1,000
$150
$ 800
$ 600 $100
$ 400
$50
$ 200
$ 0 $ 0
1999 Gross Revenue 2003 1999 Cash Earnings 2003
$ 1.00 R *$ 1.00
$ 0.80 CAG
19%
$ 0.60
$ 0.40
$ 0.20
$ 0.00
1984 Dividends 2004
2003 cash generation of $196 M, or $2.10/share
5-year average ROE of 34% is highest in peer group
Highest dividend yield in peer group  3.1% indicated in 2004
47
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens  everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
13. Professional courtesy is expected.
14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other.
We are a team.
16. Loyalty and respect are earned  not dictated. 17. Fear is a turn-off.
18. People skills are very important at Gallagher. 20. We run to problems  not away from them.
21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on  not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength  not a weakness.
24. We must continue building a professional Company  together  as a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances  but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
48

Exhibit 99.2
 
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management Segment
Financial Services Segment
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT P R O F I L E
NYSE: AJG
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm and the third-largest broker of U.S. business. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a full-service employee benefits consultant.
Stock PerformanceArthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500
www.ajg.com
JANUARY 2004
page
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 4
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT 5
ACQUISITION STRATEGY 6
MARKET OUTLOOK 6
CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 7
WHY INVEST? 8
As of December 31, 2003 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $ 32.49
52-week high/low $23.28$ 32.74
Trailing 12-mos. revenues $1.3 billion
Market cap $2.9 billion
Indicated annual dividend* $ 1.00
Yield (indicated as of January 22, 2004) 3.1 %
Shares outstanding 90.0 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/earnings (trailing year excl. net investment losses) 18 x
Number of employees 7,206
* On January 22, 2004, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.25 per share first quarter dividend.
 
Team Oriented
Client Focused
Innovative
Brokerage Segment
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
N I C H E S
 -  Agribusiness
 -  Aviation
 -  Construction  -  Energy
 -  Global Risk Management
 -  Healthcare
 -  Higher Education
 -  Management Liability
 -  Marine
 -  Mergers & Acquisitions
 -  Personal Insurance
 -  Public Entity
 -  Real Estate
- General CommercialHabitationalHospitalityShopping Centers
 -  Religious/Nonprofit
 -  Restaurant
 -  Scholastic K-12
 -  Transportation
 -  Worldwide Risk Services
 -  Wrap Ups
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division specializes in structuring property/casualty insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. With more than 60 offices throughout the U.S., this operation pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations and with the company's network of independent broker partners in more than 100 countries throughout the world.
The Brokerage Services Retail Division is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of property/casualty insurance, approximately 50% of its business falls within 22 specialized niches. These cross-divisional niche practice groups target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This niche focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. Niche practice groups allow for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitate the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within the niches provide a competitive advantage.
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division anticipates its greatest revenue growth in 2004 to come from its niche practice groups; middle-market accounts; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms like captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL
C A P A B I L I T I E S
 -  Reinsurance Brokerage
 -  International Property/Casualty Brokerage
 -  Programs/Program Administration
 -  CoverageFirst.com
 -  Excess/Surplus Lines Brokerage
 -  Captive/Rent-a-Captive Management
Specialty Marketing and International is comprised of wholesale, excess/surplus and reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S. and abroad, captive
2
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL (CONTINUED)
management operations outside the Continental U.S., and property/casualty joint-ventures and partnerships.
From 2001 through 2003, rate increases and coverage restrictions in the property/casualty market increased client demand for alternative risk transfer mechanisms. Gallagher structures a broad range of alternative market mechanisms, tailored to clients' specific needs and financial situations. Those market conditions also contributed to exceptional growth in wholesale and excess/ surplus lines business, much of which is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. A growing amount of business is coming to Gallagher via its e-commerce portal,
CoverageFirst.com, which has over 11,000 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
Through 2004, the operation expects its greatest revenue growth opportunities to come from reinsurance, international and wholesale brokerage business, programs and program administration. In addition to its offices or joint-ventures in the U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia, Singapore, Malaysia and Bahrain, the operation pursues business opportunities in conjunction with Gallagher's Strategic Alliance Network of correspondent brokers and consultants in over 100 countries around the world.
STRATEGIC ALLIANCE NETWORK
In addition to its own international brokerage offices, Gallagher has developed a non-owned network of leading independent brokers in more than 100 countries around the world. These relationships provide Gallagher's clients with one of the most comprehensive worldwide sales and service networks available.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES
CAPABILITIES
 -  Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting
 -  Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking
 -  Compliance Consulting
 -  Merger & Acquisition Analysis
 -  Actuarial Services
 -  Executive Benefits/Financial Planning
 -  Human Resource Services
 -  Retirement Plan Services
 -  Employer Administrative Services
 -  Business Continuation
 -  Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services provides employee benefit brokerage and human resource consulting to assist clients in all areas of their employee retirement and health and welfare plans. Rising healthcare costs and growing regulatory complexities have resulted in double-digit increases in employee benefit costs. Gallagher has significantly expanded its technical resources and technological capabilities over the last couple of years to better assist clients in addressing this trend.
Gallagher offers expertise and guidance in all areas of benefits planning, delivery and administration. This encompasses a broad range of benefit services, including executive benefits and financial planning, worksite marketing and voluntary products, defined contribution products, actuarial services, compensation program design/analysis, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement services, benefits communication and outsourcing, and training programs and tools to help employers address federal and state regulatory compliance.
The operation has also established eight niche practice groups in the following areas: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity, religious, restaurant, education (K-12) and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from its niche practice groups, through mergers and acquisitions, from cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, and by assisting clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities.
3
 
Quality Driven
Comprehensive
Cost Effective
Risk Management Segment
GALLAGHER BASSETT
EXPERTISE
 -  Real-Time Claims Reporting
 -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
 -  Appraisal Services
 -  Litigation Management
 -  Information Management
 -  Managed Care Services
 -  Loss Control Services
 -  Safety Programs
 -  Settlement Management
 -  Education and Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as the world's largest multiline, third-party administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices throughout the U.S., U.K. and Australia, and in Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for over a decade that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. By the end of 2003, the system had more than 7,500 users and was handling 12 million site hits and nearly 46,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through 2004 to come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
4
 
GALLGHER BENEFIT ADMINISTRATORS
C A P A B I L I T I E S
 -  Medical Case Management
 -  Non-Network Fee Negotiations
 -  Customized Reporting Capabilities
 -  EAP/Wellness Programs
 -  Managed Healthcare Delivery
 -  Utilization Review
 -  Internet Enrollment/Administration
Gallagher Benefit Administrators offers a wide range of benefit administrative services as well as the ability to integrate those services. It brings clients innovative reporting capabilities, customized managed healthcare options and integrated utilization management services.
While many third-party claims administrators have fallen behind in upgrading core competencies, Gallagher has continued to address systems and processes related to electronic data interchange and security issues, claims regulatory changes, access to information via the Internet, and methods through which employers can communicate and administer their plans more efficiently.
The operation has a platform that allows for paperless claims processing and pays many claims automatically. Clients have Web access to claims data and can complete their enrollments electronically. Gallagher Benefit Administrators expects these enhancements to elevate its competitive position in an industry facing consolidation.
Financial Services Segment
CORE COMPETENCIES
 -  Tax-Advantaged Investing
 -  Real Estate
 -  Asset Management
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and tax obligations. Financial Services specializes in tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax-advantaged investments are comprised primarily of low income housing developments, waste-to-energy projects and synthetic fuel plants. These investments have helped reduce Gallagher's tax rate to 12% in 2001, 30% in 2002 and 24% in 2003.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. Nearly 50% of the building is leased to third parties. Gallagher also owns an 11,000-acre residential housing development near Orlando. Known as Harmony, Florida, the site has a Johnny Miller Signature golf course, a new high school scheduled to open in 2004 and over 60 homes in various stages of construction. National builder D.R. Horton Builders is currently constructing dozens of homes and the first citizens of Harmony are now in residence.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally has a 50% ownership in 13 fund manager companies with approximately $4.0 billion under management.
Beginning in late 2002 and concluding in the first-quarter 2003, Gallagher exited from its venture capital investments.
5
 
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 125 acquisitions from 1986 through 2003, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these were regional or local property/casualty brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. In the last few years, the company has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding its talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
 -  a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, marketing-oriented culture
 -  a profitable, growing business whose ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
 -  clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's aggressive acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
MARKET OUTLOOK
The property/casualty (P/C) market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an overabundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%. In 2000, insurers began seeking modest increases averaging about 5%. The market hardened more significantly in 2001, especially following the September 11th terrorist attacks, and double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002. In 2003, the magnitude of rate increases began to moderate. A market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers indicated that by the fourth quarter of 2003, premiums were stable to slightly lower for one-third of all U.S. commercial P/C accounts, with the remaining two-thirds seeing increases averaging less than 10%. The study revealed that property coverages were averaging the most significant reductions, while professional liability lines, construction risks and workers compensation exposures were averaging the greatest increases. Rate competition is expected to increase during 2004.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups.
According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition is beginning to increase, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms in 2004.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
6
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
CONDENSED QUARTERLY SEGMENT INCOME STATEMENT  2001 THROUGH 2003(IN MILLIONS EXCEPT PER SHARE DATA AND OTHER INFORMATION DATA)
2001 2002 2003
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Gross revenues $ 136.5 $ 141.6 $ 155.9 $ 178.3 $ 164.9 $ 183.6 $ 210.8 $ 222.0 $ 198.1 $ 213.1 $ 232.4 $ 245.6
Expenses, including brokerage 113.4 115.6 121.2 144.6 139.2 154.6 163.3 175.5 171.3 174.9 177.5 193.2
Earnings before income taxes 23.1 26.0 34.7 33.7 25.7 29.0 47.5 46.5 26.8 38.2 54.9 52.4
Net earnings 18.3 21.0 34.6 30.1 17.7 20.6 33.2 32.6 20.1 28.6 41.7 39.8
Cash earnings (1) 20.4 23.3 37.4 33.7 20.3 24.1 36.5 35.5 23.9 32.5 45.9 44.4
Growthrevenues 7 % 11 % 10 % 18 % 20 % 30 % 36 % 26 % 22 % 17 % 12 % 10%
Pretax profit margin 17 % 18 % 22 % 19 % 16 % 16 % 23 % 21 % 14 % 18 % 24 % 21 %
Earnings per share $ 0.20 $ 0.23 $ 0.38 $ 0.33 $ 0.20 $ 0.22 $ 0.36 $ 0.36 $ 0.22 $ 0.31 $ 0.45 $ 0.43
Cash earnings per share (2) $ 0.23 $ 0.26 $ 0.42 $ 0.37 $ 0.22 $ 0.26 $ 0.40 $ 0.38 $ 0.26 $ 0.35 $ 0.49 $ 0.48
RISK MANAGEMENT
SEGMENT
Gross revenues $ 65.8 $ 65.3 $ 67.8 $ 65.8 $ 70.0 $ 67.7 $ 71.6 $ 71.9 $ 76.7 $ 78.3 $ 83.0 $ 83.7
Expenses 56.6 57.6 58.5 60.7 58.4 59.3 65.1 66.8 66.0 68.1 71.7 73.0
Earnings before income taxes 9.2 7.7 9.3 5.1 11.6 8.4 6.5 5.1 10.7 10.2 11.3 10.7
Net earnings 7.4 6.2 9.3 4.6 8.0 6.0 4.6 3.6 8.1 7.7 8.6 8.1
Cash earnings (1) 8.8 7.7 11.2 6.3 9.4 7.6 6.4 5.4 9.8 9.5 10.4 9.9
Growthrevenues 19 % 17 % 12 % 8 % 7 % 4 % 6 % 9 % 9 % 16 % 16 % 16 %
Pretax profit margin 14 % 12 % 14 % 8 % 17 % 12% 9 % 7 % 14 % 13 % 14 % 13 %
Earnings per share $ 0.08 $ 0.07 $ 0.10 $ 0.05 $ 0.08 $ 0.06 $ 0.05 $ 0.04 $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ 0.09 $ 0.09
Cash earnings per share (2) $ 0.10 $ 0.09 $ 0.12 $ 0.07 $ 0.10 $ 0.08 $ 0.07 $ 0.06 $ 0.10 $ 0.10 $ 0.11 $ 0.11
FINANCIAL SERVICES
SEGMENT
Investment income (3) $ 8.2 $ 5.1 $ 5.9 $ 10.0 $ 15.7 $ 12.7 $ 14.7 $ 17.8 $ 15.3 $ 17.9 $ 38.1 $ 46.8
Investment gains (losses) 6.2 1.9 6.1 2.6 (1.4) 13.1 (28.9) (4.8) (25.7) - 1.6 (0.4)
Expenses (3) 12.6 12.0 14.0 14.4 2.8 14.6 6.5 9.8 11.3 18.0 41.5 44.7
Earnings (loss) before income taxes 1.8 (5.0) (2.0) (1.8) 11.5 11.2 (20.7) 3.2 (21.7) (0.1) (1.8) 1.7
Net earnings (loss) 1.4 (4.0) (2.0) (1.6) 8.0 7.9 (14.5) 2.2 (16.3) (0.1) (1.4) 1.3
Cash earnings (loss) (1) (2.6) (5.0) (7.4) (3.3) 9.6 (0.6) 6.9 6.9 4.4 1.3 0.8 4.0
Earnings (loss) per share $ 0.02 $ (0.04) $ (0.02) $ (0.02) $ 0.09 $ 0.09 $ (0.16) $ 0.02 $ (0.18) $ - $ (0.02) $ 0.01
Cash earnings (loss) per share (2) $ (0.03) $ (0.06) $ (0.08) $ (0.03) $ 0.11 $ - $ 0.07 $ 0.08 $ 0.05 $ 0.01 $ - $ 0.04
TOTAL COMPANY
Gross revenues $ 216.7 $ 213.9 $ 235.7 $ 256.7 $ 249.2 $ 277.1 $ 268.2 $ 306.9 $ 264.4 $ 309.3 $ 355.1 $ 375.7
Expenses, including brokerage 182.6 185.2 193.7 219.7 200.4 228.5 234.9 252.1 248.6 261.0 290.7 310.9
Earnings before income tax 34.1 28.7 42.0 37.0 48.8 48.6 33.3 54.8 15.8 48.3 64.4 64.8
Net earnings 27.1 23.2 41.9 33.1 33.7 34.5 23.3 38.4 11.9 36.2 48.9 49.2
Cash earnings (1) 26.7 26.0 41.4 37.2 39.0 31.4 49.7 47.9 38.2 43.3 55.9 58.3
Earnings per share $ 0.30 $ 0.26 $ 0.47 $ 0.36 $ 0.37 $ 0.37 $ 0.25 $ 0.42 $ 0.13 $ 0.39 $ 0.52 $ 0.53
Cash earnings per share (2) $ 0.30 $ 0.29 $ 0.46 $ 0.41 $ 0.43 $ 0.34 $ 0.54 $ 0.52 $ 0.41 $ 0.46 $ 0.60 $ 0.62
Cash dividends per share $ 0.13 $ 0.13 $ 0.13 $ 0.13 $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.18
CONDENSED BALANCE
SHEET
Total assets $ 1,602.9 $ 1,754.9 $ 1,727.8 $ 2,145.4 $ 2,172.6 $ 2,448.6 $ 2,350.6 $ 2,463.6 $ 2,492.4 $ 2,644.3 $ 2,695.1 $ 2,847.6
Total liabilities $ 1,264.8 $ 1,419.3 $ 1,384.6 $ 1,773.8 $ 1,768.0 $ 1,965.8 $ 1,862.8 $ 1,935.4 $ 1,947.6 $ 2,071.8 $ 2,104.5 $ 2,228.5
Total stockholders' equity $ 338.1 $ 335.6 $ 343.2 $ 371.6 $ 404.6 $ 482.8 $ 487.8 $ 528.2 $ 544.8 $ 572.5 $ 590.6 $ 619.1
OTHER INFORMATION
Weighted shares (000's) 90,091 89,756 90,074 90,656 90,595 92,366 92,051 92,126 92,312 93,651 93,716 93,570
Common shares repurchased (000's) 470 444 1,614 814 - - 477 1 239 515 1,140 970
Tangible net worth (4) $ 320.8 $ 312.9 $ 320.3 $ 306.2 $ 331.8 $ 375.7 $ 378.8 $ 393.1 $ 391.4 $ 417.0 $ 422.6 $ 396.2
Book value per share $ 3.99 $ 3.96 $ 4.05 $ 4.37 $ 4.70 $ 5.47 $ 5.54 $ 5.97 $ 6.06 $ 6.32 $ 6.55 $ 6.88
Tangible book value per share $ 3.79 $ 3.69 $ 3.78 $ 3.60 $ 3.85 $ 4.25 $ 4.30 $ 4.44 $ 4.35 $ 4.60 $ 4.69 $ 4.40
Annualized return on beginning
tangible net worth 35 % 32 % 39 % 40 % 44% 44 % 40 % 42 % 12 % 24 % 33 % 37 %
Number of acquisitions closed 3 3 6 4 2 5 1 2 4 1 2 7
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 5.831 6,029 6,160 6,499 6,578 6,886 7,030 7,111 7,088 7,077 7,120 7,206
(1) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of depreciation, amortization and investment gains (losses).
(2) Represents cash earnings divided by the weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding during the period.
(3) Beginning 3rd Q, 2003, includes impact of FIN 46.
(4) Represents total stockholders' equity less net goodwill and net amortizable intangible assets.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com
 
Growth
Cash Dividends
Profits
Why Invest ?
Gross Revenues
(in millions)
$606 $741 $910 $1,101 $1,304
Cash Earnings
(in millions)
$74 $91 $129 $168 $196
Dividends Per Share
* IndicatedOn January 22, 2004, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.25 per share first quarter dividend.
GAAP Book Value Per Share
$3.29 $3.95 $4.37 $5.96 $6.88
Diluted Earnings Per Share
$.88 $1.05 $1.39 $1.41 $1.57
Note: All information as originally reported except per share amounts restated for stock splits.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
President & CEO
(630) 773-3800


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20040427165033.txt.gz
TIME:20040427165033
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 12.
Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On April 27, 2004, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("AJG") issued a press release setting forth AJG's first quarter 2004 earnings. A copy of AJG's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit (99) and hereby incorporated by reference.
Exhibit Index
 
(99) Press release, dated April 27, 2004, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: April 27, 2004

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, April 27, 2004  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2004. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
 
 
Brokerage Segment Highlights  Record First Quarter Earnings
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Highlights  Record First Quarter Earnings
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
"This was a great quarter for Gallagher in spite of rate moderation in the insurance marketplace," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "Individually, our Brokerage and Risk Management segments each posted record first quarter earnings. On a combined basis, these segments grew revenues 11%, of which 7% was organic, improved pretax margins 1.6%, and increased pretax earnings 23% and net earnings 31%."
 
"The Gallagher culture is alive and well and our team is doing an excellent job. Every day, our professionals are working hard, delivering great value to our customers and growing shareholder value."
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, April 28, 2004 at 9:00 a.m. EDT to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in nine countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
 
See notes to the first quarter 2004 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 5.
 
 
 
 
 
See notes to the first quarter 2004 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 5.
 
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2004 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. We believe the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of the Company's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, our GAAP information.
 
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20040507164003.txt.gz
TIME:20040507164003
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) Exhibits. The following exhibits are furnished as part of this report.
 
99.1 Slides for the Company's presentations at investor conferences.
 
99.2 Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Investment Profile.
 
 
The slides and investment profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at the Company's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 9, "Regulation FD Disclosure". These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures is also available on the Company's website at www.ajg.com.
 
Exhibit Index
 
99.1 Slides for the Company's presentations at investor conferences.
 
99.2 Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Investment Profile.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: May 7, 2004
 

 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
April 2004
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though perhaps not to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment, and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of existing in income tax laws. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
2
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm
Public since 1984
Market capitalization of $3.0 billion
Shares outstanding of 90.8 million
Dividend yield of 3.1%
52-week range  $23.35$34.25
Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 3/31/04, unless otherwise indicated
4
 
Our Mission
We are an international Sales and Marketing company that plans and administers cost-effective, differentiated property/casualty and human resource risk management programs as brokers, consultants and third-party administrators.
Our mission is to:
Provide superior, cost-effective risk management products and services that meet the ever-changing needs of our current and prospective clients, while continuing to strive for the highest professional excellence in the delivery of those products and services.
Provide our employees with an opportunity for professional growth, personal satisfaction and financial security.
Build and maintain long-lasting, consistent, honest and profitable relationships with our insurance markets, who we recognize play a crucial role in meeting our clients` risk management needs.
Grow shareholder value by increasing our client base, dedicating ourselves to increased productivity, profitability and professionalism resulting in long-term earnings-per-share growth.
We will accomplish our mission with the kind of leadership that will ensure perpetuation of our corporate culture. We will also adhere to rigid moral and ethical standards in all of our dealings as we look to the challenges of the future with confidence in our ability to create and maintain a Gallagher Team that is the very best at what we do.
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Performance vs. S&P
Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG]
S&P 500 (SPX)
March-99
March-00
March-01
March-02
March-03
March-04
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Competitors and Marketplace
COMPANY COMM/FEES U.S. / INT'L TARGET MARKET
Marsh 55% / 45% 55% / 45% Full Spectrum
Aon 65% / 35% 50% / 50% Full Spectrum
Gallagher 70% / 30% 90% / 10% Full Spectrum
Willis 70% / 30% 38% / 62% Full Spectrum
Brown 95% / 5% 100% / 0% Small/Middle
Hilb, Rogal 95% / 5% 100% / 0% Small/Middle
Percentages (per CSFB) are approximate
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
2003 cash flow from operations of $229 M
5-year average ROE of 31% is highest in peer group
Highest dividend yield in peer group  3.1% indicated in 2004
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) Mar 31, 2004
Stock Price $ 1.72 $ 32.57
Market Cap $57 M $3.0 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $395 M
Annual Dividend/Share $ .03 $ 1.00
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 18%
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals
$1.9$2.2 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Average Stockholders' Equity
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven
Team-oriented
Open
"Small company" feel
Client-focused
Competitive
No "C" players
11
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Employee Survey Results
78% participation
96% understand the need to grow and are committed to helping grow the Company
92% AgreeCustomer is top priority
92% "I am proud to work for this Company"
90% of men and women felt they were treated with respect by co-workers
80% felt the Company could run more efficiently
The Gallagher Culture is Alive and Strong
12
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Achievements
Record revenues of $1.3B and earnings of $146M
Total Brokerage and Risk Management revenues increased 15%
Total Brokerage and Risk Management pre-tax income increased 19%
Validated organic hiring strategy
13
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Achievements (continued)
Returned $143M in cash to stockholders
$81M of share repurchases or 2.9M shares
$62M of dividends
Paid off all corporate related debt
Increased GAAP Book Value to $619M
Maintained tangible net worth at nearly $400M
14
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Achievements (continued)
Reduced concentrations of non-liquid investments and off balance sheet items by $122M
Navigated synfuel tax credit waters
Improved transparency of financial reporting
Early Adopted
FIN 46  Consolidation of Variable Interest Entities
SFAS 123Accounting for Stock Based Compensation
15
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2003
Revenue
Brokerage 69%
Risk Management 25%
Financial Services 6%
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 79%
Risk Management 20%
Financial Services 1%
Revenue excludes FIN 46 impact and investment write-offs
Pretax earnings exclude investment write-offs (no impact of FIN 46)
16
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher
Gallagher's largest business segment
Acts as intermediary no underwriting risk
Niche driven
Alternative market leaders
Competition
Marsh
Aon
Willis
Top 20 distributors only control 25% of market (1)
Merger opportunities abound
(1) Business Insurance/JP Morgan
17
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities
Over 122 acquisitions since 1986 in this segment
Almost $460 million of 2003 revenue from acquired entities
The rules: financial health, similar culture
Gallagher is merger partner of choice
18
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits
2003 pretax margins of 19%
2003 growth in earnings per share of 24%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
19
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage 62% (Jim Gault)
Specialty Marketing & International 23% (Dave McGurn)
Employee Benefits 15% (Jim Durkin)
20
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
21
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness
Aviation
Construction
Energy
Global Risk Management
Healthcare
Higher Education
Management Liability
Marine
Mergers & Acquisitions
Personal Insurance
Public Entity
Real Estate
General Commercial
Habitational
Hospitality
Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit
Restaurant
Scholastic K-12
Transportation
Worldwide Risk Services
Wrap Ups
22
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size
Acquisitions and hiring
Alternative market
Captives
Rent-a-captives
Deductible plans
Self-insurance
23
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices, Joint Ventures & Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Reinsurance Brokerage
International P&C Brokerage
Programs/Program Administration
CoverageFirst.com
Wholesale Brokerage
Captives/Rent-a-Captives
25
 
Specialty Marketing & International
High Growth & Profit Potential
Reinsurance brokerage
Programs and program administration
International business
Wholesale brokerage
26
 
Employee Benefits Offices
27
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting
Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking
Compliance Consulting
Merger & Acquisition Analysis
Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/ Financial Planning
Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services
Employer Administrative Services
Business Continuation
Compensation Program Design/Analysis
28
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Brokerage Services
Merger and acquisition opportunities
Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs
Providing better retirement tools/information
Benefits communication and administration
Compliance with federal and state regulations
29
 
Risk Management Segment
Two Primary Operations
Property/Casualty Claims Management "Gallagher Bassett" 91% (Rich McKenna)
Medical Claims Management 9% (Jim Durkin)
Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims.
30
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits
2003 pretax margin of 13%
2003 growth in earnings per share of 51%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
31
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
32
 
Risk Management Segment
Capabilities
Real-time Claims Reporting
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
Appraisal Services
Litigation Management
Information Management
Managed Care Services
Loss Control Services
Safety Programs
Settlement Management
Education and Training
33
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments
Captives
Program business
Expanding global capabilities
Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage
Security
Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet
Employer communication/plan administration
34
 
Financial Services Segment
$858 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($ 192 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($ 511 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($ 155 M)
* As of March 31, 2004  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
35
 
Financial Services Segment
Assets at December 31, 2002 & 2003
Assets Under Management
$298
2002
$205
2003
Asset Classes 12/31/03
Tax Adv.
Asset Mgmt.
Real Estate
Other
Low Income Housing $20M
Alternative Energy $74M
Trading Securities $5M
Asset Alliance $51M
Real Estate, incl HO $24M
Bermuda Insurance $20M
VC, Airplanes & Other $11M
$            In millions
36
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007
Asset management  monetize
Real estate  optimize cash flows
Venture capital  substantially exited in 2003
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
Gross Revenues As Originally Reported ($            M)
$606
1999
$741
2000
$910
2001
$1,101
2002
$1,304
2003
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
Pretax Earnings As Originally Reported ($            M)
$104
1999
$125
2000
$142
2001
$186
2002
$193
2003
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
Revenue Per Employee As Reported
$127,000
1999
$137,000
2000
$140,000
2001
$155,000
2002
$181,000
2003
41
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted EPS As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01
$.88
1999
$1.05
2000
$1.39
2001
$1.41
2002
$1.57
2003
42
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(In millions)
$74
1999
$91
2000
$129
2001
$170
2002
$203
2003
43
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Industry-Leading ROE
Largest Positive Tangible Net Worth in Peer Group
5-Year Average ROE
19%
Peers
5-Year Average ROE
31%
Gallagher
As of 12/31/03
44
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.2 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($ 354 M)
Shares Repurchased
($ 404 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($ 445 M)
Built a balance sheet with $4.35 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 3/31/04
45
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Dividends Per Share
Average Annual Increase 20%
* IndicatedOn January 22, 2004, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.25 per share quarterly dividend.
46
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
2003 cash flow from operations of $229 M
5-year average ROE of 31% is highest in peer group
Highest dividend yield in peer group  3.1% indicated in 2004
47
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizenseveryone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built.
11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel.
12. No department or person is an island.
13. Professional courtesy is expected.
14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other.
We are a team.
16. Loyalty and respect are earnednot dictated.
17. Fear is a turn-off.
18. People skills are very important at Gallagher.
20. We run to problemsnot away from them.
21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned onnot turned off.
23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strengthnot a weakness.
24. We must continue building a professional Companytogetheras a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstancesbut carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
48

 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT P R O F I L E
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management Segment
Financial Services Segment
NYSE: AJG
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm and the third-largest broker of U.S. business. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a full-service employee benefits consultant.
Stock PerformanceArthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500
www.ajg.com
APRIL 2004
page
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 4
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT 5
ACQUISITION STRATEGY 6
MARKET OUTLOOK 6
CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 7
WHY INVEST? 8
As of March 31, 2004
Price $ 32.57
52-week high/low $23.35$ 34.25
Trailing 12-mos. gross revenues $1.4 billion
Market cap $3.0 billion
Indicated annual dividend $ 1.00
Yield 3.1 %
Shares outstanding 90.8 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/earnings 18 x
Number of employees 7,359
1
 
Team Oriented
Client Focused
Innovative
Brokerage Segment
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
N I C H E S
 -  Agribusiness
 -  Aviation
 -  Construction
 -  Energy
 -  Global Risk Management
 -  Healthcare
 -  Higher Education
 -  Management Liability
 -  Marine
 -  Mergers & Acquisitions
 -  Personal Insurance
 -  Public Entity
 -  Real Estate (4)
- General Commercial
- Habitational
- Hospitality
- Shopping Centers
 -  Religious/Nonprofit
 -  Restaurant
 -  Scholastic K-12
 -  Transportation
 -  Worldwide Risk Services
 -  Wrap Ups
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring property/casualty insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. With more than 60 offices throughout the U.S., this operation pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners in more than 100 countries throughout the world.
BSD is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of property/casualty insurance, approximately 67% of its business falls within 22 specialized niches. These cross-divisional niche practice groups target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This niche focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. Niche practice groups allow for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitate the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within the niches provide a competitive advantage.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth in 2004 to come from its niche practice groups; middle-market accounts; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms like captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL
C A P A B I L I T I E S
 -  Reinsurance Brokerage
 -  International Property/Casualty Brokerage
 -  Programs/Program Administration
 -  CoverageFirst.com
 -  Excess/Surplus Lines Brokerage
 -  Captive/Rent-a-Captive Management
Specialty Marketing and International is comprised of wholesale, excess/surplus and reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S. and abroad, captive
2
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL (CONTINUED) management operations outside the Continental U.S., and property/casualty joint-ventures and partnerships.
From 2001 through 2003, rate increases and coverage restrictions in the property/casualty market increased client demand for alternative risk transfer mechanisms. Gallagher structures a broad range of alternative market mechanisms, tailored to clients' specific needs and financial situations. Those market conditions also contributed to exceptional growth in wholesale and excess/surplus lines business, much of which is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. A growing amount of business is coming to Gallagher via its e-commerce portal, CoverageFirst.com, which has over 11,500 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
Through 2004, the operation expects its greatest revenue growth opportunities to come from reinsurance, international and wholesale brokerage business, programs and program administration. In addition to its offices or joint-ventures in the U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia, Singapore, Malaysia and Bahrain, the operation pursues business opportunities in conjunction with Gallagher's Strategic Alliance Network of correspondent brokers and consultants in over 100 countries around the world.
S T R A T E G I C A L L I A N C E N E T W O R K
In addition to its own international brokerage offices, Gallagher has developed a non-owned network of leading independent brokers in more than 100 countries around the world. These relationships provide Gallagher's clients with one of the most comprehensive worldwide sales and service networks available.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES
C A P A B I L I T I E S
 -  Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting
 -  Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking
 -  Compliance Consulting
 -  Merger & Acquisition Analysis
 -  Actuarial Services
 -  Executive Benefits/Financial Planning
 -  Human Resource Services
 -  Retirement Plan Services
 -  Employer Administrative Services
 -  Business Continuation
 -  Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services provides employee benefit brokerage and human resource consulting to assist clients in all areas of their employee retirement and health and welfare plans. Rising healthcare costs and growing regulatory complexities have resulted in double-digit increases in employee benefit costs. Gallagher has significantly expanded its technical resources and technological capabilities over the last couple of years to better assist clients in addressing this trend.
Gallagher offers expertise and guidance in all areas of benefits planning, delivery and administration. This encompasses a broad range of benefit services, including executive benefits and financial planning, worksite marketing and voluntary products, defined contribution products, actuarial services, compensation program design/analysis, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement services, benefits communication and out-sourcing, and training programs and tools that help employers address federal and state regulatory compliance.
The operation has also established eight niche practice groups in the following areas: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity, religious, restaurant, education (K-12) and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from its niche practice groups, through mergers and acquisitions, from cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, and by assisting clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities.
3
 
Quality Driven
Comprehensive
Cost Effective
Risk Management Segment
GALLAGHER BASSETT
EXPERTISE
 -  Real-Time Claims Reporting
 -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
 -  Appraisal Services
 -  Litigation Management
 -  Information Management
 -  Managed Care Services
 -  Loss Control Services
 -  Safety Programs
 -  Settlement Management
 -  Education and Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as the world's largest multiline, third-party administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., U.K., Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for over a decade that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. By the end of March 2004, the system had more than 8,000 users and was handling over 13 million site hits and over 55,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through 2004 to come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
4
 
GALLGHER BENEFIT ADMINISTRATORS
C A P A B I L I T I E S
 -  Medical Case Management
 -  Non-Network Fee Negotiations
 -  Customized Reporting Capabilities
 -  EAP/Wellness Programs
 -  Managed Healthcare Delivery
 -  Utilization Review
 -  Internet Enrollment/Administration
Gallagher Benefit Administrators offers a wide range of benefit administrative services as well as the ability to integrate those services. It brings clients innovative reporting capabilities, customized managed healthcare options and integrated utilization management services.
While many third-party claims administrators have fallen behind in upgrading core competencies, Gallagher Benefit Administrators has continued to address systems and processes related to electronic data interchange and security issues, claims regulatory changes, access to information via the Internet, and methods through which employers can communicate and administer their plans more efficiently.
The operation has a platform that allows for paperless claims processing and pays many claims automatically. Clients have Web access to claims data and can complete their enrollments electronically. Gallagher Benefit Administrators expects these enhancements to elevate its competitive position in an industry facing consolidation.
Financial Services Segment
CORE
COMPETENCIES
 -  Tax-Advantaged Investing
 -  Real Estate
 -  Asset Management
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and tax obligations. Financial Services specializes in tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax-advantaged investments are comprised primarily of low income housing developments, waste-to-energy projects and synthetic fuel plants. These investments have helped reduce Gallagher's tax rate to 30% in 2002, 24% in 2003 and 20% in 2004.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. Nearly 50% of the building is leased to third parties. Gallagher also owns an 11,000-acre community near Orlando. Known as Harmony, Florida, the site has a Johnny Miller Signature golf course and a new high school scheduled to open in August 2004. Sixty homes have been completed and there are now more than 100 residents in Harmony. National builder D.R. Horton and several local custom builders have 80 additional homes in various stages of development.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to 50% of 13 alternative investment fund manager companies with approximately $4.4 billion under management.
5
 
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 132 acquisitions from 1986 through March 2004, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these were regional or local property/casualty brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. In the last few years, the company has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding its talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
 -  a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, marketing-oriented culture
 -  a profitable, growing business whose ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
 -  clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's aggressive acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
MARKET OUTLOOK
The property/casualty (P/C) market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an overabundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%. In 2000, insurers began seeking modest increases averaging about 5%. The market hardened more significantly in 2001, especially following the September 11th terrorist attacks, and double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002. In 2003, the magnitude of rate increases began to moderate. A market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers indicated that by the fourth quarter of 2003, premiums were stable to slightly lower for one-third of all U.S. commercial P/C accounts, with the remaining two-thirds seeing increases averaging less than 10%. The study revealed that property coverages were averaging the most significant reductions, while professional liability lines, construction risks and workers compensation exposures were averaging the greatest increases. Rate competition is expected to increase during 2004.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition is beginning to increase, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms in 2004.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
6
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
CONDENSED QUARTERLY SEGMENT INCOME STATEMENT  2002 THROUGH 2004(IN MILLIONS EXCEPT PER SHARE DATA AND OTHER INFORMATION DATA)
2002 2003 2004
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Gross revenues $ 164.9 $ 183.6 $ 210.8 $ 222.0 $ 781.3 $ 198.1 $ 213.1 $ 232.4 $ 245.6 $ 889.2 $ 213.0
Earnings before income taxes 25.7 29.0 47.5 46.5 148.7 26.8 38.2 54.9 52.4 172.3 33.1
Net earnings 17.7 20.6 33.2 32.6 104.1 20.1 28.6 41.7 39.8 130.2 26.5
Growthrevenues 20% 30% 36% 26% 28% 22% 17% 12% 10% 14% 9%
Pretax profit margin 16% 16% 23% 21% 19% 14% 18% 24% 21% 19% 16%
Earnings per share $ 0.20 $ 0.22 $ 0.36 $ 0.36 $ 1.14 $ 0.22 $ 0.31 $ 0.45 $ 0.43 $ 1.41 $ 0.28
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Gross revenues $ 70.0 $ 67.7 $ 71.6 $ 71.9 $ 281.2 $ 76.7 $ 78.3 $ 83.0 $ 83.7 $ 321.7 $ 88.4
Earnings before income taxes 11.6 8.4 6.5 5.1 31.6 10.7 10.2 11.3 10.7 42.9 13.0
Net earnings 8.0 6.0 4.6 3.6 22.2 8.1 7.7 8.6 8.1 32.5 10.4
Growthrevenues 6% 4% 6% 9% 6% 9% 16% 16% 16% 14% 15%
Pretax profit margin 17% 12% 9% 7% 11% 14% 13% 14% 13% 13% 15%
Earnings per share $ 0.08 $ 0.06 $ 0.05 $ 0.04 $ 0.23 $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ 0.09 $ 0.09 $ 0.35 $ 0.11
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income (1) $ 15.7 $ 12.7 $ 14.7 $ 17.8 $ 60.9 $ 15.3 $ 17.9 $ 38.1 $ 46.8 $ 118.1 $ 46.5
Investment gains (losses) (2) (1.4) 13.1 (28.9) (4.8) (22.0) (25.7) 0.0 1.6 (0.4) (24.5) 2.5
Earnings (loss) before income taxes 11.5 11.2 (20.7) 3.2 5.2 (21.7) (0.1) (1.8) 1.7 (21.9) 2.5
Net earnings 8.0 7.9 (14.5) 2.2 3.6 (16.3) (0.1) (1.4) 1.3 (16.5) 2.0
Earnings per share $ 0.09 $ 0.09 $ (0.16) $ 0.02 $ 0.04 $ (0.18) $ - $ (0.02) $ 0.01 $ (0.19) $ 0.02
TOTAL COMPANY
Gross revenues $ 249.2 $ 277.1 $ 268.2 $ 306.9 $ 1,101.4 $ 264.4 $ 309.3 $ 355.1 $ 375.7 $ 1,304.5 $ 350.4
Earnings before income taxes 48.8 48.6 33.3 54.8 185.5 15.8 48.3 64.4 64.8 193.3 48.6
Net earnings 33.7 34.5 23.3 38.4 129.9 11.9 36.2 48.9 49.2 146.2 38.9
Earnings per share $ 0.37 $ 0.37 $ 0.25 $ 0.42 $ 1.41 $ 0.13 $ 0.39 $ 0.52 $ 0.53 $ 1.57 $ 0.41
Cash dividends per share declared $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.60 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.72 $ 0.25
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $ 2,172.6 $ 2,448.6 $ 2,350.6 $ 2,463.6 $ 2,492.4 $ 2,644.3 $ 2,695.1 $ 2,901.6 $ 2,873.0
Total liabilities $ 1,768.0 $ 1,965.8 $ 1,862.8 $ 1,935.4 $ 1,947.6 $ 2,071.8 $ 2,104.5 $ 2,282.5 $ 2,225.0
Total stockholders' equity $ 404.6 $ 482.8 $ 487.8 $ 528.2 $ 544.8 $ 572.5 $ 590.6 $ 619.1 $ 648.0
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000's) 90,595 92,366 92,051 92,126 91,861 92,312 93,651 93,716 93,570 93,292 93,955
Common shares repurchased (000's) - - 477 1 478 239 515 1,140 970 2,864 555
Tangible net worth (3) $ 331.8 $ 375.7 $ 378.8 $ 393.1 $ 391.4 $ 417.0 $ 422.6 $ 396.2 $ 394.6
Book value per share $ 4.70 $ 5.47 $ 5.54 $ 5.97 $ 6.06 $ 6.32 $ 6.55 $ 6.88 $ 7.14
Tangible book value per share(4) $ 3.85 $ 4.25 $ 4.30 $ 4.44 $ 4.35 $ 4.60 $ 4.69 $ 4.40 $ 4.35
Annualized return on beginning
tangible net worth 44% 44% 40% 42% 42% 12% 24% 33% 37% 37% 39%
Number of acquisitions closed 2 5 1 2 10 4 1 2 7 14 7
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 6,578 6,886 7,030 7,111 7,111 7,088 7,077 7,120 7,206 7,206 7,359
Earnings Before Investment (Gains) Losses, Depreciation, Amortization
and Stock Compensation Expense (5)
Net earnings $ 33.7 $ 34.5 $ 23.3 $ 38.4 $ 129.9 $ 11.9 $ 36.2 $ 48.9 $ 49.2 $ 146.2 $ 38.9
Investment (gains) losses 1.4 (13.1) 28.9 4.8 22.0 25.7 - (1.6) 0.4 24.5 (2.5)
Depreciation 5.5 6.1 6.9 7.3 25.8 7.2 7.2 8.3 8.5 31.2 8.6
Amortization 1.2 2.2 2.0 1.2 6.6 2.1 2.2 2.5 3.1 9.9 3.2
Non-cash compensation 0.1 1.1 1.1 1.1 3.4 1.0 2.2 2.2 4.0 9.4 3.3
Tax effect (2.5) 1.1 (11.7) (4.3) (17.5) (9.0) (2.9) (2.7) (3.8) (18.5) (2.5)
Earnings before investment (gains) losses,
depreciation, amortization and stock
compensation expense $ 39.4 $ 31.9 $ 50.5 $ 48.5 $ 170.2 $ 38.9 $ 44.9 $ 57.6 $ 61.4 $ 202.7 $ 49.0
On a diluted per share basis $ 0.43 $ 0.35 $ 0.55 $ 0.53 $ 1.85 $ 0.42 $ 0.48 $ 0.61 $ 0.66 $ 2.17 $ 0.52
(1) Beginning 3rd Q, 2003, includes impact of FIN 46.
(2) Investment losses from 3rd Q, 2002 to 1st Q, 2003 are primarily due to AJG's exit from its venture capital investments.
(3) Represents total stockholders' equity less net balance of goodwill and net amortizable intangible assets.
(4) Represents tangible net worth divided by the common shares outstanding.
(5) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of investment gains (losses), depreciation, amortization, amortization of deferred compensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com
7
 
Growth
Cash Dividends
Why Invest ? Profits
Gross Revenues
(in millions)
$606
99
$741
00
$910
01
$1,101
02
$1,304
03
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(in millions)
$74
99
$91
00
$129
01
$170
02
$203
03
Dividends Per Share
* IndicatedOn January 22, 2004, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.25 per share first quarter dividend.
GAAP Book Value Per Share
$3.29
99
$3.95
00
$4.37
01
$5.97
02
$6.88
03
Diluted Earnings Per Share
$.88
99
$1.05
00
$1.39
01
$1.41
02
$1.57
03
Note: All information as originally reported except per share amounts restated for stock splits.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
President & CEO
(630) 773-3800
8


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20040727170326.txt.gz
TIME:20040727170326
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 12.
Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On July 27, 2004, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("AJG") issued a press release setting forth AJG's second quarter 2004 earnings. A copy of AJG's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit (99) and hereby incorporated by reference.
Exhibit Index
 
(99) Press release, dated July 27, 2004, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: July 27, 2004

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, July 27, 2004  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today reported its financial results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2004. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
 
Quarter Ended June 30
 
 
"This was another strong quarter for Gallagher despite softening rates in the insurance marketplace. Our Brokerage and Risk Management segments each posted record second quarter earnings," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "On a combined basis our Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted excellent results for the second quarter:
 
 
 
 
 
"These results demonstrate that Gallagher's core businesses are performing well in the changing marketplace. Every day our professionals are out there working together to deliver the best value for our customers while continuing to grow value for our shareholders."
 
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights  Record Earnings
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights  Record Earnings
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 28, 2004 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in nine countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2004 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 5.
 
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2004 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 5.
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2004 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20040730164735.txt.gz
TIME:20040730164735
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
The following is a list of the exhibits furnished with this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
 
 
The slides and investment profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein by reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at the Company's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 9, "Regulation FD Disclosure". These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on the Company's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: July 30, 2004
 
The following is a list of the exhibits furnished with this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 

 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
July 2004
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though perhaps not to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment, and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of existing in income tax laws. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
2
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm
Public since 1984
Market capitalization of $2.8 billion
Shares outstanding of 91.9 million
Dividend yield of 3.3%
52-week range  $24.64$34.25
Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 6/30/04, unless otherwise indicated
4
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Performance vs. S&P
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG]
S&P 500 (SPX)
June-99 June-00 June-01 June-02 June-03 June-04
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
1999 Gross Revenue 2003
19 % CAGR
$200 $150 $100 $50 $0
1999 Cash Flow from Ops 2003
33 % CAGR
$1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1984 Dividends 2004
*$ 1.00
19 % CAG R
2003 cash flow from operations of $229 M
5-year average ROE of 31% is highest in peer group
Highest dividend yield in peer group  3.3% indicated in 2004
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO (Restated for stock splits) June 30, 2004
Stock Price $ 1.72 $ 30.45
Market Cap $57 M $2.8 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $428 M
Annual Dividend/Share $ .03 $ 1.00
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 18%
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals
$2.0$2.3 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Average
Stockholders' Equity
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven
Team-oriented
Open
"Small company" feel
Client-focused Competitive
No "C" players
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Employee Survey Results
78% participation
96% understand the need to grow and are committed to helping grow the Company
92% AgreeCustomer is top priority
92% "I am proud to work for this Company"
90% of men and women felt they were treated with respect by co-workers
80% felt the Company could run more efficiently
The Gallagher Culture is Alive and Strong
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2003
Revenue
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 69% Brokerage 79%
Financial Services 6%
Risk Management 25%
Financial Services 1%
Risk Management 20%
Revenue excludes FIN 46 impact and investment write-offs
Pretax earnings exclude investment write-offs (no impact of FIN 46)
11
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher's largest business segment
Acts as intermediary  no underwriting risk
Niche driven
Alternative market leaders
(1) Business Insurance/JP Morgan
12
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities
Over 125 acquisitions since 1986 in this segment
Almost $460 million of 2003 revenue from acquired entities
The rules: financial health, similar culture
Gallagher is merger partner of choice
13
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits
1000 900 800 700 600 500 400 300 200 100
99 00 01 02 03
99 00 01 02 03
Revenue
Pretax Earnings
$383M $849M $72M $172M
180 160 140 120 100 80 60 40 20 0
20 % CAGR
20 % CAGR
2003 pretax margins of 19%
2003 growth in earnings per share of 24%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
14
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage 62% (Jim Gault)
Employee Benefits 15% (Jim Durkin)
Specialty Marketing & International 23% (Dave McGurn)
15
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
16
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness
Public Entity
Aviation
Real Estate
General Commercial
Construction
Habitational
Energy
Hospitality
Global Risk Management
Shopping Centers
Healthcare
Religious/Nonprofit
Higher Education
Restaurant
Management Liability
Scholastic K-12
Marine
Transportation
Mergers & Acquisitions
Worldwide Risk Services
Personal Insurance
17
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size
Acquisitions and hiring
Alternative market
Captives
Rent-a-captives
Deductible plans
Self-insurance
18
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices, Joint Ventures & Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Reinsurance Brokerage
International P&C Brokerage
Programs/Program Administration
CoverageFirst.com
Wholesale Brokerage
Captives/Rent-a-Captives
20
 
Employee Benefits Offices
21
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting
Executive Benefits/ Financial Planning
Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking
Human Resource Services
Retirement Plan Services
Compliance Consulting
Employer Administrative Services
Merger & Acquisition Analysis
Business Continuation
Actuarial Services
Compensation Program Design/Analysis
22
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Brokerage Services
Merger and acquisition opportunities
Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs
Providing better retirement tools/information
Benefits communication and administration
Compliance with federal and state regulations
23
 
Risk Management Segment
Two Primary Operations
Property/Casualty Claims Management "Gallagher Bassett" 91% (Rich McKenna)
Medical Claims Management 9% (Jim Durkin)
Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims.
24
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits
350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0
1999 2003
1999 2003
Revenue
Pretax Earnings
45 40 35 30 25 20 15 10 5 0
$43M
$322M
23% CAGR
15% CAGR
2003 pretax margin of 13%
2003 growth in earnings per share of 51%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
25
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Capabilities
Real-time Claims Reporting
Managed Care Services
Loss Control Services
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
Safety Programs
Settlement Management
Appraisal Services
Education and Training
Litigation Management
Information Management
27
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments
Captives
Program business
Expanding global capabilities
Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage
Security
Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet
Employer communication/plan administration
28
 
Financial Services Segment
$927 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($190 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($583 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($154 M)
* As of June 30, 2004  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
29
 
Financial Services Segment
Assets at December 31, 2002 & June 30, 2004
Assets Under Management Asset Classes 6/30/04
$300 $250 $200 $150
$298 $190
$70 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Tax Adv.
Asset Mgmt.
Real Estate
Other
Low Income Housing $18M
Alternative Energy $67M
Asset Alliance $48M
Real Estate, incl HO $23M
Bermuda Insurance $20M VC, Airplanes & Other $14M
30
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007
Asset management  monetize
Real estate  optimize cash flows
Venture capital  substantially exited in 2003
31
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
32
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
Gross Revenues As Originally Reported ($            M)
$1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
$606 $741 $910 $1,101 $1,304
19% CAGR
33
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
Pretax Earnings As Originally Reported ($            M)
$200 $180 $160 $140 $120 $100 $80 $60 $40
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
$104 $125 $142 $186 $193
18% CAGR
34
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
Revenue Per Employee As Reported
$180 $170 $160 $150 $140 $130 $120 $110 $100
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
$127,000 $137,000 $140,000 $155,000 $181,000
8% CAGR
35
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted EPS As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01
$1.60 $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
$.88 $1.05 $1.39 $1.41 $1.57
15% CAGR
36
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation,
Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(In millions)
$250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
$74 $91 $129 $170 $203
27% CAGR
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.3 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($376 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($502 M)
Shares Repurchased
($404 M)
Built a balance sheet with $4.65 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 6/30/04
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
1999 Gross Revenue 2003
$200 $150 $100 $50 $0
1999 Cash Flow from Ops 2003
$1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1984 Dividends 2004
19% CAGR
33% CAGR
19% CAGR
2003 cash flow from operations of $229 M
5-year average ROE of 31% is highest in peer group
Highest dividend yield in peer group  3.3% indicated in 2004
39
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value?
These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens - everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built.
11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel.
12. No department or person is an island.
13. Professional courtesy is expected.
14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other. We are a team.
16. Loyalty and respect are earned - not dictated.
17. Fear is a turn-off.
18. People skills are very important at Gallagher.
20. We run to problems - not away from them.
21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on - not turned off.
23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength - not a weakness.
24. We must continue building a professional Company - together - as a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances -but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs. When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
40

 
As of June 30, 2004
Arthur J.
Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
NYSE: AJG
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management Segment
Financial Services Segment
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm and the third-largest broker of U.S. business. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty (P/C) products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a full-service employee benefits consultant.
Stock PerformanceArthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500
Gallagher
S&P 500
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
6|99
6|00
6|01
6|02
6|03
6|04
www.ajg.com
JULY 2004
page
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 4
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT 5
ACQUISITION STRATEGY 6
MARKET OUTLOOK 6
CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 7
WHY INVEST? 8
Price $30.45
52-week high/low $24.64$34.25
Trailing 12-mos. gross revenues $1.5 billion
Market cap $2.8 billion
Indicated annual dividend $1.00
Yield 3.3 %
Shares outstanding 91.9 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/earnings 16 x
Number of employees 7,564
 
Team Oriented
Client Focused
Innovative
Brokerage Segment
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
NICHES
Agribusiness
Aviation
Construction  -  Energy
Global Risk Management
Healthcare
Higher Education
Management Liability
Marine
Mergers & Acquisitions
Personal Insurance
Public Entity
Real Estate (4)General CommercialHabitationalHospitalityShopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit
Restaurant
Scholastic K-12
Transportation
Worldwide Risk Services
Wrap Ups
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring P/C insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. With 65 offices throughout the U.S., this operation pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher
operations and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners in more than 100 countries throughout the world.
BSD is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of P/C insurance, approximately 67% of its business falls within 22 specialized niches. These cross-divisional niche practice groups target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This niche focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. Niche practice groups allow for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitate the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within the niches provide a competitive advantage.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth in 2004 will come from its niche practice groups; middle-market accounts; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms like captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL
CAPABILITIES
Reinsurance Brokerage
International P/C Brokerage
Programs/Program Administration
CoverageFirst.com
Wholesale Brokerage
Captive/Rent-a-Captive Management
Specialty Marketing and International is comprised of wholesale, excess/surplus and reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S. and abroad, captive
 
SPECIALITY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL (CONTINUED)
management operations outside the Continental U.S., and P/C joint-ventures and partnerships.
From 2001 through 2003, rate increases and coverage restrictions in the P/C market increased client demand for alternative risk transfer mechanisms. Gallagher structures a broad range of alternative market mechanisms, tailored to clients' specific needs and financial situations. Those market conditions also contributed to exceptional growth in wholesale and excess/surplus lines business, much of which is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. A growing amount of business is coming to Gallagher via its e-commerce portal,
CoverageFirst.com, which has over 12,000 registered independent
agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
Through 2004, the operation expects its greatest revenue growth opportunities will come from reinsurance, international and wholesale brokerage business, programs and program administration. In addition to its offices or joint-ventures in the U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia, Singapore, Malaysia and Bahrain, the operation pursues business opportunities in conjunction with Gallagher's Strategic Alliance Network of correspondent brokers and consultants in over 100 countries around the world.
STRATEGIC
ALLIANCE
NETWORK
In addition to its own international brokerage offices, Gallagher has developed a non-owned network of leading independent brokers in more than 100 countries around the world. These relationships provide Gallagher's clients with one of the most comprehensive worldwide sales and service networks available.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES
3
CAPABILITIES
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting
Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking
Compliance Consulting
Merger & Acquisition Analysis
Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/Financial Planning
Human Resource Services
Retirement Plan Services
Employer Administrative Services
Business Continuation
Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services provides employee benefit brokerage and human resource consulting to assist clients in all areas of their employee retirement and health and welfare plans. Rising healthcare costs and growing regulatory complexities have resulted in double-digit increases in employee benefit costs. Gallagher has significantly expanded its technical resources and technological capabilities over the last couple of years to better assist clients in addressing this trend.
Gallagher offers expertise and guidance in all areas of benefits planning, delivery and administration. This encompasses a broad range of benefit services, including executive benefits and financial planning, worksite marketing and voluntary products, defined contribution products, actuarial services, compensation program
design/analysis, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement services, benefits communication and out-sourcing, and training programs and tools that help employers address federal and state regulatory compliance.
The operation has also established eight niche practice groups in the following areas: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity, religious, restaurant, education (K-12) and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from its niche practice groups, through mergers and acquisitions, from cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, and by assisting clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities.
 
Quality Driven
Comprehensive
Cost Effective
Risk Management Segment
GALLAGHER BASSETT
EXPERTISE
4
Real-Time Claims Reporting
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
Appraisal Services
Litigation Management
Information Management
Managed Care Services
Loss Control Services
Safety Programs
Settlement Management
Education and Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as the world's largest multiline, third-party administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., U.K., Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for over a decade that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. By the end of June 2004, the system had more than 8,900 users and was handling approximately 15 million site hits and over 57,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through 2004 will come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
 
GALLAGHER BENEFIT ADMINISTRATORS
CAPABILITIES
Medical Case Management
Non-Network Fee Negotiations
Customized Reporting Capabilities
EAP/Wellness Programs
Managed Healthcare Delivery
Utilization Review
Internet Enrollment/Administration
Gallagher Benefit Administrators offers a wide range of benefit administrative services as well as the ability to integrate those services. It brings clients innovative reporting capabilities, customized managed healthcare options and integrated utilization management services.
While many third-party claims administrators have fallen behind in upgrading core competencies, Gallagher Benefit Administrators has continued to address systems and processes related to electronic data interchange and security issues, claims regulatory changes, access to information via the Internet, and methods through which employers can communicate and administer their plans more efficiently.
The operation has a platform that allows for paperless claims processing and pays many claims automatically. Clients have Web access to claims data and can complete their enrollments electronically. Gallagher Benefit Administrators expects these enhancements to elevate its competitive position in an industry facing consolidation.
5
Financial Services Segment
CORE COMPETENCIES
Tax-Advantaged Investing
Real Estate
Asset Management
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and tax obligations. Financial Services specializes in tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax-advantaged investments are comprised primarily of low income housing developments, waste-to-energy projects and synthetic fuel plants. These investments have helped reduce Gallagher's tax rate to 30% in 2002, 24% in 2003 and 20% in 2004.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. The building is 100% leased, with third parties occupying approximately 45%. Gallagher also owns 80% of an 11,000-acre community near Orlando. Known as Harmony, Florida, the site has a Johnny Miller Signature golf course and a new high school opening in August 2004. More than 100 homes have been completed and there are now more than 200
residents in Harmony. National builder D.R. Horton and several local custom builders have over 50 additional homes in various stages of development.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to 50% of 13 alternative investment fund manager companies with approximately $4.5 billion under management.
 
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 135 acquisitions from 1986 through June 2004, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these were regional or local P/C brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. In the last few years, the company has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range. Gallagher is highly selective.
An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding its talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, marketing-oriented culture
a profitable, growing business whose ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's aggressive acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
MARKET OUTLOOK
6
The P/C market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an over-abundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%. A market correction began in 2000 and intensified in 2001, particularly following the September 11th terrorist attacks. Double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued
throughout 2002. The magnitude of rate increases began to moderate in 2003. A market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers indicated that in the second quarter of 2004 premium rates declined by an average of 1% for small commercial accounts (less than $25,000 in commissions and fees), 3% for mid-sized accounts ($25,000-$100,000) and 6% for large accounts. A similar rate study conducted by the Risk and Insurance Management Society in the second quarter of 2004 confirmed that price declines were outpacing price gains in every major category except workers compensation. Softening market conditions are expected to continue throughout 2004.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum
rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition is beginning to increase, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms in 2004.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
CONDENSED QUARTERLY SEGMENT INCOME STATEMENT  2002 THROUGH 2004(IN MILLIONS EXCEPT PER SHARE DATA AND OTHER INFORMATION DATA)
2002 2003 2004
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Gross revenues $164.9 $183.6 $210.8 $222.0 $781.3 $198.1 $213.1 $232.4 $245.6 $889.2 $213.0 $234.7
Earnings before income taxes 25.7 29.0 47.5 46.5 148.7 26.8 38.2 54.9 52.4 172.3 33.1 43.7
Net earnings 17.7 20.6 33.2 32.6 104.1 20.1 28.6 41.7 39.8 130.2 26.5 35.0
Growth revenues 20% 30% 36% 26% 28% 22% 17% 12% 10% 15% 9% 11%
Pretax profit margin 16% 16% 23% 21% 9% 14% 18% 24% 21% 19% 16% 19%
Earnings per share $0.20 $0.22 $0.36 $0.36 $1.14 $0.22 $0.31 $0.45 $0.43 $1.41 $0.28 $0.37
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Gross revenues $70.0 $67.7 $71.6 $71.9 $281.2 $76.7 $78.3 $83.0 $83.7 $321.7 $88.4 $92.8
Earnings before income taxes 11.6 8.4 6.5 5.1 31.6 10.7 10.2 11.3 10.7 42.9 13.0 14.4
Net earnings 8.0 6.0 4.6 3.6 22.2 8.1 7.7 8.6 8.1 32.5 10.4 11.5
Growth revenues 7% 4% 6% 9% 6% 10% 16% 16% 16% 14% 15% 19%
Pretax profit margin 17% 12% 9% 7% 11% 14% 13% 14% 13% 13% 15% 16%
Earnings per share $0.08 $0.06 $0.05 $0.04 $0.23 $0.09 $0.08 $0.09 $0.09 $0.35 $0.11 $0.12
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income (1) $15.7 $12.7 $14.7 $17.8 $60.9 $15.3 $17.9 $38.1 $46.8 $118.1 $46.5 $59.1
Investment gains (losses) (1.4) 13.1 (28.9) (4.8) (22.0) (25.7) - 1.6 (0.4) (24.5) 2.5 2.1
Earnings (loss) before income taxes 11.5 11.2 (20.7) 3.2 5.2 (21.7) (0.1) (1.8) 1.7 (21.9) 2.5 (0.5)
Net earnings 8.0 7.9 (14.5) 2.2 3.6 (16.3) (0.1) (1.4) 1.3 (16.5) 2.0 (0.4)
Earnings per share $0.09 $0.09 $(0.16) $0.02 $0.04 $(0.18) $- $(0.02) $0.01 $(0.19) $0.02 $-
TOTAL COMPANY
Gross revenues $249.2 $277.1 $268.2 $306.9 $1,101.4 $264.4 $309.3 $355.1 $375.7 $1,304.5 $350.4 $388.7
Earnings before income taxes 48.8 48.6 33.3 54.8 185.5 15.8 48.3 64.4 64.8 193.3 48.6 57.6
Net earnings 33.7 34.5 23.3 38.4 129.9 11.9 36.2 48.9 49.2 146.2 38.9 46.1
Earnings per share $0.37 $0.37 $0.25 $0.42 $1.41 $0.13 $0.39 $0.52 $0.53 $1.57 $0.41 $0.49
7
Cash dividends per share declared $0.15 $0.15 $0.15 $0.15 $0.60 $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.72 $0.25 $0.25
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $2,172.6 $2,448.6 $2,350.6 $2,463.6 $2,492.4 $2,644.3 $2,695.1 $2,847.6 $2,873.0 $3,218.2
Total liabilities $1,768.0 $1,965.8 $1,862.8 $1,935.4 $1,947.6 $2,071.8 $2,104.5 $2,228.5 $2,225.0 $2,521.4
Total stockholders' equity $404.6 $482.8 $487.8 $528.2 $544.8 $572.5 $590.6 $619.1 $648.0 $696.8
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 90,595 92,366 92,051 92,126 91,861 92,312 93,651 93,716 93,570 93,312 93,955 94,343
Common shares repurchased (000s) - - 477 1 478 239 515 1,140 970 2,864 555 -
Tangible net worth (2) $331.8 $375.7 $378.8 $393.1 $391.4 $417.0 $422.6 $396.2 $394.6 $427.5
Book value per share $4.70 5.47 $5.54 $5.97 $6.06 $6.32 $6.55 $6.88 $7.14 $7.58
Tangible book value per share $3.85 $4.25 $4.30 $4.44 $4.35 $4.60 $4.69 $4.40 $4.35 $4.65
Annualized return on beginning
tangible net worth 44% 44% 40% 42% 42% 12% 24% 33% 37% 37% 39% 43%
Number of acquisitions closed 2 5 1 2 10 4 1 2 7 14 7 3
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 6,578 6,886 7,030 7,111 7,111 7,088 7,077 7,120 7,206 7,206 7,359 7,564
Earnings Before Investment (Gains) Losses, Depreciation, Amortization
and Stock Compensation Expense (3)
Net earnings $33.7 $34.5 $23.3 $38.4 $129.9 $11.9 $36.2 $48.9 $49.2 $146.2 $38.9 $46.0
Investment (gains) losses 1.4 (13.1) 28.9 4.8 22.0 25.7 - (1.6) 0.4 24.5 (2.5) (2.1)
Depreciation 5.5 6.1 6.9 7.3 25.8 7.2 7.2 8.3 8.5 31.2 8.6 9.0
Amortization 1.2 2.2 2.0 1.2 6.6 2.1 2.2 2.5 3.1 9.9 3.2 6.0
Non-cash compensation 0.1 1.1 1.1 1.1 3.4 1.0 2.2 2.2 4.0 9.4 3.3 4.0
Tax effect (2.5) 1.1 (11.7) (4.3) (17.5) (9.0) (2.9) (2.7) (3.8) (18.5) (2.5) (3.4)
Earnings before investment (gains) losses,
depreciation, amortization and stock
compensation expense $39.4 $31.9 $50.5 $48.5 $170.2 $38.9 $44.9 $57.6 $61.4 $202.7 $49.0 $59.6
On a diluted per share basis $0.43 $0.35 $0.55 $0.53 $1.85 $0.42 $0.48 $0.61 $0.66 $2.17 $0.52 $0.63
(1) Beginning 3rd Q, 2003, includes impact of FIN 46.
(2) Represents total stockholders' equity less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets.
(3) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of investment gains (losses), depreciation, amortization, amortization of deferred compensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com
 
Growth
Cash Dividends
Why Invest ?
Profits
Gross Revenues
(in millions)
$1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
$1,304
19%
CAGR
$1,101
$910
$741 $606
99
00
01
02
03
* INDICATED
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(in millions)
$250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
$203
CAGR 27%
$170
$129
$91 $74
99
00
01
02
03
Dividends Per Share
$1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
$1.00 *
Increase
Annual
Average
20%
$0.03
84 85 86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04
GAAP Book Value Per Share
$7.00 $6.00 $5.00 $4.00 $3.00 $2.00
$1.00 $0.00
$6.88
19% CAGR $5.97
$4.37 $3.95 $3.29
99 00 01 02 03
Diluted Earnings Per Share
$1.60 $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40
$0.20 $0.00
15% CAGR
$1.57 $1.39 $1.41
$1.05 $.88
99 00 01 02 03
Note: All information as originally reported except per share amounts restated for stock splits.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
President & CEO
(630) 773-3800


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20041026172935.txt.gz
TIME:20041026172935
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.
Other Events
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") today received a subpoena from the Connecticut Attorney General requesting information concerning possible violations by the Company of the Connecticut antitrust laws in connection with the solicitation of bids for insurance. The Company intends to cooperate fully.
 
The Company also stated today that it will not participate as a retail broker in volume-based or profit-based contingent commission agreements effective January 1, 2005. In addition, when allegations of bid rigging and price fixing recently came to light at Marsh, management retained independent counsel to perform an internal review. While the review is at an early stage, management has no knowledge that Gallagher has engaged in any improper practices.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20041110164216.txt.gz
TIME:20041110164216
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
The slides and investment profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at the Company's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure". These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on the Company's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: November 10, 2004
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
September 2004
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though perhaps not to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment, and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of existing in income tax laws. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
2
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm Public since 1984 Market capitalization of $3.1 billion Shares outstanding of 92.4 million Dividend yield of 3.0% 52-week range  $26.74$34.25 Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 9/30/04, unless otherwise indicated
4
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Performance vs. S&P
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG] S&P 500 (SPX)
Sep-99 Sep-00 Sep-01 Sep-02 Sep-03 Sep-04
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
19%
CAGR
1999 Gross Revenue 2003 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
33%
CAGR
1999 Cash Flow from Ops 2003 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
19%
CAGR
$1.00
1984 Dividends 2004
2003 cash flow from operations of $229 M
5-year average ROE of 31% is highest in peer group Dividend yield of 3.0% in 2004
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) September 30, 2004
Stock Price $1.72 $33.13
Market Cap $57 M $3.1 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $449.0 M
Annual Dividend/Share $.03 $1.00
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 18%
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals $2.0$2.3 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Average Stockholders' Equity
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven Team-oriented Open "Small company" feel Client-focused Competitive No "C" players
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2003 Employee Survey Results
78% participation
96% understand the need to grow and are committed to helping grow the Company 92% AgreeCustomer is top priority 92% "I am proud to work for this Company" 90% of men and women felt they were treated with respect by co-workers 80% felt the Company could run more efficiently
The Gallagher Culture is Alive and Strong
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2003
Revenue
Brokerage 69%
Financial Services 6%
Risk Management 25%
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 79%
Financial Services 1%
Risk Management 20%
Revenue excludes FIN 46 impact and investment write-offs
Pretax earnings exclude investment write-offs (no impact of FIN 46)
11
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher's largest business segment Acts as intermediary  no underwriting risk Niche driven Alternative market leaders
(1) Business Insurance/JP Morgan
12
 
Brokerage Segment
Contingent Commissions
Eliminated retail broker volume/profit-based contingents effective 1/1/05 $31.7total contingent commissions through 9/30/04 $33 milliontotal contingent commissions for full year 2003 Subpoena received from Connecticut Attorney General Gallagher cooperating fully
13
 
Brokerage Segment
Contingent Commission Revenues
Nine Month Period Ended September 30, 2004
Revenues Approximate Number of
Contingent commission revenue from: ($ in millions) Agreements Carriers
Local contingent commission contracts and programs $22.8 535 160
Local managing general agent, managing general
underwriter and program administration contracts 5.1 35 25
National contingent commission contracts 3.8 20 12
$31.7 590 197
14
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities Over 130 acquisitions since 1986 in this segment Almost $460 million of 2003 revenue from acquired entities The rules: financial health, similar culture Gallagher is merger partner of choice
15
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits
1000 900 800 700 600 500 400 300 200 100 $383M
20%
CAGR
$849M
99 00 01 02 03
Revenue
180 160 140 120 100 80 60 40 20 0 $72M
20%
CAGR
$172M
99 00 01 02 03
Pretax Earnings
2003 pretax margins of 19%
2003 growth in earnings per share of 24%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
16
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage 62% (Jim Gault)
Employee Benefits 15% (Jim Durkin)
Specialty Marketing & International 23% (Dave McGurn)
As of 12/31/03
17
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
18
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness Aviation Construction Energy
Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education Management Liability Marine Mergers & Acquisitions Personal Insurance
Public Entity Real Estate
General Commercial Habitational Hospitality Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit Restaurant Scholastic K-12 Transportation Worldwide Risk Services
19
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size Acquisitions and hiring Alternative market
Captives Rent-a-captives Deductible plans Self-insurance
20
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices, Joint Ventures & Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Reinsurance Brokerage International P&C Brokerage Programs/Program Administration CoverageFirst.com Wholesale Brokerage Captives/Rent-a-Captives
22
 
Employee Benefits Offices
23
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/ Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
24
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Brokerage Services Merger and acquisition opportunities Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs Providing better retirement tools/information Benefits communication and administration Compliance with federal and state regulations
25
 
Risk Management Segment
Two Primary Operations
Property/Casualty Claims Management "Gallagher Bassett" 91% (Rich McKenna)
Medical Claims Management 9% (Jim Durkin)
Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims.
As of 12/31/03
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits
350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0
15%
CAGR
$322M
1999 2003
Revenue
45 40 35 30 25 20 15 10 5 0
23%
CAGR
$43M
1999 2003
Pretax Earnings
2003 pretax margin of 13%
2003 growth in earnings per share of 51%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
27
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
ONTARIO
SCOTLAND
ENGLAND
AUSTRALIA
HAWAII
28
 
Risk Management Segment
Capabilities
Real-time Claims Reporting Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management
Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
29
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments Captives Program business Expanding global capabilities Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage Security Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet Employer communication/plan administration
30
 
Financial Services Segment $963 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($177 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($163 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($623 M)
* As of September 30, 2004  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
31
 
Financial Services Segment
Assets at December 31, 2002 & September 30, 2004
Assets Under Management $300 $250 $200 $150 $298 $177
2002 2004 $            In millions
Asset Classes 9/30/04 $70 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Low Income Housing $15M Alternative Energy $61M Asset Alliance $46M Real Estate, incl HO $22M Bermuda Insurance $20M VC, Airplanes & Other $13M
Tax Adv.
Asset Mgmt.
Real Estate
Other
32
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007 Asset management  monetize Real estate  optimize cash flows Venture capital  substantially exited in 2003
33
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
34
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
Gross Revenues As Originally Reported ($ M) $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200
19%
CAGR
$606 $741 $910 $1,101 $1,304
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
35
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
Pretax Earnings As Originally Reported ($            M) $200 $180 $160 $140 $120 $100 $80 $60 $40
18%
CAGR
$104 $125 $142 $186 $193
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
36
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
Revenue Per Employee As Reported $180 $170 $160 $150 $140 $130 $120 $110 $100
8 %
CAGR
$127,000 $137,000 $140,000 $155,000 $181,000
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted EPS As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01 $1.60 $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40
1 5%
CAGR
$.88 $1.05 $1.39 $1.41 $1.57
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(In millions) $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
2 7 %
CAGR
$74 $91 $129 $170 $203
1999 2000 2001 2002 2003
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.4 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($399 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($547 M)
Shares Repurchased
($423 M)
Built a balance sheet with $4.86 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 9/30/04
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
19 %
CAGR
1999 Gross Revenue 2003 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
33 %
CAGR
1999 Cash Flow from Ops 2003 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
19%
CAGR
$1.00
1984
Dividends
2004
2003 cash flow from operations of $229 M
5-year average ROE of 31% is highest in peer group Dividend yield of 3.0% in 2004
41
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens - everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
13. Professional courtesy is expected.
14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other.
We are a team.
16. Loyalty and respect are earned - not dictated. 17. Fear is a turn-off.
18. People skills are very important at Gallagher. 20. We run to problems -not away from them.
21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on - not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength - not a weakness.
24. We must continue building a professional Company - together - as a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances - but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
42

 
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management Segment
Financial Services Segment
Arthur J.
Gallagher
& Co.
INVESTMENT P R O F I L E
NYSE: AJG
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm and the third-largest broker of U.S. business. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty (P/C) products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a full-service employee benefits consultant.
Stock PerformanceArthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500
Gallagher
S&P 500
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
9 99 9 00 9 01 9 02 9 03 9 04 www.ajg.com
OCTOBER 2004
page
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 4
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT 5
ACQUISITION STRATEGY 6
MARKET OUTLOOK 6
CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 7
WHY INVEST? 8
As of September 30, 2004
Price $ 33.13
52-week high/low $26.74$ 34.25
Trailing 12-mos. gross revenues $1.5 billion
Market cap $3.1 billion
Indicated annual dividend $ 1.00
Yield 3.0 %
Shares outstanding 92.4 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/earnings 17 x
Number of employees 7,824
1
 
Team Oriented
Client Focused
Innovative
Brokerage Segment
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
N I C H E S
Agribusiness Aviation Construction Energy
Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education Management Liability
Marine
Mergers & Acquisitions
Personal Insurance
Public Entity
Real Estate (4)
General Commercial Habitational Hospitality Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit
Restaurant Scholastic K-12 Transportation
Worldwide Risk Services
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring P/C insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. With offices throughout the U.S., this operation pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners in more than 100 countries throughout the world.
BSD is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of P/C insurance, approximately 67% of its business falls within 21 specialized niches. These cross-divisional niche practice groups target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This niche focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. Niche practice groups allow for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitate the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within the niches provide a competitive advantage.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth over the next year will come from its niche practice groups; middle-market accounts; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms like captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL
C A P A B I L I T I E S
Reinsurance Brokerage International P/C Brokerage Programs/Program Administration
CoverageFirst.com
Wholesale Brokerage
Captive/Rent-a-Captive Management
Specialty Marketing and International is comprised of wholesale, excess/surplus and reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S. and abroad, captive
2
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL (CONTINUED) management operations outside the Continental U.S., and P/C joint-ventures and partnerships.
From 2001 through 2003, rate increases and coverage restrictions in the P/C market increased client demand for alternative risk transfer mechanisms. Gallagher structures a broad range of alternative market mechanisms, tailored to clients' specific needs and financial situations. Those market conditions also contributed to exceptional growth in wholesale and excess/surplus lines business, much of which is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. A growing amount of business is coming to Gallagher via its e-commerce portal,
CoverageFirst.com, which has over 12,000 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
Specialty Marketing and International expects its greatest revenue growth opportunities will come from reinsurance, international and wholesale brokerage business, programs and program administration. In addition to its offices or joint-ventures in the U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia, Singapore, Malaysia and Bahrain, the operation pursues business opportunities in conjunction with Gallagher's Strategic Alliance Network of correspondent brokers and consultants in over 100 countries around the world.
STRATEGIC
ALLIANCE
NETWORK
In addition to its own international brokerage offices, Gallagher has developed a non-owned network of leading independent brokers in more than 100 countries around the world. These relationships provide Gallagher's clients with one of the most comprehensive worldwide sales and service networks available.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES
CAPABILITIES
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services Executive Benefits/Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services provides employee benefit brokerage and human resource consulting to assist clients in all areas of their employee retirement and health and welfare plans. Rising healthcare costs and growing regulatory complexities have resulted in double-digit increases in employee benefit costs. Gallagher has significantly expanded its technical resources and technological capabilities over the last couple of years to better assist clients in addressing this trend.
Gallagher offers expertise and guidance in all areas of benefits planning, delivery and administration. This encompasses a broad range of benefit services, including executive benefits and financial planning, worksite marketing and voluntary products, defined contribution products, actuarial services, compensation program design/analysis, data analysis and
benchmarking, retirement services, benefits communication and out-sourcing, and training programs and tools that help employers address federal and state regulatory compliance.
The operation has also established eight niche practice groups in the following areas: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity, religious, restaurant, education (K-12) and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from its niche practice groups, through mergers and acquisitions, from cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, and by assisting clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities.
3
 
Quality Driven
Comprehensive
Cost Effective
Risk Management Segment
GALLAGHER BASSETT
E X P E R T I S E
Real-Time Claims Reporting
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as the world's largest multiline, third-party administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., U.K., Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for over a decade that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. By the end of September 2004, the system had more than 9,300 users and was averaging 15 million site hits and over 60,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through the next year will come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
4
 
GALLAGHER BENEFIT ADMINISTRATORS
CAPABILITIES
Medical Case Management Non-Network Fee Negotiations Customized Reporting Capabilities EAP/Wellness Programs Managed Healthcare Delivery Utilization Review Internet Enrollment/Administration
Gallagher Benefit Administrators offers a wide range of benefit administrative services as well as the ability to integrate those services. It brings clients innovative reporting capabilities, customized managed healthcare options and integrated utilization management services.
While many third-party claims administrators have fallen behind in upgrading core competencies, Gallagher Benefit Administrators has continued to address systems and processes related to electronic data interchange and security issues, claims regulatory changes, access to information via the Internet, and methods through which employers can communicate and administer their plans more efficiently.
The operation has a platform that allows for paperless claims processing and pays many claims automatically. Clients have Web access to claims data and can complete their enrollments electronically. Gallagher Benefit Administrators expects these enhancements to elevate its competitive position in an industry facing consolidation.
Financial Services Segment
CORE
COMPETENCIES
Tax-Advantaged Investing Real Estate Asset Management
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and tax obligations. Financial Services specializes in tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax-advantaged investments are comprised primarily of low income housing developments, waste-to-energy projects and synthetic fuel plants. These investments have helped reduce
Gallagher's tax rate to 30% in 2002, 24% in 2003 and 20% in 2004.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. The building is almost 100% leased, with third parties occupying approximately 40%. Gallagher also owns 80% of an 11,000-acre community development near Orlando. Known as Harmony, Florida, the site has a Johnny Miller Signature golf course and a new high school that opened in August 2004. More than 140 homes have been completed and there are now more than 300 residents in Harmony. National builder D.R. Horton and six custom builders have over 30 additional homes in various stages of development. Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to
50% of 14 alternative investment fund manager companies with approximately $4.6 billion under management.
5
 
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 139 acquisitions from 1986 through September 2004, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these were regional or local P/C brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. In the last few years, the company has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range. Gallagher is highly selective.
An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding its talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on: a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, marketing-oriented culture a profitable, growing business whose ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to
Gallagher's greater resources clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's aggressive acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
MARKET OUTLOOK
The P/C market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an over-abundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%. A market correction began in 2000 and intensified in 2001, particularly following the September 11th terrorist attacks. Double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002. The magnitude of rate increases began to moderate in 2003 and softening market conditions continued into 2004. A market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents &
Brokers indicated that the average premium for commercial accounts declined 5.9% in the third quarter of 2004, with large accounts experiencing the most significant reductions. A similar rate study conducted by the Risk and Insurance Management Society in the third quarter of 2004 confirmed that price declines were outpacing price gains in every major category except workers compensation.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the
complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition has increased, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms.
In light of recent controversy over the appropriateness of profit and volume based incentive commissions paid to brokers, Gallagher announced in October 2004 that it will no longer participate as a retail broker in volume-based or profit-based contingent commission agreements effective January 1, 2005. The amount of contingent commission revenue for the nine-month period ended September 30, 2004 in which Gallagher participated as a retail broker and which involved volume-based or profit-based contingent commission agreements aggregated to $26.6 million. The loss of revenues from these agreements could have a material adverse effect on Gallagher's results of operations.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
6
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
CONDENSED QUARTERLY SEGMENT INCOME STATEMENT  2002 THROUGH 2004(IN MILLIONS EXCEPT PER SHARE DATA AND OTHER INFORMATION DATA)
2002 2003 2004
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Gross revenues $ 164.9 $ 183.6 $ 210.8 $ 222.0 $ 781.3 $ 198.1 $ 213.1 $ 232.4 $ 245.6 $ 889.2 $ 213.0 $ 234.7 $ 254.2
Earnings before income taxes 25.7 29.0 47.5 46.5 148.7 26.8 38.2 54.9 52.4 172.3 33.1 43.7 56.5
Net earnings 17.7 20.6 33.2 32.6 104.1 20.1 28.6 41.7 39.8 130.2 26.5 35.0 45.2
Growth revenues 20% 30% 36% 26% 28% 22% 17% 12% 10% 15% 9% 11% 9%
Pretax profit margin 16% 16% 23% 21% 19% 14% 18% 24% 21% 19% 16% 19% 22%
Diluted net earnings per share $ 0.20 $ 0.22 $ 0.36 $ 0.36 $ 1.14 $ 0.22 $ 0.31 $ 0.45 $ 0.43 $ 1.41 $ 0.28 $ 0.37 $ 0.48
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Gross revenues $ 70.0 $ 67.7 $ 71.6 $ 71.9 $ 281.2 $ 76.7 $ 78.3 $ 83.0 $ 83.7 $ 321.7 $ 88.4 $ 92.8 $ 94.7
Earnings before income taxes 11.6 8.4 6.5 5.1 31.6 10.7 10.2 11.3 10.7 42.9 13.0 14.4 15.9
Net earnings 8.0 6.0 4.6 3.6 22.2 8.1 7.7 8.6 8.1 32.5 10.4 11.5 12.7
Growth revenues 7% 4% 6% 9% 6% 9% 16% 16% 16% 14% 15% 19% 14%
Pretax profit margin 17% 12% 9% 7% 11% 14% 13% 14% 13% 13% 15% 16% 17%
Diluted net earnings per share $ 0.08 $ 0.06 $ 0.05 $ 0.04 $ 0.23 $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ 0.09 $ 0.09 $ 0.35 $ 0.11 $ 0.12 $ 0.13
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income (1) $ 15.7 $ 12.7 $ 14.7 $ 17.8 $ 60.9 $ 15.3 $ 17.9 $ 38.1 $ 46.8 $ 118.1 $ 46.5 $ 59.1 $ 34.3
Investment gains (losses) (1.4) 13.1 (28.9) (4.8) (22.0) (25.7) - 1.6 (0.4) (24.5) 2.5 2.1 2.6
Earnings (loss) before income taxes 11.5 11.2 (20.7) 3.2 5.2 (21.7) (0.1) (1.8) 1.7 (21.9) 2.5 (0.5) (4.4)
Net earnings (loss) 8.0 7.9 (14.5) 2.2 3.6 (16.3) (0.1) (1.4) 1.3 (16.5) 2.0 (0.4) (3.5)
Diluted net earnings (loss) per share $ 0.09 $ 0.09 $ (0.16) $ 0.02 $ 0.04 $ (0.18) $ - $ (0.02) $ 0.01 $ (0.19) $ 0.02 $ - $ (0.04)
TOTAL COMPANY
Gross revenues $ 249.2 $ 277.1 $ 268.2 $ 306.9 $ 1,101.4 $ 264.4 $ 309.3 $ 355.1 $ 375.7 $ 1,304.5 $ 350.4 $ 388.7 $ 385.8
Earnings before income taxes 48.8 48.6 33.3 54.8 185.5 15.8 48.3 64.4 64.8 193.3 48.6 57.6 68.0
Net earnings 33.7 34.5 23.3 38.4 129.9 11.9 36.2 48.9 49.2 146.2 38.9 46.1 54.4
Diluted net earnings per share $ 0.37 $ 0.37 $ 0.25 $ 0.42 $ 1.41 $ 0.13 $ 0.39 $ 0.52 $ 0.53 $ 1.57 $ 0.41 $ 0.49 $ 0.57
Cash dividends declared per share $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.15 $ 0.60 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.18 $ 0.72 $ 0.25 $ 0.25 $ 0.25
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $ 2,172.6 $ 2,448.6 $ 2,350.6 $ 2,463.6 $ 2,492.4 $ 2,644.3 $ 2,695.1 $ 2,901.6 $ 2,873.0 $ 3,218.2 $ 3,085.0
Total liabilities $ 1,768.0 $ 1,965.8 $ 1,862.8 $ 1,935.4 $ 1,947.6 $ 2,071.8 $ 2,104.5 $ 2,282.5 $ 2,225.0 $ 2,521.4 $ 2,342.1
Total stockholders' equity $ 404.6 $ 482.8 $ 487.8 $ 528.2 $ 544.8 $ 572.5 $ 590.6 $ 619.1 $ 648.0 $ 696.8 $ 742.9
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 90,595 92,366 92,051 92,126 91,861 92,312 93,651 93,716 93,570 93,312 93,955 94,343 95,053
Common shares repurchased (000s) - - 477 1 478 239 515 1,140 970 2,864 555 - - 615
Tangible net worth (2) $ 331.8 $ 375.7 $ 378.8 $ 393.1 $ 391.4 $ 417.0 $ 422.6 $ 396.2 $ 394.6 $ 427.5 $ 449.0
Book value per share $ 4.70 5.47 $ 5.54 $ 5.97 $ 6.06 $ 6.32 $ 6.55 $ 6.88 $ 7.14 $ 7.58 $ 8.04
Tangible book value per share (3) $ 3.85 $ 4.25 $ 4.30 $ 4.44 $ 4.35 $ 4.60 $ 4.69 $ 4.40 $ 4.35 $ 4.65 $ 4.86
Annualized return on beginning
tangible net worth (4) 44% 44% 40% 42% 42% 12% 24% 33% 37% 37% 39% 43% 47%
Number of acquisitions closed 2 5 1 2 10 4 1 2 7 14 7 3 4
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 6,578 6,886 7,030 7,111 7,088 7,077 7,120 7,206 7,359 7,564 7,824
Earnings Before Investment (Gains) Losses, Depreciation, Amortization
and Stock Compensation Expense (5)
Net earnings $ 33.7 $ 34.5 $ 23.3 $ 38.4 $ 129.9 $ 11.9 $ 36.2 $ 48.9 $ 49.2 $ 146.2 $ 38.9 $ 46.0 $ 54.4
Investment (gains) losses 1.4 (13.1) 28.9 4.8 22.0 25.7 - (1.6) 0.4 24.5 (2.5) (2.1) (2.6)
Depreciation 5.5 6.1 6.9 7.3 25.8 7.2 7.2 8.3 8.5 31.2 8.6 9.0 8.7
Amortization 1.2 2.2 2.0 1.2 6.6 2.1 2.2 2.5 3.1 9.9 3.2 6.0 4.3
Non-cash compensation 0.1 1.1 1.1 1.1 3.4 1.0 2.2 2.2 4.0 9.4 3.3 4.0 3.9
Tax effect (2.5) 1.1 (11.7) (4.3) (17.4) (9.0) (2.9) (2.7) (3.8) (18.4) (2.5) (3.4) (2.9)
Earnings before investment (gains) losses,
depreciation, amortization and stock
compensation expense $ 39.4 $ 31.9 $ 50.5 $ 48.5 $ 170.3 $ 38.9 $ 44.9 $ 57.6 $ 61.4 $ 202.8 $ 49.0 $ 59.6 $ 65.8
On a diluted per share basis $ 0.43 $ 0.35 $ 0.55 $ 0.53 $ 1.85 $ 0.42 $ 0.48 $ 0.61 $ 0.66 $ 2.17 $ 0.52 $ 0.63 $ 0.69
(1) Beginning 3rd Q, 2003, includes impact of FIN 46.
(2) Represents total stockholders' equity less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets. (3) Represents tangible net worth divided by common shares outstanding at end of the period.
(4) Represents year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity, less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets, as of the beginning of the year.
(5) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of investment gains (losses), depreciation, amortization, amortization of deferred compensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com
 
Growth
Cash Dividends
Profits
Why Invest ?
Gross Revenues
(in millions) $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
CAGR
19% $606 $741 $910 $1,101 $1,304
99 00 01 02 03
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(in millions) $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
CAGR
27% $74 $91 $129 $170 $203
99 00 01 02 03
Dividends Per Share $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00 $0.03
Increase
Annual
Average
20% $1.00 *
84 85 86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04
* Indicated
GAAP Book Value Per Share $7.00 $6.00 $5.00 $4.00 $3.00 $2.00
$1.00 $0.00
CAGR
19% $3.29 $3.95 $4.37 $5.97 $6.88
99 00 01 02 03
Diluted Earnings Per Share $1.60 $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40
$0.20 $0.00
CAGR
15% $.88 $1.05
$1.39 $1.41 $1.57
99 00 01 02 03
Note: All information as originally reported except per share amounts restated for stock splits.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
President & CEO
(630) 773-3800


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20041202172916.txt.gz
TIME:20041202172916
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.
Other Events
 
Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a third party administrator and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., today received a subpoena from the Office of the Attorney General of the State of New York (the New York AG) requesting information in connection with an investigation it is conducting. The subpoena does not seek information concerning Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.'s insurance brokerage operations. As of the date of this press release, Gallagher has not received a subpoena from the New York AG in connection with Gallagher's insurance brokerage operations, nor has Gallagher been named in any proceedings filed by the New York AG.
 
Similar to many other participants in the insurance industry, Gallagher has received subpoenas and requests for information from various other state attorneys general and from state departments of insurance regarding Gallagher's insurance brokerage operations. Gallagher is cooperating with all such inquiries.
 
Item 9.01.
Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
[Logo of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.]
 
 
 
Itasca, IL, December 2, 2004Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a third party administrator and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., today received a subpoena from the Office of the Attorney General of the State of New York (the New York AG) requesting information in connection with an investigation it is conducting. The subpoena does not seek information concerning Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.'s insurance brokerage operations. As of the date of this press release, Gallagher has not received a subpoena from the New York AG in connection with Gallagher's insurance brokerage operations, nor has Gallagher been named in any proceedings filed by the New York AG.
 
Similar to many other participants in the insurance industry, Gallagher has received subpoenas and requests for information from various other state attorneys general and from state departments of insurance regarding Gallagher's insurance brokerage operations. Gallagher is cooperating with all such inquiries.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in nine countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050106132704.txt.gz
TIME:20050106132704
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
 
 
A copy of the press release announcing Mr. Hengesbaugh's intention not to stand for re-election is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
Itasca, IL, January 6, 2005  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. announces today that Bernard L. Hengesbaugh, a Director of the Company, has advised the Company that, as a result of his recent acceptance of the position of Chief Operating Officer of the American Medical Association, he is unable to stand for re-election to the Board of Directors at the Company's May, 2005 Annual Meeting of Shareholders.
 
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer, congratulates Mr. Hengesbaugh and wishes him success in this important position. Mr. Gallagher also stated that while Mr. Hengesbaugh will be missed, he looks forward to continuing to work with him for the duration of his term as a Director.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in nine countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050125165935.txt.gz
TIME:20050125165935
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On January 25, 2005, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's fourth quarter and full year 2004 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
99   Press release, dated January 25, 2005, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, January 25, 2005  Gallagher today reported its financial results for fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2004. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
 
Quarter Ended December 31
 
 
"Despite the softening rates in the insurance marketplace and the disruptions in our industry resulting from the ongoing investigations by state attorneys general and other regulatory agencies, Gallagher had another strong year," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "On a combined basis, our Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted excellent results for the year:
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
Legal Developments
 
As announced in its third quarter earnings conference call, in response to industry developments, Gallagher retained independent counsel to perform an internal review of certain of its business practices. Such independent counsel has completed its internal review and has found no evidence that Gallagher had engaged in any price fixing or bid rigging of the type alleged in the New York Attorney General s October 14, 2004 complaint against Marsh & McLennan Companies, Inc. nor has it engaged in any improper tying arrangements. However, as part of insurance industry-wide investigations, Gallagher remains the subject of investigations and regulatory proceedings by authorities in fifteen states investigating certain of its business practices, including the receipt by Gallagher of contingent commissions. Gallagher is also a defendant in eight lawsuits brought by private litigants which relate to these practices. Gallagher cannot predict the outcome of these investigations, regulatory proceedings, and lawsuits, nor their effect upon Gallagher's business or financial condition.
 
In addition, previously reported litigation involving synfuel technology reached the trial stage this month with a result expected in February 2005. The plaintiff seeks damages from Gallagher's subsidiary, AJG Financial Services, Inc., in the amount of $140 million as well as a declaratory judgment that payments would be owing on future synfuel production through the end of 2007. AJG Financial Services, Inc. seeks damages in its counterclaim in the amount of $71 million. While management continues to believe the plaintiff's claims lack merit, the outcome of this trial cannot be predicted.
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, January 26, 2005 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in eight countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2004 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2004 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2004 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050202192119.txt.gz
TIME:20050202192119
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The January 2005 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Date: February 2, 2005
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
January 2005
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment or the outcome of litigation concerning Gallagher's Syn/Coal production; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may be subject to reduction due to the elimination of contingent commission arrangements in 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of such laws or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of Syn/Coal credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
2
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com.
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm Public since 1984 Market capitalization of $3.0 billion Shares outstanding of 92.1 million
Dividend yield of 3.5%* (indicated as of Jan 05)
52-week range  $25.42$34.25 Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 12/31/04, unless otherwise indicated
* Yield given 1/19/05 Board of Directors' declaration of a $.28 per share first quarter 2005 dividend.
4
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Performance vs. S&P
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
Dec-99 Dec-00 Dec-01 Dec-02 Dec-03 Dec-04
Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG] S&P 500 (SPX)
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
2000 Gross Revenues 2004 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
21% CAGR
34% CAGR
19% CAGR
2000 Cash Flow from Ops 2004 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1985 Dividends 2005 $1.12*
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group Dividend yield of 3.5% indicated in 2005*
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO (Restated for stock splits) December 31, 2004
Stock Price
Market Cap
Tangible Net Worth
Annual Dividend/Share
$1.72
$57 M
$23 M$32.50
$.03$3.0 B
$387 M
$1.12* (indicated)
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 19%
* On January 19, 2005, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.28 per share first quarter 2005 dividend.
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Record revenues of $1.5B and net earnings of $189
Total Brokerage and Risk Management revenues increased 11%
Total Brokerage and Risk Management pretax earnings increased 14%
Completed record 19 acquisitions
Record dividend increase of 39%
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Returned $141M in cash to stockholders
$56M of share repurchases or 1.8M shares
$85M of paid dividends
Increased GAAP Book Value to $761M
Maintained tangible net worth at nearly $400M
Navigated synfuel tax credit waters
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals
$2.0 - $2.3 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Average Stockholders' Equity
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven
Team-oriented and committed to growth
Open
"Small company" feel
Client-focused
Competitive
No "C" players
Niche advantaged
11
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2004
Gross Revenues
Brokerage 67%
Financial Services 7%
Risk Management 27%
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 81%
Financial Services (8%)
Risk Management 26%
Gross revenues exclude FIN 46 impact and investment gains
Pretax earnings excludes investment gains (no FIN 46 impact on earnings)
12
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher's largest business segment
Acts as intermediary  no underwriting risk
Niche driven Alternative market leaders
13
 
Brokerage Segment
Contingent Commissions
Effective 1/1/05, not entering into new volume/profit-based contingent agreements as retail broker
$39.5M total contingent commissions through 12/31/04; $33.8M are retail volume/profit-based
Received subpoenas and other requests for information from state attorneys general and state regulatory authorities
Gallagher cooperating fully
Initiated internal review with outside counsel which found no evidence of price fixing, bid rigging or improper tying arrangements
14
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities
Approximately 138 acquisitions in this segment from 1986 through 2004
The rules: financial health, similar culture
Gallagher is merger partner of choice
15
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits
1000 900 800 700 600 500 400 300 200 100
00 01 02 03 04 $458M $968M
20% CAGR
Gross Revenues
200 150 100 50 0
00 01 02 03 04 $92M $185M
20% CAGR
Pretax Earnings
2004 pretax margins of 19%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 11%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
16
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage 60% (Jim Gault)
Employee Benefits 16% (Jim Durkin)
Specialty Marketing & International 24% (Dave McGurn)
As of 12/31/04
17
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
18
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness Aviation Captives Construction Energy
Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education Management Liability Marine Mergers & Acquisitions Personal Insurance
Public Entity Real Estate
General Commercial Habitational Hospitality Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit Restaurant Scholastic K-12 Transportation Worldwide Risk Services Wrap ups
19
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size Acquisitions and hiring Alternative market
Captives Rent-a-captives Deductible plans Self-insurance
20
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices, Joint Ventures & Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Wholesale Brokerage International P&C Brokerage Programs/Program Administration
Reinsurance Brokerage Captives/Rent-a-Captives CoverageFirst.com
22
 
Employee Benefits Offices
23
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/ Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services
Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
24
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Retail Brokerage Merger and acquisition opportunities Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs Providing better retirement tools/information Benefits communication and administration Compliance with federal and state regulations
25
 
Risk Management Segment
Two Primary Operations
Property/Casualty Claims Management "Gallagher Bassett" 93% (Rich McKenna)
Medical Claims Management 7% (Jim Durkin)
Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims.
As of 12/31/04
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits
400 350
300 250 200 150 100 50 0
1999 2004
15% CAGR
Gross Revenues $373M
70 60 50 40 30 20 10 0
1999 2004
22% CAGR
Pretax Earnings $60M
2004 pretax margin of 16%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 46%
Note: Amounts as originally reported
27
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
28
 
Risk Management Segment
Capabilities
Real-time Claims Reporting Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management
Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
29
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments Captives Program business Expanding global capabilities Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage Security Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet Employer communication/plan administration
30
 
Financial Services Segment $888 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($175 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($561 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($152 M)
* As of December 31, 2004  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
31
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets Under Management and Financial Guarantees $400 $350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $362 $191
2002 2004 $70 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Net Asset Classes 12/31/04
Tax Adv. Asset Real Other Mgmt. Estate
Low Income Housing $16M Alternative Energy $60M Asset Alliance $48M Real Estate, incl HO $24M Bermuda Insurance $27M VC, Airplanes & Other $16M
$ In millions
32
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007 Asset management  monetize Real estate  optimize cash flows Venture capital  substantially exited in 2003
33
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
34
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
21% CAGR
Gross Revenues As Originally Reported ($M) $1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $741 $910 $1,101 $1,304 $1,522
2000 2001 2002 2003
2004
35
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
19% CAGR
Pretax Earnings As Originally Reported ($M) $260 $240 $220 $200 $180 $160 $140 $120 $100 $125 $142 $186 $193 $236
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
36
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
11% CAGR
Revenue Per Employee As Reported $200 $190 $180 $170 $160 $150 $140 $130 $120 $137,000 $140,000 $155,000 $181,000 $185,000
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted Net EPS As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01 $2.20 $2.00
18% CAGR
$1.80 $1.60
$1.40 $1.20
$1.00 $0.80 $1.05 $1.39 $1.41 $1.57 $1.99
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
26% CAGR
(In millions) $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $91 $129 $170 $203 $237
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.4 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($422 M)
Reinvested in
Operations
($546 M)
Shares Repurchased
($442 M)
Built a balance sheet with $4.20 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 12/31/04
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
21% CAGR
2000 Gross Revenues 2004 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
34% CAGR
19% CAGR
2000 Cash Flow from Ops 2004 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1985 Dividends 2005 $1.12*
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group Dividend yield of 3.5% indicated in 2005*
41
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens -everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
13. Professional courtesy is expected.
14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other.
We are a team.
16. Loyalty and respect are earned -not dictated.
17. Fear is a turn-off.
18. People skills are very important at Gallagher. 20. We run to problems -not away from them.
21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on -not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength -not a weakness.
24. We must continue building a professional Company -together -as a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances -but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
42

 
Brokerage Segment Risk Management Segment
Financial Services Segment
Arthur J.
Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
NYSE: AJG
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm and the third-largest broker of U.S. business. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty (P/C) products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a full-service employee benefits consultant.
Stock Performance - Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500
Gallagher
S&P 500
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
12|99 12 00 12 01 12 02 12 03 12 04 www.ajg.com
JANUARY 2005
page
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 4
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT 5
ACQUISITION STRATEGY 6
MARKET OUTLOOK 6
CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 7
WHY INVEST? 8
As of December 31, 2004
Price $32.50
52-week high/low $25.42$34.25
Trailing 12-mos. gross revenues $1.5 billion
Market cap $3.0 billion
Indicated annual dividend* $1.12
Yield (indicated as of January 19th, 2005) 3.5 %
Shares outstanding 92.1 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/earnings 16 x
Number of employees 8,204
* On January 19, 2005, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared at $.28 per share first quarter 2005 dividend.
1
 
Team Oriented
Client Focused
Innovative
Brokerage Segment
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
NICHES
Agribusiness Aviation Captives Construction Energy
Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education
Management Liability Marine Mergers & Acquisitions Personal Insurance
Public Entity
Real Estate (4)General CommercialHabitationalHospitalityShopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit Restaurant Scholastic K-12 Transportation Worldwide Risk Services Wrap Ups
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring P/C insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. With offices throughout the U.S., this operation pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners in more than 100 countries throughout the world.
BSD is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of P/C insurance, approximately 70% of its business falls within 23 specialized niches. These cross-divisional niche practice groups target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This niche focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. Niche practice groups allow for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitate the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within the niches provide a competitive advantage.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth over the next year will come from its niche practice groups; middle-market accounts; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms like captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL
CAPABILITIES
Wholesale Brokerage International P/C Brokerage Programs/Program Administration
Reinsurance Brokerage
Captive/Rent-a-Captive Management
CoverageFirst.com
Specialty Marketing and International is comprised of wholesale, excess/surplus and reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S. and abroad, captive
2
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL (CONTINUED) management operations outside the Continental U.S., and P/C partnerships.
Gallagher structures a broad range of alternative market mechanisms, tailored to clients' specific needs and financial situations. Hard market conditions in the P/C industry from 2001-2003 contributed to exceptional growth in alternative market mechanisms as well as in wholesale and excess/surplus lines business, much of which is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. Although market competition began to heat up in 2004, interest in alternative market mechanisms has remained strong. A growing amount of business is also coming to Gallagher via its e-commerce portal,
CoverageFirst.com, which has over 14,600 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
Specialty Marketing and International expects its greatest revenue growth opportunities will come from global reinsurance, international and domestic wholesale, and the continued expansion of specialty programs and program administration. In addition to its offices in the U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia, Singapore and Malaysia, the operation pursues business opportunities in conjunction with Gallagher's Strategic Alliance Network of correspondent brokers and consultants in over 100 countries around the world.
STRATEGIC
ALLIANCE
NETWORK
In addition to its own international brokerage offices, Gallagher has developed a non-owned network of leading independent brokers in more than 100 countries around the world. These relationships provide Gallagher's clients with one of the most comprehensive worldwide sales and service networks available.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES
CAPABILITIES
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services Executive Benefits/Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services provides employee benefit brokerage and human resource consulting to assist clients in all areas of their employee retirement and health and welfare plans. Rising healthcare costs and growing regulatory complexities have resulted in double-digit increases in employee benefit costs. Gallagher has significantly expanded its technical resources and technological capabilities to better assist clients in addressing this trend.
Gallagher offers expertise and guidance in all areas of benefits planning, delivery and administration. This encompasses a broad range of benefit services, including executive benefits and financial planning, worksite marketing and voluntary products, defined contribution products, actuarial services, compensation program design/analysis, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement services, benefits communication and out-sourcing, and training programs and tools that help employers address federal and state regulatory compliance.
The operation has also established eight niche practice groups in the following areas: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity, religious, restaurant, education (K-12) and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from mergers and acquisitions, from cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, by assisting clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities, and from its niche practice groups.
3
 
Quality Driven
Comprehensive
Cost Effective
Risk Management Segment
GALLAGHER BASSETT
EXPERTISE
Real-Time Claims Reporting
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as the world's largest multiline, third-party administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., U.K., Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for over a decade that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. By the end of 2004, the system had more than 10,000 users and was averaging more than 17 million site hits and 63,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through the next year will come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
4
 
GALLAGHER BENEFIT ADMINISTRATORS
CAPABILITIES
 -  Medical Case Management  -  Non-Network Fee Negotiations  -  Customized Reporting Capabilities  -  EAP/Wellness Programs  -  Managed Healthcare Delivery  -  Utilization Review  -  Internet Enrollment/Administration
Gallagher Benefit Administrators offers a wide range of benefit administrative services as well as the ability to integrate those services. It brings clients innovative reporting capabilities, customized managed healthcare options and integrated utilization management services.
While many third-party claims administrators have fallen behind in upgrading core competencies, Gallagher Benefit Administrators has continued to address systems and processes related to electronic data interchange and security issues, claims regulatory changes, access to information via the Internet, and methods through which employers can communicate and administer their plans more efficiently.
The operation has a platform that allows for paperless claims processing and pays many claims automatically. Clients have Web access to claims data and can complete their enrollments electronically. Gallagher Benefit Administrators expects these enhancements to elevate its competitive position in an industry facing consolidation.
Financial Services Segment
CORE
COMPETENCIES
Tax-Advantaged Investing Real Estate Asset Management
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and optimizing tax benefits from Gallagher's investments. Financial Services specializes in tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax-advantaged investments are comprised primarily of low income housing developments, waste-to-energy projects and synthetic fuel plants. These investments have helped reduce Gallagher's tax rate to 30% in 2002, 24% in 2003 and 20% in 2004.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. The building is almost 100% leased, with third parties occupying approximately 40%. Gallagher also owns 80% of an 11,000-acre community development near Orlando. Known as Harmony, Florida, the site has a Johnny Miller Signature golf course and a new high school that opened in August 2004. More than 140 homes have been completed and there are now more than 350 residents in Harmony. National builder D.R. Horton and six custom builders have over 60 additional homes in various stages of development. Additionally the infrastructure for 180 townhomes is in progress for sales beginning in late 2005.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to 50% of 14 alternative investment fund manager companies with approximately $4.4 billion under management.
5
 
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 144 acquisitions from 1986 through December 2004, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these were regional or local P/C brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. In the last few years, the company has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding its talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on: a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, marketing-oriented culture a profitable, growing business whose ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's aggressive acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
MARKET OUTLOOK
The P/C market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an over-abundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%. A market correction began in 2000 and intensified in 2001, particularly following the September 11th terrorist attacks. Double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002. The magnitude of rate increases began to moderate in 2003 and softening market conditions continued into 2004. A market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers indicated that the average premium for commercial accounts declined 7% in the forth quarter of 2004, with large accounts experiencing the most significant reductions.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition has increased, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms.
In light of recent controversy over the appropriateness of profit and volume-based incentive commissions paid to brokers, on October 26, 2004, Gallagher announced that it will not enter into any new contingent volume-based or profit-based commission agreements as a retail broker effective January 1, 2005. For the 12-month period ended December 31, 2004, the company received $39.5 million in contingent commissions. Included in this total is $33.8 million of volume-based or profit-based contingent commissions that Gallagher received as a retail broker. Accordingly, it is expected that Gallagher's future contingent commissions revenues could be substantially reduced.
Additionally, Gallagher retained independent counsel during the fourth quarter of 2004 to perform an internal review of certain of its business practices as they relate to these industry developments. This review is now complete, and the independent counsel found no evidence of any price fixing, bid rigging or improper tying arrangements. However, as part of the industry-wide investigations, the company remains the subject of investigations and regulatory proceedings by authorities investigating certain of its business practices, including the receipt of contingent commissions.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
6
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
CONDENSED QUARTERLY SEGMENT INCOME STATEMENT  2003 THROUGH 2004(IN MILLIONS EXCEPT PER SHARE DATA AND OTHER INFORMATION DATA)
2003 2004
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4thQ Full Year
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Gross revenues $198.1 $213.1 $232.4 $245.6 $889.2 $213.0 $234.7 $254.2 $265.8 $967.7
Earnings before income taxes 26.8 38.2 54.9 52.4 172.3 33.1 43.7 56.5 51.8 185.1
Net earnings 20.1 28.6 41.7 39.8 130.2 26.5 35.0 45.2 41.5 148.2
Growth revenues 22% 17% 12% 10% 15% 9% 11% 9% 9% 9%
Pretax profit margin 14% 18% 24% 21% 19% 16% 19% 22% 20% 19%
Diluted net earnings per share $0.22 $0.31 $0.45 $0.43 $1.40 $0.28 $0.37 $0.48 $0.44 $1.56
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Gross revenues $76.7 $78.3 $83.0 $83.7 $321.7 $88.4 $92.8 $94.7 $96.7 $372.6
Earnings before income taxes 10.7 10.2 11.3 10.7 42.9 13.0 14.4 15.9 16.9 60.2
Net earnings 8.1 7.7 8.6 8.1 32.5 10.4 11.5 12.7 13.5 48.1
Growth revenues 9% 16% 16% 16% 14% 15% 19% 14% 16% 16%
Pretax profit margin 14% 13% 14% 13% 13% 15% 16% 17% 18% 16%
Diluted net earnings per share $0.09 $0.08 $0.09 $0.09 $0.35 $0.11 $0.12 $0.13 $0.14 $0.51
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income (1) $15.3 $17.9 $38.1 $46.8 $118.1 $46.5 $59.1 $34.3 $33.3 $173.2
Investment gains (losses) (25.7) - 1.6 (0.4) (24.5) 2.5 2.1 2.6 0.9 8.1
Earnings (loss) before income taxes (21.7) (0.1) (1.8) 1.7 (21.9) 2.5 (0.5) (4.4) (7.4) (9.8)
Net earnings (loss) (16.3) (0.1) (1.4) 1.3 (16.5) 2.0 (0.4) (3.5) (5.9) (7.8)
Diluted net earnings (loss) per share $(0.18) $- $(0.02) $0.01 $(0.19) $0.02 - $(0.04) $(0.06) $(0.08)
TOTAL COMPANY
Gross revenues $264.4 $309.3 $355.1 $375.7 $1,304.5 $350.4 $388.7 $385.8 $396.7 $1,521.6
Earnings before income taxes 15.8 48.3 64.4 64.8 193.3 48.6 57.6 68.0 61.3 235.5
Net earnings 11.9 36.2 48.9 49.2 146.2 38.9 46.1 54.4 49.1 188.5
Diluted net earnings per share $0.13 $0.39 $0.52 $0.53 $1.57 $0.41 $0.49 $0.57 $0.52 $1.99
Cash dividends declared per share $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.72 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $1.00
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $2,492.4 $2,644.3 $2,695.1 $2,901.6 $2,873.0 $3,218.2 $3,085.0 $3,237.9
Total liabilities $1,947.6 $2,071.8 $2,104.5 $2,282.5 $2,225.0 $2,521.4 $2,342.1 $2,476.9
Total stockholders' equity $544.8 $572.5 $590.6 $619.1 $648.0 $696.8 $742.9 $761.0
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 92,312 93,651 93,716 93,570 93,312 93,955 94,343 95,053 94,827 94,546
Common shares repurchased (000s) 239 515 1,140 970 2,864 555 - 615 613 1,783
Tangible net worth (2) $391.4 $417.0 $422.6 $396.2 $394.6 $427.5 $449.0 $386.8
Book value per share $6.06 $6.32 $6.55 $6.88 $7.14 $7.58 $8.04 $8.26
Tangible book value per share (3) $4.35 $4.60 $4.69 $4.40 $4.35 $4.65 $4.86 $4.20
Annualized return on beginning
tangible net worth (4) 12% 24% 33% 37% 37% 39% 43% 47% 48% 48%
Number of acquisitions closed 4 1 2 7 14 7 3 4 5 19
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 7,088 7,077 7,120 7,206 7,359 7,564 7,824 8,204
Earnings Before Investment (Gains) Losses,
Depreciation, Amortization and Stock
Compensation Expense (5)
Net earnings $11.9 $36.2 $48.9 $49.2 $146.2 $38.9 $46.0 $54.4 $49.1 $188.5
Investment (gains) losses 25.7 - (1.6) 0.4 24.5 (2.5) (2.1) (2.6) (0.9) (8.1)
Depreciation 7.2 7.2 8.3 8.5 31.2 8.6 9.0 8.7 8.5 34.8
Amortization 2.1 2.2 2.5 3.1 9.9 3.2 6.0 4.3 5 18.5
Non-cash compensation 1.0 2.2 2.2 4.0 9.4 3.3 4.0 3.9 4.4 15.6
Tax effect (9.0) (2.9) (2.7) (3.8) (18.4) (2.5) (3.4) (2.9) (3.4) (12.2)
Earnings before investment (gains) losses,
depreciation, amortization and stock
compensation expense $38.9 $44.9 $57.6 $61.4 $202.8 $49.0 $59.6 $65.8 $62.7 $237.1
On a diluted per share basis $0.42 $0.48 $0.61 $0.66 $2.17 $0.52 $0.63 $0.69 $0.66 $2.51
(1) Beginning 3rd Q, 2003, includes impact of FIN 46.
(2) Represents total stockholders' equity less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets. (3) Represents tangible net worth divided by common shares outstanding at end of the period.
(4) Represents year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity, less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets, as of the beginning of the year. (5) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of investment gains (losses), depreciation, amortization, amortization of deferred compensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com
7
 
Growth
Cash Dividends
Why Invest ? Profits
Gross Revenues
(in millions) $1600 $1400 $1200 $1000 $800 $600 $400 $200
00 01 02 03 04 $741 $910 $1,101 $1,304 $1,522
Earnings Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(in millions) $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
00 01 02 03 04 $91 $129 $170 $203 $237
Dividends Per Share
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
84 85 86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04 05
* Indicated $0.03 $1.12 *
GAAP Book Value Per Share $9.00 $8.00 $7.00 $6.00 $5.00 $4.00 $3.00 $2.00 $1.00 $0.00
00 01 02 03 04 $3.95 $4.37 $5.96 $6.88 $8.26
Diluted Earnings Per Share $2.00 $1.50 $1.00
$0.50
$0.00
00 01 02 03 04 $1.05 $1.39 $1.41 $1.57 $1.99
Note: All information as originally reported except per share amounts restated for stock splits.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
President & CEO
(630) 773-3800
8


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050211215818.txt.gz
TIME:20050211215818
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.    
Other Events
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. announced that, late this afternoon, a jury in the Fourth District Court for the State of Utah awarded damages against its subsidiary, AJG Financial Services, Inc., and in favor of Headwaters Incorporated ("Headwaters") in the amount of $175 million. The jury award relates to the previously disclosed trial of a license agreement dispute lawsuit brought by Headwaters against AJG Financial Services, Inc. In its answer to the complaint, AJG Financial Services had asserted counterclaims against Headwaters. The jury made no award under these counterclaims.
 
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and CEO, stated, "We strongly disagree with the jury's decision. We believe we have not breached the contract nor owe any payments under the contract."
 
Gallagher intends to file a prompt and timely motion with the trial court to set aside the verdict and order a new trial. If the verdict is not set aside, Gallagher intends to ask the court to reduce the amount of damages awarded. If the request for a new trial is denied, Gallagher intends to pursue an appeal of the verdict.
 
Item 9.01.    
Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, February 11, 2005Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. announced that, late this afternoon, a jury in the Fourth District Court for the State of Utah awarded damages against its subsidiary, AJG Financial Services, Inc., and in favor of Headwaters Incorporated ("Headwaters") in the amount of $175 million. The jury award relates to the previously disclosed trial of a license agreement dispute lawsuit brought by Headwaters against AJG Financial Services, Inc. In its answer to the complaint, AJG Financial Services had asserted counterclaims against Headwaters. The jury made no award under these counterclaims.
 
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and CEO, stated, "We strongly disagree with the jury's decision. We believe we have not breached the contract nor owe any payments under the contract."
 
Gallagher intends to file a prompt and timely motion with the trial court to set aside the verdict and order a new trial. If the verdict is not set aside, Gallagher intends to ask the court to reduce the amount of damages awarded. If the request for a new trial is denied, Gallagher intends to pursue an appeal of the verdict.
 
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Monday, February 14, 2005 at 11:30 a.m. Central Time to address this issue. The call will be broadcast live through Gallagher's web site at www.ajg.com. For anyone unable to listen during the live webcast, the conference call replay will be available on Gallagher's web site approximately one hour after the broadcast and can be accessed by going to Investor Relations and clicking on Presentations.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has offices in eight countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050311172807.txt.gz
TIME:20050311172807
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Effective March 8, 2005, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) entered into an amendment (the Amendment) to its $250 million revolving credit facility (the Credit Agreement). The Amendment amended the "No Material Adverse Change" and "Litigation and Other Controversies" representations in the Credit Agreement to exclude from those representations the judgment in the approximate amount of $175,000,000 against AJG Financial Services, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Gallagher, (the Utah Judgment) resulting from the jury verdict described in Gallagher's Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2005. The Amendment also included a waiver of any existing or potential default or event of default under provisions of the Credit Agreement that limit the amount of unstayed or unsatisfied judgments that could exist against Gallagher and its subsidiaries, and a waiver of a financial covenant based on EBITDA to the extent that Gallagher is required to expense any amount of the Utah Judgment from its earnings. The Amendment also increased the letter of credit subfacility included in the Credit Agreement from $75,000,000 to $125,000,000.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050328171840.txt.gz
TIME:20050328171840
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 1.01.    Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On March 22, 2005, AJG Financial Services, Inc. (AJGFS), a wholly-owned subsidiary of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., entered into a Purchase and Sale Agreement by and among AJGFS, Three E Corporation (Three E) and SOF-HARMONY, L.L.C. (the Purchaser) whereby AJGFS and Three E agreed to sell their partnership interests in the limited partnership which owns the Florida Community Development (the Development). Pursuant to the transaction, AJGFS is entitled to receive cash of approximately $25.8 million which includes net cash consideration of $22.1 million. The transaction is expected to result in a pretax gain of $11.0 million to $12.0 million. The closing of the transaction is scheduled to occur in April 2005, and is subject to customary closing conditions. The terms of the transaction also provide that Gallagher continue to post a $12.6 million letter of credit to guarantee $12.4 million of bonds issued by the Development. Gallagher is fully indemnified by an affiliate of the Purchaser and, in consideration of this guarantee, will receive cash compensation sufficient to cover its costs plus 1% of certain future cash flow residuals from the Development.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050426171322.txt.gz
TIME:20050426171322
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On April 26, 2005, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's first quarter 2005 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, April 26, 2005  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2005. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
 
Quarter Ended March 31
 
 
"Gallagher continues to do what it does best even in these challenging times  solve our clients' risk management problems," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "First quarter 2005 revenue growth reflects the strong efforts of our team in selling insurance products and completing acquisitions which fit in to the Gallagher culture. Risk Management in particular continues to show excellent results."
 
Brokerage and Risk Management Combined First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, April 27, 2005 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in eight countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2005 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2005 Unconsolidated and Consolidated Investment Summaries
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2005 earnings release and unconsolidated and consolidated investment summaries on page 6.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050519075641.txt.gz
TIME:20050519075641
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On May 18, 2005, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. and its subsidiaries and affiliates, except for Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., (Gallagher), entered into an Assurance of Voluntary Compliance (the AVC) with the Attorney General of the State of Illinois and the Director of Insurance of the State of Illinois (collectively, the State Agencies) to resolve all of the issues related to investigations conducted by the State Agencies.
 
The material terms of the AVC are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The foregoing summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the AVC, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 hereto.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS
 
In the Matter of
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
 
 
ASSURANCE OF VOLUNTARY COMPLIANCE
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to the provisions of Illinois 815 ILCS 505, ., Lisa Madigan, Attorney General of the State of Illinois (the "Attorney General"), caused an investigation to be made of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. and its subsidiaries and affiliates (except for Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc.) ("Gallagher") related to its practices in the purchasing, renewal, placement or servicing of insurance for its clients (the "Attorney General's Investigation"); and the Director of Insurance of the State of Illinois (the "Director"), pursuant to the Illinois Insurance Code, conducted an investigation of Gallagher related to its practices in the purchasing, renewal, placement or servicing of insurance for its clients (the "Director's Investigation"); and based upon the Attorney General's Investigation and the Director's Investigation (the "Investigations"), the following findings have been made:
et
seq
 
1. Gallagher is the world's fourth largest insurance broker. Businesses and individuals who need insurance, as well as insurance companies that need reinsurance, retain Gallagher to help them design an insurance plan and negotiate with insurance companies to get a favorable mix of coverage, service, financial security and price.
 
2. Gallagher purports to serve its clients by presenting itself as an effective, trustworthy and unbiased manager of its clients' risks.
 
3. Specifically, on its World-Wide Website, Gallagher has published a document entitled "Client Commitment." In it, Gallagher has made the following written assurance, among others, to its clients worldwide: "We always recommend that which is in the client's best
 
interest, even if it diminishes our revenues." . (Last visited on April 26, 2005).
See
http://www.ajg.com/portal/communities/
community.asp?UserID=2&intCommunityIndex=370&intCurrentPageIndex=2&intComCurrent Folder=&CommunityID=285
 
4. Through this statement, Gallagher has assured its clients that it will never allow its own financial interests to conflict with its clients' interests.
 
5. Despite this written assurance, for many years Gallagher entered into contingent commission agreements with several favored insurance companies. These arrangements, which it sometimes called profit-sharing, incentive, bonus or override agreements, created at least a potential conflict of interest for Gallagher. On the one hand, as broker and pursuant to its "Client Commitment," Gallagher committed that its revenue interests did not conflict with its clients' interests. On the other hand, by entering into contingent commission agreements, Gallagher allowed its revenue interests to potentially conflict with those of its clients because it received these commissions only if it placed sufficient business with the favored insurers. Thus, Gallagher operated under a potential conflict of interest.
 
6. For years, Gallagher's contingent commission agreements enticed Gallagher to place business with certain insurance companies in order to maximize its own revenues. For example, on February 27, 1997, Craig Van der Voort, the Branch Manager of Gallagher-Great Lakes, Inc., a Gallagher subsidiary, wrote a confidential memorandum to a fellow executive describing a $323,735 contingent commission check just received from Hartford Insurance for Hartford business generated from four Gallagher offices. He described the need to continue to "push" business to Hartford:
 
None of these offices would have received any Hartford bonus in 1997 had it not been for the fact that we pushed to write about $400,000 new [business] with them in November and December. . . . Let's not be in jeopardy again at year-end 1997. The Hartford Tier III bonus is the best in the business! We have got to try to stabilize our book with Hartford, or better, grow it. We came close to $323,735! We cannot afford to lose that kind of revenue.
blowing
 
AJG-ILDOI-00067733-35. (emphasis in original)
 
7. On March 14, 1997, he wrote a confidential memorandum to Gallagher-Great Lakes Production Managers describing a new, lucrative agreement with another insurer, Chubb. He advised the managers to "direct" new business to Chubb and consider moving existing business to Chubb:
 
Contingent income and "side" bonus payments from various markets is an extremely important source of revenue to our branch. Each year, I try to negotiate at least a few special incentive agreements with some of our more important markets.
 
Chubb recently agreed to one of the most lucrative New Business Incentives that I have ever seen. . . . .
 
We really have to take advantage of this opportunity and shoot for net new Chubb business in excess of $1,000,000. That would pay us an extra 10% on and this bonus does not go through a production formula, it goes straight to the bottom line.
everything
 
Managers, please watch over the marketing in your units and direct our "new/new" placements to Chubb when feasible. . . . [W]e may, in fact, want to move business from some of the companies that are major players in our office. . . .
not
 
Let's make this work to our advantage! Also, this agreement should not be discussed outside the office or with other markets.
 
AJG-ILDOI-00067926-27. (emphasis in original)
 
8. Gallagher's Brokerage Services Division is the largest operational division in Gallagher. Divided into seven regions, it has branches and offices throughout the U.S. In the late 1990's, the Chairman of Gallagher's Brokerage Service Division was Walter F. McClure. McClure approved the following performance goal for one of the Branch Managers of the Brokerage Services Division,: "Maximize contingency opportunities and steer business to hit target thresholds." AJG-ILDOI-0006226.
 
9. Consistent with these internally expressed desires to "move" and "steer" business to hit target thresholds, Gallagher regularly achieved this goal of placing business with carriers offering contingent rewards. On April 6, 1998, all branch managers of the Brokerage Service Division were congratulated on their successful "efforts to move and offer new business to
 
Chubb." On April 15, 1998, the branch managers received monetary bonuses up to $19,300 for both placing new business with Chubb, and for moving existing business from other carriers to Chubb. AJG-ILDOI-00048419.
 
10. In 2001, the Chicagoland Regional Manager was James Gault. Van der Voort and Gault met with Chubb representatives in early 2001 and discussed that the contingent commissions were still designed to "drive" business to Chubb. AJG-ILDOI-00003553. Afterward, on May 1, 2001 Van der Voort urged branch managers of Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services in Chicago to meet the Chubb contingency targets:
 
We had an incentive deal that would have paid a 5% override on all new business if we wrote $1,000,000 of between October 1, 2000 and April 1 of 2001. We actually wrote about $750,000 so we did not make it. The same offer has been made for the period April 1 through September 30, 2001. Let's try to make something of this. Every AJGRMS Division has lines of business that match up with Chubb. Get the word out to your production staff.
new
 
AJG-ILDOI-00003552.
 
11. Later that year, on September 18, 2001, Van der Voort copied James Gault on a message to branch managers of Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services in Chicago who were again urged to place business with carriers offering contingent bonuses:
 
Attached is a bonus plan which I was able to obtain from the Atlantic Companies. It is not rich, but, it does provide us with commission overrides if we grow in new business, retain existing business, and maintain decent loss ratios. . . . We have other special bonus agreements in place with markets like Chubb, Fireman's Fund, and Hartford. . . . We are expected to seek out these special agreements and support them so that additional revenues can be earned. Please do what you can in your respective divisions to support our "partner" markets and any bonus plans.
 
AJG-ILDOI-00003495.
 
12. By May, 2002, Van der Voort was promoted to the position of Vice President -Market Relations for the Brokerage Services Division and given nationwide responsibility to increase the volume of business placed with selected carriers. He reported to Gault, who was then the Executive Vice-President of the entire Brokerage Services Division.
 
13. In his new Market Relations position, Van der Voort disseminated a message to every branch and regional manager of the nationwide Brokerage Services Division on July 8, 2002 describing the details of a new contingent commission plan with Crum & Forster. Under the plan, Gallagher would receive 2% additional commissions if it placed $15 million of premiums with Crum & Forster and as much as 3% additional commissions if it placed $25 million. He candidly explained the purpose of the plan: "to reward continued growth with C&F." Reward would go directly to the managers who oversee the individual brokers. At the specific request of Brokerages Services Division President James Gault, he also described for branch managers the potential bonus they could personally receive for maximizing contingent income:
 
Keep in mind that contingent income is very important to the BSD [Brokerage Services Division] and each branch will be given credit on the monthly Board Report for the proportionate share of contingent income they help generate with a market in a given year. The actual allocated branch contingent results also have a big effect on individual branch manager bonuses and performance evaluations so your results will be tracked and they do make a difference.
 
AJG-ILDOI-00062088-89; AJG-ILDOI-00055630-31.
 
14. To ensure that managers remain focused on meeting the Crum & Forster target thresholds, on November 15, 2002, the Vice President - Market Relations told all branch and regional managers: "Through October, our national Crum & Forster volume is almost $23 million. We need to surpass $25 million in order to qualify for a full 3% on our total volume. Let's make sure that happens over the final 2 months of the year." AJG-ILDOI-00062083.
 
15. On January 3, 2003, Crum & Forster notified Gallagher that it had indeed reached the contingency fee target threshold and was therefore entitled to receive a $765,392 contingency payment. Van der Voort wrote "this gain of 21 times over last year will be a big boost!" AJG-ILDOI-00062094-95.
 
16. On February 14, 2003, the Chief Executive Officer of Gallagher, Patrick Gallagher, along with James Gault and all retail brokerage regional managers received a memorandum from Van der Voort. The memorandum described the $1.8 million dollar "bonus" check Hartford paid under its contingent commission agreement. Consistent with the Gallagher policy to place business with carriers offering lucrative contingent commissions, Van der Voort advised all the recipients to continue to send business to Hartford: "The same plan is in place for 2003 and we need to get our branches to take advantage and work more closely with Hartford. We have a strong relationship at the top and they want to grow with us." AJG-ILDOI-00054474.
 
17. On July 21, 2003, Pat Gallagher held a meeting with his top corporate staff, including James Gault. One of the four topics discussed was the degree to which Gallagher personnel should be focused on contingent commissions. Pat Gallagher made his intent clear in the staff meeting minutes: "Contingents are important and we want people to be fighting for them."
 
18. Consistent with the Gallagher policy of placing business with carriers to achieve contingent income, Regional Managers were presented with a list of goals in 2003. One of the ten goals for 2003 for the Regional Managers stated: "Generate at least as much contingent dollars as 2002." AJG-ILDOI-00005851-52. James Gault and the Regional Managers were expected to sign off on the goals.
 
19. On December 4, 2003, Gallagher's Vice President - Market Relations urged all branch and regional managers of the Brokerage Services Division to "pump" up volume with Crum & Forster and several other carriers with which Gallagher has lucrative contingent commission programs:
 
With year-end approaching, it is our last chance to pump additional premium volume into these markets so that it is included in the 2003 contingent income calculation. Some of our more lucrative incentive programs are in place with these companies
 
 
Any opportunity which you or your staff have to support these markets, either through renewal retention or new business, will help generate additional revenue for AJG. If we can have a strong finish with Crum & Forster, it is possible for AJG to meet a threshold, which pays Gallagher 4% of our eligible C&F premiums.
 
AJG-ILDOI-00062102.
 
20. After the Vice President - Market Relations directed managers to "pump" business into these carriers, he added that they should also consider the "best interests of our clients." AJG-ILDOI-00062102. In a prior message to managers, he had included this same consideration because he believed that without it some of Gallagher's new acquisition partners might respond inappropriately to the incentives in contingent commission agreements.
 
21. The insurance carriers too were explicit in the behavior they expected from Gallagher as broker in return for commission bonuses. Liberty Mutual described the bonus commissions as an "incentive . . . to encourage your Agency to place an increased amount of profitable business with our Company." Amerisure offered its deal in return for Gallagher-Great Lake's "commitment" to "write a minimum volume of $750,000 in new commercial lines premium" by year end. Chubb "intended to reward [one other Gallagher subsidiary] for the production of profitable new business to Chubb." AJG-ILDOI-00078675.
 
22. American International Group, Inc. ("AIG") does not have an explicit contingency commission contract with Gallagher. A memo to Gallagher's CEO dated September 25, 2002 stated: "While AIG avoids discussions of incentive income or contingent payments, they seem agreeable to supporting expense subsidies when it benefits their growth as well." AJG-ILDOI-00062395. As a result, AIG has rewarded Gallagher with millions of dollars to subsidize Gallagher's business operations in return for placing business with AIG. Gallagher has not informed its clients about these subsidies.
 
23. Specifically, in 2002, AIG rewarded Gallagher with $2 million and provided another $2.5 million in subsidies in 2003. Van der Voort informed CEO Patrick Gallagher and Brokerage Services Division President James Gault of these subsidies on August 18, 2004. He also notified them of how they could communicate directly with AIG Chief Executive Hank Greenberg on this arrangement. AJG-ILDOI-00062336.
 
24. Some of these payments that AIG made to Gallagher in return for placing business with AIG were in the form of "hiring subsidies." Specifically, AIG would offer to pay for the annual salary of certain Gallagher brokers. In return, Gallagher would agree to grant AIG an exclusive "first right of refusal" for prospective insurance business, unbeknownst to the client. AJG-ILDOI-00062359. Gallagher understood that "AIG only offers a subsidy when they believe it is an investment that will be paid back many times over in the form of new business. In one case, Gallagher informed the manager who was to receive an AIG-subsidized "international" broker: "You will have to give [AIG] a fair opportunity on international business and try to see that they are successful on a fair share." Consistent with the existence of a potential conflict of interest, Gallagher also instructed this manager: "Of course, this will be done with the clients best interests in mind." AJG-ILDOI-00062329.
 
25. Van der Voort described one such proposed arrangement in a communication with AIG itself on June 16, 2004: The President of Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services in Chicago "understands that in recognition of a hiring subsidy from AIG World Source, you would expect to get the first look at qualifying submissions and as a result, write a significant percentage of their applicable business." AJG-ILDOI-00062351. He made sure the relevant managers at Gallagher knew their obligations under this arrangement: "Keep in mind, AIG World Source . . . will expect their fair share of business in return and it will be up to you to make sure that actually happens." AJG-ILDOI-00062351.
 
26. While Gallagher was instructing its managers that the AIG subsidies required the managers to "make sure" AIG received a share of Gallagher business, Gallagher told at least one of its clients that AIG created no incentives for Gallagher to commit business to AIG. On May 26, 2004, a Vice-President in the Brokerage Services Division advised a client that AIG has "no need to offer incentives to anyone. Historically, they have incentivized anyone to do business with their firm and it is a philosophy and model they continue to incorporate in todays [sic] marketplace." (emphasis in original)
never
 
27. Gallagher received undisclosed subsidies from some other favored carriers. Under a written arrangement dated March 4, 2004, Chubb agreed to a hiring subsidy: "The advanced pay out is to support hiring of staff within [Gallagher's] unit that will specifically support Chubb production." AJG-ILDOI-00073930. Under an earlier agreement, "[i]n return for Chubb's contribution to individuals salary, [Gallagher's unit] was required to meet specific new business goals with Chubb." AJG-ILDOI-00074794. Hartford, too, has funded the salaries of Gallagher brokers.
 
28. On May 7, 2002, Van der Voort communicated with James Gault and described how he was gathering information on the volume of business Gallagher had placed with key insurance carriers in order to request reinsurance business from them. For carriers such as AIG, Chubb and Hartford, he explained that he would compare the volume of business placed on their behalf to reinsurance business offered to Gallagher "to try and leverage the specific companies for more of their reinsurance business." AJG-ILDOI-00061764-65.
 
29. As a result of the foregoing, the Attorney General and Director find that Gallagher operated under an unwaived potential conflict of interest by a) establishing an undisclosed corporate goal of placing business with selected insurers to obtain increased revenue for
 
Gallagher; b) implementing that goal by encouraging managers to place business with insurers offering additional revenue to Gallagher; c) rewarding managers with bonuses for placing clients with selected insurers; d) entering into undisclosed "expense subsidies" with certain insurers who funded the salaries of Gallagher brokers, e) committing to such insurers a certain volume of business in return for these subsidies; and f) proposing to increase retail business to insurers in return for their commitments to use Gallagher's reinsurance services.
 
30. Gallagher is cooperating with the Attorney General's and the Director's Investigations.
 
31. Gallagher has adopted, and under this Assurance of Voluntary Compliance (the "Assurance") and a corresponding Stipulation and Consent Order with the Director will continue to implement a number of business reforms governing the conduct of Gallagher's business.
 
32. The Attorney General, the Director and Gallagher wish to enter into this Assurance to resolve all issues related to Gallagher, its subsidiaries, affiliates, directors, officers and employees in the Investigations.
 
33. The Attorney General finds the relief and agreements contained in this Assurance appropriate and in the public interest. The Attorney General is willing to accept this Assurance pursuant to 815 ILCS 505/6.1, in lieu of commencing a statutory proceeding.
 
34. The Director and Gallagher will simultaneously enter into this Assurance and separate Illinois Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, Division of Insurance Stipulation and Consent Order ("Stipulation and Consent Order") to resolve all issues related to Gallagher in the Director's Investigation. The Director finds the relief and agreements contained in this Assurance appropriate and in the public interest.
 
35. This Assurance is entered into solely for the purpose of resolving the Attorney General's Investigation and the Director's Investigation, and is not intended to be used for any other purpose.
 
36. Neither this Assurance, nor any acts performed or statements made, nor documents executed in furtherance of this Assurance may be used as an admission of the above allegations or findings.
 
37. Gallagher is entering into this Assurance and Stipulation without admitting any of the allegations or findings.
 
NOW THEREFORE Gallagher and the Attorney General and the Director hereby enter into this Assurance and agree as follows:
 
 
1. Gallagher shall establish a $26,962,500 fund (the "Fund") ($0.1 million of which reflects part of the cost of the Investigations) on or before January 16, 2006 to be paid to its Policyholders (as hereinafter defined) who retained Gallagher to place, renew, consult on or service insurance on a retail basis where such placement resulted in contingent commissions or overrides for the period from January 1, 2002 through December 31, 2004. As used herein, "retail" shall mean where Gallagher is the direct, primary provider of insurance brokerage services to a policyholder and excluding where Gallagher primarily provides services to retail brokers as a managing general agent, managing general underwriter or wholesaler. A "Policyholder" is a retail policyholder who retained Gallagher's U.S. offices to place, renew or consult on insurance services including employer-sponsored employee benefit plans (including the plan sponsor or named fiduciary of the employee benefit plan as defined in ERISA). All of the money paid into the Fund and any interest earned thereon shall be paid to such Policyholders pursuant to this Assurance. No portion of the Fund shall be considered a fine or a penalty. This sum is in full satisfaction of Gallagher's obligations hereunder, and neither the Attorney General nor the Director shall seek to impose on Gallagher any other financial obligation or liability related to the above allegations and findings.
 
2. Gallagher shall (a) by August 31, 2005 calculate, in accordance with a formula approved by the Attorney General and the Director, the amount of money each Policyholder is eligible to receive; (b) within ten days of completing these calculations, file a report with the Attorney General and the Director, certified by an officer of Gallagher, setting forth for each Policyholder: (1) Policyholder's name and address; (2) the amount the Policyholder paid in premiums or consulting fees for each policy; (3) the amount of retail contingent commission or override revenue recorded by Gallagher during 2002, 2003 and 2004; and (4) the amount of payment from the Fund each Policyholder is eligible to receive computed pursuant to this Assurance, in accordance with the formula approved by the Attorney General and the Director; and (c) by October 1, 2005, send a notice approved by the Attorney General and Director, provided Gallagher has the right to modify the notice to policyholders who are not residents in Illinois in order to comply with the notice requirements of other jurisdictions, to each Policyholder eligible to receive payment from the Fund, setting forth items (2) through (4), above, and stating that the amount paid may increase if there is less than full participation by Policyholders in the Fund.
 
3. Policyholders eligible to receive a distribution from the Fund shall have until December 31, 2005 to request a distribution. Policyholders who voluntarily elect to receive a cash distribution (the "Participating Policyholders") shall tender a signed release in the form attached hereto as Exhibit 1. On or before March 31, 2006, the Fund will pay the Participating Policyholders their initial share of the Fund. In the event that any eligible Policyholder elects not to participate or otherwise does not respond (the "Non-Participating Policyholders"), that Non-Participating Policyholder's allocated share may be used by Gallagher to satisfy any pending or other claims asserted by Policyholders relating to the matters covered by this Assurance. In no event shall a distribution be made from the Fund to any other Policyholder until all Participating Policyholders have been paid the initial amount due as calculated pursuant
 
to paragraph 2 above, nor shall the total payments from the Fund to any Non-Participating Policyholder exceed 80% of that Non-Participating Policyholder's original allocated share. If any funds remain in the Fund as of December 31, 2007, such funds shall be distributed in the following order: (a) reimburse Gallagher for any payments made between May 1, 2005 and December 31, 2007 with respect to any other claims made by Non-Participating Policyholders, (b) set aside to make payments to other Non-Participating Policyholders for which claims have been made and settled but not yet paid with respect to the matters covered by this Assurance, (c) distribute on a pro rata basis to the Participating Policyholders with the approval of the Attorney General and the Director. Gallagher shall use its best efforts to defend against any legal action whose purpose or effect is to interfere with the payments out of the Fund as provided above, and Gallagher shall give the Attorney General and the Director notice of any such legal action. In the event that Gallagher proposes to a court that it be allowed to enter into a settlement of any class action with respect to the matters covered by this Assurance, Gallagher shall provide the Attorney General and the Director with sufficient notice of the proposed settlement to allow the Attorney General to file a response to the proposed settlement.
 
4. In no event shall Gallagher use any of the funds in the Fund to pay attorney fees.
 
5. On or before April 30, 2006, Gallagher shall file a report with the Attorney General and the Director, certified by an officer of Gallagher, listing all amounts paid from the Fund and to whom those amounts have been paid. Thereafter, Gallagher shall file quarterly reports on any and all distributions made to participating and nonparticipating policyholders concluding with a final report to be filed as soon as practicable after the distribution of all the funds has been completed.
 
 
6. No later than December 31, 2005, Gallagher shall undertake (to the extent not already undertaken) the following business reforms.
 
A.
Permissible Forms of Compensation
 
7. In connection with its retail insurance brokerage, agency, producing, consulting and other services in placing, renewing, consulting on or servicing any insurance policy, Gallagher shall accept only: a specific fee to be paid by the client; or a specific fee or a specific percentage commission to be paid by the insurer set at the time of purchase, renewal, placement or servicing of the insurance policy; or a combination of both. Nothing in this paragraph relieves Gallagher of complying with additional requirements imposed by law, including the requirements for written documentation relating to fees paid directly by clients and the laws on rebating. Gallagher may retain interest earned on premiums collected on behalf of insurers when such retention is consistent with the requirements of, and is permitted by, applicable law.
 
8. Gallagher, will not directly or indirectly accept or request anything with a material value ($500 or more) from an insurance company including, but not limited to, money, credits, loans, forgiveness of principal or interest, vacations, prizes, gifts or the payment of employee salaries or expenses; provided, however, this limitation will not apply to expenses associated with customary conventions or business meetings sponsored by an insurance company or trade association, for the purpose of business or professional education and development.
 
B.
Prohibition of Contingent Compensation
 
9. In placing, renewing, consulting on or servicing any retail insurance policy, Gallagher shall not directly or indirectly accept from or request of any insurer any Contingent Compensation. For purposes of this Assurance, Contingent Compensation is any
 
compensation contingent upon Gallagher's: (a) placing a particular number of policies or dollar value of premium with the insurer, (b) achieving a particular level of growth in the number of policies placed or dollar value of premium with the insurer, (c) meeting a particular rate of retention or renewal of policies in force with the insurer, (d) placing or keeping sufficient insurance business with the insurer to achieve a particular loss ratio or any other measure of profitability, or (e) providing preferential treatment in the placement process, including but not limited to the giving of last looks, first looks, rights of first refusal, or limiting the number of quotes sought from insurers for insurance placements.
 
C.
Prohibition of "Pay-To-Play" Arrangements
 
10. Although Gallagher has not been found to have engaged in any of the activities described in this paragraph, Gallagher agrees that when placing, renewing, consulting on or servicing any retail insurance policy, Gallagher shall not directly or indirectly accept from or request of any insurer any compensation in connection with Gallagher's selection of insurance companies from which to solicit bids for its clients.
 
D.
Prohibition of "Bid-Rigging" Arrangements
 
11. Although Gallagher has not been found to have engaged in any of the activities described in this paragraph, Gallagher agrees that when placing, renewing, consulting on or servicing any retail insurance policy, Gallagher shall not directly or indirectly knowingly accept from or request of any insurer any false, fictitious, inflated, artificial, "B" or "throw away" quote, or any other quote or indication except for a quote that represents the insurer's most appropriate evaluation at the time when the quote is given of the minimum premium the insurer would require to bind the insurance coverage desired by Gallagher's client. Nothing herein shall preclude Gallagher from accepting or requesting any bona fide quote.
 
E.
Prohibition of Reinsurance Brokerage "Leveraging"
 
12. Although Gallagher has not been found to have engaged in any of the activities described in this paragraph, Gallagher agrees that when placing, renewing, consulting on or servicing any retail insurance policy, Gallagher shall not directly or indirectly accept from or request of any insurer any promise or commitment to use any of Gallagher's brokerage, agency, producing or consulting services, including reinsurance brokerage, agency or producing services, contingent upon any of the factors listed in paragraph 9(a)-(e), above.
 
F.
Prohibition of Inappropriate Use of Wholesalers
 
13. Although Gallagher has not been found to have engaged in any of the activities described in this paragraph, Gallagher agrees that when placing, renewing, consulting on or servicing any insurance policy, Gallagher shall not directly or indirectly knowingly place, renew, consult on or service its clients' insurance business through a wholesale broker unless Gallagher discloses to the client(a) the Compensation received or to be received by Gallagher, (b) any Gallagher interest in or contractual agreements with the wholesaler, and (c) any alternatives to using a wholesaler.
 
G.
Mandated Disclosures to Clients
 
14. Gallagher in placing, renewing, consulting on or servicing any insurance policy for its commercial property, casualty, and health and welfare insurance policyholder clients on a retail basis shall at least once per year in writing disclose all compensation excluding treaty reinsurance fees received by Gallagher for each client, in dollars if known at that time or as a percent of premium if the dollar amount is not known at that time, from any insurer or third party in connection with Gallagher's placement, renewal, consultation on or servicing of insurance for that client. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in this paragraph 14 insofar as any disclosure to be made to a client is mandated by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 ("ERISA"), disclosure which complies with ERISA will be deemed to meet the requirements of this paragraph.
 
H.
Standards of Conduct and Training
 
15. Gallagher shall implement company-wide written standards of conduct regarding compensation from insurers, consistent with the terms of this Assurance and subject to the approval of the Director, which implementation shall include, , appropriate training of relevant employees, including but not limited to training in business ethics, professional obligations, conflicts of interest, anti-trust and trade practices compliance, record keeping and appropriate disclosure to clients.
inter
alia
 
16. Gallagher shall not place its own financial interest ahead of its clients' interests when providing insurance products or services for its clients. Gallagher agrees that it will recommend moving a book of business from one insurer to another only when it is in the best interest of the client.
 
I.
Prohibition Against Violating Illinois Law
 
17. Gallagher shall not directly or indirectly engage or attempt to engage in violations of Illinois law, 815 ILCS 505 . ., and the Illinois Insurance Code, including without limitation Article XXXI of the Illinois Insurance Code.
et
seq
 
J.
Limitation on Extraterritorial Effect
 
18. The provisions of paragraphs 7 through 16 shall apply only to those U.S. domiciled Gallagher entities that (a) service clients domiciled in the United States; (b) place, renew, consult on or provide services for policies covering risks in the United States; or (c) are, themselves, domiciled in the United States.
 
K.
Acquisitions
 
19. Gallagher will not be in violation of this Assurance if within one year of the date it acquires any business, it brings such business into compliance with paragraphs 7 to 16 hereof provided further that the receipt by such business of contingent commissions under agreements in effect at the time of acquisition shall be permitted.
 
 
20. Gallagher shall establish a Compliance Committee of the Board of Directors, including not less than one non-management member of the Board of Directors, which shall monitor Gallagher's compliance with the standards of conduct regarding compensation from insurers and shall report in writing periodically, at least annually, to the Attorney General and the Director the results of its monitoring activities for a period of three (3) years from the effective date of this Assurance which shall also include Gallagher's good faith estimate of the amount of each form of compensation received by Gallagher from each insurer with which it directly placed insurance with a total premium value in excess of $50,000,000 during the preceding year.
 
21. Gallagher shall maintain a record of all client complaints received concerning any compensation from an insurer which shall be provided to the Compliance Committee of the Board of Directors.
 
 
22. Gallagher shall fully and promptly cooperate with the Attorney General with regard to the Investigation, and related proceedings and actions, of any other person, corporation or entity, including but not limited to Gallagher's current and former employees, concerning the insurance industry. Subject to the assertion of any attorney-client or other applicable legal privileges, Gallagher shall use its reasonable best efforts to ensure that all of its officers, directors, employees, and agents also fully and promptly cooperate with the Attorney General in the Investigation and related proceedings and actions. Cooperation shall include without limitation subject to the attorney-client and other applicable legal privileges: (a) production voluntarily and without service of subpoena of any information and all documents or other tangible evidence reasonably requested by the Attorney General, and any compilations or
 
summaries of information or data that the Attorney General reasonably requests be prepared; (b) without the necessity of a subpoena, having Gallagher's officers, directors, employees and agents attend any proceedings at which the presence of any such persons is requested by the Attorney General and having such persons answer any and all inquiries that may be put by the Attorney General (or any of the Attorney General's deputies, assistants or agents) to any of them at any proceedings or otherwise ("proceedings" include but are not limited to any meetings, interviews, depositions, hearings, grand jury hearing, trial or other proceedings); (c) fully, fairly and truthfully disclosing all information and producing all records and other evidence in its possession relevant to all inquiries reasonably made by the Attorney General concerning any fraudulent or criminal conduct whatsoever about which it has any knowledge or information; (d) in the event any document is withheld or redacted on grounds of privilege, work-product or other legal doctrine, a statement shall be submitted in writing by Gallagher indicating: (1) the type of document; (2) the date of the document; (3) the author and recipient of the document; (4) the general subject matter of the document; (5) the reason for withholding the document; and (6) the Bates number or range of the withheld document. The Attorney General agrees that Gallagher has not waived applicable legal privileges by signing this Assurance. The Attorney General may however challenge a claim of privilege in any forum of its choice and may (except as otherwise agreed with Gallagher), without limitation, rely on all documents or communications theretofore produced or the contents of which have been described by Gallagher, its officers, directors, employees, or agents; and (e) Gallagher shall not jeopardize the safety of any investigator or the confidentiality of any aspect of the Attorney General's Investigation, including sharing or disclosing evidence, documents, or other information with others during the course of the investigation, without the consent of the Attorney
 
General. Nothing herein shall prevent Gallagher from providing such evidence to other regulators, its legal counsel, directors or officers or in compliance with valid discovery requests in civil litigation or as otherwise required by law, including any disclosure requirements under federal securities laws.
 
23. Gallagher shall comply in all material respects with the terms of this Assurance. Gallagher shall waive any claim that any civil action is time barred on grounds of the statute of limitations for any claims relating to the enforcement of this Assurance.
 
 
24. Gallagher shall be subject to examination by the Director at Gallagher's reasonable expense for fiscal years beginning on January 1, 2006. Gallagher shall fully cooperate with the Director in such examinations. Gallagher shall additionally provide private secure office space, photocopying equipment and any other administrative or clerical resources necessary to assist in any examination, as well as all relevant data, provided upon request by the Director in electronic or computerized format. The Director may coordinate such examinations with other states. Any material breach of this agreement by Gallagher shall be deemed to be a failure to facilitate or aid the Director in an examination in violation of Sections 500-110(b) and 500-70 of the Illinois Insurance Code. In the event the Director believes there has been a material breach of this agreement, the Director shall provide written notice to Gallagher of such alleged material breach and Gallagher shall have thirty (30) days within which to cure such breach. Upon cure of such material breach the Director will not institute enforcement proceedings with respect thereto.
 
 
25. Gallagher shall not seek or accept, directly or indirectly, indemnification pursuant to any insurance policy, with regard to any or all of the amounts payable pursuant to this Assurance.
 
26. Neither the Attorney General nor the Director shall initiate or defend any legal action or administrative proceeding against Gallagher, its subsidiaries, affiliates, directors, officers or employees based upon the findings contained in this Assurance.
 
27. The Assurance is not intended to disqualify Gallagher, or any current employees of Gallagher, from engaging in any business in Illinois or in any other jurisdiction. Nothing in this Assurance shall relieve Gallagher's obligations imposed by any applicable state insurance law or regulations or other applicable law.
 
28. In the event that any provisions of the Assurance will be deemed unlawful or unenforceable by any court or governmental agency of competent jurisdiction, the validity and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof shall not be affected. In the event that as a result of action by the Illinois Legislature, the Illinois Supreme Court or an Illinois Appellate Court (from which there is no further right of appeal), or an Illinois governmental agency of competent jurisdiction, any of the laws covering any of the matters relating to the business reforms provisions of paragraphs 7 to 16 of this Assurance are modified, the parties agree to discuss the modification or amendment of this Assurance to conform to such legal action and agree that the parties' consent to such modification or amendment shall not be unreasonably withheld.
 
29. Except as otherwise provided herein, this Assurance shall not confer any rights upon any persons or entities besides the Attorney General, the Director and Gallagher. In addition to rights conferred upon the Attorney General and the Director by statute or otherwise, this Assurance creates a binding contractual obligation upon Gallagher.
 
30. In addition to any record maintenance requirements set forth in the Illinois Insurance Code and related regulations, Gallagher shall maintain custody of, or make arrangements to have maintained, all documents and records of Gallagher related to this matter for a period of not less than three (3) years.
 
31. The Attorney General and Director may make such application as appropriate to enforce or interpret the provisions of this Assurance, or in the alternative, maintain any civil action for such other and further relief as the Attorney General may determine is proper and necessary for the enforcement of this Assurance. Each of the parties reserve the right to request in writing that the Assurance be modified or amended.
 
32. In any application or in any such action, facsimile transmission of a copy of any papers to current counsel for Gallagher shall be good and sufficient service on Gallagher unless Gallagher designates, in writing to the Attorney General and Director, another person to receive service by facsimile transmission.
 
33. Facsimile transmission of a copy of this Assurance to counsel for Gallagher shall be good and sufficient service on Gallagher.
 
34. This Assurance shall be governed by the laws of the State of Illinois without regard to conflict of laws principles.
 
35. This Assurance of Voluntary Compliance may be executed in counterparts.
 
WHEREFORE, the following signatures are affixed hereto on this 18th day of May, 2005.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Itasca, IL, May 18, 2005  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today reached a comprehensive agreement with the Illinois Attorney General and the Director of Insurance of Illinois to resolve issues related to industry-wide investigations surrounding contingent commissions. There was no lawsuit involved nor were there any findings of unlawful or deceitful conduct or that any client had been disadvantaged. Gallagher admitted no wrongdoing or liability and is not required to issue an apology.
 
Specifics of the agreement include:
 
 
 
 
 
 
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer, said, "We are pleased to have concluded this matter with both the Illinois Attorney General and the Illinois Director of Insurance and we appreciate their professionalism. Gallagher has been serving our clients for over 77 years, and in 1984 we institutionalized our 25 point "Gallagher Way." The first tenet states that we are dedicated to providing excellence in risk management services to our clients. These new measures will benefit our clients and we believe all insurance organizations should adopt similar measures."
 
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Thursday, May 19, 2005 at 9:00 a.m. CT to review the settlement. To listen, please go to
www.ajg.com.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultant. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these facts.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050527131551.txt.gz
TIME:20050527131551
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
The May 2005 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Date: May 27, 2005
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
May 2005
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment or the outcome of litigation concerning Gallagher's Syn/Coal production; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may be subject to reduction due to the elimination of contingent commission arrangements in 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of such laws or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of Syn/Coal credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
2
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com.
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm Public since 1984 Market capitalization of $2.7 billion Shares outstanding of 93.2 million Dividend yield of 3.9 52-week range  $28.06$33.96 Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 3/31/05, unless otherwise indicated
4
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Performance vs. S&P
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG]
S&P 500 (SPX)
Mar-00 Mar-01 Mar-02 Mar-03 Mar-04 Mar-05
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
21%
CAGR
2000
Total Revenues
2004 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
34%
CAGR
2000
Cash Flow from Ops
2004 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
19%
CAGR
1985
Dividends
2005 $1.12
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group* Dividend yield of 3.9% indicated in 2005
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations *Through 12/31/04
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) March 31, 2005
Stock Price $1.72 $28.80
Market Cap $57 M $2.7 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $310 M
Annual Dividend/Share $.03 $1.12
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 19%
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Record revenues of $1.4B and earnings from continuing operations of $188M
Total Brokerage and Risk Management revenues increased 12% Total Brokerage and Risk Management pretax earnings increased 14% Completed record 19 acquisitions Record dividend increase of 39%
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Returned $141M in cash to stockholders $56M of share repurchases or 1.8M shares $85M of paid dividends
Increased GAAP Book Value to $761M Maintained tangible net worth at nearly $400M Navigated synfuel tax credit waters
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2005 Developments
Resolved Headwaters dispute
Sold two medical claims management operations Sold Florida Community Development investment Reserved for state insurance investigation Froze defined benefit pension plan effective 7/1/05 Reached agreement with Illinois' Attorney General and Insurance Department on 5/18/05
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals $2.0$2.3 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Average Stockholders' Equity
11
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven
Team-oriented and committed to growth Open "Small company" feel Client-focused Competitive No "C" players Niche advantaged
12
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2004
Total Revenues
Brokerage 67%
Financial Services 8%
Risk Management 25%
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 82%
Financial Services (8%)
Risk Management 26%
Total revenues from continuing operations exclude FIN 46 impact and investment gains
Pretax earnings from continuing operation excludes investment gains (no FIN 46 impact on earnings)
13
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher's largest business segment Acts as intermediary  no underwriting risk Niche driven Alternative market leaders
14
 
Brokerage Segment
Contingent Commission Chronology
October 2004effective 1/1/05, not entering into new volume/profit-based contingent agreements as retail broker Received subpoenas and other requests for information from state attorneys general and state regulatory authorities Q4 2004conducted internal review with outside counsel which found no evidence of price fixing, bid rigging or improper tying arrangements Q1 2005, received $20.7M in contingent commissions on 2004 contracts Q1 2005recorded $35M charge ($21M after tax, or $.23 per diluted share) as best estimate of amount to resolve the state insurance investigations based on costs of similar industry settlements thus far, plus an accrual for legal costs May 18, 2005  reach agreement with Illinois' Attorney General and Insurance Department  no lawsuit; no unlawful conduct will create $27M fund for certain retail clients which does not represent a fine or penalty will adopt certain business reforms including an agreement not to receive retail contingent commissions
Continue full cooperation with other state regulatory authorities
15
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities Approximately 140 acquisitions in this segment from 1986 through 3/31/05 The rules: financial health, similar culture Gallagher is merger partner of choice
16
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits
1000 900 800 700 600 500 400 300 200 100 $458M
19%
CAGR
$920M
00 01 02 03 04
Total Revenues
200 150 100 50 0 $89M
21%
CAGR
$186M
00 01 02 03 04
Pretax Earnings
2004 pretax margins of 20%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 12%
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
17
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage 59% (Jim Gault)
Employee Benefits 17% (Jim Durkin)
Specialty Marketing & International 24% (Dave McGurn)
As of 3/31/05
18
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
19
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness Aviation Captives Construction Construction Project Solutions Energy Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education Management Liability Marine
Mergers & Acquisitions Personal Insurance Public Entity Real Estate
General Commercial Habitational Hospitality Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit Restaurant Scholastic K-12 Transportation Worldwide Risk Services
20
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size Acquisitions and hiring Alternative market
Captives Rent-a-captives Deductible plans Self-insurance
21
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices, Joint Ventures & Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Wholesale Brokerage International P&C Brokerage Programs/Program Administration Reinsurance Brokerage Captives/Rent-a-Captives CoverageFirst.com
23
 
Employee Benefits Offices
24
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/ Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
25
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Retail Brokerage Merger and acquisition opportunities Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs Providing better retirement tools/information Benefits communication and administration Compliance with federal and state regulations
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Gallagher's Property/Casualty Claims Management Operation "Gallagher Bassett"  Rich McKenna World's largest multiline, third-party administrator (Business Insurance magazine) Revenue growth is all organic Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims Significant barriers to entry into this business  high retention levels
27
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits
350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0
16%
CAGR
$203M $346M
2000 2004
Total Revenues
60 50 40 30 20 10 0
24%
CAGR
$28M $58M
2000 2004
Pretax Earnings
2004 pretax margin of 17%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 47%
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
28
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
29
 
Risk Management Segment
Expertise
Real-time Claims Reporting Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management
Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
30
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments Captives Program business Expanding global capabilities Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage Security Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet Employer communication/plan administration
31
 
Financial Services Segment $889 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($171 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($140 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($578 M)
* As of March 31, 2005  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
32
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets Under Management and Financial Guarantees $400 $350 $300 $250
$200 $150 $362 $187
2002 2005
Net Asset Classes 3/31/05 $70 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Tax Adv. Asset Mgmt. Real Estate Other
Low Income Housing $16M Alternative Energy $61M Asset Alliance $47M Real Estate, incl HO $23M Bermuda Insurance $27M VC, Airplanes & Other $13M $ In millions
33
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007 Asset management  monetize Real estate  optimize cash flows
Sold Florida Community Development investment in Q2 2005
Venture capital  substantially exited in 2003
34
 
Financial Services Segment
Headwaters Dispute
February 05  Utah jury awarded damages against AJGFS of $175M with a possible additional $120M
May 05  AJGFS reached settlement with Headwaters Payments of $50M in May 05 and $70M by January 06 Annual royalty for 2005 through 2007 up to a maximum of $20M per year Q1 05  Recorded pretax charge of $131M
($84M after tax or $.91 per diluted share)
35
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
36
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
Total Revenues From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported ($ M) $1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400
21%
CAGR
$685 $842 $1,023 $1, 226 $1,447
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
Total Pretax Earnings From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported ($ M) $260 $240 $220 $200 $180 $160 $140 $120 $100
18%
CAGR
$122 $140 $184 $192 $235
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
Total Revenue Per Employee As Originally Reported $200 $190 $180 $170 $160 $150 $140 $130 $120
7%
CAGR
$141,000 $138,000 $153,000 $180,000 $185,000
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted Earnings From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01 $2.20 $2.00
$1.80 $1.60
$1.40 $1.20
$1.00 $0.80
18%
CAGR
$1.02 $1.38 $1.41 $1.56 $1.99
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings From Continuing Operations Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(In millions) $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
26%
CAGR
$89 $128 $168 $200 $235
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
Note: Amounts as originally reported
41
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.4 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($445 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($538 M)
Shares Repurchased
($442 M)
Built a balance sheet with $3.32 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 3/31/05
42
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
21%
CAGR
2000
Total Revenues
2004 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
34%
CAGR
2000
Cash Flow from Ops
2004 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
19%
CAGR
$1.12
1985
Dividends
2005
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group* Dividend yield of 3.9% indicated in 2005
Note: Amounts as originally reported from continuing operations
* Through 12/31/04
43
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens -everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
13. Professional courtesy is expected.
14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other.
We are a team.
16. Loyalty and respect are earned -not dictated. 17. Fear is a turn-off.
18. People skills are very important at Gallagher. 20. We run to problems -not away from them.
21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on -not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength -not a weakness.
24. We must continue building a professional Company -together -as a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances -but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
44

Exhibit 99.2
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050726170240.txt.gz
TIME:20050726170240
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On July 26, 2005, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's second quarter 2005 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
99     Press release, dated July 26, 2005, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, July 26, 2005  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2005. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
 
Quarter Ended June 30
 
 
Six Months Ended June 30
 
 
"Given the significant demands facing Gallagher related to the industry-wide issues surrounding contingent commissions, I couldn't be more pleased with our results," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "On May 18, 2005, we reached a national agreement with regulators here in our home state of Illinois that we believe allows us to move forward in this new environment. However, we must still resolve these issues in 18 other states and 13 class action lawsuits, which are certainly distractive and consume our energies. Nonetheless, we continue to sell and provide our clients with excellent service."
 
Brokerage and Risk Management Combined Second Quarter Highlights  Record Earnings
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights  Record Earnings
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 27, 2005 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
 
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2005 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20050804131250.txt.gz
TIME:20050804131250
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The August 2005 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
August 2005
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may be subject to reduction due to the elimination of contingent commission arrangements in 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of such laws or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of Syn/Coal credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
2
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com.
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm Public since 1984 Market capitalization of $2.6 billion Shares outstanding of 94.6 million Dividend yield of 4.1% 52-week range  $25.42 - $34.12 Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 6/30/05, unless otherwise indicated
4
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Performance vs. S&P
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
Jun-00 Jun-01 Jun-02 Jun-03 Jun-04 Jun-05
Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG] S&P 500 (SPX)
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
2000 Total Revenues 2004
20% CAGR
$300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
2000 Cash Flow from Ops 2004
34% CAGR
$1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1985 Dividends 2005 $1.12
19% CAGR
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group* Dividend yield of 4.1% indicated in 2005
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations *Through 12/31/04
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO (Restated for stock splits) June 30, 2005
Stock Price $1.72 $ 27.13
Market Cap $57 M $2.6 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $343 M
Annual Dividend/Share $.03 $ 1.12
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 19%
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Record revenues of $1.4B and earnings from continuing operations of $188M
Total Brokerage and Risk Management revenues increased 12% Total Brokerage and Risk Management pretax earnings increased 14% Completed record 19 acquisitions Record dividend increase of 39%
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Returned $141M in cash to stockholders $56M of share repurchases or 1.8M shares $85M of paid dividends
Increased GAAP Book Value to $761M Maintained tangible net worth at nearly $400M Navigated synfuel tax credit waters
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2005 Developments
Reached agreement with Illinois' Attorney General and Insurance Department on 5/18/05 Sold two medical claims management operations Continue divestiture of Financial Services assets Resolved Headwaters dispute Froze defined benefit pension plan effective 7/1/05
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals $2.0 - $2.3 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Average Stockholders' Equity
11
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven
Team-oriented and committed to growth Open "Small company" feel Client-focused Competitive No "C" players Niche advantaged
12
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2004
Total Revenues
Brokerage 67%
Risk Management 25%
Financial Services 8%
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 82%
Risk Management 26%
Financial Services (8%)
Total revenues from continuing operations exclude FIN 46 impact and investment gains Pretax earnings from continuing operation excludes investment gains (no FIN 46 impact on earnings)
13
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher's largest business segment Acts as intermediary  no underwriting risk Niche driven Alternative market leaders
14
 
Brokerage Segment
Contingent Commission Status
Resolved issue without a lawsuit No unlawful conduct
No longer accepting contingent commissions as a retail broker Must disclose compensation to clients Still working to get buy-in from other states
15
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities Approximately 145 acquisitions in this segment from 1986 through 6/30/05 The rules: financial health, similar culture Gallagher is merger partner of choice
16
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits
1000 900 800 700 600 500 400 300 200 100 $458M $920M
00 01 02 03 04
19% CAGR
Total Revenues
200 150 100 50 0 $89M $186M
00 01 02 03 04
21% CAGR
Pretax Earnings
2004 pretax margins of 20%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 12%
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
17
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage 56% (Jim Gault)
Specialty Marketing & International 26% (Dave McGurn)
Employee Benefits 18% (Jim Durkin)
As of 6/30/05
18
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
19
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness Aviation Captives Construction Construction Project Solutions Energy Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education Management Liability Marine
Mergers & Acquisitions Personal Insurance Public Entity Real Estate
General Commercial Habitational Hospitality Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit Restaurant Scholastic K-12 Transportation Worldwide Risk Services
20
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size Acquisitions and hiring Alternative market
Captives Rent-a-captives Deductible plans Self-insurance
21
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices & Strategic Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Wholesale Brokerage International P&C Brokerage Programs/Program Administration Reinsurance Brokerage Captives/Rent-a-Captives CoverageFirst.com
23
 
Employee Benefits Offices
24
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
25
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Retail Brokerage Merger and acquisition opportunities Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs Providing better retirement tools/information Benefits communication and administration Compliance with federal and state regulations
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Gallagher's Property/Casualty Claims Management Operation "Gallagher Bassett"  Rich McKenna World's largest multiline, third-party administrator (Business Insurance magazine) Revenue growth is all organic Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims Significant barriers to entry into this business  high retention levels
27
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits
350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0 $203M $346M
16% CAGR
2000 2004
Total Revenues
60 50 40 30 20 10 0 $28M $58M
24% CAGR
2000 2004
Pretax Earnings
2004 pretax margin of 17%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 47%
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
28
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
 
Risk Management Segment
Expertise
Real-time Claims Reporting Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management
Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
30
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments Captives Program business Expanding global capabilities Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage Security Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet Employer communication/plan administration
31
 
Financial Services Segment $926 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($153 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($608 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($165 M)
* As of June 30, 2005  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
32
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets and Financial Guarantees* $400 $350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $362 $166
2002 2005 $70 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Net Assets*
Tax Adv
Asset Mgmt
Real Estate
Other
Low Income Housing $14M Alternative Energy $52M Asset Alliance $47M Home Office Building $12M Other $12M $ In millions
*Reflects sale of Allied World Assurance Holdings, Ltd. On 7/19/05
33
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007 Asset management  monetize Real estate  optimize cash flows
Sold Florida Community Development- 2Q 2005
Other
Exited Venture Capital investments in 2003 Sold Bermuda Insurance Investment  3Q 2005
34
 
Financial Services Segment
Headwaters Dispute
February 05  Utah jury awarded damages against AJGFS of $175M with a possible additional $120M
May 05  AJGFS reached settlement with Headwaters
Payment of $50M made in May 05 Payment of $70M due in January 06
Annual royalty for 2005 through 2007 up to a maximum of $20M per year
Q1 05  Recorded pretax charge of $131M
($84M after tax or $.91 per diluted share)
35
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
36
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
Total Revenues From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported ($ M) $1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 $684 $836 $1,021 $1, 221 $1,437
20% CAGR
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
Total Pretax Earnings From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported ($ M) $260 $240 $220 $200 $180 $160 $140 $120 $100
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 $121 $137 $185 $193 $237
18% CAGR
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
Total Revenue Per Employee As Originally Reported $200 $190 $180 $170 $160 $150 $140 $130 $120
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 $141,000 $137,000 $153,000 $179,000 $183,000
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
7% CAGR
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted Earnings From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01 $2.20 $2.00
$1.80 $1.60
$1.40 $1.20
$1.00 $0.80
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
18% CAGR
$1.02 $1.36 $1.41 $1.56 $2.01
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings From Continuing Operations Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(In millions) $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 $88 $131 $169 $201 $236
26% CAGR
Note: Amounts as originally reported
41
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.5 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($471 M)
Shares Repurchased
($444 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($549 M)
Built a balance sheet with $3.62 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 6/30/05
42
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
2000 Total Revenues 2004
20% CAGR
$300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
2000 Cash Flow from Ops 2004
34% CAGR
$1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1985 Dividends 2005 $1.12
19% CAGR
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group* Dividend yield of 4.1% indicated in 2005
Note: Amounts as originally reported from continuing operations
* Through 12/31/04
43
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens -everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
13. Professional courtesy is expected.
14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other.
We are a team.
16. Loyalty and respect are earned -not dictated. 17. Fear is a turn-off.
18. People skills are very important at Gallagher. 20. We run to problems -not away from them.
21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on -not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength -not a weakness.
24. We must continue building a professional Company -together -as a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances -but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
44

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management Segment
Financial Services Segment
Arthur J.
Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
NYSE: AJG
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty (P/C) products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a full-service employee benefits consultant.
Stock Performance - Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500 Gallagher S&P 500
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
6 00 6 01 6 02 6 03 6 04 6 05 www.ajg.com
AUGUST 2005
page
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 4
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT 5
ACQUISITION STRATEGY 5
MARKET OUTLOOK 6
CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 7
WHY INVEST? 8
As of June 30, 2005
Price $27.13
52-week high/low $25.42 - $34.12
Trailing 12-mos. gross revenues $1.5 billion
Market cap $2.6 billion
Indicated annual dividend $1.12
Yield 4.1 %
Shares outstanding 94.6 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/earnings (trailing year excl. discontinued operations) 14x
Number of employees 8,052
1
 
Team Oriented
Client Focused
Innovative
Brokerage Segment
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
NICHES
Agribusiness Healthcare Real Estate (4)
General Commercial
Aviation Higher Education Habitational
Hospitality
Captives Management Liability Shopping Centers
Construction Marine Religious/Nonprofit
Construction Project Mergers & Acquisitions Restaurant
Solutions
Personal Insurance Scholastic K-12
Energy
Public Entity Transportation
Global Risk Management
Worldwide Risk Services
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring P/C insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. With offices throughout the U.S., this operation pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners in nearly 120 countries throughout the world.
BSD is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of P/C insurance, approximately 75% of its business falls within 23 specialized niches. These cross-divisional niche practice groups target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This niche focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. Niche practice groups allow for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitate the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within the niches provide a competitive advantage.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth over the next year will come from its niche practice groups; middle-market accounts; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms like captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL
CAPABILITIES
Wholesale Brokerage Reinsurance Brokerage
International P/C Brokerage Captive/Rent-a-Captive Management
Programs/Program Administration CoverageFirst.com
Specialty Marketing and International is comprised of wholesale, excess/surplus and reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S. and abroad, captive
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2005
2
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL (CONTINUED)
management operations outside the Continental U.S., and P/C partnerships.
Gallagher structures a broad range of alternative market mechanisms, tailored to clients' specific needs and financial situations. Hard market conditions in the P/C industry from 2001-2003 contributed to exceptional growth in alternative market mechanisms as well as in wholesale and excess/ surplus lines business, much of which is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. Although market competition continues to heat up, interest in alternative market mechanisms remains strong. A growing amount of business is also coming to Gallagher via its e-commerce portal, CoverageFirst.com, which has over 15,100 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
In January 2005, Gallagher announced that it was merging its two U.S. reinsurance brokerage subsidiaries and that all reinsurance brokerage operations worldwide would begin operating under the name Gallagher Re to enhance brand awareness.
Specialty Marketing and International expects its greatest revenue growth opportunities will come from global reinsurance, international and domestic wholesale, and the continued expansion of specialty programs and program administration. In addition to its offices in the U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia and Singapore, the operation pursues business opportunities in conjunction with Gallagher's Strategic Alliance Network of correspondent brokers and consultants in nearly 120 countries around the world.
STRATEGIC
ALLIANCE
NETWORK
In addition to its own international brokerage offices, Gallagher has developed a non-owned network of leading independent brokers in nearly 120 countries around the world. These relationships provide Gallagher's clients with one of the most comprehensive worldwide sales and service networks available.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES
CAPABILITIES
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services Executive Benefits/Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services provides employee benefit brokerage and human resource consulting to assist clients in all areas of their employee retirement and health and welfare plans. Rising healthcare costs and growing regulatory complexities have resulted in double-digit increases in employee benefit costs. Gallagher has significantly expanded its technical resources and technological capabilities to better assist clients in addressing this trend.
Gallagher offers expertise and guidance in all areas of benefits planning, delivery and administration. This encompasses a broad range of benefit services, including executive benefits and financial planning, worksite marketing and voluntary products, defined contribution products, actuarial services, compensation program design/analysis, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement services, benefits communication and out-sourcing, and training programs and tools that help employers address federal and state regulatory compliance.
The operation has also established eight niche practice groups in the following areas: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity, religious, restaurant, education (K-12) and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from mergers and acquisitions, from cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, by assisting clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities, and from its niche practice groups.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2005
3
 
Quality Driven
Cost Effective
Comprehensive
Risk Management Segment
GALLAGHER BASSETT
EXPERTISE
Real-Time Claims Reporting
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as the world's largest multiline, third-party administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., U.K., Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for over a decade that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. By the end of the second quarter 2005, the system had 10,800 users and was averaging 18.5 million site hits and 62,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through the next year will come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2005
4
 
Financial Services Segment
CORE COMPETENCIES
Tax-Advantaged Investing Real Estate Asset Management
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and optimizing tax benefits from Gallagher's investments. Financial Services specializes in tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax-advantaged investments are comprised primarily of low income housing developments, waste-to-energy projects and synthetic fuel plants. These investments helped reduce Gallagher's tax rate to 24% in 2003, 20% in 2004 and 23% in 2005.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. The building is almost 100% leased, with third parties occupying approximately 40%.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to 50% of 14 alternative investment fund manager companies with approximately $3.4 billion under management at June 30, 2005.
On February 11, 2005, a Utah jury awarded damages in the amount of $175.0 million against AJG Financial Services, Inc. (AJGFS) and in favor of Headwaters Incorporated in regards to a synthetic coal technology licensing agreement. Effective as of May 1, 2005, AJGFS and Headwaters entered into a definitive agreement to settle this and all other litigation between the companies for $50.0 million, which was paid to Headwaters in May 2005. Additionally, AJGFS and Headwaters have modified their existing licensing agreement, allowing AJGFS to utilize Headwaters' technology on two of AJGFS' synthetic fuel facilities in exchange for (1) $70.0 million payable on or before January 15, 2006 and (2) an annual royalty to Headwaters in 2005, 2006 and 2007, which at full production, would be approximately $20.0 million of AJGFS' estimated pre-royalty, pretax earnings of $40.0 million in total annually from these two facilities. Gallagher has recorded a pretax charge to its first quarter 2005 earnings of $131.0 million ($84.2 million after tax, or $0.91 per diluted share) related to this settlement, including litigation, bonding and other costs.
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 151 acquisitions from 1986 through June 2005, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these were regional or local P/C brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. In the last few years, the company has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding its talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on: a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, marketing-oriented culture a profitable, growing business whose ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's aggressive acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2005
5
 
MARKET OUTLOOK
The P/C market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an over-abundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%.
A market correction began in 2000 and intensified in 2001, particularly following the September 11th terrorist attacks. In the fourth quarter of 2001, the average premium increase was 28.5%, according to a Lehman Brothers analysis. Double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002. The magnitude of rate increases began to moderate in 2003 and softening market conditions continued throughout 2004. A market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers indicated that the average premium for commercial accounts declined 9.7% in the second quarter of 2005, with medium and large accounts averaging the most significant reductions.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition has increased, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms.
In October 2004, Gallagher announced that it would no longer participate as a retail broker in volume-based or profit-based contingent commission agreements effective January 1, 2005. Since then, the insurance industry in general, and Gallagher individually, continues to be the subject of a substantial number of regulatory and legal actions by many State Attorneys General and private litigants investigating contingent commissions and various other historical business practices. Over the last several months, three other major insurance brokers have reached settlements with one or more Attorneys General. In the first quarter 2005, Gallagher recorded a pretax charge of $35 million ($21 million after tax, or $.23 per diluted share), which represented its best estimate of the amount to resolve the state insurance investigations. On May 18, 2005, Gallagher reached an agreement with the Illinois Attorney General and Illinois Insurance Department. There was no lawsuit nor any findings of unlawful or deceitful conduct. As part of the agreement, the company will create a $27 million fund, none of which represents a fine or penalty, for the benefit of certain retail clients. The company also agreed to adopt certain business reforms including an agreement not to receive retail contingent commissions. Gallagher continues to cooperate with other state regulatory authorities.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2005
6
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
CONDENSED QUARTERLY SEGMENT FINANCIAL INFORMATION- 2003 THROUGH 2005
(UNAUDITED - IN MILLIONS EXCEPT PER SHARE DATA AND OTHER INFORMATION DATA) ALL INFORMATION RESTATED TO REFLECT DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
2003 2004 2005
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues $186.1 $200.9 $220.2 $233.3 $840.5 $202.5 $223.3 $239.8 $254.6 $920.2 $225.3 $246.8
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 26.9 38.5 55.4 52.1 172.9 33.5 44.2 56.6 52.1 186.4 (8.5) 43.5
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 20.2 28.8 42.1 39.6 130.7 26.7 35.3 45.3 41.7 149.0 (0.6) 33.5
Growth revenues 20% 17% 12% 11% 14% 9% 11% 9% 9% 9% 11% 11%
Pretax profit margin before litigation matters (1) 14% 19% 25% 22% 20% 17% 20% 24% 20% 20% 12% 18%
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.22 $0.31 $0.45 $0.43 $1.40 $0.28 $0.37 $0.48 $0.44 $1.57 $(0.01) $0.35
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues $69.0 $70.9 $75.5 $76.6 $292.0 $81.4 $86.0 $88.1 $90.0 $345.5 $91.6 $89.6
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 10.4 9.8 10.4 10.2 40.8 12.4 14.0 15.5 16.3 58.2 17.2 18.5
Earnings from continuing operations 7.9 7.5 8.0 7.8 31.2 10.1 11.3 12.4 13.1 46.9 13.2 14.2
Growth revenues 12% 19% 18% 19% 17% 18% 21% 17% 17% 18% 13% 4%
Pretax profit margin 15% 14% 14% 13% 14% 15% 16% 18% 18% 17% 19% 21%
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.09 $0.08 $0.09 $0.08 $0.34 $0.11 $0.12 $0.13 $0.14 $0.50 $0.14 $0.15
BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT COMBINED
Revenues $255.1 $271.8 $295.7 $309.9 $1,132.5 $283.9 $309.3 $327.9 $344.6 $1,265.7 $316.9 $336.4
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 37.3 48.3 65.8 62.3 213.7 45.9 58.2 72.1 68.4 244.6 8.7 62.0
Earnings from continuing operations 28.1 36.2 50.1 47.4 161.9 36.8 46.6 57.7 54.8 195.9 12.6 47.7
Growth revenues 18% 18% 13% 13% 15% 11% 14% 11% 11% 12% 12% 9%
Pretax profit margin before litigation matters (1) 15% 18% 22% 20% 19% 16% 19% 22% 20% 19% 14% 18%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $0.31 $0.39 $0.54 $0.51 $1.75 $0.39 $0.49 $0.61 $0.58 $2.07 $0.13 $0.50
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income (2) $15.1 $17.0 $37.2 $43.8 $113.1 $45.0 $57.3 $33.0 $27.9 $163.2 $30.0 $30.9
Investment gains (losses) (25.7) - 1.6 (0.4) (24.5) 2.5 2.1 2.6 0.9 8.1 (0.1) 3.8
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes (21.0) 0.3 (1.3) 1.1 (20.9) 3.4 (0.3) (3.6) (6.8) (7.3) (133.4) (4.6)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations (15.9) 0.1 (1.1) 0.9 (16.0) 2.5 (0.3) (3.0) (5.6) (6.4) (86.2) (3.5)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $(0.18) $- $(0.02) $0.01 $(0.19) $0.03 $- $(0.03) $(0.06) $(0.06) $(0.93) $(0.04)
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues $244.5 $288.8 $334.5 $353.3 $1,221.1 $331.4 $368.7 $363.5 $373.4 $1,437.0 $346.8 $371.1
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 16.3 48.6 64.5 63.4 192.8 49.3 57.9 68.5 61.6 237.3 (124.7) 57.4
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 12.2 36.4 49.0 48.3 145.9 39.3 46.3 54.7 49.2 189.5 (73.6) 44.2
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.13 $0.39 $0.52 $0.52 $1.56 $0.41 $0.49 $0.57 $0.52 $2.01 $(0.80) $0.46
Cash dividends declared per share $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.72 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $1.00 $0.28 $0.28
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $2,492.4 $2,644.3 $2,695.1 $2,901.6 $2,873.0 $3,218.2 $3,085.0 $3,237.9 $3,227.7 $3,444.4
Total liabilities $1,947.6 $2,071.8 $2,104.5 $2,282.5 $2,225.0 $2,521.4 $2,342.1 $2,476.9 $2,545.0 $2,701.5
Total stockholders' equity $544.8 $572.5 $590.6 $619.1 $648.0 $696.8 $742.9 $761.0 $682.7 $742.9
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 92,312 93,651 93,716 93,570 93,312 93,955 94,343 95,053 94,827 94,546 94,790 95,584
Common shares repurchased (000s) 239 515 1,140 970 2,864 555 - 615 613 1,783 - 59
Tangible net worth (3) $391.4 $417.0 $422.6 $396.2 $394.6 $427.5 $449.0 $386.8 $309.8 $342.6
Book value per share $6.06 $6.32 $6.55 $6.88 $7.14 $7.58 $8.04 $8.26 $7.33 $7.85
Tangible book value per share (4) $4.35 $4.60 $4.69 $4.40 $4.35 $4.65 $4.86 $4.20 $3.32 $3.62
Annualized return on beginning tangible net worth (5) 12% 24% 33% 37% 37% 37% 43% 47% 48% 48% NMF NMF
Number of acquisitions closed 4 1 2 7 14 7 3 4 5 19 2 5
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 6,639 6,662 6,713 6,808 6,958 7,180 7,451 7,840 7,975 8,052
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, investment (gains) losses, pension plan curtailment gain, depreciation, amortization and stock compensation expense (6)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations $12.2 $36.4 $49.0 $48.3 $145.9 $39.3 $46.3 $54.7 $49.2 $189.5 $(73.6) $44.2
Litigation matters - - - - - - - - - - - 166.0 -
Investment (gains) losses 25.7 - (1.6) 0.4 24.5 (2.5) (2.1) (2.6) (0.9) (8.1) 0.1 (3.8)
Pension plan curtailment gain - - - - - - - - - - - (10.0)
Depreciation 6.8 6.6 7.9 8.0 29.3 8.0 8.5 8.2 8.0 32.7 8.5 9.0
Amortization 1.9 2.0 2.3 2.9 9.1 3.0 5.8 4.1 4.8 17.7 5.3 5.3
Non-cash stock compensation 1.0 2.2 2.2 4.0 9.4 3.3 4.0 3.9 4.4 15.6 4.9 3.4
Tax effect (8.4) (2.6) (2.5) (3.6) (17.1) (2.2) (3.2) (2.7) (3.2) (11.3) (65.1) (0.9)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, investment (gains) losses, pension plan curtailment gain, depreciation, amortization and stock compensation expense (6) $39.1 $44.6 $57.3 $60.0 $201.0 $48.9 $59.3 $65.6 $62.4 $236.2 $46.2 $47.2
On a diluted per share basis $0.42 $0.48 $0.61 $0.64 $2.15 $0.52 $0.63 $0.69 $0.66 $2.50 $0.49 $0.49
(1) Represents pretax earnings (loss) from continuing operations before the impact of pretax litigation and contingent commission related matters divided by total revenues. (2) Beginning 3rd Q, 2003, includes impact of FIN 46.
(3) Represents total stockholders' equity less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets. (4) Represents tangible net worth divided by common shares outstanding at end of the period.
(5) Represents year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity, less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets, as of the beginning of the year.
(6) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of the impact of litigation and contingent commission related matters, investment gains (losses), pension plan curtailment gain, depreciation, amortization, amortization of deferredcompensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2005
7
 
Growth
Cash Dividends
Profits
Why Invest ?
Total Revenues from Continuing Operations
(in millions) $1600 $1400 $1200 $1000 $800 $600 $400 $200
00 01 02 03 04 $684 $836 $1,021 $1,221 $1,437
20% CAGR
$1,021
Earnings from Continuing Operations Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(in millions) $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
00 01 02 03 04 $88 $131 $169 $201 $236
26% CAGR
Dividends Per Share $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
84 85 86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04 05 $0.03
20% Annual Average Increase
$1.12 *
* Indicated
GAAP Book Value Per Share $9.00 $8.00 $7.00 $6.00 $5.00 $4.00 $3.00 $2.00 $1.00 $0.00
00 01 02 03 04 $3.95 $4.37 $5.96 $6.88 $8.26
20% CAGR
Diluted Earnings Per Share from Continuing Operations $2.20 $2.00 $1.80 $1.60 $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80
00 01 02 03 04 $1.02 $1.36 $1.41 $1.56 $2.01
18% CAGR
Note: All information is as originally reported, except per share amounts restated for stock splits.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
President & CEO
(630) 773-3800
8


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20051006095850.txt.gz
TIME:20051006095850
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On October 5, 2005, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) entered into an unsecured Multicurrency Credit Agreement (the Credit Agreement), which expires on October 4, 2010, with a group of financial institutions as Lenders, Harris N.A. as Administrative Agent, Citibank N.A., as Syndication Agent and Barclays Bank PLC, as Documentation Agent. The Credit Agreement provides for a revolving credit commitment of up to $450.0 million (of which up to $125.0 million may be used for issuances of standby or commercial letters of credit and up to $30.0 million may be used for the making of Swing Loans by Harris N.A.). Gallagher may from time to time request an increase in the revolving credit commitment up to a maximum aggregate revolving credit commitment of $550.0 million. The Credit Agreement replaced a $250.0 million unsecured revolving credit facility that was to expire on July 20, 2006.
 
The Credit Agreement provides that Gallagher may elect that each borrowing in U.S. dollars be either Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Loans. All loans denominated in currencies other than U.S. dollars shall be Eurocurrency Loans. Interest rates on Base Rate Loans and outstanding drawings on letters of credit in U.S. dollars under the Credit Agreement are based on the Base Rate, as defined in the Credit Agreement. Interest rates on Eurocurrency Loans or outstanding drawings on letters of credit in currencies other than U.S. dollars under the Credit Agreement are based on Adjusted LIBOR, as defined in the Credit Agreement, plus a margin of .400%, .500%, .600% or .800%, depending on the financial leverage ratio maintained by Gallagher. Interest rates on Swing Loans are based, at the election of Gallagher, on either the Base Rate, as defined in the Credit Agreement, or such alternate rate as may be quoted by Harris N.A. The annual facility fee related to the Credit Agreement is either ..100%, .125%, .150% or .200% of the used and unused portions of the revolving credit commitment, depending on the financial leverage ratio maintained by Gallagher.
 
The terms of the Credit Agreement include various covenants, including covenants that require Gallagher to maintain specified levels of net worth and financial leverage ratios. The Credit Agreement also includes customary events of default, with corresponding grace periods, including, without limitation, payment defaults, cross-defaults to other agreements evidencing indebtedness and bankruptcy-related defaults. Gallagher's obligations under the Credit Agreement are unconditionally guaranteed by several of its wholly-owned subsidiaries.
 
A copy of the Credit Agreement is attached to this report as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference as though it were fully set forth herein. The description above is a summary of the Credit Agreement and is qualified in its entirety by the complete text of the Credit Agreement itself.
 
On October 5, 2005, Gallagher issued a press release announcing that it had entered into the Credit Agreement. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 1.02. Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Also on October 5, 2005, in connection with the Credit Agreement, Gallagher terminated its $250.0 million credit facility dated July 21, 2003 among Gallagher, the Guarantors party thereto, the Banks party thereto, Citibank, N.A, as Syndication Agent, and Harris N.A. (successor by merger with Harris Trust and Savings Bank), as Agent and Lead Arranger (the Old Credit Agreement). The Old Credit Agreement provided for a revolving credit commitment of up to $250.0 million, up to $125.0 million of which was permitted to be used for the issuance of standby letters of credit. Interest rates on borrowings under the Old Credit Agreement were based on the prime commercial rate or LIBOR plus .575%, .800% or 1.000%, the determination of which was dependent on a financial leverage ratio maintained by Gallagher. The annual facility fee related to the Old Credit Agreement was either .125%, .150% or .200% of the used and unused portions of the revolving credit commitment, the determination of which was dependent on a financial leverage ratio maintained by Gallagher. All indebtedness, liabilities and obligations outstanding under the Old Credit Agreement have been fully paid and satisfied, except for those certain letters of credit which became letters of credit under the Credit Agreement. There were no early termination penalties or fees incurred, but Gallagher will write-off approximately $0.5 million of unamortized debt acquisition costs in fourth quarter 2005 related to the termination of the Old Credit Agreement.
 
The information provided in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated into this Item 1.02 by reference.
 
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
 
The information provided in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated into this Item 2.03 by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibits
 
 
 
T M C A is entered into as of October 5, 2005, by and among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), the Guarantors from time to time party to this Agreement, the several financial institutions from time to time party to this Agreement, as Lenders, Citibank N.A., as Syndication Agent, Barclays Bank PLC, as Documentation Agent, and Harris N.A., as Administrative Agent as provided herein. All capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the same meanings herein as such terms are defined in Section 6.1 hereof.
HIS
ULTICURRENCY
REDIT
GREEMENT
"Borrower"
 
 
The Borrower has requested, and the Lenders have agreed to extend, certain credit facilities on the terms and conditions of this Agreement.
 
N, T, in consideration of the mutual agreements contained herein, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
 
S 1. T C.
ECTION
HE
REDITS
 
. Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, each Lender, by its acceptance hereof, severally agrees to make a loan or loans (individually a and collectively ) in U.S. Dollars and Alternative Currencies to the Borrower from time to time on a revolving basis in an aggregate outstanding Original Dollar Amount up to the amount of such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment, on or after the Effective Date and before the Termination Date. The sum of the (i) aggregate Original Dollar Amount of Revolving Loans, (ii) the aggregate Original Dollar Amount of Swing Loans, and (iii) the aggregate U.S. Dollar Equivalent of all L/C Obligations at any time outstanding shall not exceed the Revolving Credit Commitments in effect at such time. Each Borrowing of Revolving Loans shall be made ratably from the Lenders in proportion to their respective Percentages. As provided in Section 1.5(a) hereof, the Borrower may elect that each Borrowing of Revolving Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars be either Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Loans. All Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency shall be Eurocurrency Loans. Revolving Loans may be repaid and the principal amount thereof reborrowed before the Termination Date, subject to all the terms and conditions hereof.
Section 1.1. The Revolving Credit Commitments
"Revolving Loan"
"Revolving Loans"
 
. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, as part of the Revolving Credit, the L/C Issuer shall issue standby or commercial letters of credit (each a ) for the account of the Borrower or for the account of the Borrower and one or more of its Subsidiaries in U.S. Dollars or an Alternative Currency in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of an aggregate undrawn face amount up to the L/C Sublimit. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Existing L/Cs (all of which are listed and described on Schedule 1.2(a) hereto) shall each constitute a herein for all
Section 1.2. Letters of Credit
General Terms.
"Letter of Credit"
"Letter of Credit"
purposes of the Agreement to the same extent, and with the same force and effect, as if such Existing L/Cs had been issued at the request of the Borrower under the Revolving Credit. Each Letter of Credit shall be issued by the L/C Issuer in the manner described above, but each Lender shall be obligated to reimburse the L/C Issuer for its Percentage of the amount of each drawing thereunder and, accordingly, each Letter of Credit shall constitute usage of the Revolving Credit Commitment of each Lender in an amount equal to its Percentage of the L/C Obligations then outstanding.
pro rata
 
(b) At any time on or after the Effective Date and before the Termination Date, the L/C Issuer shall, at the request of the Borrower, issue one or more Letters of Credit in a form satisfactory to the L/C Issuer, with expiration dates no later than the earlier of (i) 12 months from the date of issuance or (ii) 365 days after the Termination Date, in an aggregate face amount as set forth above, upon the receipt of an application duly executed by the Borrower and, if such Letter of Credit is for the account of one of its Subsidiaries, such Subsidiary for the relevant Letter of Credit in the form customarily prescribed by the L/C Issuer for the type of Letter of Credit, whether standby or commercial, requested (each an ); that with respect to any Letter of Credit with an expiration date that is later than the Termination Date, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent no later than 20 days prior to the Termination Date cash collateral in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of the full amount then available for drawing under such Letter of Credit. Any such cash collateral required by this Section 1.2(b) shall be held by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the terms of Section 10.4 hereof. Notwithstanding anything contained in any Application to the contrary (i) the Borrower's obligation to pay fees in connection with each Letter of Credit shall be as exclusively set forth in Section 4.1(b) hereof, (ii) except as provided above, at any time when no Event of Default exists the L/C Issuer will not call for the funding by the Borrower of any amount under a Letter of Credit before being presented with a drawing thereunder, and (iii) if the L/C Issuer is not timely reimbursed for the amount of any drawing under a Letter of Credit on the date such drawing is paid, the Borrower's obligation to reimburse the L/C Issuer for the amount of such drawing shall bear interest (which the Borrower hereby promises to pay) from and after the date such drawing is paid until payment in full thereof at a rate per annum (x) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in U.S. Dollars, equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans plus the Base Rate from time to time in effect and (y) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in an Alternative Currency, equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans the rate established pursuant to Section 3.2(c)(iii) hereof for Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency. The L/C Issuer will promptly notify the Lenders of each issuance by it of a Letter of Credit. If the L/C Issuer issues any Letters of Credit with expiration dates that are automatically extended under the terms set forth in such Letter of Credit, then the L/C Issuer will give notice of non-renewal to the Borrower before the time necessary to prevent such automatic extension if before such required notice date (i) the expiration date of such Letter of Credit if so extended would be later than 365 days after the Termination Date, (ii) the Revolving Credit Commitments have been terminated or (iii) an Event of Default exists and the Required Lenders have given the L/C Issuer instructions not to so permit the extension of the expiration date of such Letter of Credit. The L/C Issuer agrees to issue amendments to the Letters of Credit increasing the amount, or extending the expiration date, thereof at the request of the Borrower subject to the conditions of Section 8.2 and the other terms of this Section 1.2. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the L/C Issuer's obligation to issue, amend or extend the
Applications.
"Application"
provided,
plus
 
expiration date of a Letter of Credit is subject to the conditions of Section 8.2 and the other terms of this Section 1.2 and the L/C Issuer will not issue, amend or extend the expiration date of any Letter of Credit if any Lender notifies the L/C Issuer of any failure to satisfy or otherwise comply with such conditions and terms and directs the L/C Issuer not to take such action.
 
(c) Subject to Section 1.2(b) hereof, the obligation of the Borrower to reimburse the L/C Issuer for all drawings under a Letter of Credit (a ) shall be governed by the Application related to such Letter of Credit, except that, if and as long as no Default or Event of Default exists and the other conditions in Section 8.2 hereof are satisfied, any Reimbursement Obligation outstanding on account of a drawing under a Letter of Credit shall automatically convert into a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of such Reimbursement Obligation on the date such drawing occurs and the L/C Issuer shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender thereof, and each Lender shall thereupon fund its Base Rate Loan in such Borrowing in accordance with Sections 1.1 and 1.5 (except for any requirement that a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans be in a certain amount). If the conditions in Section 8.2 cannot be satisfied with respect to any drawing, then reimbursement of such drawing shall be made in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent in immediately available funds at the Administrative Agent's principal office in Chicago, Illinois or such other office as the Administrative Agent may designate in writing to the Borrower (who shall thereafter cause to be distributed to the L/C Issuer such amount(s) in like funds) by no later than 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the date when such drawing is paid or, if such drawing was paid after 11:30 a.m. (Chicago time), by the end of such day. If the Borrower does not make any such reimbursement payment on the date due and the Participating Lenders fund their participations therein in the manner set forth in Section 1.2(d) below, then all payments thereafter received by the Administrative Agent in discharge of any of the relevant Reimbursement Obligations shall be distributed in accordance with Section 1.2(d) below.
The Reimbursement Obligations.
"Reimbursement Obligation"
 
(d) Each Lender (other than the Lender then acting as L/C Issuer in issuing Letters of Credit), by its acceptance hereof, severally agrees to purchase from the L/C Issuer, and the L/C Issuer hereby agrees to sell to each such Lender (a ), an undivided percentage participating interest (a ), to the extent of its Percentage, in each Letter of Credit issued by, and each Reimbursement Obligation owed to, the L/C Issuer. Upon any failure by the Borrower to pay any Reimbursement Obligation at the time required on the date the related drawing is paid, as set forth in Section 1.2(c) above, or if the L/C Issuer is required at any time to return to the Borrower or to a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other Person any portion of any payment of any Reimbursement Obligation, each Participating Lender shall, not later than the Business Day it receives a certificate in the form of Exhibit A hereto from the L/C Issuer to such effect, if such certificate is received before 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time), or not later than the following Business Day, if such certificate is received after such time, pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer an amount equal to its Percentage of such unpaid or recaptured Reimbursement Obligation together with interest on such amount accrued from the date the related payment was made by the L/C Issuer to the date of such payment by such Participating Lender at a rate per annum equal to (i) from the date the related payment was made by the L/C Issuer to the date two Business Days after payment by such Participating Lender is due hereunder, (x) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in U.S. Dollars, the Federal Funds Rate for
The Participating Interests.
"Participating Lender"
"Participating Interest"
 
each such day and (y) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in an Alternative Currency, at the cost to the Administrative Agent of funding the amount it advanced to fund such Lender's payment, as determined by the Administrative Agent and (ii) from the date two Business Days after the date such payment is due from such Participating Lender to the date such payment is made by such Participating Lender, (x) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in U.S. Dollars, the Base Rate in effect for each such day and (y) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in an Alternative Currency, the rate established by Section 3.2(c) hereof for Eurocurrency Loans denominated in such currency. Each such Participating Lender shall thereafter be entitled to receive its Percentage of each payment received in respect of the relevant Reimbursement Obligation and of interest paid thereon, with the L/C Issuer retaining its Percentage thereof as a Lender hereunder.
 
The several obligations of the Participating Lenders to the L/C Issuer under this Section 1.2 shall be absolute, irrevocable and unconditional under any and all circumstances whatsoever (except, without limiting the Borrower's obligations under each Application, to the extent the Borrower is relieved from its obligation to reimburse the L/C Issuer for a drawing under a Letter of Credit because of the L/C Issuer's gross negligence or willful misconduct in determining that documents received under the Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof) and shall not be subject to any set-off, counterclaim or defense to payment which any Participating Lender may have or have had against the Borrower, the L/C Issuer, any other Lender or any other Person whatsoever.
 
(e) The Participating Lenders shall, to the extent of their respective Percentages, indemnify the L/C Issuer (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrower) against any cost, expense (including reasonable counsel fees and disbursements), claim, demand, action, loss or liability (except such as result from the L/C Issuer's gross negligence or willful misconduct) that the L/C Issuer may suffer or incur in connection with any Letter of Credit. The obligations of the Participating Lenders under this Section 1.2(e) and all other parts of this Section 1.2 shall survive termination of this Agreement and of all other L/C Documents.
Indemnification.
 
. (a) Each Base Rate Loan made or maintained by a Lender shall bear interest during each Interest Period it is outstanding (computed on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and actual days elapsed) on the unpaid principal amount thereof from the date such Loan is advanced, continued or created by conversion from a Eurocurrency Loan until maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise) at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans plus the Base Rate from time to time in effect, payable on the last day of its Interest Period and at maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise).
Section 1.3. Applicable Interest Rates
Base Rate Loans.
 
(b) Each Eurocurrency Loan made or maintained by a Lender shall bear interest during each Interest Period it is outstanding (computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and actual days elapsed) on the unpaid principal amount thereof from the date such Loan is advanced, continued, or created by conversion from a Base Rate until maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise) at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans plus the Adjusted LIBOR applicable for such Interest Period, payable on the last day of the Interest Period and at maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise), and, if the
Eurocurrency Loans.
 
applicable Interest Period is longer than three months, on each day occurring every three months after the commencement of such Interest Period. There shall not be more than ten Borrowings of Eurocurrency Loans outstanding at any one time.
 
(c) . The Administrative Agent shall determine each interest rate applicable to the Loans and the other Obligations, and a reasonable determination thereof by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive and binding except in the case of manifest error or willful misconduct. The Original Dollar Amount of each Eurocurrency Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency shall be determined or redetermined, as applicable, effective as of the first day of each Interest Period applicable to such Loan.
Rate Determinations
 
. Each Borrowing of Base Rate Loans shall be in an amount not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000, that a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans applied to pay a Reimbursement Obligation pursuant to Section 1.2(c) hereof shall be in an amount equal to such Reimbursement Obligation. Each Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans shall be in an amount not less than an Original Dollar Amount of $3,000,000 and, if greater, in units of the relevant currency as would have an Original Dollar Amount most closely approximating $500,000 or an integral multiple thereof.
Section 1.4. Minimum Borrowing Amounts for Revolving Loans
provided
 
(a) . The Borrower shall give notice to the Administrative Agent by no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) (i) at least four Business Days before the date on which the Borrower requests the Lenders to advance a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency, (ii) at least three Business Days before the date on which the Borrower requests the Lenders to advance a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars and (iii) at least one Business Day before the date on which the Borrower requests the Lenders to advance a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans. The Loans included in each Borrowing shall bear interest initially at the type of rate specified in such notice of a new Borrowing. Thereafter, the Borrower may from time to time elect to change or continue the type of interest rate borne by each Borrowing or, subject to Section 1.4's minimum amount requirement for each outstanding Borrowing, a portion thereof, as follows: (i) if such Borrowing is of Eurocurrency Loans, on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, the Borrower may continue all or part of such Borrowing as Eurocurrency Loans for an Interest Period or Interest Periods specified by the Borrower or, if such Eurocurrency Loan is denominated in U.S. Dollars, convert all or part of such Borrowing into Base Rate Loans and (ii) if such Borrowing is of Base Rate Loans, on any Business Day, the Borrower may (subject to the notice requirements set forth herein) convert all or part of such Borrowing into Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars or denominated in an Alternative Currency, in each case, for an Interest Period or Interest Periods specified by the Borrower. The Borrower shall give all such notices requesting the advance, continuation, or conversion of a Borrowing to the Administrative Agent by telephone or telecopy (which notice shall be irrevocable once given and, if by telephone, shall be promptly confirmed in writing). Notices of the continuation of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans for an additional Interest Period or of the conversion of part or all of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars into Base Rate Loans or of Base Rate Loans into Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars must be given by
Section 1.5. Manner of Borrowing, and Designating Interest Rates Applicable to, Revolving Loans.
Notice to the Administrative Agent
 
no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) at least three Business Days before the date of the requested continuation or conversion. Notices of the continuation of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency must be given no later than 12:00 noon (Chicago time) at least four Business Days before the requested continuation. All such notices concerning the advance, continuation, or conversion of a Borrowing shall specify the date of the requested advance, continuation or conversion of a Borrowing (which shall be a Business Day), the amount of the requested Borrowing to be advanced, continued, or converted, the type of Loans to comprise such new, continued or converted Borrowing and, if such Borrowing is to be comprised of Eurocurrency Loans, the currency and the Interest Period applicable thereto. The Borrower agrees that the Administrative Agent may rely on any such telephonic or telecopy notice given by any person it in good faith believes is an Authorized Representative of the Borrower without the necessity of independent investigation, and in the event any such notice by telephone conflicts with any written confirmation, such telephonic notice shall govern if the Administrative Agent has acted in reliance thereon.
 
(b) . Not later than 12:00 Noon (Chicago time) on the date the Administrative Agent receives any notice from the Borrower pursuant to Section 1.5(a) above, the Administrative Agent shall give telephonic or telecopy notice to each Lender. The Administrative Agent shall give notice to the Borrower and each Lender by like means of the interest rate applicable to each Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans and, if such Borrowing is denominated in an Alternative Currency, shall give notice by such means to the Borrower and each Lender of the Original Dollar Amount thereof.
Notice to the Lenders
 
(c) . Any outstanding Borrowing of Base Rate Loans shall, subject to Section 8.2 hereof, automatically be continued for an additional Interest Period on the last day of its then current Interest Period unless the Borrower has notified the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 1.5(a) that it intends to convert such Borrowing into a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans or notifies the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 3.5(a) that it intends to prepay such Borrowing. If the Borrower fails to give notice pursuant to Section 1.5(a) above of the continuation or conversion of any outstanding principal amount of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars before the last day of its then current Interest Period within the period required by Section 1.5(a) and has not notified the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 3.5 that it intends to prepay such Borrowing, such Borrowing shall automatically be converted into a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, subject to Section 8.2 hereof. If the Borrower fails to give notice pursuant to Section 1.5(a) above of the continuation of any outstanding principal amount of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency before the last day of its then current Interest Period within the period required by Section 1.5(a) and has not notified the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 3.5 that it intends to prepay such Borrowing, such Borrowing shall automatically be continued as a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans in the same Alternative Currency with an Interest Period of one month, subject to Section 8.2 hereof, including the application of Section 1.5 and the restrictions contained in the definition of Interest Period.
Borrower's Failure to Notify
 
(d) . Not later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) on the date of any requested advance of a new Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, and not later than
Disbursement of Revolving Loans
 
1:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the date of any requested advance of a new Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, subject to Section 8 hereof, each Lender shall make available its Loan comprising part of such Borrowing in funds immediately available at the principal office of the Administrative Agent in Chicago, Illinois, except that if such Borrowing is denominated in an Alternative Currency each Lender shall, subject to Section 8 hereof, make available its Loan comprising part of such Borrowing at such office as the Administrative Agent has previously specified in a notice to each Lender, in such funds as are then customary for the settlement of international transactions in such currency and no later than such local time as is necessary for such funds to be received and transferred to the Borrower for same day value on the date of the Borrowing. The Administrative Agent shall make the proceeds of each new Borrowing denominated in U.S. Dollars available to the Borrower at the Administrative Agent's principal office in Chicago, Illinois, by depositing such proceeds to the credit of the Borrower's operating account maintained with the Administrative Agent or as the Borrower and the Administrative Agent may otherwise agree, and the Administrative Agent shall make the proceeds of each new Borrowing denominated in an Alternative Currency available at such office as the Administrative Agent has previously agreed to with the Borrower, in each case in the type of funds received by the Administrative Agent from the Lenders.
 
(e) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have been notified by a Lender before the date on which such Lender is scheduled to make payment to the Administrative Agent of the proceeds of a Revolving Loan (which notice shall be effective upon receipt) that such Lender does not intend to make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such payment when due and the Administrative Agent may in reliance upon such assumption (but shall not be required to) make available to the Borrower the proceeds of the Loan to be made by such Lender and, if any Lender has not in fact made such payment to the Administrative Agent, such Lender shall, on demand, pay to the Administrative Agent the amount made available to the Borrower attributable to such Lender together with interest thereon in respect of each day during the period commencing on the date such amount was made available to the Borrower and ending on (but excluding) the date such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent at a rate per annum equal to (i) from the date the related advance was made by the Administrative Agent to the date two Business Days after payment by such Lender is due hereunder, at a rate per annum equal to the Federal Funds Rate or, in the case of a Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the cost to the Administrative Agent of funding the amount it advanced to fund such Lender's Loan, as reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent and (ii) from the date two Business Days after the date such payment is due from such Lender to the date such payment is made by such Lender, the Base Rate in effect for each such day or, in the case of a Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the rate established by Section 3.2(c) for Eurocurrency Loans denominated in such currency. If such amount is not received from such Lender by the Administrative Agent immediately upon demand, the Borrower will, on demand, repay to the Administrative Agent the proceeds of the Loan attributable to such Lender with interest thereon at a rate per annum equal to the interest rate applicable to the relevant Loan, but without such payment being considered a payment or prepayment of a Loan under Section 3.6 hereof, so that the Borrower will have no liability under such Section with respect to such payment; that such repayment by the Borrower shall not be deemed to release or otherwise limit any claims or rights that the Borrower may have against any Lender for the failure to fund any Loans hereunder.
Administrative Agent Reliance on Lender Funding.
provided,
 
S 2. T S L.
ECTION
HE
WING
INE
 
. Subject to all of the terms and conditions hereof, as part of the Revolving Credit, Harris N.A. () agrees to make loans in U.S. Dollars to the Borrower under the Swing Line () which shall not in the aggregate at any time outstanding exceed the Swing Line Sublimit. The Swing Line Loans may be availed of by the Borrower from time to time and borrowings thereunder may be repaid and used again during the period beginning on the Effective Date and ending on the Termination Date; that each Swing Loan must be repaid on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto. Each Swing Loan shall be in an amount not less than $500,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000.
Section 2.1. Swing Loans
"Harris"
"Swing Loans"
provided
 
. Each Swing Loan shall bear interest at a rate per annum equal to (i) the sum of the Base Rate plus the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans from time to time in effect (computed on the basis of a year 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, for the actual number of days elapsed) or (ii) Harris' Quoted Rate (computed on the basis of a year of 360 days for the actual number of days elapsed). Interest on each Swing Loan shall be due and payable on the last day of each Interest Period applicable thereto, and interest after maturity (whether by lapse of time, acceleration or otherwise) shall be due and payable upon demand.
Section 2.2. Interest on Swing Loans
 
. The Borrower shall give Harris prior notice (which may be written or oral) no later than 3:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the date upon which the Borrower requests that any Swing Loan be made, of the amount and date of such Swing Loan and the Interest Period selected therefor. Within 30 minutes after receiving such notice, Harris shall in its discretion quote an interest rate to the Borrower at which Harris would be willing to make such Swing Loan available to the Borrower for a given Interest Period (the rate so quoted for a given Interest Period being herein referred to as ). The Borrower acknowledges and agrees that the interest rate quote is given for immediate and irrevocable acceptance, and if the Borrower does not so immediately accept Harris' Quoted Rate for the full amount requested by the Borrower for such Swing Loan, Harris' Quoted Rate shall be deemed immediately withdrawn and such Swing Loan shall bear interest at the rate per annum determined by adding the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans to the Base Rate for the Interest Period selected by the Borrower. Subject to all of the terms and conditions hereof, the proceeds of such Swing Loan shall be made available to the Borrower on the date so requested at the offices of Harris in Chicago, Illinois. Anything contained in the foregoing to the contrary notwithstanding (i) the obligation of Harris to make Swing Loans shall be subject to all of the terms and conditions of this Agreement and (ii) Harris shall not be obligated to make more than one Swing Loan during any one day.
Section 2.3. Requests for Swing Loans
"Harris' Quoted Rate"
 
. In its sole and absolute discretion, Harris may at any time, on behalf of the Borrower (and the Borrower hereby irrevocably authorizes Harris to act on its behalf for such purpose) and with notice to the Borrower, request each Lender to make a Revolving Loan in the form of a Base Rate Loan in an amount equal to such Lender's Percentage of the amount of the Swing Loans outstanding on the date such notice is given. Unless any of the conditions of Section 8.2 are not fulfilled on such date, each Lender shall make the proceeds of its requested Revolving Loan available to Harris, in immediately available funds, at Harris'
Section 2.4.
Refunding Loans
 
principal office in Chicago, Illinois, before 12:00 Noon (Chicago time) on the Business Day following the day such notice is given. The proceeds of such Revolving Loans shall be immediately applied to repay such outstanding Swing Loans.
 
. If any Lender refuses or otherwise fails to make a Revolving Loan when requested by Harris pursuant to Section 2.4 above (because the conditions in Section 8.2 are not satisfied or otherwise), such Lender shall, by the time and in the manner such Revolving Loan was to have been funded to Harris, purchase from Harris an undivided participating interest in the relevant outstanding Swing Loans in an amount equal to its Percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Swing Loans that were to have been repaid with such Revolving Loans, no purchase of a participation in a Swing Loan bearing interest at Harris' Quoted Rate need be made until after expiration of the Interest Period applicable thereto. Each Lender that so purchases a participation in a Swing Loan shall thereafter be entitled to receive its Percentage of each payment of principal received on the relevant Swing Loan and of interest received thereon accruing from the date such Lender funded to Harris its participation in such Loan. The several obligations of the Lenders under this Section 2.5 shall be absolute, irrevocable and unconditional under any and all circumstances whatsoever and shall not be subject to any set-off, counterclaim or defense to payment which any Lender may have or have had against the Borrower, any other Lender or any other Person whatever. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such obligations shall not be affected by any Default or Event of Default or by any reduction or termination of the Revolving Credit Commitment of any Lender, and each payment made by an Lender under this Section 2.5 shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Section 2.5.
Participations
provided
 
S 3. G P A A L; R C C T I
ECTION
ENERAL
ROVISIONS
PPLICABLE
TO
LL
OANS
EVOLVING
REDIT
OMMITMENT
ERMINATIONS
AND
NCREASES
 
. As provided in Section 1.5(a) hereof in the case of Revolving Loans and in Section 2.3 in the case of Swing Loans, at the time of each request to advance, continue, or create by conversion a Borrowing of Loans (other than Base Rate Loans), the Borrower shall select an Interest Period applicable to such Loans from among the available options. The term means the period commencing on the date a Borrowing of Loans is advanced, continued, or created by conversion and ending: (a) in the case of Base Rate Loans, on the last day of the calendar quarter in which such Borrowing is advanced, continued, or created by conversion (or on the last day of the following quarter if such Loan is advanced, continued or created by conversion on the last day of a calendar quarter), (b) in the case of Eurocurrency Loans, one, two, three, or six months thereafter and (c) in the case of Swing Loans, on the date one to five days thereafter as mutually agreed by Harris and the Borrower; that:
Section 3.1. Interest Periods
"Interest Period"
provided, however,
 
(a) any Interest Period for a Borrowing of Revolving Loans consisting of Base Rate Loans that otherwise would end after the Termination Date shall end on the Termination Date;
 
(b) for any Borrowing of Revolving Loans consisting of Eurocurrency Loans or for any Swing Loan, the Borrower may not select an Interest Period that extends beyond the Termination Date;
 
(c) whenever the last day of any Interest Period would otherwise be a day that is not a Business Day, the last day of such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, provided that, if such extension would cause the last day of an Interest Period for a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans to occur in the following calendar month, the last day of such Interest Period shall be the immediately preceding Business Day; and
 
(d) for purposes of determining an Interest Period for a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, a month means a period starting on one day in a calendar month and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the next calendar month; provided, however, that if there is no numerically corresponding day in the month in which such an Interest Period is to end or if such an Interest Period begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month, then such Interest Period shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month in which such Interest Period is to end.
 
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, while any Event of Default exists or after acceleration, (x) the Borrower shall pay interest (after as well as before entry of judgment thereon to the extent permitted by law) on the principal amount of all Loans and Reimbursement Obligations at a rate per annum equal to, and (y) with respect to any outstanding Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall pay Letter of Credit fees at a rate per annum equal to:
Section 3.2. Default Rate
 
(a) for any Base Rate Loan or any Swing Loan bearing interest based on the Base Rate, the sum of two percent (2.0%) plus the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans plus the Base Rate from time to time in effect;
 
(b) for any Swing Loan bearing interest at Harris' Quoted Rate or any Eurocurrency Loan denominated in U.S. Dollars, the sum of two percent (2.0%) plus the rate of interest in effect thereon at the time of such default until the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto and, thereafter, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of two percent (2%) plus the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans plus the Base Rate from time to time in effect;
 
(c) for any Eurocurrency Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the sum of two percent (2.0%) the rate of interest in effect thereon at the time of such default until the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto and, thereafter, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of (i) the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans (ii) two percent (2.0%) (iii) the rate of interest per annum as determined in good faith by the Administrative Agent (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100,000 of 1%) at which overnight or weekend deposits (or, if such amount due remains unpaid more than three Business Days, then for such other period of time not longer than one month as the Administrative Agent may elect in good faith) of the
plus
plus
plus
 
relevant Alternative Currency for delivery in immediately available and freely transferable funds would be offered by the Administrative Agent to major banks in the interbank market upon request of such major banks for the applicable period as determined above and in an amount comparable to the unpaid principal amount of any such Eurocurrency Loan (or, if the Administrative Agent is not placing deposits in such currency in the interbank market, then the Administrative Agent's cost of funds in such currency for such period); and
 
(d) for any Reimbursement Obligation, the sum of two percent (2.0%) the amounts due under Section 1.2 with respect to such Reimbursement Obligation; and
plus
 
(e) for any Letter of Credit, the sum of two percent (2.0%) the letter of credit fee due under Section 4.1 with respect to such Letter of Credit;
plus
 
that in the absence of acceleration, any adjustments pursuant to this Section shall be made at the election of the Administrative Agent, acting at the request or with the consent of the Required Lenders, with written notice to the Borrower (which notice may be revoked at the direction of the Required Lenders notwithstanding any provision of Section 14.13 requiring the unanimous consent of the Lenders to reduce interest rates). While any Event of Default exists or after acceleration, interest shall be paid on demand of the Administrative Agent at the request or with the consent of the Required Lenders.
provided, however,
 
(a) The Revolving Loans made to the Borrower by a Lender shall be evidenced by a single promissory note of the Borrower issued to such Lender in the form of Exhibit B hereto. Each such promissory note is hereinafter referred to as a and collectively such promissory notes are referred to as the
Section 3.3. Notes.
Revolving Credit Notes.
"Revolving Credit Note"
"Revolving Credit Notes."
 
(b) All Swing Loans made to the Borrower by Harris shall be evidenced by a single promissory note of the Borrower issued to Harris in the form of Exhibit C hereto (the ).
Swing Line Note.
"Swing Line Note"
 
(c) Each Lender shall record on its books and records or on a schedule to the appropriate Note the amount and currency of each Loan advanced, continued, or converted by it, all payments of principal and interest and the principal balance from time to time outstanding thereon, the type of such Loan, and, for any Fixed Rate Loan, the Interest Period and interest rate applicable thereto. The record thereof, whether shown on such books and records of a Lender or on a schedule to any Note, shall be evidence as to all such matters; , that the failure of any Lender to record any of the foregoing or any error in any such record shall not limit or otherwise affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay all Loans made to it hereunder together with accrued interest thereon. At the request of any Lender and upon such Lender tendering to the Borrower the Note to be replaced, the Borrower shall furnish a new Note to such Lender to replace any outstanding Note, and at such time the first notation appearing on a schedule on the reverse side of, or attached to, such Note shall set forth the aggregate unpaid principal amount of all Loans, if any, then outstanding thereon.
Notes Generally.
prima
facie
provided, however
 
. Each Revolving Loan shall mature and become due and payable by the Borrower on the Termination Date. Each Swing Loan shall mature and become due and payable by the Borrower on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
Section 3.4. Maturity of Loans
 
The Borrower may prepay without premium or penalty and in whole or in part (but, if in part, then: (i) if such Borrowing is of Base Rate Loans, in an amount not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000 (except in the case of repayments of Base Rate Loans made under Section 1.2(c) which may be repaid in the full amount of such Base Rate Loans), (ii) if such Borrowing is of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars, in an amount not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000, (iii) if such Borrowing is denominated in an Alternative Currency, an amount for which the U.S. Dollar Equivalent is not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples most closely approximating $100,000 and (iv) in an amount such that the minimum amount required for a Borrowing pursuant to Section 1.4 hereof remains outstanding) any Borrowing of (x) Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars upon three Business Days' prior notice to the Administrative Agent, (y) Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency at any time upon four Business Days prior notice by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent, or (z) Base Rate Loans, at any time with notice delivered to the Administrative Agent no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) on the date of prepayment, such prepayment to be made by the payment of the principal amount to be prepaid and accrued interest thereon to the date fixed for prepayment and, in the case of Eurocurrency Loans, any compensation required by Section 3.6 hereof. Swing Loans bearing interest at Harris' Quoted Rate may only be paid on the last day of the Interest Period then applicable to such Loans. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise each Lender of any such prepayment notice it receives from the Borrower. Any amount of Loans paid or prepaid before the Termination Date may, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, be borrowed, repaid and borrowed again.
Section 3.5. Prepayments.
 
. If any Lender shall incur any loss, cost or expense (including, without limitation, any loss (including loss of profit), cost or expense incurred by reason of the liquidation or re-employment of deposits or other funds acquired by such Lender to fund or maintain any Fixed Rate Loan or the relending or reinvesting of such deposits or amounts paid or prepaid to such Lender as a result of:
Section 3.6. Funding Indemnity for Fixed Rate Loans
 
(a) any payment, prepayment or conversion of a Fixed Rate Loan on a date prior to the last day of its Interest Period,
 
(b) any failure (because of a failure to meet the conditions of Section 8 or otherwise) by the Borrower to borrow or continue a Fixed Rate Loan, or to convert a Base Rate Loan into a Fixed Rate Loan, on the date specified in a notice given pursuant to Section 1.5(a) or 2.3 or established pursuant to Section 1.5(c) hereof, or
 
(c) any acceleration of the maturity of a Fixed Rate Loan as a result of the occurrence of any Event of Default hereunder,
 
then, upon the demand of such Lender, the Borrower shall pay to such Lender such amount as will reimburse such Lender for such loss, cost or expense. If any Lender makes such a claim for
 
compensation, it shall provide to the Borrower, with a copy to the Administrative Agent, a certificate executed by an officer of such Lender setting forth the amount of such loss, cost or expense in reasonable detail and such certificate shall be conclusive if reasonably determined.
 
. The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time, upon five Business Days' prior written notice to the Administrative Agent, to terminate the Revolving Credit Commitments without premium or penalty, in whole or in part, any partial termination to be (i) in an amount not less than $5,000,000, and (ii) allocated ratably among the Lenders in proportion to their respective Percentages, that the Revolving Credit Commitments may not be reduced to an amount less than the sum of the Original Dollar Amount of all Revolving Loans and Swing Loans and the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of all L/C Obligations then outstanding. Any termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments below the L/C Sublimit or Swing Line Sublimit then in effect shall reduce the L/C Sublimit and Swing Line Sublimit, as applicable, to an amount equal to the reduced aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments. The Administrative Agent shall give prompt notice to each Lender of any such termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments. Any termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments pursuant to this Section 3.7 may not be reinstated.
Section 3.7. Commitment Terminations
provided
 
. The Borrower may from time to time, on any Business Day after the Effective Date and prior to the Termination Date so long as no Event of Default exists, increase the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments by delivering a Commitment Amount Increase Request at least five Business Days prior to the desired effective date of such increase (the ) identifying an additional Lender (or additional Revolving Credit Commitments for existing Lender(s)) and the amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment (or additional amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment(s)); that (i) the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments shall not at any time exceed $550,000,000, and (ii) any increase of the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments shall be in an amount not less than $25,000,000. The effective date of any Commitment Amount Increase shall be agreed upon by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent. Upon the effectiveness thereof, the new Lender(s) (or, if applicable, existing Lender(s)) shall advance Revolving Loans, or the existing Lenders shall make such assignments (which assignments shall not be subject to the requirements set forth in Section 14.12) of the outstanding Loans and L/C Obligations to the Lenders providing the Commitment Amount Increase so that, after giving effect to such assignments, each Lender (including the Lenders providing the Commitment Amount Increase) will hold Loans and L/C Obligations equal to its Percentage of all outstanding Loans and L/C Obligations. It shall be a condition to such effectiveness that (i) either no Eurocurrency Loans be outstanding on the date of such effectiveness or the Borrower pays any applicable breakage cost under Section 3.6 incurred by any Lender resulting from the repayment of its Loans and (ii) the Borrower shall not have terminated any portion of the Revolving Credit Commitments pursuant to Section 3.6 hereof. The Borrower agrees to pay any reasonable expenses of the Administrative Agent relating to any Commitment Amount Increase. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no Lender shall have any obligation to increase its Revolving Credit Commitment and no Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment shall be increased without its consent thereto, and each Lender may at its option, unconditionally and without cause, decline to increase its Revolving Credit Commitment.
Section 3.8. Increase in Commitments
"Commitment Amount Increase"
provided, however,
 
S 4. F; P A P.
ECTION
EES
LACE
AND
PPLICATION
OF
AYMENTS
 
. (a) For the period from the Effective Date to but not including the Termination Date, the Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Lenders in accordance with their Percentages, a facility fee accruing at the rate per annum equal to the Applicable Margin for Facility Fee on the average daily amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments whether or not in use. Such facility fee shall be payable quarterly in arrears on the last day of each calendar quarter in each year (commencing December 31, 2005) and on the Termination Date, unless the Revolving Credit Commitments are terminated in whole on an earlier date, in which event the fee for the period to but not including the date of such termination shall be paid in whole on the date of such termination.
Section 4.1. Fees
Facility Fee.
 
(b) On the date of issuance or extension, or increase in the amount, of any Letter of Credit pursuant to Section 1.2 hereof, the Borrower shall pay to the L/C Issuer for its own account a fronting fee equal to 1/8 of 1% (0.125%) of the face amount of (or of the increase in the face amount of) such Letter of Credit. Quarterly in arrears, on the last day of each calendar quarter (commencing December 31, 2005) the Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Lenders in accordance with their Percentages, a letter of credit fee at a rate per annum equal to the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans in effect during each day of such quarter applied to the daily average face amount of Letters of Credit outstanding during such quarter. In addition, the Borrower shall pay to the L/C Issuer for its own account the L/C Issuer's standard issuance, drawing, negotiation, amendment, and other administrative fees for each Letter of Credit (whether a Commercial Letter of Credit or Standby Letter of Credit) as established by the L/C Issuer from time to time. All the standard fees set forth in the preceding sentence shall be retained by the L/C Issuer for its own account (such standard fees referred to in the clauses (i) and (ii) of the preceding sentence may be established by the L/C Issuer from time to time).
Letter of Credit Fees.
 
(c) On the Effective Date, the Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, the up front fees due to the Lenders as heretofore agreed.
Closing Fees.
 
(d) . The Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent the fees agreed to between the Administrative Agent and the Borrower pursuant to a separate written letter agreement dated as of July 29, 2005.
Administrative Agent Fees
 
(e) . All fees payable under this Section 4.1 shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days for the actual number of days elapsed.
Fee Calculations
 
. All payments of principal of and interest on the Loans and the Reimbursement Obligations, and of all other Obligations payable by the Borrower under this Agreement, shall be made by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent by no later than 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the due date thereof at the principal office of the Administrative Agent in Chicago, Illinois (or such other location in the State of Illinois as the Administrative Agent may designate to the Borrower) or, if such payment is on a Reimbursement Obligation, no later than provided by Section 1.3(c) hereof or, if such payment is to be made in an Alternative Currency, no later than 12:00 noon local time at the place of
Section 4.2. Place and Application of Payments
 
payment to such office as the Administrative Agent has previously specified in a notice to the Borrower for the benefit of the Lender or Lenders entitled thereto. Any payments received after such time shall be deemed to have been received by the Administrative Agent on the next Business Day. All such payments shall be made (i) in U.S. Dollars, in immediately available funds at the place of payment, or (ii) in the case of amounts payable hereunder in an Alternative Currency, in such Alternative Currency in such funds then customary for the settlement of international transactions in such currency, in each case without set-off or counterclaim. The Administrative Agent will promptly thereafter cause to be distributed like funds relating to the payment of principal or interest on Loans or commitment fees ratably to the Lenders, in each case to be applied in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
 
S 5. G F A.
ECTION
UARANTIES
AND
URTHER
SSURANCES
 
. The payment and performance of the Obligations shall at all times be guaranteed by each direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary of the Borrower (each, a ) pursuant to Section 13 hereof or pursuant to one or more Additional Guarantor Supplements delivered to the Administrative Agent, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time (individually, a and, collectively, the ).
Section 5.1. Guaranties
"Guarantor"
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
 
The Borrower agrees that it shall, and shall cause each Domestic Subsidiary to, from time to time at the request of the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, execute and deliver such documents and do such acts and things as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders may reasonably request in order to provide for the Guaranties contemplated by this Section 5. In the event the Borrower or any Subsidiary forms or acquires any direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary after the date hereof or any Subsidiary becomes a direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary after the date hereof, the Borrower shall cause such direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary to execute a Guaranty within 50 days after the end of the fiscal quarter of the Borrower in which such Subsidiary became a Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary, and the Borrower shall also deliver to the Administrative Agent, or cause such direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary to deliver to the Administrative Agent, at the Borrower's cost and expense, such other instruments, documents, certificates, and opinions reasonably required by the Administrative Agent in connection therewith.
Section 5.2. Further Assurances.
 
S 6. D; I.
ECTION
EFINITIONS
NTERPRETATION
 
. The following terms when used herein have the following meanings:
Section 6.1. Definitions
 
is defined in Section 10.4(b) hereof.
"Account"
 
means an agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit G or such other form acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
"Additional Guarantor Supplement"
 
means a rate per annum determined in accordance with the following formula:
"Adjusted LIBOR"
 
 
means, for any Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, the daily average for the applicable Interest Period of the maximum rate, expressed as a decimal, at which reserves (including, without limitation, any supplemental, marginal and emergency reserves) are imposed during such Interest Period by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) on , as defined in such Board's Regulation D (or in respect of any other category of liabilities that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Eurocurrency Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets that include loans by non-United States offices of any Lender to United States residents), subject to any amendments of such reserve requirement by such Board or its successor, taking into account any transitional adjustments thereto. For purposes of this definition, the Eurocurrency Loans shall be deemed to be as defined in Regulation D without benefit or credit for any prorations, exemptions or offsets under Regulation D. means, for an Interest Period for a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, (a) the LIBOR Index Rate for such Interest Period, if such rate is available, and (b) if the LIBOR Index Rate cannot be determined, the average rate of interest per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100 of 1%) at which deposits in U.S. Dollars or the relevant Alternative Currency, as appropriate, in immediately available funds are offered to the Administrative Agent at 11:00 a.m. (London, England time) two Business Days before the beginning of such Interest Period by major banks in the interbank eurocurrency market for delivery on the first day of and for a period equal to such Interest Period in an amount equal or comparable to the principal amount of the Eurocurrency Loan scheduled to be made by the Administrative Agent as part of such Borrowing. means, for any Interest Period, the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher one hundred-thousandth of a percentage point) for deposits in U.S. Dollars or the relevant Alternative Currency, as appropriate, for a period equal to such Interest Period, which appears on the appropriate Telerate Page as of 11:00 a.m. (London, England time) on the day two Business Days before the commencement of such Interest Period. means the display designated on the Telerate Service (or such other service as may be nominated by the British Bankers' Association as the information vendor for the purpose of displaying British Bankers' Association Interest Settlement Rates for deposits of U.S. Dollar (currently displayed on Page 3750) or of the relevant Alternative Currency.
"Eurocurrency Reserve Percentage"
"eurocurrency liabilities"
"eurocurrency liabilities"
"LIBOR"
"LIBOR Index Rate"
"Telerate Page"
 
means Harris N.A. in its capacity as administrative agent hereunder for the Lenders and any successor pursuant to Section 12.7 hereof.
"Administrative Agent"
 
means any Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by, or under direct or indirect common control with, another Person. A Person shall be deemed to control another Person for purposes of this definition if such Person possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct, or cause the direction of, the management and policies of the other Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, common directors, trustees or officers, by
"Affiliate"
 
contract or otherwise; that, in any event for purposes of this definition, any Person that owns, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of the securities having the ordinary voting power for the election of directors or governing body of a corporation or 10% or more of the partnership or other ownership interests of any other Person (other than as a limited partner of such other Person) will be deemed to control such corporation or other Person.
provided
 
means this Multicurrency Credit Agreement, as the same may be amended, modified, restated or supplemented from time to time pursuant to the terms hereof.
"Agreement"
 
means any of euros, pounds sterling, and Japanese yen, and any other currency approved by the Administrative Agent, in each case for so long as such currency is readily available to all the Lenders and is freely transferable and freely convertible to U.S. Dollars and the Dow Jones Telerate Service or Reuters Monitor Money Rates Service (or any successor to either) reports a LIBOR for such currency for interest periods of one, two, three and six calendar months; provided that if any Lender provides written notice to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) that any currency control or other exchange regulations are imposed in the country in which any such Alternative Currency is issued and that in the reasonable opinion of such Lender funding a Loan in such currency is impractical, then such currency shall cease to be an Alternative Currency hereunder until such time as all the Lenders reinstate such country's currency as an Alternative Currency.
"Alternative Currency"
 
means, with respect to Loans, Reimbursement Obligations, and the facility fees and letter of credit fees payable under Section 4.1 hereof until the first Pricing Date, the rates per annum shown opposite Level I below, and thereafter from one Pricing Date to the next, the Applicable Margin means the rates per annum determined in accordance with the following schedule:
"Applicable Margin"
 
 
For purposes hereof, the term means, for any fiscal quarter of the Borrower ending on or after September 30, 2005, the date on which the Administrative Agent is in receipt of the Borrower's most recent financial statements (and, in the case of the year-end financial statements, audit report) for the fiscal quarter then ended, pursuant to Section 9.4 hereof. The
"Pricing Date"
 
Applicable Margin shall be established based on the Cash Flow Leverage Ratio for the most recently completed fiscal quarter and the Applicable Margin established on a Pricing Date shall become retroactively effective as of the first day of such fiscal quarter and shall remain in effect until the next Pricing Date, subject to retroactive adjustment for the period from the last day of such fiscal quarter to such Pricing Date pursuant to this section. If the Borrower has not delivered its financial statements by the date such financial statements (and, in the case of the year-end financial statements, audit report) are required to be delivered under Section 9.4 hereof, until such financial statements and audit report are delivered, the Applicable Margin shall be the highest Applicable Margin ( the Cash Flow Leverage Ratio shall be deemed to be greater than 2.0 to 1.0). If the Borrower subsequently delivers such financial statements before the next Pricing Date, the Applicable Margin established by such late delivered financial statements shall take effect from the date of delivery until the next Pricing Date, subject to retroactive adjustment as provided above. In all other circumstances, the Applicable Margin established by such financial statements shall be in effect from the first day of the fiscal quarter in which such Pricing Date occurs and which is immediately after the end of the fiscal quarter covered by such financial statements until the next redetermination as set forth above. Each determination of the Applicable Margin made by the Administrative Agent in accordance with the foregoing shall be conclusive and binding on the Borrower and the Lenders if reasonably determined.
i.e.,
 
is defined in Section 1.2(b) hereof.
"Application"
 
means those persons shown on the list of officers provided by the Borrower pursuant to Section 8.1(f) hereof, or on any update of such list provided by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent, or any further or different officer of the Borrower so named by any Authorized Representative of the Borrower in a written notice to the Administrative Agent.
"Authorized Representative"
 
means for any day the greater of:
"Base Rate"
 
(i) the rate of interest announced by the Administrative Agent from time to time as its prime commercial rate, or equivalent, as in effect on such day, with any change in the Base Rate resulting from a change in said prime commercial rate to be effective as of the date of the relevant change in said prime commercial rate; or
 
(ii) the sum of (x) the rate determined by the Administrative Agent to be the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100 of 1%) of the rates per annum quoted to the Administrative Agent at approximately 10:00 a.m. (Chicago time) (or as soon thereafter as is practicable) on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, on the immediately preceding Business Day) by two or more Federal funds brokers selected by the Administrative Agent for the sale to the Administrative Agent at face value of Federal funds in an amount comparable to the principal amount owed to the Administrative Agent for which such rate is being determined, plus (y) 1/2 of 1%.
 
means a Revolving Loan bearing interest prior to maturity at a rate specified in Section 1.3(a) hereof.
"Base Rate Loan"
 
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Borrower"
 
means the total of Loans of a single type advanced, continued for an additional Interest Period, or converted from a different type into such type by the Lenders on a single date and for a single Interest Period. Borrowings of Revolving Loans are made and maintained ratably from each of the Lenders according to their Percentages. A Borrowing is: on the day Lenders advance funds comprising such Borrowing to the Borrower; on the date a new Interest Period for the same type of Loans commences for such Borrowing; and when such Borrowing is changed from one type of Loan to another, all as requested by the Borrower pursuant to Section 1.5(a) hereof.
"Borrowing"
"advanced"
"continued"
"converted"
 
means any day other than a Saturday or Sunday on which Lenders are not authorized or required to close in Chicago, Illinois and, if the applicable Business Day relates to the borrowing or payment of a Eurocurrency Loan, on which banks are dealing in deposits in U.S. Dollars in the interbank market in London, England and Nassau, Bahamas and, if the applicable Business Day relates to the borrowing or payment of a Eurocurrency Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, on which banks and foreign exchange markets are open for business in the city where disbursements of or payments on such Loan are to be made and, if such Alternative Currency is the euro or any national currency of a nation that is a member of the European Economic and Monetary Union, which is a TARGET Settlement Day.
"Business Day"
 
means any lease of Property which, in accordance with GAAP, would be required to be capitalized on the balance sheet of the lessee.
"Capital Lease"
 
means the amount of the liability shown on the balance sheet of any Person in respect of a Capital Lease as determined in accordance with GAAP.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation"
 
means, as of any time the same is to be determined, the ratio of (a) Funded Debt as of the last day of the most recent four fiscal quarters then ended minus Excess Cash as of the last day of the same such period to (b) EBITDA for the same most recent four fiscal quarters then ended. For purposes of computing the Cash Flow Leverage Ratio for any period which includes the first quarter of the Borrower's 2005 fiscal year, EBITDA shall be computed by adding back to Net Income (i) the $131,000,000 charge to the Borrower's Net Income taken in the first quarter of the Borrower's 2005 fiscal year in connection with the judgment in the State of Utah litigation involving Headwaters Incorporated and (ii) the $35,000,000 charge to the Borrower's Net Income taken in such fiscal quarter in connection with the settlement to resolve state investigations relating to contingent commission arrangements.
"Cash Flow Leverage Ratio"
 
means and includes any of the following:
"Change in Control"
 
(a) any person or group (within the meaning of Sections 13(d)(2) and 14(d)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) is or becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of 50% or more of the Voting Stock of the Borrower; or
 
(b) during any period of twelve consecutive calendar months, individuals who at the beginning of such period constituted the Board of Directors of the Borrower,
 
together with any new directors whose election by the Board of Directors of the Borrower or nomination for election by the Borrower's stockholders was approved by at least two-thirds of the directors then still in office who either were directors at the beginning of the period or whose election was previously so approved, cease for any reason other than death or disability to constitute at least a majority of the directors then in office; or
 
(c) the stockholders of the Borrower shall approve the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Borrower or any merger, consolidation, issuance of securities or purchase of assets, the result of which would be the occurrence of any event described in clause (a) or (b) above.
 
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any successor statute thereto.
"Code"
 
means a Letter of Credit that finances a commercial transaction by paying part or all of the purchase price for goods against delivery of a document of title covering such goods and any other required documentation.
"Commercial Letter of Credit"
 
is defined in Section 3.8 hereof.
"Commitment Amount Increase"
 
means a Commitment Amount Increase Request in the form of Exhibit D hereto.
"Commitment Amount Increase Request"
 
means a written certificate in the form of Exhibit E hereto.
"Compliance Certificate"
 
means, with respect to the Borrower, all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades and businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control which, together with the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
"Controlled Group"
 
means the advancing of any Loan, the continuation of or conversion into a Eurocurrency Loan, or the issuance of, or extension of the expiration date or increase in the amount of, any Letter of Credit.
"Credit Event"
 
means any event or condition the occurrence of which would, with the passage of time or the giving of notice, or both, constitute an Event of Default.
"Default"
 
means Barclays Bank PLC.
"Documentation Agent"
 
means each Subsidiary of the Borrower which is organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
 
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, Net Income for such period plus all amounts deducted in arriving at such Net Income amount in respect of (a) Interest Expense for such period and (b) federal, state, and local income taxes for such period.
"EBIT"
 
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, EBIT for such period plus all amounts properly charged for depreciation of fixed assets and amortization of intangible assets during such period on the books of such Person and its subsidiaries.
"EBITDA"
 
means the date on which the Administrative Agent has received signed counterpart signature pages of this Agreement from each of the signatories (or, in the case of a Lender, confirmation that such Lender has executed such a counterpart and dispatched it for delivery to the Administrative Agent) and the documents required by Section 8.1 hereof.
"Effective Date"
 
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, or any successor statute thereto.
"ERISA"
 
means a Revolving Loan bearing interest prior to maturity at the rate specified in Section 1.3(b) hereof.
"Eurocurrency Loan"
 
means any of the events or circumstances specified in Section 10.1 hereof.
"Event of Default"
 
means, as of any date the same is to be determined, all cash on the books of the Borrower and its Domestic Subsidiaries which is maintained in accounts located in the United States of America and which is in excess of $25,000,000 excluding restricted cash.
"Excess Cash"
 
means that certain Credit Agreement dated as of July 21, 2003 among the Borrower, the guarantors party thereto, Harris N.A. (successor by merger with Harris Trust and Savings Bank), individually and as agent, and the other lenders party thereto, as amended from time to time.
"Existing Credit Agreement"
 
means the outstanding letters of credit issued by Harris pursuant to the Existing Credit Agreement prior to the date hereof, all of which are listed and described on Schedule 1.2(a) hereof.
"Existing L/Cs"
 
means the fluctuating interest rate per annum described in part (x) of clause (ii) of the definition of Base Rate.
"Federal Funds Rate"
 
means Swing Loans bearing interest at Harris' Quoted Rate and Eurocurrency Loans, unless the context in which such term is used shall otherwise require.
"Fixed Rate Loans"
 
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the aggregate of all Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis at such time all Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of any other Person which is directly or indirectly guaranteed by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or which the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries has agreed (contingently or otherwise) to purchase or otherwise acquire or in respect of which the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries has otherwise assured a creditor against loss.
"Funded Debt"
plus
 
means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect from time to time, applied by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a basis consistent with the preparation of the Borrower's most recent financial statements furnished to the Lenders pursuant to Section 7.5 hereof.
"GAAP"
 
is defined in Section 5.1 hereof.
"Guarantor"
 
is defined in Section 5.1 hereof.
"Guaranty"
 
is defined in Section 2.1 hereof.
"Harris"
 
is defined in Section 2.3 hereof.
"Harris' Quoted Rate"
 
means for any Person (without duplication) (i) all indebtedness created, assumed or incurred in any manner by such Person representing money borrowed (including by the issuance of debt securities), (ii) all indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than (a) trade accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which are not more than 90 days past due and (b) obligations to make earn-out payments in cash, debt instruments or preferred stock, pursuant to acquisitions occurring prior to the date of this Agreement or permitted under this Agreement), (iii) all indebtedness secured by any Lien upon Property of such Person, whether or not such Person has assumed or become liable for the payment of such indebtedness, (iv) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person and (v) all obligations of such Person on or with respect to letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and other extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money, excluding, in each case, indebtedness which is non-recourse to such Person and its subsidiaries.
"Indebtedness for Borrowed Money"
 
means, as of any time the same is to be determined, the ratio of (a) EBIT for the four fiscal quarter period most recently ended to (b) Interest Expense during the same such four fiscal quarter period. For purposes of computing the Interest Coverage Ratio for any period which includes the first quarter of the Borrower's 2005 fiscal year, EBIT shall be computed by adding back to Net Income (i) the $131,000,000 charge to the Borrower's Net Income taken in the first quarter of the Borrower's 2005 fiscal year in connection with the judgment in the State of Utah litigation involving Headwaters Incorporated and (ii) the $35,000,000 charge to the Borrower's Net Income taken in such fiscal quarter in connection with the settlement to resolve state investigations relating to contingent commission arrangements.
"Interest Coverage Ratio"
 
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to Capitalized Lease Obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP excluding incremental interest charges resulting from consolidation under FIN 46.
"Interest Expense"
 
is defined in Section 3.1 hereof.
"Interest Period"
 
means the Letters of Credit, any draft or other document presented in connection with a drawing thereunder, the Applications and this Agreement.
"L/C Documents"
 
means Harris N.A. or any other Lender or Lenders selected by the Borrower and reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
"L/C Issuer"
 
means the U.S. Dollars Equivalent of the aggregate undrawn face amounts of all outstanding Letters of Credit and all unpaid Reimbursement Obligations.
"L/C Obligations"
 
means $125,000,000, as such amount may be reduced pursuant to the terms hereof.
"L/C Sublimit"
 
means and includes each financial institution party hereto and the other financial institutions from time to time party to this Agreement, including each assignee Lender pursuant to Section 14.12 hereof.
"Lender"
 
is defined in Section 11.4 hereof.
"Lending Office"
 
is defined in Section 1.2(a) hereof.
"Letter of Credit"
 
means any mortgage, lien, security interest, pledge, charge or encumbrance of any kind in respect of any Property, including the interests of a vendor or lessor under any conditional sale, Capital Lease or other title retention arrangement.
"Lien"
 
means and includes each Revolving Loan and Swing Loan; and the term of Loan refers to its status as a Revolving Loan or a Swing Loan, or, if a Revolving Loan, to its status as a Base Rate Loan or Eurocurrency Loan.
"Loan"
"type"
 
means this Agreement, the Notes, the Applications, the Letters of Credit, the Guaranties and each other instrument or document to be delivered hereunder or thereunder or otherwise in connection therewith.
"Loan Documents"
 
means, with respect to any Subsidiary, a Subsidiary whose assets represent more than 5% of the assets of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
"Material"
 
means (a) a material adverse change in, or material adverse effect upon, the operations, business, Property, condition (financial or otherwise) or prospects of the Borrower or of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) a material impairment of the ability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole to perform their obligations under this Agreement, the Notes, the Applications, the Letters of Credit or the Guaranties, as applicable, or (c) a material adverse effect upon the legality, validity, binding effect or enforceability against the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole of this Agreement, the Notes, the Applications, the Letters of Credit or the Guaranties, as applicable, or the rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or the Lenders thereunder.
"Material Adverse Effect"
 
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the net income (or net loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period as computed on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, and, without limiting the foregoing, after deduction from gross income of all expenses and reserves, including reserves for all taxes on or measured by income.
"Net Income"
 
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the total shareholders' equity (including capital stock, additional paid-in capital and retained earnings after deducting treasury stock, but excluding minority interests in Subsidiaries) which would appear on the balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that in computing Net Worth, the Borrower may exclude the effect of stock repurchases aggregating not more than $300,000,000 after the date hereof so long as such stock repurchases are approved by the Borrower's board of directors.
"Net Worth"
provided, however,
 
means any Subsidiary that is not a Guarantor.
"Non-Guarantor Subsidiary"
 
means and includes Revolving Credit Notes and the Swing Line Note, unless the context in which such term is used shall otherwise require.
"Notes"
 
means all obligations of the Borrower to pay principal and interest on the Loans and the L/C Obligations, all fees and charges payable hereunder, and all other payment obligations of the Borrower, and either of them, arising under or in relation to any Loan Document, in each case whether now existing or hereafter arising, due or to become due, direct or indirect, absolute or contingent, and howsoever evidenced, held or acquired.
"Obligations"
 
means the amount of any Obligations denominated in U.S. Dollars and, in relation to any Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the U.S. Dollars Equivalent of such Loan on the day it is advanced or continued for an Interest Period.
"Original Dollar Amount"
 
means the rate of interest per annum as determined by the Administrative Agent (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest whole multiple of one-sixteenth of one percent (1/16 of 1%)) at which overnight or weekend deposits of the appropriate currency for delivery in immediately available and freely transferable funds would be offered by the Administrative Agent to major banks in the interbank market upon request of such major banks for the applicable period and in an amount comparable to the unpaid principal amount of the drawing (or, if the Administrative Agent is not placing deposits in such currency in the interbank market, then the Administrative Agent's cost of funds in such currency for such period).
"Overnight Eurocurrency Rate"
 
is defined in Section 1.2(d) hereof.
"Participating Lender"
 
means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any Person succeeding to any or all of its functions under ERISA.
"PBGC"
 
means, for each Lender, the percentage of the Revolving Credit Commitments represented by such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment or, if the Revolving Credit Commitments have been terminated, the percentage held by such Lender (including
"Percentage"
 
through participation interests in L/C Obligations outstanding under the Revolving Credit and Swing Loans) of the aggregate principal amount of all Revolving Loans, Swing Loans and L/C Obligations then outstanding.
 
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization or any other entity or organization, including a government or any agency or political subdivision thereof.
"Person"
 
means any employee pension benefit plan covered by Title IV of ERISA or subject to the minimum funding standards under Section 412 of the Code that either (i) is maintained by a member of the Controlled Group for employees of a member of the Controlled Group or (ii) is maintained pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or any other arrangement under which more than one employer makes contributions and to which a member of the Controlled Group is then making or accruing an obligation to make contributions or has within the preceding five plan years made contributions.
"Plan"
 
means any interest in any kind of property or asset, whether real, personal or mixed, or tangible or intangible.
"Property"
 
is defined in Section 1.2(c) hereof.
"Reimbursement Obligation"
 
means, as of the date of determination thereof, Lenders holding at least 51% of the Percentages.
"Required Lenders"
 
means, with respect to the Borrower, each or any of its president, chief financial officer, treasurer, chief accounting officer or general counsel.
"Responsible Officer"
 
means, with respect to any Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency, (a) the date of issuance thereof, (b) the date of each amendment thereto having the effect of increasing the amount thereof, (c) the last day of each calendar month, and (d) each additional date as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders shall specify.
"Revaluation Date"
 
means the credit facility for making Revolving Loans and issuing Letter of Credit described in Sections 1.1 and 1.2 hereof.
"Revolving Credit"
 
means, as to any Lender, the obligation of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to participate in Swing Loans and Letters of Credit issued for the account of the Borrower hereunder in an aggregate principal or face amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the amount set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule I attached hereto, as the same may be reduced or modified at any time or from time to time pursuant to the terms hereof. The Borrower and the Lenders acknowledge and agree that the Revolving Credit Commitments of the Lenders aggregate $450,000,000 on the date hereof.
"Revolving Credit Commitment"
 
is defined in Section 3.3(a) hereof.
"Revolving Credit Note"
 
is defined in Section 1.1 hereof.
"Revolving Loan"
 
means the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission or any successor thereto.
"SEC"
 
is defined in Section 14.7 hereof.
"Set-Off"
 
means any claim (other than those disclosed in the Borrower's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 or the Borrower's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2005) arising out of, or any action, suit or proceeding filed or threatened against the Borrower or any Subsidiary based on, allegations relating to contingent commissions or related practices provided the aggregate amount of the liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries with respect to such claims, actions, suits and proceedings does not exceed $100,000,000.
"Specified Claim"
 
means a Letter of Credit that is not a Commercial Letter of Credit.
"Standby Letter of Credit"
 
means, as to any particular parent corporation, any corporation or other Person more than 50% of the Voting Stock of which is at the time directly or indirectly owned by such parent corporation and/or one or more corporations which are themselves subsidiaries of such parent corporation. The term shall mean a subsidiary of the Borrower.
"subsidiary"
"Subsidiary"
 
means the credit facility for making one or more Swing Loans described in Section 2.1 hereof.
"Swing Line"
 
is defined in Section 3.3(b) hereof.
"Swing Line Note"
 
means $30,000,000, as such amount may be reduced pursuant to the terms hereof.
"Swing Line Sublimit"
 
is defined in Section 2.1 hereof.
"Swing Loans"
 
means Citibank, N.A.
"Syndication Agent"
 
means any day on which the Trans-European Automated Real-Time Gross Settlement Express Transfer (TARGET) System is open.
"TARGET Settlement Day"
 
means October 4, 2010.
"Termination Date"
 
means, for any Plan at any time, the amount (if any) by which the present value of all vested nonforfeitable accrued benefits under such Plan exceeds the fair market value of all Plan assets allocable to such benefits, all determined as of the then most recent valuation date for such Plan, but only to the extent that such excess represents a potential liability of a member of the Controlled Group to the PBGC or the Plan under Title IV of ERISA.
"Unfunded Vested Liabilities"
 
means (a) the amount of any Obligation or Letter of Credit denominated in U.S. Dollars, (b) in relation to any Obligation or Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency, the amount of U.S. Dollars which would be realized by converting such Alternative Currency into U.S. Dollars at the exchange rate quoted to the Administrative Agent,
"U.S. Dollar Equivalent"
 
at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) three Business Days prior (i) to the date on which a computation thereof is required to be made, and (ii) in the case of L/C Obligations, on any Revaluation Date, in each case, by major banks in the interbank foreign exchange market for the purchase of U.S. Dollars for such Alternative Currency.
 
and each means the lawful currency of the United States of America.
"U.S. Dollars"
"$"
 
means, with respect to any Person, the capital stock of any class or classes or other equity interests (however designated) having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or similar governing body of such Person, other than stock or other equity interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency.
"Voting Stock"
 
means a , as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA.
"Welfare Plan"
"welfare plan"
 
means, with respect to any Subsidiary, a Subsidiary of which all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (other than directors' qualifying shares as required by law) or other equity interests are owned by the Borrower and/or one or more Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries of the Borrower within the meaning of this definition.
"Wholly-Owned"
 
. The foregoing definitions are equally applicable to both the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. The words , , and and words of like import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement. All references to time of day herein are references to Chicago, Illinois time unless otherwise specifically provided. Where the character or amount of any asset or liability or item of income or expense is required to be determined or any consolidation or other accounting computation is required to be made for the purposes of this Agreement, it shall be done in accordance with GAAP except where such principles are inconsistent with the specific provisions of this Agreement.
Section 6.2.
Interpretation
"hereof"
"herein"
"hereunder"
 
S 7. R W.
ECTION
EPRESENTATIONS
AND
ARRANTIES
 
The Borrower hereby represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent and each Lender as follows:
 
. The Borrower is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing as a corporation under the laws of the State of Delaware, has full corporate power to own its Property and conduct its business as now conducted, and is duly licensed or qualified and in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the nature of the business conducted by it or the nature of the Property owned or leased by it requires such licensing or qualifying, except where the failure to be so licensed or qualified could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.1. Organization and Qualification
 
. Each Subsidiary is duly organized, validly existing and, to the extent applicable, in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is incorporated or organized, as the case may be, has full corporate power to own its Property and conduct its business as now conducted, and is duly licensed or qualified and in good standing in each
Section 7.2. Subsidiaries
 
jurisdiction in which the nature of the business conducted by it or the nature of the Property owned or leased by it requires such licensing or qualifying, except where the failure to be so licensed or qualified could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Schedule 7.2 hereto identifies as of the Effective Date (i) each Subsidiary, the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, as the case may be, the percentage of issued and outstanding shares of each class of its capital stock or other equity interests owned by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and, if such percentage is not 100% (excluding directors' qualifying shares as required by law), a description of each class of its authorized capital stock and other equity interests and the number of shares of each class issued and outstanding and (ii) each direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary. All of the outstanding shares of capital stock and other equity interests of each Subsidiary are validly issued and outstanding and fully paid and nonassessable and all such shares and other equity interests indicated on Schedule 7.2 as owned by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries are owned, beneficially and of record, by the Borrower or such Subsidiary free and clear of all Liens. There are no outstanding commitments or other obligations of any Subsidiary to issue, and no options, warrants or other rights of any Person to acquire, any shares of any class of capital stock or other equity interests of any Subsidiary.
 
. The Borrower has full corporate power and authority to enter into this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which it is a party, to make the borrowings herein provided for, to issue its Notes in evidence thereof, and to perform all of its obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents to which it is a party. Each Guarantor has full corporate power and authority to enter into this Agreement as a signatory hereto or pursuant to an Additional Guarantor Supplement and to perform all of its obligations hereunder. Each Loan Document to which the Borrower or any Guarantor is a party has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Borrower or such Guarantor, as the case may be, and constitutes the valid and binding obligation of the Borrower or such Guarantor enforceable in accordance with its terms except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and general principles of equity (regardless of whether the application of such principles is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law). No Loan Document, nor the performance or observance by the Borrower or any Guarantor of any of the matters and things herein or therein provided for, contravenes or constitutes a default under any provision of law or any judgment, injunction, order or decree binding upon the Borrower or any Guarantor or any provision of the charter, articles of incorporation or by-laws of the Borrower or any Guarantor or any covenant, indenture or agreement of or affecting the Borrower or any Guarantor or any of their respective Properties, in each case where such contravention or default, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any Property of the Borrower or any Guarantor.
Section 7.3. Corporate Authority and Validity of Obligations
 
. The Borrower shall use the proceeds of the Loans and other extensions of credit made available hereunder to fund its general corporate and working capital purposes, to refinance existing indebtedness and for such other purposes as are consistent with all applicable laws and the terms hereof. Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is engaged in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System), and no part of the proceeds of any Loan or any other extension of credit hereunder will be used to purchase or carry margin stock or used in a manner that violates any provision of Regulation U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
Section 7.4. Use of Proceeds; Margin Stock
 
. The consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as at December 31, 2004, and the related consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal year then ended, and accompanying notes thereto, which financial statements are accompanied by the audit report of Ernst & Young LLP, independent public accountants, and the unaudited interim consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as at June 30, 2005, and the related consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for the six months then ended, heretofore furnished to the Lenders, fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as at said dates and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the periods then ended in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis (except, in the case of such unaudited statements, for normal year-end audit adjustments). Except as previously disclosed in writing to the Administrative Agent, neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary has contingent liabilities which are material to it other than as indicated on such financial statements or, with respect to future periods, on the financial statements furnished pursuant to Section 9.4 hereof.
Section 7.5. Financial Reports
 
Since December 31, 2004, except as previously disclosed in the Borrower's Form 10-K filed with the SEC for the year ended December 31, 2004, the Borrower's Form 8-K filed with the SEC on February 14, 2005, or the Borrower's Form 10-Q filed with the SEC for the quarter ended June 30, 2005 and except for any Specified Claims, there has been no change in the condition (financial or otherwise) or business prospects of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.6. No Material Adverse Change.
 
. The written statements and information furnished to the Lenders in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and the commitments by the Lenders to provide all or part of the financing contemplated hereby do not contain any untrue statements of a material fact or omit a material fact necessary to make the material statements contained herein or therein not misleading, the Lenders acknowledging that as to any projections furnished to the Lenders, the Borrower only represents that the same were prepared on the basis of information and estimates the Borrower believed to be reasonable.
Section 7.7. Full Disclosure
 
. The Borrower and its Subsidiaries each have good and defensible title to their assets as reflected on the most recent consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries furnished to the Lenders, subject to no Liens other than such thereof as are permitted by Section 9.9 hereof.
Section 7.8. Good Title
 
Except as otherwise disclosed in the Borrower's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, or the Borrower's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2005 and except for any Specified Claims, there is no litigation or governmental proceeding or labor controversy pending, nor to the knowledge of the Borrower threatened, against the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.9. Litigation and Other Controversies.
 
. All federal, state and other material tax returns required to be filed by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in any jurisdiction have, in fact, been filed, and all taxes, assessments, fees and other governmental charges upon the Borrower and its Subsidiaries or upon any of their respective Properties, income or franchises, which are shown to be due and payable in such returns, have been paid, except for any taxes, assessments, fees or charges being contested in good faith by appropriate proceeding and for which adequate reserves have been provided. The Borrower does not know of any proposed additional tax assessment against it or its Subsidiaries for which adequate provision in accordance with GAAP has not been made on its accounts. Adequate provisions in accordance with GAAP for taxes on the books of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries have been made for all open years, and for its current fiscal period.
Section 7.10. Taxes
 
. No authorization, consent, license, or exemption from, or filing or registration with, any court or governmental department, agency or instrumentality, nor any approval or consent of the stockholders of the Borrower or any other Person, is or will be necessary to the valid execution, delivery or performance by the Borrower of this Agreement or any other Loan Document.
Section 7.11. Approvals
 
. Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is a party to any contracts or agreements with any of its Affiliates (other than transactions between the Borrower and a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary or between Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries) on terms and conditions which are less favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary than would be usual and customary in similar contracts or agreements between Persons not affiliated with each other.
Section 7.12. Affiliate Transactions
 
Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is an "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or a "public utility holding company" within the meaning of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, as amended.
Section 7.13. Investment Company; Public Utility Holding Company.
 
. In respect of each Plan, the Borrower and each other member of its Controlled Group has fulfilled its obligations under the minimum funding standards of and is in compliance in all material respects with ERISA and the Code to the extent applicable to it and has not incurred any material liability to the PBGC or a Plan under Title IV of ERISA other than a liability to the PBGC for premiums under Section 4007 of ERISA. Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary has any material contingent liabilities with respect to any post-retirement benefits under a Welfare Plan, other than liability for continuation coverage described in article 6 of Title I of ERISA.
Section 7.14. ERISA
 
. The Borrower and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with the requirements of all federal, state and local laws, rules and regulations applicable to or pertaining to their Properties or business operations (including, without limitation, the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, and laws and regulations establishing quality criteria and standards for air, water, land
Section 7.15. Compliance with Laws
 
and toxic or hazardous wastes and substances), non-compliance with which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary has received notice to the effect that its operations are not in compliance with any of the requirements of applicable federal, state or local environmental, health and safety statutes and regulations or are the subject of any governmental investigation evaluating whether any remedial action is needed to respond to a release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment, which non-compliance or remedial action could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
. Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is in default under the terms of any covenant, indenture or agreement of or affecting the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any of their Properties, which default if uncured could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.16. Other Agreements
 
. There are no labor controversies pending or threatened against the Borrower or any Subsidiary which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.17. Labor Controversies
 
. After giving effect to the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the extensions of credit under this Agreement: (a) neither the Borrower nor any Guarantor will (i) be "insolvent," within the meaning of such term as used in 101 of the "Bankruptcy Code", or Section 2 of either the "UFTA" or the "UFCA", or as defined or used in any "Other Applicable Law" (as those terms are defined below), or (ii) be unable to pay its debts generally as such debts become due within the meaning of Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code, Section 4 of the UFTA or Section 6 of the UFCA, or (iii) have an unreasonably small capital to engage in any business or transaction, whether current or contemplated, within the meaning of Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code, Section 4 of the UFTA or Section 5 of the UFCA; and (b) the obligations of the Borrower and the Guarantors under the Loan Documents and with respect to the Loans and Letters of Credit will not be rendered avoidable under any Other Applicable Law. For purposes of this Section, means Title 11 of the United States Code, means the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, means the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, and means any other applicable law pertaining to fraudulent transfers or obligations voidable by creditors, in each case as such law may be amended from time to time.
Section 7.18. Insolvency
"Bankruptcy Code"
"UFTA"
"UFCA"
"Other Applicable Law"
 
No Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
Section 7.19. No Default.
 
S 8. C P.
ECTION
ONDITIONS
RECEDENT
 
The obligation of each Lender to advance, continue, or convert any Loan (other than the continuation of, or conversion into, a Base Rate Loan), or of the L/C Issuer to issue, extend the expiration date of or increase the amount of any Letter of Credit, shall be subject to the following conditions precedent:
 
. Before or concurrently with the initial Credit Event:
Section 8.1. Initial Credit Event
 
(a) The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement;
 
(b) The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) for each Lender, such Lender's duly executed Revolving Credit Note dated the date hereof and otherwise in compliance with the provisions of Section 3.3(a) hereof and (ii) Harris' duly executed Swing Line Note of the Borrower dated the date hereof;
 
(c) The Administrative Agent shall have received for each Lender the favorable written opinion of counsel to the Borrower and the Guarantors in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel;
 
(d) The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) an original certificate of good standing, for the Borrower and each Guarantor (to the extent applicable), certified as of a date not earlier than 30 days prior to the date hereof by the Secretary of State of such party's jurisdiction of organization and (ii) certificate or articles of incorporation, together with all amendments, and bylaws and any amendments thereto, for the Borrower and each Guarantor, certified by such party's Secretary or an Assistant Secretary;
 
(e) The Administrative Agent shall have received copies of resolutions of the Borrower's and each Guarantor's Board of Directors authorizing the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents to which it is a party and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, together with specimen signatures of the persons authorized to execute such documents on behalf of the Borrower or such Guarantor, all certified in each instance by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary;
 
(f) The Administrative Agent shall have received a list of the Borrower's Authorized Representatives;
 
(g) The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence satisfactory to it that the indebtedness of the Borrower owing to Harris N.A., Citibank, N.A., LaSalle Bank National Association, Bank of America, N.A., Barclays Bank PLC, Union Bank of California, N.A., U.S. Bank National Association, Fifth Third Bank (Chicago), Comerica Bank and PNC Bank, NA pursuant to the Existing Credit Agreement (except for the Existing L/Cs which are to become Letters of Credit hereunder as set forth in Section 1.2 hereof), has been fully paid and satisfied and that the credit facilities extended by such lenders have been terminated;
 
(h) The Administrative Agent shall have received the fees required by Section 4.1(c) and 4.1(d) hereof;
 
(i) Each of the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 hereof shall be true and correct in all material respects; and
 
(j) All legal matters incident to the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Lenders.
 
. As of the time of each Credit Event hereunder:
Section 8.2. All Credit Events
 
(a) In the case of a Borrowing of a Revolving Loan, the Administrative Agent shall have received the notice required by Section 1.5 hereof (including any deemed notice under Section 1.5(c)); in the case of a Swing Loan, Harris shall have received the notice required in Section 2.3 hereof; in the case of the issuance of any Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall have received a duly completed Application for such Letter of Credit (along with the fees required by Section 4.1(b) hereof); in the case of an extension or increase in the amount of a Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall have received a written request therefor (along with the fees required by Section 4.1(b) hereof) in a form acceptable to the L/C Issuer;
 
(b) Each of the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 hereof (other than Section 7.6) shall be true and correct in all material respects as of said time, taking into account any amendments to such Section made after the date of this Agreement in accordance with its provisions, except that if any such representation or warranty relates solely to an earlier date it need only remain true as of such date;
 
(c) No Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a result of such Credit Event;
 
(d) After giving effect to such Credit Event, the aggregate Original Dollar Amount of Revolving Loans, Swing Loans and L/C Obligations then outstanding shall not exceed the Revolving Credit Commitments; and
 
(e) Such Credit Event shall not violate any order, judgment or decree of any court or other authority or any provision of law or regulation applicable to the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including, without limitation, Regulation U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System).
 
Each request for a Borrowing hereunder and each request for the issuance of, increase in the amount of, or extension of the expiration date of, a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Borrower on the date of such Credit Event as to the facts specified in paragraphs (a) through (d), both inclusive, of this Section 8.2.
 
S 9. C.
ECTION
OVENANTS
 
The Borrower covenants and agrees that, so long as any credit is available to or in use by the Borrower hereunder, except to the extent compliance in any case is waived in writing pursuant to the terms of Section 14.13 hereof:
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, preserve and maintain its existence, and preserve and keep in force and effect all licenses, permits and franchises necessary to the proper conduct of its business; that nothing in this Section 9.1 shall prohibit the dissolution, sale, transfer or other disposition of any Subsidiary which is otherwise permitted under Section 9.11 hereof.
Section 9.1. Maintenance of Business.
provided, however,
 
s. The Borrower shall duly pay and discharge, and shall cause each Subsidiary to duly pay and discharge, all material taxes, rates, assessments, fees and governmental charges upon or against it or its Properties, in each case before the same become delinquent and before penalties accrue thereon, unless and to the extent that the same are being contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings which prevent enforcement of the matter under contest and adequate reserves are provided therefor.
Section 9.2. Taxes and Assessment
 
The Borrower shall insure and keep insured, and shall cause each Subsidiary to insure and keep insured, with responsible insurance companies, all insurable Property owned by it which is of a character usually insured by Persons similarly situated and operating like Properties against loss or damage from such hazards and risks, and in such amounts, as are insured by Persons similarly situated and operating like Properties; and the Borrower shall insure, and shall cause each Subsidiary to insure, such other hazards and risks (including employers' and public liability risks) with responsible insurance companies as and to the extent usually insured by Persons similarly situated and conducting similar businesses. The Borrower shall upon written request furnish to the Administrative Agent and any Lender a certificate setting forth in summary form the nature and extent of the insurance maintained pursuant to this Section.
Section 9.3. Insurance.
 
The Borrower shall maintain a standard system of accounting in accordance with GAAP and shall furnish to the Administrative Agent, each Lender and their duly authorized representatives such information respecting the business and financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request (each Lender to have the right to require the Administrative Agent make such request); and without any request, the Borrower will furnish each of the following to the Administrative Agent, with sufficient copies for each Lender (which the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to each Lender) or, in lieu of furnishing any such item to the Administrative Agent, may at such time notify the Administrative Agent that such item has been posted to a website maintained by or on behalf of the Borrower and accessible to all of the Lenders, such notification to inform the Administrative Agent of any information necessary to allow the Lenders to access such item:
Section 9.4. Financial Reports.
 
(a) as soon as available, and in any event within 45 days after the close of each fiscal quarter of the Borrower, a copy of the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the last day of such period and the consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal quarter and for the fiscal year-to-date period then ended, each in reasonable detail showing in comparative form the figures for the corresponding date and period in the previous fiscal year, prepared by the Borrower in accordance with GAAP (subject to normal year-end adjustments) and certified to by its President or Chief Financial Officer or Vice President and Treasurer;
 
(b) as soon as available, and in any event within 90 days after the close of each annual accounting period of the Borrower, a copy of the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the last day of the period then ended and the consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for the period then ended, and accompanying notes thereto, each in reasonable detail showing in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, accompanied by an opinion thereon, unqualified as to scope and going-concern status, of Ernst & Young LLP or another firm of independent public accountants of recognized national standing, selected by the Borrower and satisfactory to the Required Lenders, to the effect that the financial statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP and present fairly in accordance with GAAP the consolidated financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the close of such fiscal year and the results of their operations and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended and that an examination of such accounts in connection with such financial statements has been made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and, accordingly, such examination included such tests of the accounting records and such other auditing procedures as were considered necessary in the circumstances;
 
(c) within the period provided in subsection (b) above, the written statement of the accountants who certified the audit report thereby required that in the course of their audit they have obtained no knowledge of any Default or Event of Default with respect to Sections 9.6, 9.7 and 9.8, or, if such accountants have obtained knowledge of any such Default or Event of Default, they shall disclose in such statement the nature and period of the existence thereof;
 
(d) promptly after receipt thereof, any additional written reports, management letters or other detailed information contained in writing given to it by its independent public accountants and having a material impact on the consolidated financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
 
(e) promptly after the sending or filing thereof, a copies of all proxy statements, financial statements and reports which the Borrower sends to its shareholders, and copies of all regular, periodic and special reports and all registration statements which the Borrower files with the SEC or with any national securities exchange; and
 
(f) promptly after knowledge thereof shall have come to the attention of any Responsible Officer of the Borrower, written notice of any threatened or pending litigation or governmental proceeding or labor controversy against the Borrower or any Subsidiary which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or of the occurrence of any Default or Event of Default hereunder.
 
Each of the financial statements furnished to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be accompanied by a Compliance Certificate
 
signed by the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Vice President and Treasurer of the Borrower to the effect that to the best of such officer's knowledge and belief no Default or Event of Default has occurred during the period covered by such statements or, if any such Default or Event of Default has occurred during such period, setting forth a description of such Default or Event of Default and specifying the action, if any, taken by the Borrower to remedy the same. Such Compliance Certificate shall also (i) set forth the calculations supporting such statements in respect of Sections 9.6 and 9.7 of this Agreement and (ii) contain a calculation of the Cash Flow Leverage Ratio for purposes of determining adjustments (if any) to the Applicable Margins.
 
. The Borrower shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, permit the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each of their duly authorized representatives and agents during normal business hours to visit and inspect any of the Properties, corporate books and financial records of the Borrower and each Subsidiary, to examine and make copies of the books of accounts and other financial records of the Borrower and each Subsidiary, and to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Borrower and each Subsidiary with, and to be advised as to the same by, its officers, employees and independent public accountants (and by this provision the Borrower hereby authorizes such accountants to discuss with the Administrative Agent and such Lender the finances and affairs of the Borrower and of each Subsidiary) at such reasonable times and reasonable intervals as the Administrative Agent or any such Lender may designate.
Section 9.5. Inspection
 
. The Borrower shall not at any time permit its Net Worth to be less than $550,000,000 plus 40% of Net Income for each calendar quarter (if positive for such quarter) completed as of the date of determination, commencing with the calendar quarter ending September 30, 2005.
Section 9.6. Net Worth
 
. The Borrower shall not at any time permit its Cash Flow Leverage Ratio to be more than 2.75 to 1.0.
Section 9.7. Cash Flow Leverage Ratio
 
The Borrower shall not at any time permit its Interest Coverage Ratio to be less than 4.00 to 1.0.
Section 9.8. Interest Coverage Ratio.
 
The Borrower shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any Property owned by the Borrower or such Subsidiary; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent:
Section 9.9. Liens.
provided, however,
 
(a) Liens arising by statute in connection with worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, old age benefits, social security obligations, taxes, assessments, statutory obligations or other similar charges, good faith cash deposits in connection with tenders, contracts or leases to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is a party or other cash deposits required to be made in the ordinary course of business, in each case that the obligation is not for borrowed money and that the obligation secured is not overdue or, if overdue, is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings which prevent enforcement of the matter under contest and adequate reserves have been established therefor;
provided
 
(b) mechanics', workmen's, materialmen's, landlords', carriers', or other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business with respect to obligations which are not due or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings which prevent enforcement of the matter under contest;
 
(c) the pledge of assets for the purpose of securing an appeal, stay or discharge in the course of any legal proceeding, that the aggregate amount of liabilities of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries secured by a pledge of assets permitted under this subsection, including interest and penalties thereon, if any, shall not be in excess of $50,000,000 at any one time outstanding;
provided
 
(d) Liens on Property of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries created solely for the purpose of securing purchase money indebtedness or Capitalized Lease Obligations and, representing or incurred to finance, refinance or refund the purchase price of Property, that no such Lien shall extend to or cover other Property of the Borrower or such Subsidiary other than the respective Property so acquired, and the principal amount of indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall at no time exceed the original purchase price of such Property;
provided
 
(e) leases or subleases granted to others in the ordinary course of business and any interest or title of a lessor under any lease permitted by this Agreement;
 
(f) customary rights of set off, revocation, refund or chargeback under deposit agreements or under the Uniform Commercial Code in favor of banks or other financial institution where the Borrower or any Subsidiary maintains deposits in the ordinary course of business;
 
(g) Liens constituting encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, condemnations, easements, encroachments, covenants, rights of way, minor defects, irregularities and rights or restrictions of record on the title or use of real property, which do not materially detract from the value of such property or materially impair the use thereof in the business of the Borrower or any Subsidiary; and
 
(h) Liens other than those permitted by any of the foregoing subsections (a) through (g) such Liens do not at any time secure obligations exceeding 10% of Net Worth as then determined and computed.
provided
 
. The Borrower shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, acquire all or any substantial part of the assets or business of any other Person or division thereof; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent acquisitions of all or substantially all of the assets or business of any other Person or division thereof, or all or any part of the Voting Stock of or other equity interest in any Person (including as such an acquisition, any action to participate as a joint venturer in any joint venture or as a partner in any partnership), in each case if and so long as (i) no Default or Event of Default exists or would exist after giving effect to such acquisition, (ii) after giving effect to such acquisition, the Borrower would have unused Revolving Credit Commitments in excess of $75,000,000, (iii) the Board of Directors or other governing body of such Person whose Property or Voting
Section 9.10. Acquisitions
provided, however,
 
Stock or other equity interest is being so acquired has not opposed the terms of such acquisition and (iv) such acquisition involves a line of business which is complementary to the lines of business in which the Borrower or the Subsidiary, as the case may be, making such acquisition is engaged on the Effective Date.
 
The Borrower shall not be a party to any merger or consolidation unless the Borrower is the surviving entity and no Default or Event of Default exists or would exist after giving effect to such merger or consolidation. The Borrower shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of all or any part of its Property, including any disposition of Property as part of a sale and leaseback transaction, or in any event sell or discount (with or without recourse) any of its notes or accounts receivable; that so long as no Default or Event of Default exists this Section shall not apply to nor operate to prevent:
Section 9.11. Mergers, Consolidations and Sales.
provided, however,
 
(a) the sale or lease of inventory in the ordinary course of business;
 
(b) the sale, transfer, lease or other disposition of Property of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to one another;
 
(c) the merger of any Subsidiary with or into the Borrower (with the Borrower being the surviving entity) or another existing or newly-formed Subsidiary;
 
(d) the dissolution of any Subsidiary pursuant to a plan of dissolution requiring the conveyance or distribution of all or substantially all of the assets of such Subsidiary to the Borrower or to another existing or newly-formed Subsidiary;
 
(e) the dissolution, sale or transfer of any Non-Guarantor Subsidiary;
 
(f) the sale of delinquent notes or accounts receivable in the ordinary course of business for purposes of collection only (and not for the purpose of any bulk sale or securitization transaction);
 
(g) the sale, transfer or other disposition of any tangible personal property that, in the reasonable business judgment of the Borrower or its Subsidiary, has become obsolete or worn out, and which is disposed of in the ordinary course of business;
 
(h) sales by the Borrower or its Subsidiaries of assets categorized in the "Financial Services" segment as identified in the Borrower's consolidated financial statements filed with the SEC; and
 
(i) any other sale, transfer, lease or disposition of Property of the Borrower or any Subsidiary not described in the foregoing clauses (a) through (g) (including any disposition of Property as part of a sale and leaseback transaction) aggregating for the Borrower and its Subsidiaries not more than $340,000,000 during the term of this Agreement.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, promptly pay and discharge all obligations and liabilities arising under ERISA of a character which if unpaid or unperformed could reasonably be expected to result in the imposition of a Lien against any of its Properties. The Borrower shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, promptly notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender of (i) the occurrence of any reportable event (as defined in ERISA) with respect to a Plan (other than a reportable event with respect to which the 30 day notice requirement is waived), (ii) receipt of any notice from the PBGC of its intention to seek termination of any Plan or appointment of a trustee therefor, (iii) its intention to terminate or withdraw from any Plan, and (iv) the occurrence of any event with respect to any Plan which would result in the incurrence by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any material liability, fine or penalty, or any material increase in the contingent liability of the Borrower or any Subsidiary with respect to any post-retirement Welfare Plan benefit.
Section 9.12. ERISA.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, comply in all respects with the requirements of all federal, state and local laws, rules, regulations, ordinances and orders applicable to or pertaining to their Properties or business operations, non-compliance with which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.13. Compliance with Laws.
 
The Borrower shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any contract, agreement or business arrangement with any of its Affiliates (other than transactions between the Borrower and a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary or between Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries) on terms and conditions which are less favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary than would be usual and customary in similar contracts, agreements or business arrangements between Persons not affiliated with each other.
Section 9.14. Burdensome Contracts with Affiliates.
 
Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary shall change its fiscal year from its present basis without the prior written consent of the Required Lenders, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld.
Section 9.15. No Changes in Fiscal Year.
 
The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to, engage in any business or activity if as a result the general nature of the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole would be changed in any material respect from the general nature of the business engaged in by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on the date of this Agreement.
Section 9.16. Change in the Nature of Business.
 
. The Guarantors shall at all times maintain an aggregate asset value equal to or greater than the lesser of (a) 80% of the consolidated total assets of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries or (b) $1,500,000,000.
Section 9.17. Assets of Guarantors
 
S 10. E D R.
ECTION
VENTS
OF
EFAULT
AND
EMEDIES
 
. Any one or more of the following shall constitute an Event of Default:
Section 10.1. Events of Default
 
(a) default (i) in the payment when due of the principal amount of any Loan or (ii) for a period of three Business Days in the payment when due of interest or fees or any part of any other Obligation payable by the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document; or
 
(b) default in the observance or performance of the Borrower's obligation to deliver cash collateral for Letters of Credit as required by Section 1.2(b) hereof; or
 
(c) default for a period of one Business Day in the observance or performance of the Borrower's obligations under Section 9.4 hereof; or
 
(d) default in the observance or performance of any covenant set forth in Sections 9.6, 9.7, 9.8, 9.10, 9.11, 9.12 or 9.16 hereof; or
 
(e) default in the observance or performance of any other provision hereof or of any other Loan Document which is not remedied within 30 days after the earlier of (i) the date on which such failure shall first become known to any Responsible Officer of the Borrower or (ii) written notice thereof is given to the Borrower by the Administrative Agent or any Lender; or
 
(f) any representation or warranty made by the Borrower herein or in any other Loan Document, or in any statement or certificate furnished by it pursuant hereto or thereto, or in connection with any Loan or other extension of credit made hereunder, proves untrue in any material respect as of the date of the issuance or making thereof; or
 
(g) default shall occur under any evidence of Indebtedness for Borrowed Money issued, assumed or guaranteed by the Borrower or any Subsidiary aggregating in excess of $25,000,000, or under any indenture, agreement or other instrument under which the same may be issued, and such default shall continue for a period of time sufficient to permit the acceleration of the maturity of any such Indebtedness for Borrowed Money (whether or not such maturity is in fact accelerated), or any such Indebtedness for Borrowed Money shall not be paid when due (whether by lapse of time, acceleration or otherwise); or
 
(h) any judgment or judgments, writ or writs, or warrant or warrants of attachment, or any similar process or processes in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 shall be entered or filed against the Borrower or any Subsidiary or against any of their Property which remains unvacated, unbonded, unstayed or unsatisfied for a period of 30 days; or
 
(i) the Borrower or any member of its Controlled Group shall fail to pay when due an amount or amounts aggregating in excess of $2,000,000 which it shall have become liable to pay to the PBGC or to a Plan under Title IV of ERISA; or notice of intent to terminate a Plan or Plans having aggregate Unfunded Vested Liabilities in excess of $15,000,000 (or in the case of a Multiemployer Plan, a Plan with respect to which the Borrower's responsibility for Unfunded Vested Liabilities is in excess of $15,000,000) (collectively, a ) shall be filed under Title IV of ERISA by the Borrower or any other member of its Controlled Group, any plan administrator or any combination of the foregoing; or the PBGC shall institute proceedings under Title IV of ERISA to terminate or to cause a trustee to be appointed to administer any Material Plan or a proceeding shall be instituted by a fiduciary of any Material Plan against the Borrower or any member of its Controlled Group to enforce Section 515 or 4219(c)(5) of ERISA and such proceeding shall not have been dismissed within 30 days thereafter; or a condition shall exist by reason of which the PBGC would be entitled to obtain a decree adjudicating that any Material Plan must be terminated; or
"Material Plan"
 
(j) the occurrence of a Change in Control; or
 
(k) the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary shall (i) have entered involuntarily against it an order for relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code, as amended, (ii) not pay, or admit in writing its inability to pay, its debts generally as they become due, (iii) make an assignment for the benefit of creditors, (iv) apply for, seek, consent to, or acquiesce in, the appointment of a receiver, custodian, trustee, examiner, liquidator or similar official for it or any substantial part of its Property, (v) institute any proceeding seeking to have entered against it an order for relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code, as amended, to adjudicate it insolvent, or seeking dissolution, winding up, liquidation, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition of it or its debts under any law relating to bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization or relief of debtors or fail to file an answer or other pleading denying the material allegations of any such proceeding filed against it, (vi) take any corporate action in furtherance of any matter described in parts (ii) through (v) above, or (vii) fail to contest in good faith any appointment or proceeding described in Section 10.1(l) hereof; or
 
(l) a custodian, receiver, trustee, examiner, liquidator or similar official shall be appointed for the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary or any substantial part of any of its Property, or a proceeding described in Section 10.1(k)(v) shall be instituted against the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary, and such appointment continues undischarged or such proceeding continues undismissed or unstayed for a period of 60 days.
 
. When any Event of Default other than those described in subsections (k) or (l) of Section 10.1 hereof has occurred and is continuing, the Administrative Agent shall, if so directed by the Required Lenders, by written notice to the Borrower: (a) terminate the remaining Revolving Credit Commitments and all other obligations of the Lenders hereunder on the date stated in such notice (which may be the date thereof); (b) declare the principal of and the accrued interest on all outstanding Notes to be forthwith due and payable and thereupon all outstanding Notes, including both principal and interest thereon,
Section 10.2. Non-Bankruptcy Defaults
 
shall be and become immediately due and payable together with all other amounts payable under the Loan Documents without further demand, presentment, protest or notice of any kind; and (c) demand that the Borrower immediately pay to the Administrative Agent, subject to Section 10.4, the full amount then available for drawing under each or any Letter of Credit, and the Borrower agrees to immediately make such payment and acknowledges and agrees that the Lenders would not have an adequate remedy at law for failure by the Borrower to honor any such demand and that the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, shall have the right to require the Borrower to specifically perform such undertaking whether or not any drawings or other demands for payment have been made under any Letter of Credit.
 
. When any Event of Default described in subsections (k) or (l) of Section 10.1 hereof has occurred and is continuing, then all outstanding Notes shall immediately become due and payable together with all other amounts payable under the Loan Documents without presentment, demand, protest or notice of any kind, the obligation of the Lenders to extend further credit pursuant to any of the terms hereof shall immediately terminate and the Borrower shall immediately pay to the Administrative Agent, subject to Section 10.4, the full amount then available for drawing under all outstanding Letters of Credit, the Borrower acknowledging that the Lenders would not have an adequate remedy at law for failure by the Borrower to honor any such demand and that the Lenders, and the Administrative Agent on their behalf, shall have the right to require the Borrower to specifically perform such undertaking whether or not any draws or other demands for payment have been made under any of the Letters of Credit.
Section 10.3. Bankruptcy Defaults
 
. (a) If the payment or prepayment of the amount available for drawing under any or all outstanding Letters of Credit is required under Section 1.2(b), Section 10.2 or Section 10.3 above, the Borrower shall forthwith pay the amount required to be so prepaid, to be held by the Administrative Agent as provided in subsection (b) below.
Section 10.4. Collateral for Undrawn Letters of Credit
 
(b) All amounts prepaid pursuant to subsection (a) above shall be held by the Administrative Agent in a separate collateral account (such account, and the credit balances, properties and any investments from time to time held therein, and any substitutions for such account, any certificate of deposit or other instrument evidencing any of the foregoing and all proceeds of and earnings on any of the foregoing being collectively called the ) as security for, and for application by the Administrative Agent (to the extent available) to, the reimbursement of any payment under any Letter of Credit then or thereafter made by the Administrative Agent. The Account shall be held in the name of and subject to the exclusive dominion and control of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders. If and when requested by the Borrower, the Administrative Agent shall invest funds held in the Account from time to time in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America with a remaining maturity of one year or less, that the Administrative Agent is irrevocably authorized to sell investments held in the Account when and as required to make payments out of the Account for application to amounts due and owing from the Borrower to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or Lenders; that if (i) the Borrower shall have made payment of all such obligations referred to in subsection (a) above and (ii) no Letters of Credit remain outstanding hereunder, then the Administrative Agent shall repay to the Borrower any remaining amounts held in the Account.
"Account"
provided
provided, however,
 
. The Administrative Agent shall give notice to the Borrower under Section 10.1(c) hereof promptly upon being requested to do so by any Lender and shall thereupon notify all the Lenders thereof.
Section 10.5. Notice of Default
 
. The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Administrative Agent and each Lender, and any other holder of any Note outstanding hereunder, all out-of-pocket expenses incurred or paid by the Administrative Agent and such Lender or any such holder, including attorneys' fees and court costs, in connection with any Default or Event of Default by the Borrower hereunder or in connection with the enforcement of any of the Loan Documents.
Section 10.6. Expenses
 
S 11. C C.
ECTION
HANGE
IN
IRCUMSTANCES
 
. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Agreement or any Note, if at any time after the date hereof any Lender shall determine in good faith that any change in applicable laws, treaties or regulations or in the interpretation thereof makes it unlawful for such Lender to make or continue to maintain Eurocurrency Loans, such Lender shall promptly give notice thereof to the Administrative Agent (which shall in turn promptly notify the Borrower and the other Lenders) and such Lender's obligations to make or maintain Eurocurrency Loans under this Agreement shall terminate until it is no longer unlawful for such Lender to make or maintain Eurocurrency Loans. The Borrower shall prepay on the last day of the Interest Period for any such affected Eurocurrency Loan, or within such earlier period as required by law upon demand from the affected Lender, the outstanding principal amount of any such affected Eurocurrency Loans, together with all interest accrued thereon and all other amounts payable to the affected Lender with respect thereto; subject to all of the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Borrower may then elect to borrow the principal amount of the affected Eurocurrency Loans from such Lender by means of Base Rate Loans from such Lender, which Base Rate Loans shall not be made ratably by the Lenders but only from such affected Lender.
Section 11.1. Change of Law
provided, however,
 
. If on or prior to the first day of any Interest Period for any Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans:
Section 11.2. Unavailability of Deposits or Inability to Ascertain, or Inadequacy of, Adjusted LIBOR
 
(a) the Administrative Agent determines that deposits in U.S. Dollars or the applicable Alternative Currency (in the applicable amounts) are not being offered to it in the eurocurrency interbank market for such Interest Period, or that by reason of circumstances affecting the interbank eurocurrency market adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the applicable Adjusted LIBOR, or
 
(b) the Required Lenders determine and so advise the Administrative Agent that Adjusted LIBOR as determined by the Administrative Agent will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of funding their Eurocurrency Loans or Loan for such Interest Period,
 
then the Administrative Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders, whereupon until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, the obligations of the Lenders to make Eurocurrency Loans in the currency so affected shall be suspended.
 
. (a) If, after the date hereof, the adoption of any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change therein, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Lending Office) with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law but, if not having the force of law, compliance with which is customary in the relevant jurisdiction) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency issued after the date hereof:
Section 11.3. Increased Cost and Reduced Return
 
(i) shall subject any Lender (or its Lending Office) to any tax, duty or other charge with respect to its Eurocurrency Loans, its Notes, its Letters of Credit, or its participation in any thereof, any Reimbursement Obligations owed to it or its obligation to make Eurocurrency Loans, issue Letters of Credit, or to participate therein, or shall change the basis of taxation of payments to any Lender (or its Lending Office) of the principal of or interest on its Eurocurrency Loans, Letters of Credit, or participations therein or any other amounts due under this Agreement in respect of its Eurocurrency Loans, Letters of Credit, or participations therein, any Reimbursement Obligations owed to it, or its obligation to make Eurocurrency Loans, issue a Letter of Credit, or acquire participations therein (except for changes in the rate of tax on the overall net income or profits of such Lender or its Lending Office imposed by the jurisdiction in which such Lender or its lending office is incorporated, or in which such Lender's principal executive office or Lending Office is located); or
 
(ii) shall impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement (including, without limitation, any such requirement imposed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, but excluding with respect to any Eurocurrency Loans any such requirement included in an applicable Eurocurrency Reserve Percentage) against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (or its Lending Office) or shall impose on any Lender (or its Lending Office) or on the interbank market any other condition affecting its Eurocurrency Loans, its Notes, its Letters of Credit, or its participation in any thereof, any Reimbursement Obligation owed to it, or its obligation to make Eurocurrency Loans, to issue a Letter of Credit, or to participate therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing is to increase the cost to such Lender (or its Lending Office) of making or maintaining any Eurocurrency Loan, issuing or maintaining a Letter of Credit, or participating therein, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender (or its Lending Office) under this Agreement or under its Notes with respect thereto,
 
by an amount deemed by such Lender to be material, then, within 15 days after demand by such Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), the Borrower shall be obligated to pay to such Lender such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such increased cost or reduction. In the event any law, rule, regulation or interpretation described above is revoked, declared invalid or inapplicable or is otherwise rescinded, and as a result thereof a Lender is determined to be entitled to a refund from the applicable authority for any amount or amounts which were paid or reimbursed by the Borrower to such Lender hereunder, such Lender shall refund such amount or amounts to the Borrower without interest.
 
(b) If any Lender or the Administrative Agent shall have determined that the adoption, after the date hereof, of any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy, or any change therein (including, without limitation, any revision in the Final Risk-Based Capital Guidelines of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 CFR Part 208, Appendix A; 12 CFR Part 225, Appendix A) or of the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (12 CFR Part 3, Appendix A), or in any other applicable capital rules heretofore adopted and issued by any governmental authority), or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof after the date hereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Lending Office) with any request or directive issued after the date hereof regarding capital adequacy (whether or not having the force of law but, if not having the force of law, compliance with which is customary in the applicable jurisdiction) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency, has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's capital, or on the capital of any corporation controlling such Lender, as a consequence of its obligations hereunder to a level below that which such Lender could have achieved but for such adoption, change or compliance (taking into consideration such Lender's policies with respect to capital adequacy) by an amount deemed by such Lender to be material, then from time to time, within 15 days after demand by such Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), the Borrower shall pay to such Lender such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such reduction.
 
(c) Each Lender that determines to seek compensation under this Section 11.3 shall notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent of the circumstances that entitle the Lender to such compensation pursuant to this Section 11.3 and will designate a different Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such compensation and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender. A certificate of any Lender claiming compensation under this Section 11.3 and setting forth the additional amount or amounts to be paid to it hereunder shall be conclusive if reasonably determined. The Borrower shall not be obligated to reimburse, compensate or indemnify any Lender with respect to a claim or any portion thereof to the extent such claim or portion thereof arose more than 120 days prior to the notice of such claim delivered pursuant to this Section 11.3(c).
 
. Each Lender may, at its option, elect to make its Loans hereunder at the branch, office or affiliate specified on the appropriate signature page hereof (each a ) for each type of Loan available hereunder or at such other of its branches, offices or affiliates as it may from time to time elect and designate in a written notice to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
Section 11.4. Lending Offices
"Lending Office"
 
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, each Lender shall be entitled to fund and maintain its funding of all or any part of its Loans in any manner it sees fit, it being understood, however, that for the purposes of this Agreement all determinations hereunder shall be made as if each Lender had actually funded and maintained each Eurocurrency Loan through the purchase of deposits of U.S. Dollars in the eurocurrency interbank market having a maturity corresponding to such Loan's Interest Period and bearing an interest rate equal to Adjusted LIBOR for such Interest Period.
Section 11.5. Discretion of Lender as to Manner of Funding
 
. If the Borrower is required pursuant to Section 11.3 or Section 14.1 hereof to make any additional payment to any Lender or if any Lender's obligation to make or continue, or to convert Base Rate Loans into, Eurocurrency Loans shall be suspended pursuant to Section 11.1 or Section 11.2 hereof, or if any Lender does not timely agree or consent, in writing, to any amendment or consent hereto or waiver of any provision hereof which is timely agreed or consented to by the Required Lenders (any such Lender being hereinafter referred to as a ), then in such case, the Borrower may, upon at least five Business Days' notice to the Administrative Agent and to such Replaced Lender, designate a replacement lender (a ) acceptable to the Administrative Agent in its reasonable discretion, to which such Replaced Lender shall, subject to its receipt (unless a later date for the remittance thereof shall be agreed upon by the Borrower and the Replaced Lender) of all amounts owed to such Replaced Lender under Section 11.3 or Section 14.1, assign all (but not less than all) of its rights, obligations, Loans and Revolving Credit Commitment hereunder; that all amounts (including amounts owed pursuant to Section 3.6 hereof) owed by the Borrower to such Replaced Lender hereunder (except liabilities which by the terms hereof survive the payment in full of the Loans and termination of this Agreement) shall be paid in full as of the date of such assignment.
Section 11.6. Replacement of Lenders
"Replaced Lender"
"Replacement Lender"
provided,
 
S 12. T A A.
ECTION
HE
DMINISTRATIVE
GENT
 
. Each Lender hereby appoints Harris N.A. as the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents and hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such action as the Administrative Agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
Section 12.1. Appointment and Authorization of Administrative Agent
 
. The Administrative Agent shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as any other Lender and may exercise or refrain from exercising the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and the Administrative Agent and its affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Affiliate of the Borrower as if it were not the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents. The term as used herein and in all other Loan Documents, unless the context otherwise clearly requires, includes the Administrative Agent in its individual capacity as a Lender. References in Section 1 hereof to the Administrative Agent's Loans, or to the amount owing to the Administrative Agent for which an interest rate is being determined, refer to the Administrative Agent in its individual capacity as a Lender.
Section 12.2. Administrative Agent and its Affiliates
"Lender"
 
. If the Administrative Agent receives from the Borrower a written notice of an Event of Default pursuant to Section 9.4(f) hereof, the Administrative Agent shall promptly give each of the Lenders written notice thereof. The Lenders expressly agree that the Administrative Agent is not acting as a fiduciary of the Lenders in respect of the Loan Documents, the Borrower or otherwise, and nothing herein or in any of the other Loan Documents shall result in any duties or obligations on the Administrative Agent or any of the Lenders except as expressly set forth herein. The obligations of the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents are only those expressly set forth therein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action hereunder with respect to any Default or Event of Default, except as expressly provided in Sections 10.2 and 10.5 hereof. In no event, however, shall the Administrative Agent be required to take any action in violation of applicable law or of any provision of any Loan Document, and the Administrative Agent shall in all cases be fully justified in failing or refusing to act hereunder or under any other Loan Document unless it shall be first indemnified to its reasonable satisfaction by the Lenders against any and all costs, expense, and liability which may be incurred by it by reason of taking or continuing to take any such action. The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to assume that no Default or Event of Default exists unless notified to the contrary by a Lender or the Borrower. In all cases in which this Agreement and the other Loan Documents do not require the Administrative Agent to take certain actions, the Administrative Agent shall be fully justified in using its discretion in failing to take or in taking any action hereunder and thereunder.
Section 12.3. Action by Administrative Agent
 
. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel, independent public accountants and other experts selected by it and shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the advice of such counsel, accountants or experts.
Section 12.4. Consultation with Experts
 
. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, or employees shall be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in connection with the Loan Documents (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents or employees shall be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain, inquire into or verify (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in connection with this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any Credit Event; (ii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants or agreements of the Borrower contained herein or in any other Loan Document; (iii) the satisfaction of any condition specified in Section 8 hereof, except receipt of items required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent; or (iv) the validity, effectiveness, genuineness, enforceability, perfection, value, worth or collectibility hereof or of any other Loan Document or of any other documents or writing furnished in connection with any Loan Document; and the Administrative Agent makes no representation of any kind or character with respect to any such matter mentioned in this sentence. The Administrative Agent may execute any of its duties under any of the Loan Documents by or through employees, agents, and attorneys-in-fact and shall not be answerable to the Lenders, the Borrower, or any other Person for the default or misconduct of any such agents or attorneys-in-fact selected with reasonable care. The Administrative Agent shall not incur any liability by acting in reliance upon any notice, consent,
Section 12.5. Liability of Administrative Agent; Credit Decision
 
certificate, other document or statement (whether written or oral) believed by it to be genuine or to be sent by the proper party or parties. In particular and without limiting any of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent shall have no responsibility for confirming the accuracy of any Compliance Certificate or other document or instrument received by it under the Loan Documents. The Administrative Agent may treat the payee of any Note as the holder thereof until written notice of transfer shall have been filed with the Administrative Agent signed by such payee in form satisfactory to the Administrative Agent. Each Lender acknowledges that it has independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender, and based upon such information, investigations and inquiries as it deems appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to extend credit to the Borrower in the manner set forth in the Loan Documents. It shall be the responsibility of each Lender to keep itself informed as to the creditworthiness of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent shall have no liability to any Lender with respect thereto.
 
. The Lenders shall ratably, in accordance with their respective Percentages, indemnify and hold the Administrative Agent, and its directors, officers, employees, agents and representatives harmless from and against any liabilities, losses, costs or expenses suffered or incurred by it under any Loan Document or in connection with the transactions contemplated thereby, regardless of when asserted or arising, except to the extent they are promptly reimbursed for the same by the Borrower and except to the extent that any event giving rise to a claim was caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party seeking to be indemnified. The obligations of the Lenders under this Section 12.6 shall survive termination of this Agreement.
Section 12.6. Indemnity
 
. The Administrative Agent may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Lenders and the Borrower. Upon any such notice of resignation of the Administrative Agent, the Required Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor Administrative Agent with the consent of the Borrower. If no successor Administrative Agent shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders, and shall have accepted such appointment, within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent's giving of notice of resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders, appoint a successor Administrative Agent, which shall be any Lender hereunder or any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or of any State thereof and having a combined capital and surplus of at least $200,000,000. The retiring Administrative Agent shall continue as Administrative Agent hereunder until a successor Administrative Agent has accepted appointment as Administrative Agent. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as the Administrative Agent hereunder, such successor Administrative Agent shall thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights and duties of the retiring or removed Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations thereunder. After any retiring Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder as Administrative Agent, the provisions of this Section 12 and all protective provisions of the other Loan Documents shall inure to its benefit as to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Administrative Agent.
Section 12.7. Resignation of Administrative Agent and Successor Administrative Agent
 
The L/C Issuer shall act on behalf of the Lenders with respect to any Letters of Credit issued by it and the documents associated therewith. The L/C Issuer shall have all of the benefits and immunities (i) provided to the Administrative Agent in this Section 12 with respect to any acts taken or omissions suffered by the L/C Issuer in connection with Letters of Credit issued by it or proposed to be issued by it and the Applications pertaining to such Letters of Credit as fully as if the term "Administrative Agent", as used in this Section 12, included the L/C Issuer with respect to such acts or omissions and (ii) as additionally provided in this Agreement with respect to such L/C Issuer.
Section 12.8. L/C Issuer.
 
. The Lenders designated as Syndication Agent or Documentation Agent shall have no duties or responsibilities for the administration of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents. The Administrative Agent shall have the continuing right, for purposes hereof, at any time and from time to time to designate one or more of the Lenders (and/or its or their Affiliates) as "syndication agents," "documentation agents," "arrangers," or other designations for purposes hereto, but such designation shall have no substantive effect, and such Lenders and their Affiliates shall have no additional powers, duties or responsibilities as a result thereof.
Section 12.9. Syndication Agent
 
S 13. T G.
ECTION
HE
UARANTIES
 
. To induce the Lenders to provide the credits described herein and in consideration of benefits expected to accrue to the Borrower by reason of the Revolving Credit Commitments and for other good and valuable consideration, receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, each Guarantor hereby unconditionally and irrevocably guarantees jointly and severally to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders, the due and punctual payment of all present and future Obligations, including, but not limited to, the due and punctual payment of principal of and interest on the Notes, the Reimbursement Obligations, and the due and punctual payment of all other Obligations now or hereafter owed by the Borrower under the Loan Documents as and when the same shall become due and payable, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration, or otherwise, according to the terms hereof and thereof. In case of failure by the Borrower punctually to pay any Obligations guaranteed hereby, each Guarantor hereby unconditionally agrees to make such payment or to cause such payment to be made punctually as and when the same shall become due and payable, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration, or otherwise, and as if such payment were made by the Borrower.
Section 13.1. The Guaranties
 
. The obligations of each Guarantor under this Section 13 shall be unconditional and absolute and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall not be released, discharged, or otherwise affected by:
Section 13.2. Guarantee Unconditional
 
(a) any extension, renewal, settlement, compromise, waiver, or release in respect of any obligation of the Borrower or of any other guarantor under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or by operation of law or otherwise;
 
(b) any modification or amendment of or supplement to this Agreement or any other Loan Document;
 
(c) any change in the corporate existence, structure, or ownership of, or any insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization, or other similar proceeding affecting, the Borrower, any other guarantor, or any of their respective assets, or any resulting release or discharge of any obligation of the Borrower or of any other guarantor contained in any Loan Document;
 
(d) the existence of any claim, set-off, or other rights which the Borrower or any other guarantor may have at any time against the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person, whether or not arising in connection herewith;
 
(e) any failure to assert, or any assertion of, any claim or demand or any exercise of, or failure to exercise, any rights or remedies against the Borrower, any other guarantor, or any other Person or Property;
 
(f) any application of any sums by whomsoever paid or howsoever realized to any obligation of the Borrower, regardless of what obligations of the Borrower remain unpaid;
 
(g) any invalidity or unenforceability relating to or against the Borrower or any other guarantor for any reason of this Agreement or of any other Loan Document or any provision of applicable law or regulation purporting to prohibit the payment by the Borrower or any other guarantor of the principal of or interest on any Note or any Reimbursement Obligation or any other amount payable under the Loan Documents; or
 
(h) any other act or omission to act or delay of any kind by the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person or any other circumstance whatsoever that might, but for the provisions of this paragraph, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of the obligations of any Guarantor under this Section 13.
 
. Each Guarantor's obligations under this Section 13 shall remain in full force and effect until the Commitments are terminated, all Letters of Credit have expired, and the principal of and interest on the Notes and all other amounts payable by the Borrower and the Guarantors under this Agreement and all other Loan Documents shall have been paid in full. If at any time any payment of the principal of or interest on any Note or any Reimbursement Obligation or any other amount payable by the Borrower or any Guarantor under the Loan Documents is rescinded or must be otherwise restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy, or reorganization of the Borrower or of any guarantor, or otherwise, each Guarantor's obligations under this Section 13 with respect to such payment shall be reinstated at such time as though such payment had become due but had not been made at such time.
Section 13.3. Discharge Only upon Payment in Full; Reinstatement in Certain Circumstances
 
. Each Guarantor agrees it will not exercise any rights which it may acquire by way of subrogation by any payment made hereunder, or otherwise, until all the Obligations shall have been paid in full subsequent to the termination of all the Revolving Credit Commitments and expiration of all Letters of Credit. If any amount shall be paid to a Guarantor on account of such subrogation rights at any time prior to the later of (x) the payment in full of
Section 13.4. Subrogation
 
the Obligations and all other amounts payable by the Borrower hereunder and the other Loan Documents and (y) the termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments and expiration of all Letters of Credit, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and shall forthwith be paid to the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders or be credited and applied upon the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
 
. Each Guarantor irrevocably waives acceptance hereof, presentment, demand, protest, and any notice not provided for herein, as well as any requirement that at any time any action be taken by the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person against the Borrower, another guarantor, or any other Person.
Section 13.5. Waivers
 
. Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the right of recovery against each Guarantor under this Section 13 shall not exceed $1.00 less than the lowest amount which would render such Guarantor's obligations under this Section 13 void or voidable under applicable law, including, without limitation, fraudulent conveyance law.
Section 13.6. Limit on Recovery
 
. If acceleration of the time for payment of any amount payable by the Borrower under this Agreement or any other Loan Document is stayed upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of the Borrower, all such amounts otherwise subject to acceleration under the terms of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents shall nonetheless be payable by the Guarantors hereunder forthwith on demand by the Administrative Agent made at the request of the Required Lenders.
Section 13.7. Stay of Acceleration
 
. All of the Guarantors are engaged in related businesses and integrated to such an extent that the financial strength and flexibility of each Guarantor has a direct impact on the success of each other Guarantor. Each Guarantor will derive substantial direct and indirect benefit from the extension of credit hereunder.
Section 13.8. Benefit to Guarantors
 
Each Guarantor shall take such action as the Borrower is required by this Agreement to cause such Guarantor to take, and shall refrain from taking such action as the Borrower is required by this Agreement to prohibit such Guarantor from taking.
Section 13.9. Guarantor Covenants.
 
S 14. M.
ECTION
ISCELLANEOUS
 
. (a) . Except as otherwise required by law and subject to Section 14.1(b) hereof, each payment by the Borrower under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents shall be made without withholding for or on account of any present or future taxes (other than overall net income taxes on the recipient) imposed by or within the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is domiciled, any jurisdiction from which the Borrower makes any payment, or (in each case) any political subdivision or taxing authority thereof or therein. If any such withholding is so required, the Borrower shall make the withholding, pay the amount withheld to the appropriate governmental authority before penalties attach thereto or interest accrues thereon and forthwith pay such additional amount as may be necessary to ensure that the net amount actually received by each Lender and the Administrative
Section 14.1. Withholding Taxes
Payments Free of Withholding
 
Agent free and clear of such taxes (including such taxes on such additional amount) is equal to the amount which that Lender or the Administrative Agent (as the case may be) would have received had such withholding not been made. If the Administrative Agent or any Lender pays any amount in respect of any such taxes, penalties or interest, the Borrower shall reimburse the Administrative Agent or that Lender for that payment on demand in the currency in which such payment was made. If the Borrower pays any such taxes, penalties or interest, it shall deliver official tax receipts evidencing that payment or certified copies thereof to the Lender or Administrative Agent on whose account such withholding was made (with a copy to the Administrative Agent if not the recipient of the original) on or before the thirtieth day after payment.
 
(b) . Each Lender that is not a United States person (as such term is defined in Section 7701(a)(30) of the Code) shall submit to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent on or before the earlier of the initial Credit Event and 30 days after the date hereof, two duly completed and signed copies of either Form W-8 BEN (or substantially similar substitute forms) or Form W-8ECI (or substantially similar substitute forms) of the United States Internal Revenue Service certifying such Lender's entitlement to a complete exemption from United States withholding tax with respect to payments to be made under this Agreement. Thereafter and from time to time, each Lender shall submit to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent such additional duly completed and signed copies of one or the other of such Forms (or such successor forms as shall be adopted from time to time by the relevant United States taxing authorities) as may be (i) requested by the Borrower in a written notice, directly or through the Administrative Agent, to such Lender and (ii) required under then-current United States law or regulations to avoid or reduce United States withholding taxes on payments in respect of all amounts to be received by such Lender, including fees, pursuant to the Loan Documents or the Loans. All forms or amendments described in the preceding sentence shall certify that such Lender is entitled to receive payments under this Agreement without deduction or withholding of any United States federal income taxes, unless an event (including without limitation any change in treaty, law or regulation) has occurred prior to the date on which any such delivery would otherwise be required which renders all such forms inapplicable or which would prevent such Lender from duly completing and delivering any such form or amendment with respect to it and such Lender advises the Borrower and the Administrative Agent that it is not capable of receiving payments without any deduction or withholding of United States federal income tax. For any period during which a Lender that is not a United States Person has failed to provide the Borrower with an appropriate form pursuant to this Section 14.1(b) (unless such failure is due to a change in treaty, law or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, occurring subsequent to the date on which a form originally was required to be provided), such Lender shall not be entitled to indemnification under this Section 14.1 with respect to taxes imposed by the United States.
U.S. Withholding Tax Exemptions
 
(c) . If any Lender determines, as a result of any change in applicable law, regulation or treaty, or in any official application or interpretation thereof, that it is unable to submit to the Borrower or Administrative Agent any form or certificate that such Lender is obligated to submit pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section 14.1 or that such Lender is required to withdraw or cancel any such form or certificate previously submitted or any such form or certificate otherwise becomes ineffective or inaccurate, such
Inability of Lender to Submit Forms
 
Lender shall promptly notify the Borrower and Administrative Agent of such fact and the Lender shall to that extent not be obligated to provide any such form or certificate and will be entitled to withdraw or cancel any affected form or certificate, as applicable.
 
(d) If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines that it has received a refund of any taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 14.1, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section 14.1 with respect to the taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant governmental authority with respect to such refund); that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant governmental authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to pay such refund to such governmental authority.
Tax Refunds.
provided
 
. No delay or failure on the part of the Administrative Agent or any Lender or on the part of any holder or holders of any of the Obligations in the exercise of any power or right under any Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor as an acquiescence in any default, nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise of any other power or right. The rights and remedies hereunder of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and any holder or holders of any of the Obligations are cumulative to, and not exclusive of, any rights or remedies which any of them would otherwise have.
Section 14.2. No Waiver of Rights
 
. If any payment hereunder becomes due and payable on a day which is not a Business Day, the due date of such payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day on which date such payment shall be due and payable. In the case of any payment of principal falling due on a day which is not a Business Day, interest on such principal amount shall continue to accrue during such extension at the rate per annum then in effect, which accrued amount shall be due and payable on the next scheduled date for the payment of interest.
Section 14.3. Non-Business Day
 
. The Borrower agrees that it will pay any documentary, stamp or similar taxes payable in respect of any Loan Document, including interest and penalties, in the event any such taxes are assessed, irrespective of when such assessment is made and whether or not any credit is then in use or available hereunder.
Section 14.4. Documentary Taxes
 
. All representations and warranties made herein or in certificates given pursuant hereto shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, and shall continue in full force and effect with respect to the date as of which they were made as long as any credit is in use or available hereunder.
Section 14.5. Survival of Representations
 
. All indemnities and all other provisions relative to reimbursement to the Lenders of amounts sufficient to protect the yield of the Lenders with respect to the Loans, including, but not limited to, Section 3.6, Section 11.3 and Section 14.15 hereof, shall survive the termination of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and the payment of the Loans and all other Obligations.
Section 14.6. Survival of Indemnities
 
. Each Lender agrees with each other Lender which is a party hereto that if such Lender shall receive and retain any payment, whether by set-off or application of deposit balances or otherwise (), on any of the Loans or Reimbursement Obligations in excess of its ratable share of payments on all such obligations then outstanding to the Lenders, then such Lender shall purchase for cash at face value, but without recourse, ratably from each of the other Lenders such amount of the Loans or Reimbursement Obligations, or participations therein, held by each such other Lenders (or interest therein) as shall be necessary to cause such Lender to share such excess payment ratably with all the other Lenders; that if any such purchase is made by any Lender, and if such excess payment or part thereof is thereafter recovered from such purchasing Lender, the related purchases from the other Lenders shall be rescinded ratably and the purchase price restored as to the portion of such excess payment so recovered, but without interest. For purposes of this Section 14.7, amounts owed to or recovered by, the Administrative Agent in connection with Reimbursement Obligations in which Lenders have been required to fund their participation shall be treated as amounts owed to or recovered by the Administrative Agent as a Lender hereunder.
Section 14.7. Sharing of Set-Off
"Set-off"
provided, however,
 
. Except as otherwise specified herein, all notices under the Loan Documents shall be in writing (including telecopy or other electronic communication) and shall be given to a party hereunder at its address or telecopier number set forth below or such other address or telecopier number as such party may hereafter specify by notice to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, given by courier, or by other telecommunication device capable of creating a written record of such notice and its receipt. Notices under the Loan Documents to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall be addressed to their respective addresses, telecopier or telephone numbers set forth on the signature pages hereof, and to the Borrower shall be addressed as follows:
Section 14.8. Notices
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Attention: General Counsel
Telephone: (630) 285-3457
Telecopy: (630) 285-3483
 
with a copy to:
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Attention: Treasurer
Telephone: (630) 285-3536
Telecopy: (630) 285-4272
 
Each such notice, request or other communication shall be effective (i) if given by telecopier, when such telecopy is transmitted to the telecopier number specified in this Section 14.8 or on the signature pages hereof and a confirmation of receipt of such telecopy has been received by the sender, (ii) if given by courier, when delivered or (iii) if given by any other means, when delivered at the addresses specified in this Section 14.8 or on the signature pages hereof; that any notice given pursuant to Section 1 hereof shall be effective only upon receipt.
provided
 
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterpart signature pages, and by the different parties on different counterparts, each of which when executed shall be deemed an original but all such counterparts taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement will be deemed executed by the parties hereto when each has signed it and delivered its executed signature page to the Administrative Agent by facsimile transmission, electronic transmission or physical delivery.
Section 14.9. Counterparts
 
. This Agreement shall be binding upon the Borrower, the Guarantors and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of each of the Lenders and the benefit of their respective successors and assigns, including any subsequent holder of any Note. The Borrower may not assign any of its rights or obligations under any Loan Document without the written consent of all of the Lenders. Except as otherwise provided for herein, no Guarantor may assign any of its rights or obligations under any Loan Document without the written consent of all the Lenders.
Section 14.10. Successors and Assigns
 
. Each Lender shall have the right at its own cost to grant participations (to be evidenced by one or more agreements or certificates of participation) in the Loans made and Reimbursement Obligations and/or Revolving Credit Commitment and/or participations in Swing Loans held by such Lender at any time and from time to time to one or more other banks, insurance companies, commercial lenders and other financial institutions; that no such participation shall relieve any Lender of any of its obligations under this Agreement, and that no such participant shall have any rights under this Agreement except as provided in this Section 14.11, and the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation or responsibility to such participant. Any party to which such a participation has been granted shall have the benefits of Section 3.6 and Section 11.3 hereof but shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under either such Section than the Lender granting such participation would have been entitled to receive with respect to the rights transferred. Any agreement pursuant to which any Lender may grant such a participating interest shall provide
Section 14.11. Participants
provided
provided further
 
that such Lender shall retain the sole right and responsibility to enforce the obligations of the Borrower hereunder including, without limitation, the right to approve any amendment or modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such participation agreement may provide that such Lender will not agree to any modification, amendment or waiver of this Agreement that would (A) increase the Revolving Credit Commitment of such Lender if such increase would also increase the participant's obligations, (B) forgive any amount of or postpone the date for payment of any principal of or interest on any Loan or Reimbursement Obligation or of any fee payable hereunder in which such participant has an interest or (C) reduce the stated rate at which interest or fees accrue or other amounts payable hereunder in which such participant has an interest. The Borrower authorizes each Lender to disclose to any participant or prospective participant under this Section 14.11 any financial or other information pertaining to the Borrower, subject to Section 14.21 hereof.
provided
 
. Each Lender may, from time to time upon at least five Business Days' notice to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, assign to other Persons all or any part of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including without limitation the indebtedness evidenced by each Note then owned by such assigning Lender, together with an equivalent proportion of its obligation to make Loans and advances and participate in Letters of Credit and Swing Loans hereunder) pursuant to written agreements in the form attached hereto as Exhibit F executed by such assigning Lender, such assignee Lender or Lenders, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, which agreements shall specify in each instance the portion of the indebtedness evidenced by each Note which is to be assigned to each such assignee lender and the portion of the Revolving Credit Commitment, and obligations to participate in Letters of Credit and Swing Loans, in each case of the assigning Lender to be assumed by such assignee lender (the ); that (i) each such assignment shall be of a constant, and not a varying, percentage of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement and the assignment shall cover the same percentage of such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment, Loans, Notes and interests in Letters of Credit and Swing Loans; (ii) the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitment of the assigning Lender being assigned pursuant to each such assignment (determined as of the effective date of the relevant Assignment Agreement) shall in no event be less than $5,000,000; (iii) unless the assigning Lender is assigning all of its Revolving Credit Commitment, outstanding Loans and L/C Obligations, each Lender shall maintain for its own account at least $5,000,000 of its Revolving Credit Commitment and the Administrative Agent must retain all of the Swing Line Loans; (iv) the Administrative Agent and the Borrower must each consent (which consents shall not be unreasonably withheld) to each such assignment (except that the Borrower's consent shall not be required if such assignment is made after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing) to a party which is not a Lender at such time except that such consents shall not be required in connection with an assignment by a Lender to a wholly-owned subsidiary or Affiliate of such Lender; and (v) the assigning Lender must pay to the Administrative Agent a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 and any out-of-pocket attorney's fees incurred by the Administrative Agent in connection with such Assignment Agreement. Upon the execution of each Assignment Agreement by the assigning Lender thereunder, the assignee lender thereunder, the Borrower (if applicable) and the Administrative Agent and payment to such assigning Lender by such assignee lender of the purchase price for the portion of the indebtedness of the Borrower being acquired by it, (i) such assignee lender
Section 14.12. Assignment Agreements
"Assignment Agreements"
provided, however,
 
shall thereupon become a for all purposes of this Agreement with a Revolving Credit Commitment (including the related obligations to participate in Letters of Credit and Swing Loans) in the amount set forth in such Assignment Agreement and with all the rights, powers and obligations afforded a Lender hereunder, (ii) such assigning Lender shall have no further liability for funding the portion of its Revolving Credit Commitment (including the related obligations to participate in Letters of Credit and Swing Loans) assumed by such new assignee Lender and (iii) the address for notices to such assignee Lender shall be as specified in the Assignment Agreement executed by it. Concurrently with the execution and delivery of such Assignment Agreement, the Borrower shall upon request execute and deliver a new Revolving Credit Note to the assignee Lender in the amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment (and a Swing Line Note if such assignee Lender is concurrently with such assignment becoming a new Administrative Agent) after giving effect to such assignment, all such Notes to constitute for all purposes of this Agreement. Nothing in this Section 14.12 shall prevent or prohibit any Lender which is a bank, trust company or other financial institution from pledging its Notes or Loans to a Federal Reserve Bank in support of borrowings made by such Lender from such Federal Reserve Bank; no such pledge, or any assignment pursuant to or in lieu of an enforcement of such a pledge, shall relieve the transferor Lender from its obligations hereunder.
"Lender"
"Notes"
 
. Any provision of the Loan Documents may be amended or waived if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed by (a) the Borrower, (b) the Required Lenders, and (c) if the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent are affected thereby, the Administrative Agent; that:
Section 14.13. Amendments
provided
 
(i) no amendment or waiver pursuant to this Section 14.13 shall (A) increase the Revolving Credit Commitment of any Lender without the consent of such Lender or (B) increase the Swing Line Sublimit without the consent of Harris or (C) forgive, or reduce the amount of, or postpone any fixed date for payment of, any principal of or interest on any Loan or Reimbursement Obligation or any fee payable hereunder without the consent of each Lender or (D) reduce the stated rate at which interest or any fee hereunder is calculated; and
 
(ii) no amendment or waiver pursuant to this Section 14.13 shall, unless signed by each Lender, change any provision of Section 8, Section 10.1(a), Section 11, this Section 14.13, or the definition of Required Lenders, or release any Guarantor (except as set forth below), or affect the number of Lenders required to take any action under the Loan Documents.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Lenders authorize the Administrative Agent to release any Guarantor which, subsequent to its execution of a Guaranty, ceases (for any reason not prohibited by the terms hereof) to be a direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary.
 
. Section headings used in this Agreement are for reference only and shall not affect the construction of this Agreement.
Section 14.14. Headings
 
. The Borrower agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses of the Administrative Agent in connection with the preparation
Section 14.15. Legal Fees, Other Costs and Indemnification
 
and negotiation of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, the reasonable fees and disbursements of Chapman and Cutler, counsel to the Administrative Agent, in connection with the preparation and execution of the Loan Documents, and any amendment, waiver or consent related hereto, whether or not the transactions contemplated herein are consummated. The Borrower further agrees to indemnify each Lender, the Administrative Agent, and their respective directors, officers and employees against all losses, claims, damages, penalties, judgments, liabilities and related expenses (including, without limitation, all expenses of litigation or preparation therefor, whether or not the indemnified Person is a party thereto) which any of them may incur or reasonably pay arising out of or relating to any Loan Document or any of the transactions contemplated thereby or the direct or indirect application or proposed application of the proceeds of any Loan or Letter of Credit, other than those which arise from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party claiming indemnification. The Borrower, upon demand by the Administrative Agent or a Lender at any time, shall reimburse the Administrative Agent or Lender for any reasonable legal or other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending against any of the foregoing except if the same is directly due to the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party to be indemnified.
 
. In addition to any rights now or hereafter granted under applicable law and not by way of limitation of any such rights, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default, each Lender and each subsequent holder of any Note is hereby authorized by the Borrower at any time or from time to time, without notice to the Borrower or to any other Person, any such notice being hereby expressly waived, to set off and to appropriate and to apply any and all deposits (general or special, including, but not limited to, indebtedness evidenced by certificates of deposit, whether matured or unmatured, but not including trust accounts or premium trust accounts, and in whatever currency denominated) and any other indebtedness at any time held or owing by that Lender or that subsequent holder to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower, whether or not matured, against and on account of the obligations and liabilities of the Borrower to that Lender or that subsequent holder under the Loan Documents, including, but not limited to, all claims of any nature or description arising out of or connected with the Loan Documents, irrespective of whether or not (a) that Lender or that subsequent holder shall have made any demand hereunder or (b) the principal of or the interest on the Loans or Notes and other amounts due hereunder shall have become due and payable pursuant to Section 8 and although said obligations and liabilities, or any of them, may be contingent or unmatured.
Section 14.16. Set Off
 
. The Loan Documents constitute the entire understanding of the parties thereto with respect to the subject matter thereof and any prior or contemporaneous agreements, whether written or oral, with respect thereto are superseded thereby.
Section 14.17. Entire Agreement
 
. This Agreement and the other Loan Documents, and the rights and duties of the parties hereto, shall be construed and determined in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Illinois.
Section 14.18. Governing Law
 
. To the fullest extent permitted by law, the obligation of the Borrower and each Guarantor in respect of any amount due in U.S. Dollars or an Alternative Currency (the ) under this Agreement shall, notwithstanding any payment in
Section 14.19. Currency
"relevant currency"
 
any other currency (whether pursuant to a judgment or otherwise), be discharged only to the extent of the amount in the relevant currency that the Person entitled to received such payment may, in accordance with normal banking procedures, purchase with the sum paid in such other currency (after any premium and costs of exchange) on the Business Day immediately following the day on which such Person receives such payment. If the amount of the relevant currency so purchased is less than the sum originally due to such Person in the relevant currency, the Borrower or relevant Guarantor agrees, as a separate obligation and notwithstanding any such judgment, to indemnify such Person against such loss, and if the amount of the specified currency so purchased exceeds the sum of (a) the amount originally due to the relevant Person in the specified currency plus (b) any amounts shared with other Lenders as a result of allocations of such excess as a disproportionate payment to such Person under Section 14.7 hereof, such Person agrees to remit such excess to the Borrower.
 
. The Borrower hereby submits to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the United States District Court for the Northern District of Illinois and of any Illinois State court sitting in the City of Chicago for purposes of all legal proceedings arising out of or relating to this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby. The Borrower irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such proceeding brought in such a court and any claim that any such proceeding brought in such a court has been brought in an inconvenient forum. T B, A A, L L D .
Section 14.20. Submission to Jurisdiction; Waiver of Jury Trial
HE
ORROWER
THE
DMINISTRATIVE
GENT
AND
EACH
ENDER
HEREBY
IRREVOCABLY
WAIVES
ANY
AND
ALL
RIGHT
TO
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
LEGAL
PROCEEDING
ARISING
OUT
OF
OR
RELATING
TO
ANY
OAN
OCUMENT
OR
THE
TRANSACTIONS
CONTEMPLATED
THEREBY
 
. Each Lender that is subject to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ) hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the Act, it is required to obtain, verify, and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrower in accordance with the Act.
Section 14.21. USA Patriot Act
"Act"
 
. Each Lender agrees to maintain in confidence and not to disclose without the Borrower's consent (other than to its employees, affiliates, auditors, counsel or other professional advisors, or to another Lender, each of which shall also be bound by this Section 14.22) any information concerning the Borrower or any Subsidiaries furnished pursuant to this Agreement and not previously disclosed in any filing made by the Borrower with the SEC; that any Lender may disclose any such information (a) that has become generally available to the public, (b) if required or appropriate in any report, statement or testimony submitted to any regulatory body having or claiming to have jurisdiction over such Lender, (c) if required or appropriate in response to any summons or subpoena or in connection with any litigation, (d) in order to comply with any law, order, regulation or ruling applicable to such Lender, or (e) to any prospective or actual participant under Section 14.11 or 14.12 hereof in connection with any contemplated or actual transfer of a participating or other interest in such Lender's rights or obligations hereunder; , that (i) such actual or prospective transferee executes an agreement with such Lender containing provisions substantially identical to those
Section 14.22. Confidentiality
provided
provided
 
contained in this Section 14.22 and (ii) in the case of any disclosure under subsection (c) above, such Lender shall (to the extent permitted by applicable law) notify the Borrower of such disclosure so that the Borrower may seek an appropriate protective order or waive such Lender's compliance with the provisions of this Section, it being understood that if the Borrower has no right to obtain such a protective order or if the Borrower does not commence procedures to obtain such a protective order within ten Business Days of the receipt of such notice, such Lender's compliance with this Section shall be deemed to have been waived with respect to such disclosure. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, confidential information shall not include, and each Lender and the Borrower (and each employee, representative or other agent of any Lender or the Borrower) may disclose to any and all Persons, without limitation of any kind, the "tax treatment" and "tax structure" (in each case, within the meaning of Treasury Regulation Section 1.6011-4) of the transactions contemplated hereby and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are or have been provided to such party relating to such tax treatment or tax structure; that with respect to any document or similar item that in either case contains information concerning such tax treatment or tax structure of the transactions contemplated hereby as well as other information, this sentence shall only apply to such portions of the document or similar item that relate to such tax treatment or tax structure.
provided
 
 
This Multicurrency Credit Agreement is entered into between us for the uses and purposes hereinabove set forth as of the date first above written.
 
 
Each of the undersigned hereby elects to be a for all purposes of this Agreement. Each of the undersigned confirms that the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 hereof are true and correct as to the undersigned as of the date hereof and that each shall comply with all of the covenants set forth in Section 9 hereof to the extent applicable to it. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each of the undersigned hereby agrees to perform all the obligations of a Guarantor under, and to be bound in all respects by the terms of, this Agreement, including without limitation Section 13 hereof.
"Guarantor"
 
 
Accepted and agreed to as of the day and year last above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Attention:
 
Reference is made to the Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of October 5, 2005 among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., the Lenders named therein, and Harris N.A., as Administrative Agent (the ). Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Credit Agreement. or
"Credit Agreement"
[The Borrower, , has failed to pay its Reimbursement Obligation in the amount of $. Your Lender's Percentage of the unpaid Reimbursement Obligation is $]
                    
            
            
[The L/C Issuer has been required to return a payment by the Borrower, , of a Reimbursement Obligation in the amount of $. Your Lender's Percentage of the returned Reimbursement Obligations is $.]
                    
            
            
 
 
 
October 5, 2005
 
F V R, the undersigned, A J. G & C., a Delaware corporation (the ), promises to pay to the order of (the ) on the Termination Date of the hereinafter defined Credit Agreement, at the principal office of Harris N.A., in Chicago, Illinois, (or in the case of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency, at such office as the Administrative Agent has previously notified the Borrower) in the currency of such Loan in accordance with Section 4.2 of the Credit Agreement, the aggregate unpaid principal amount of all Revolving Loans made by the Lender to the Borrower pursuant to the Credit Agreement, together with interest on the principal amount of each Revolving Loan from time to time outstanding hereunder at the rates, and payable in the manner and on the dates, specified in the Credit Agreement.
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
RTHUR
ALLAGHER
O
"Borrower"
                                        
"Lender"
 
The Lender shall record on its books or records or on a schedule attached to this Note, which is a part hereof, each Revolving Loan made by it pursuant to the Credit Agreement, together with all payments of principal and interest and the principal balances from time to time outstanding hereon, whether the Revolving Loan is a Base Rate Loan or a Eurocurrency Loan, the currency thereof and the interest rate and Interest Period applicable thereto, that prior to the transfer of this Note all such amounts shall be recorded on a schedule attached to this Note. The record thereof, whether shown on such books or records or on a schedule to this Note, shall be evidence of the same, that the failure of the Lender to record any of the foregoing or any error in any such record shall not limit or otherwise affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay all Revolving Loans made to it pursuant to the Credit Agreement together with accrued interest thereon.
provided
prima facie
provided, however,
 
This Note is one of the Notes referred to in the Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of even date herewith, among the Borrower, Harris N.A., individually and as Administrative Agent, and the lenders from time to time party thereto (said Multicurrency Credit Agreement, as amended, modified or restated from time to time, being referred to herein as the ), and this Note and the holder hereof are entitled to all the benefits provided for thereby or referred to therein, to which Credit Agreement reference is hereby made for a statement thereof. All defined terms used in this Note, except terms otherwise defined herein, shall have the same meaning as in the Credit Agreement.
"Credit Agreement"
 
Prepayments may be made hereon and this Note may be declared due prior to the expressed maturity hereof, all in the events, on the terms and in the manner as provided for in the Credit Agreement.
 
This Note shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Illinois.
The Borrower hereby promises to pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees) suffered or incurred by the holder hereof in collecting this Note or enforcing any rights in any collateral therefor, all as more particularly provided in the Credit Agreement. The Borrower hereby waives demand, presentment, protest or notice of any kind hereunder except as expressly provided in the Credit Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
On the Termination Date, for value received, the undersigned, A J. G & C., a Delaware corporation (the ), promises to pay to the order of Harris N.A. (the ), at the principal office of Harris N.A. in Chicago, Illinois, the principal sum of (i) Thirty Million and 00/100 Dollars ($30,000,000.00), or (ii) such lesser amount as may at the time of the maturity hereof, whether by acceleration or otherwise, be the aggregate unpaid principal amount of all Swing Loans owing from the Borrower to the Lender pursuant to the Credit Agreement hereinafter mentioned.
RTHUR
ALLAGHER
O
"Borrower"
"Lender"
 
This Note evidences Swing Loans made and to be made to the Borrower by the Lender pursuant to that certain Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of even date herewith among the Borrower, Harris N.A., individually and as Administrative Agent, and the lenders from time to time party thereto (said Multicurrency Credit Agreement, as amended, modified or restated from time to time, being referred to herein as the ), and the Borrower hereby promises to pay interest at the office specified above on each Swing Loan evidenced hereby at the rates and times specified therefor in the Credit Agreement.
"Credit Agreement"
 
Each Swing Loan made by the Lender to the Borrower against this Note, any repayment of principal hereon and the interest rates applicable thereto shall be endorsed by the holder hereof on the reverse side of this Note or recorded on the books and records of the holder hereof (that such entries shall be endorsed on the reverse side hereof prior to any negotiation hereof) and the Borrower agrees that in any action or proceeding instituted to collect or enforce collection of this Note, the entries so endorsed on the reverse side hereof or recorded on the books and records of the Lender shall be evidence of the unpaid balance of this Note and the interest rates applicable thereto.
provided
prima facie
 
This Note is issued by the Borrower under the terms and provisions of the Credit Agreement, and this Note and the holder hereof are entitled to all of the benefits and security provided for thereby or referred to therein, to which reference is hereby made for a statement thereof. This Note may be declared to be, or be and become, due prior to its expressed maturity as specified in the Credit Agreement, and certain prepayments are required to be made hereon, all in the events, on the terms and with the effects provided in the Credit Agreement. All capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the same meaning herein as such terms have in the Credit Agreement.
 
This Note shall be construed in accordance with, and governed by, the internal laws of the State of Illinois without regard to principles of conflict of law.
 
The Borrower hereby promises to pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees) suffered or incurred by the holder hereof in collecting this Note or enforcing any
rights in any collateral therefor, all as more particularly provided in the Credit Agreement. The Borrower hereby waives demand, presentment, protest or notice of any kind hereunder except as expressly provided in the Credit Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
Harris N.A.,
as Administrative Agent (the )
"Administrative Agent"
for the Lenders referred to below
111 West Monroe Street
Chicago, Illinois 60603
 
Attention: Agency Services
 
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
In accordance with the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby requests that the Administrative Agent consent to an increase in the aggregate Revolving Credit Commitments (the ), in accordance with Section 3.8 of the Credit Agreement, to be effected by . Capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the same meanings herein as such terms have in the Credit Agreement.
"Commitment Amount Increase"
[an increase in the Revolving Credit Commitment of [name of existing Lender(s)] [and] [the addition of [each of] [name of each new Lender] (the [each a]
"New Lender"
) as a Lender under the terms of the Credit Agreement]
 
After giving effect to such Commitment Amount Increase, the Revolving Credit Commitment of the shall be
[Lender(s)]
[New Lenders]
[$.] [as follows:
            
 
 
 
1. The New Lender hereby confirms that it has received a copy of the Loan Documents and the exhibits related thereto, together with copies of the documents which were required to be delivered under the Credit Agreement as a condition to the making of the Loans and other extensions of credit thereunder. The New Lender acknowledges and agrees that it has made and will continue to make, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, its own credit analysis and decisions relating to the Credit Agreement. The New Lender further acknowledges and agrees that the Administrative Agent has not made any representations or warranties about the creditworthiness of the Borrower or any other party to the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or with respect to the legality, validity, sufficiency or enforceability of the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or the value of any security therefor.
[Each]
[Each]
 
2. Except as otherwise provided in the Credit Agreement, effective as of the date of acceptance hereof by the Administrative Agent, the New Lender (i) shall be deemed automatically to have become a party to the Credit Agreement and have all the rights and obligations of a under the Credit Agreement as if it were an original signatory thereto and (ii) agrees to be bound by the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement as if it were an original signatory thereto.
[each]
"Lender"
 
3. The New Lender hereby advises you of the following administrative details with respect to its Loans and Revolving Credit Commitments:
[Each]
 
 
Institution Name:
                            
 
Address:
                                           
 
               _____________________
 
Telephone:
                                      
 
Facsimile:
                                       
 
 
[4. The [Each] New Lender has delivered, if appropriate, to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (or is delivering to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent concurrently herewith) the tax forms referred to in Section 4.1 of the Credit Agreement.]
*
 
T A , , S I.
HIS
GREEMENT
SHALL
BE
DEEMED
TO
BE
A
CONTRACTUAL
OBLIGATION
UNDER
AND
SHALL
BE
GOVERNED
BY
AND
CONSTRUED
IN
ACCORDANCE
WITH
THE
LAWS
OF
THE
TATE
OF
LLINOIS
 
The Commitment Amount Increase shall be effective when the executed consent of the Administrative Agent is received or otherwise in accordance with Section 3.8, of the Credit Agreement, but not in any case prior to , . It shall be a condition to the effectiveness of the Commitment Amount Increase that all expenses referred to in Section 3.8 of the Credit Agreement shall have been paid.
                                        
        
 
 
The Borrower hereby certifies that no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
 
Please indicate the Administrative Agent's consent to such Commitment Amount Increase by signing the enclosed copy of this letter in the space provided below.
 
 
The undersigned hereby consents
on this day of ,
    
                    
to the above-requested Commitment
            
Amount Increase.
 
 
 
 
This Compliance Certificate is furnished to Harris N.A. as Administrative Agent pursuant to the Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of October 5, 2005 among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., the Lenders signatory thereto and Harris N.A., as Administrative Agent (the ). Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
"Credit Agreement"
 
T :
HE
UNDERSIGNED
HEREBY
CERTIFIES
THAT
 
1. I am the duly elected of the Borrower;
                                                             
 
2. I have reviewed the terms of the Credit Agreement and I have made, or have caused to be made under my supervision, a detailed review of the financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries during the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements;
 
3. The examinations described in paragraph 2 did not disclose, and I have no knowledge of, the existence of any condition or the occurrence of any event which constitutes a Default or Event of Default during or at the end of the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements or as of the date of this Certificate, except as set forth below;
 
4. The financial statements required by Section 9.4 of the Credit Agreement and being furnished to you concurrently with this certificate are, to the best of my knowledge, fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial conditions of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the dates and for the periods covered thereby; and
 
5. The Attachment hereto sets forth financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with certain covenants of the Credit Agreement, all of which data and computations are, to the best of my knowledge, true, complete and correct and have been made in accordance with the relevant Sections of the Credit Agreement.
 
6. During the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower, no Subsidiary became a direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary .
[except for ]
                                         
 
Described below are the exceptions, if any, to paragraph 3 by listing, in detail, the nature of the condition or event, the period during which it has existed and the action which the Borrower has taken, is taking, or proposes to take with respect to each such condition or event:
 
        _________________________________________________________________________________________________________
 
        _________________________________________________________________________________________________________
        _________________________________________________________________________________________________________
 
        _________________________________________________________________________________________________________
 
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in the Attachment hereto and the financial statements delivered with this Certificate in support hereof, are made and delivered this day of 20.
                    
                    
    
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Reference is made to the Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of October 5, 2005 (as extended, renewed, amended or restated from time to time, the ) among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., the Lenders and Harris N.A., as Administrative Agent for the Lenders. Terms defined in the Credit Agreement are used herein with the same meaning.
"Credit Agreement"
 
(the ) and (the ) agree as follows:
                                                             
"Assignor"
                                        
"Assignee"
 
1. The Assignor hereby sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby purchases and assumes from the Assignor, the amount and specified percentage interest as shown on Schedule I hereto of the Assignor's rights and obligations under the Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date (as defined below), including, without limitation, the Assignor's Revolving Credit Commitment as in effect on the Effective Date and the Revolving Loans, if any, owing to the Assignor on the Effective Date and the Assignor's Percentage of any outstanding L/C Obligations and Swing Loans, if any.
 
2. The Assignor (i) represents and warrants that it is the legal and beneficial owner of the interest being assigned by it hereunder and that such interest is free and clear of any adverse claim, lien, or encumbrance of any kind; (ii) makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Credit Agreement or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto; and (iii) makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to the financial condition of the Borrower or any Subsidiary or the performance or observance by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any of their respective obligations under the Credit Agreement or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto.
 
3. The Assignee (i) confirms that it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered to the Lenders pursuant to Section 9.4(a) and Section 9.4(b) thereof and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Acceptance; (ii) agrees that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Credit Agreement; (iii) appoints and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such action as Administrative Agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto; (iv) agrees that it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the
obligations which by the terms of the Credit Agreement are required to be performed by it as a Lender; and (v) specifies as its lending offices (and address for notices) the offices set forth beneath its name on the signature pages hereof.
 
4. As consideration for the assignment and sale contemplated in Section 1 hereof, the Assignee shall pay to the Assignor on the date hereof in Federal funds the amount agreed upon between them. It is understood that commitment and/or Letter of Credit fees accrued to the date hereof with respect to the interest assigned hereby are for the account of the Assignor and such fees accruing from and including the date hereof are for the account of the Assignee. Each of the Assignor and the Assignee hereby agrees that if it receives any amount under the Credit Agreement which is for the account of the other party hereto, it shall receive the same for the account of such other party to the extent of such other party's interest therein and shall promptly pay the same to such other party.
 
5. The effective date for this Assignment and Acceptance shall be , 20 (the ). Following the execution of this Assignment and Acceptance, it will be delivered to the Borrower for its acceptance, to the extent required by the Credit Agreement, and to the Administrative Agent for acceptance and recording by the Administrative Agent.
                    
    
"Effective Date"
 
6. Upon such acceptance and recording, as of the Effective Date, (i) the Assignee shall be a party to the Credit Agreement and, to the extent provided in this Assignment and Acceptance, have the rights and obligations of a Lender thereunder and (ii) the Assignor shall, to the extent provided in this Assignment and Acceptance, relinquish its rights and be released from its obligations under the Credit Agreement.
 
7. Upon such acceptance and recording, from and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments under the Credit Agreement in respect of the interest assigned hereby (including, without limitation, all payments of principal, interest and commitment fees with respect thereto) to the Assignee. The Assignor and Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments under the Credit Agreement for periods prior to the Effective Date directly between themselves.
 
8. In accordance with Section 14.12 of the Credit Agreement, the Assignor and the Assignee request and direct that the Administrative Agent prepare and cause the Borrower to execute and deliver to the Assignee a Revolving Credit Note payable to the Assignee in the amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment and to the Assignor a new Revolving Credit Note in the amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment, in each case, after giving effect to this assignment.
 
9. This Assignment and Acceptance shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of Illinois.
 
 
 
 
 
The Assignee hereby purchases and assumes from the Assignor the following interest in and to all of the Assignor's rights and obligations under the Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date:
 
 
 
, 200
                    
    
 
H N.A., as Administrative Agent for the Lenders named in the Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of October 5, 2005, among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., as Borrower, the Guarantors referred to therein, the Lenders from time to time party thereto, and the Administrative Agent (the )
ARRIS
"Credit Agreement"
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement described above. Terms not defined herein which are defined in the Credit Agreement shall have for the purposes hereof the meaning provided therein.
 
The undersigned, , a hereby elects to be a for all purposes of the Credit Agreement, effective from the date hereof. The undersigned confirms that the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 of the Credit Agreement are true and correct in all material respects as and to the extent that they apply to the undersigned as of the date hereof and the undersigned shall comply with each of the covenants set forth in Section 9 of the Credit Agreement applicable to it.
[name of Subsidiary Guarantor]
[jurisdiction of incorporation or organization]
"Guarantor"
 
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the undersigned hereby agrees to perform all the obligations of a Guarantor under, and to be bound in all respects by the terms of, the Credit Agreement, including without limitation Section 13 thereof, to the same extent and with the same force and effect as if the undersigned were a signatory party thereto.
 
The undersigned acknowledges that this Agreement shall be effective upon its execution and delivery to the Administrative Agent, and it shall not be necessary for the Administrative Agent or any Lender to execute this Agreement or any other acceptance hereof. This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the internal laws of the State of Illinois.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Those companies which are indented represent Subsidiaries of the corporation under which they are indented. Except for directors' qualifying shares, 100% of the Voting Stock of each of the Subsidiaries listed below, other than those indicated by footnote, is owned of record or beneficially by its indicated parent Direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiaries appear in bold-faced type.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Itasca, IL, October 5, 2005  Gallagher today announced that it entered into a $450 million unsecured credit facility, expiring on October 4, 2010, with a group of nine financial institutions led by Harris N.A., Citibank, N.A., and Barclays Bank PLC. Gallagher may also request an additional $100 million in funding capacity within the facility. Funds may be drawn for stock repurchase, future acquisitions or general corporate purposes. This agreement replaces a $250 million unsecured revolving credit facility that was due to expire in July 2006.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20051025170029.txt.gz
TIME:20051025170029
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On October 25, 2005, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's third quarter 2005 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, October 25, 2005  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine-month period ended September 30, 2005. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
 
Quarter Ended September 30
 
 
"2005 has seen an unprecedented amount of hurricane losses. In particular, Katrina, Rita and now Wilma are putting incredible stress on our clients, on our employees and likely on industry-wide insurance pricing and capacity. Gallagher's teams have done an outstanding job of putting our clients' needs first and I couldn't be more pleased with our team's resilience. The insurance industry now has a tremendous opportunity to prove its value and we are proud to be part of that process," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "Our brokerage segment's revenue growth of 10% and our risk management segment's 7% revenue growth are outstanding quarterly results when faced with rate softening as well as regulatory turmoil. We believe we are making progress with the regulatory environment and look forward to focusing on building our company."
 
Brokerage and Risk Management Combined Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 26, 2005 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded under the symbol "AJG" on the New York Stock Exchange.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the area of tax legislation and in crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6.
 
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2005 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20051031161234.txt.gz
TIME:20051031161234
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
The October 2005 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
October 2005
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
The presentation relating to this material may contain forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may be subject to reduction due to the elimination of contingent commission arrangements in 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws or unfavorable interpretations of such laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of Syn/Coal credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Regulation G Disclosure
This presentation includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our investor relations web-site at www.ajg.com.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm Public since 1984 Market capitalization of $2.7 billion Shares outstanding of 95.2 million Dividend yield of 3.9% 52-week range  $34.25$25.42 Traded NYSE as "AJG"
As of 9/30/05, unless otherwise indicated
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
Performance vs. S&P
350% 300% 250% 200% 150% 100% 50% 0%
Jan-00 Jan-01 Jan-02 Jan-03 Jan-04 Jan-05
Arthur J Gallagher & Co [AJG] S&P 500 [SPX]
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
20 %
CAGR
2000 Total Revenues 2004 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
34% CAGR
2000 Cash Flow from Ops 2004
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
19% CAGR
1985 Dividends 2005 $1.12
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group* Dividend yield of 3.9% indicated in 2005
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations *Through 12/31/04
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Real Growth Story
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits)
September 30, 2005
Stock Price
$1.72
$28.81
Market Cap
$57 M
$2.7 B
Tangible Net Worth
$23 M
$377 M
Annual Dividend/Share
$.03
$1.12
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 19%
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Record revenues of $1.4B and earnings from continuing operations of $188M
Total Brokerage and Risk Management revenues increased 12% Total Brokerage and Risk Management pretax earnings increased 14% Completed record 19 acquisitions Record dividend increase of 39%
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2004 Achievements
Returned $141M in cash to stockholders $56M of share repurchases or 1.8M shares $85M of paid dividends
Increased GAAP Book Value to $761M Maintained tangible net worth at nearly $400M Navigated synfuel tax credit waters
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2005 Developments
Reached agreement with Illinois' Attorney General and Insurance Department on 5/18/05 Sold two medical claims management operations Continue divestiture of Financial Services assets Resolved Headwaters dispute Froze defined benefit pension plan effective 7/1/05 Establish $450M unsecured credit facility
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Long-term Goals $2.5$3.0 billion in revenues within five years
15% year-over-year earnings growth
30%+ annual return on Average Stockholders' Equity
11
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
Sales and marketing driven
Team-oriented and committed to growth Open "Small company" feel Client-focused Competitive No "C" players Niche advantaged
12
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2004
Total Revenues
Brokerage 67%
Financial Services 8%
Risk Management 25%
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 82%
Financial Services (8%)
Risk Management 26%
Total revenues from continuing operations exclude FIN 46 impact and investment gains
Pretax earnings from continuing operation excludes investment gains (no FIN 46 impact on earnings)
13
 
Brokerage Segment
Gallagher's largest business segment Acts as intermediary  no underwriting risk Niche driven Alternative market leaders
14
 
Brokerage Segment
Contingent Commission Status
Resolved issue without a lawsuit No unlawful conduct
No longer accepting contingent commissions as a retail broker Must disclose compensation to clients Still working to get buy-in from other states
15
 
Brokerage Segment
A Strategic Consolidator
Geographic diversity; enhance or expand capabilities Approximately 146 acquisitions in this segment from 1986 through 9/30/05 The rules: financial health, similar culture Gallagher is merger partner of choice
16
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits
1000 900 800 700 600 500 400 300 200 100 $458M
19% CAGR
$920M
00 01 02 03 04
Total Revenues
200 150 100 50 0 $89M
21% CAGR
$186M
00 01 02 03 04
Pretax Earnings
2004 pretax margins of 20%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 12%
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
17
 
Brokerage Segment
Three Primary Operations
Retail Brokerage 56% (Jim Gault)
Employee Benefits 18% (Jim Durkin)
Specialty Marketing & International 26% (Dave McGurn)
As of 9/30/05
18
 
Retail Brokerage Offices
19
 
Retail Brokerage
Niches
Agribusiness Aviation Captives
Claim Advocacy & Loss Control Construction Construction Project Solutions Energy Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education Management Liability Marine
Mergers & Acquisitions Personal Insurance Public Entity Real Estate
General Commercial Habitational Hospitality Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit Restaurant Scholastic K-12 Transportation Worldwide Risk Services
20
 
Retail Brokerage
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niches  number and size Acquisitions and hiring Alternative market
Captives Rent-a-captives Deductible plans Self-insurance
21
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Offices & Strategic Alliances
 
Specialty Marketing & International
Capabilities
Wholesale Brokerage International P/C Brokerage Programs/Program Administration Reinsurance Brokerage Captives/Rent-a-Captives CoverageFirst.com
23
 
Employee Benefits Offices
24
 
Employee Benefits
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/ Financial Planning Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation Compensation Program Design/Analysis
25
 
Employee Benefits
High Growth & Profit Potential
Niche marketing
Cross-selling opportunities with Retail Brokerage Merger and acquisition opportunities Assisting clients/prospects with four top priorities
Controlling health and welfare costs Providing better retirement tools/information Benefits communication and administration Compliance with federal and state regulations
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Gallagher's Property/Casualty Claims Management Operation "Gallagher Bassett"  Rich McKenna World's largest multiline, third-party administrator (Business Insurance magazine) Revenue growth is all organic Fee revenues are primarily generated based on number of claims Significant barriers to entry into this business  high retention levels
27
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits
350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0
16% CAGR
$203M $346M
2000 2004
Total Revenues
60 50 40 30 20 10 0
24% CAGR
$28M $58M
2000 2004
Pretax Earnings
2004 pretax margin of 17%
2004 growth in diluted net EPS of 47%
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
28
 
Gallagher Bassett Offices
ONTARIO
SCOTLAND
ENGLAND
AUSTRALIA
HAWAII
 
Risk Management Segment
Expertise
Real-time Claims Reporting Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management
Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education and Training
30
 
Risk Management Segment
High Growth & Profit Potential
Fortune 1000 companies
Outsourcing of insurance co. claims departments Captives Program business Expanding global capabilities Enhancements in systems/processes related to:
Electronic data storage Security Claims regulatory changes
Access to information via the Internet Employer communication/plan administration
31
 
Financial Services Segment $1,035 Million of Cash & Investments*
Investments Allocated to Financial Services Segment
($137 M)
Cash Allocated to Risk Management Segment
($194 M)
Cash Allocated to Brokerage Segment
($704 M)
* As of 9/30/05  Cash & investments net of related investment borrowings
32
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Asset s and Financial Guarant ees*
$400
$350
$300
$250
$200
$150
$100
$362
$163
2002
2005
Net Assets* $70 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Tax Adv
Asset Mgmt
Real Estate
Other
Low Income Housing $16M Alternative Energy $50M Asset Alliance $47M Home Office Building $12M Other $12M $ In millions *As of 9/30/05
33
 
Financial Services Segment
Refocused Investing
Tax advantaged  maximize through 2007 Asset management  monetize Real estate  optimize cash flows
Sold Florida Community Development- 2Q 2005
Other
Exited Venture Capital investments in 2003 Sold Bermuda Insurance Investment  3Q 2005
34
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
35
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Revenue Growth
Total Revenues From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported ($ M) $1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400
20% CAGR
$684 $836 $1,021 $1,221 $1,437
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
36
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Profitable Growth
Total Pretax Earnings From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported ($ M) $260 $240 $220 $200 $180 $160 $140 $120 $100
18% CAGR
$121 $137 $185 $193 $237
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Rising Productivity
Total Revenue Per Employee As Originally Reported $200 $190 $180 $170 $160 $150 $140 $130 $120
7% CAGR
$141,000 $137,000 $153,000 $179,000 $183,000
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Increasing Shareholder Value
Diluted Earnings From Continuing Operations As Originally Reported  Post Split 1/18/01 $2.20 $2.00
$1.80 $1.60
$1.40 $1.20
$1.00 $0.80
18% CAGR
$1.02 $1.36 $1.41 $1.56 $2.01
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings From Continuing Operations Before Investment Gains (Losses), Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense
(In millions)
$300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
26% CAGR
$88 $131 $169 $201 $236
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
Note: Amounts as originally reported
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Since 1990, $1.6 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($498 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($626 M)
Shares Repurchased
($444 M)
Built a balance sheet with $3.96 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 9/30/05
41
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Summary: Why Invest?
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $200 $0
20% CAGR
2000 Total Revenues 2004 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
34% CAGR
2000 Cash Flow from Ops 2004 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
19% CAGR
1985 Dividends 2005 $1.12
2004 cash flow from operations of $277 M
5-year average ROE of 30% is highest in peer group* Dividend yield of 3.9% indicated in 2005
Note: Amounts as originally reported for continuing operations *Through 12/31/04
42
 
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way, Robert E. Gallagher  1984
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens  everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
We are a team.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on  not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength  not a weakness.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances  but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
43

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty (P/C) products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a full-service employee benefits consultant.
www.ajg.com
OCTOBER 2005
page BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2 RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 4 FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT 5 ACQUISITION STRATEGY 5 MARKET OUTLOOK 6 CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 7 WHY INVEST? 8
As of September 30, 2005 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $28.81 52-week high/low $34.25 - $25.42 Trailing 12-mos. revenues $1.5 billion Market cap $2.7 billion Indicated annual dividend $1.12 Yield 3.9 % Shares outstanding 95.2 million End of fiscal year December 31 Price/earnings (trailing year excl. discontinued operations & litigation matters) 15.6 x Number of employees 8,099
 
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
N
ICHES
Agribusiness
Aviation
Captives
Claim Advocacy & Lost Control
Construction
Construction Project Solutions
Energy
Global Risk Management
Healthcare
Higher Education
Management Liability
Marine
Mergers & Acquisitions
Personal Insurance
Public Entity
Real Estate (4)
General Commercial
Habitational
Hospitality
Shopping Centers
Religious/Nonprofit
Restaurant
Scholastic K-12
Transportation
Worldwide Risk Services
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring P/C insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. With offices throughout the U.S., this operation pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners in nearly 120 countries throughout the world.
BSD is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of P/C insurance, approximately 75% of its business falls within 24 specialized niches. These cross-divisional niche practice groups target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This niche focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. Niche practice groups allow for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitate the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within the niches provide a competitive advantage.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth over the next year will come from its niche practice groups and middle-market accounts; from developing and managing alternative market mechanisms such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and through mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL
CAPABILITIES
Wholesale Brokerage
International P/C Brokerage
Programs/Program Administration
Reinsurance Brokerage
Captive/Rent-a-Captive Management
CoverageFirst.com
Specialty Marketing and International is comprised of Gallagher's wholesale, excess/surplus and reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S.
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL (CONTINUED)
and abroad, captive management operations outside the Continental U.S., and P/C partnerships.
Gallagher structures a broad range of alternative market mechanisms, tailored to clients' specific needs and financial situations. Gallagher has also built a substantial book of wholesale and excess/surplus lines business through acquisition and internal growth, most of which is operating under the Risk Placement Services, Inc. banner. Much of this business is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. A growing amount of this business is coming to Gallagher via its e-commerce portal, CoverageFirst.com, which has almost 15,900 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
In 2005, Gallagher merged its two U.S. reinsurance brokerage subsidiaries, and all of Gallagher's reinsurance brokerage operations worldwide are now operating under the name Gallagher Re to enhance brand awareness.
Specialty Marketing and International expects its greatest revenue growth opportunities will come from mergers and acquisitions, global reinsurance, international and domestic wholesale, and the continued expansion of specialty programs and program administration. In addition to its offices in the U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia and Singapore, the operation pursues business opportunities in conjunction with Gallagher's Strategic Alliance Network of correspondent brokers and consultants in nearly 120 countries around the world.
S A
TRATEGIC
LLIANCE
NETWORK
In addition to its own international brokerage offices, Gallagher has developed a non-owned network of leading independent brokers in nearly 120 countries around the world. These relationships provide Gallagher's clients with one of the most comprehensive worldwide sales and service networks available.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES
CAPABILITIES
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting
Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking
Compliance Consulting
Merger & Acquisition Analysis
Actuarial Services
Executive Benefits/Financial Planning
Human Resource Services
Retirement Plan Services
Employer Administrative Services
Business Continuation
Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services provides employee benefit brokerage and human resource consulting to assist clients in all areas of their employee retirement and health and welfare plans. Rising healthcare costs and growing regulatory complexities have resulted in double-digit increases in employee benefit costs. Gallagher has significantly expanded its technical resources and technological capabilities to better assist clients in addressing this trend.
Gallagher offers expertise and guidance in all areas of benefits planning, delivery and administration. This encompasses a broad range of benefit services, including executive benefits and financial planning, worksite marketing and voluntary products, defined contribution products, actuarial services, compensation program design/analysis, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement services, benefits communication and out-sourcing, and training programs and tools that help employers address federal and state regulatory compliance.
The operation has also established eight niche practice groups in the following areas: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity, religious, restaurant, education (K-12) and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from mergers and acquisitions, from cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, by assisting clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities, and from its niche practice groups.
 
GALLAGHER BASSETT
EXPERTISE
Real-Time Claims Reporting
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
Appraisal Services
Litigation Management
Information Management
Managed Care Services
Loss Control Services
Safety Programs
Settlement Management
Education and Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as the world's largest multiline, third-party administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., U.K., Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for over a decade that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. By the end of the third quarter 2005, the system had 11,200 users and was averaging 18.5 million site hits and 70,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through the next year will come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
 
CORE
COMPETENCIES
Tax-Advantaged Investing
Real Estate
Asset Management
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and optimizing tax benefits from Gallagher's investments. Financial Services specializes in tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax-advantaged investments are comprised primarily of low income housing developments, waste-to-energy projects and synthetic fuel plants. These investments helped reduce Gallagher's tax rate to 24% in 2003, 20% in 2004 and 23% in 2005.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. The building is almost 100% leased, with third parties occupying approximately 40%.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to 50% of 13 alternative investment fund manager companies with approximately $3.3 billion under management at September 30, 2005.
On February 11, 2005, a Utah jury awarded damages in the amount of $175.0 million against AJG Financial Services, Inc. (AJGFS) and in favor of Headwaters Incorporated in regards to a synthetic coal technology licensing agreement. Effective as of May 1, 2005, AJGFS and Headwaters entered into a definitive agreement to settle this and all other litigation between the companies for $50.0 million, which was paid to Headwaters in May 2005. Additionally, AJGFS and Headwaters have modified their existing licensing agreement, allowing AJGFS to utilize Headwaters' technology on two of AJGFS' synthetic fuel facilities in exchange for (1) $70.0 million payable on or before January 15, 2006 and (2) an annual royalty to Headwaters in 2005, 2006 and 2007, which at full production, would be approximately $20.0 million of AJGFS' estimated pre-royalty, pretax earnings of $40.0 million in total annually from these two facilities. Gallagher has recorded a pretax charge to its first quarter 2005 earnings of $131.0 million ($84.2 million after tax, or $0.91 per diluted share) related to this settlement, including litigation, bonding and other costs.
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 152 acquisitions from 1986 through September 2005, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these were regional or local P/C brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. In the last few years, the company has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding its talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, marketing-oriented culture
a profitable, growing business whose ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's aggressive acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
 
MARKET OUTLOOK
The P/C market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an over-abundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%.
A market correction began in 2000 and intensified in 2001, particularly following the September 11th terrorist attacks. Double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002. The magnitude of rate increases began to moderate in 2003 and softening market conditions continued throughout the first half of 2005. A market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers indicated that the average premium for commercial accounts declined 8.2% in the third quarter of 2005, with medium and large accounts averaging the most significant reductions. However, the survey also indicated that recent unprecedented hurricane losses are currently changing the insurance market place, and increases are being incurred in habitational pricing and deductibles across the country. This trend is likely to intensify in the fourth quarter.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition has increased, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms.
The insurance industry in general, and Gallagher individually, continues to be the subject of a substantial number of regulatory and legal actions by many State Attorneys General and private litigants investigating contingent commissions and various other historical business practices. Over the last several months, four other major insurance brokers have reached settlements with one or more Attorneys General. In the first quarter 2005, Gallagher recorded a pretax charge of $35 million ($21 million after tax, or $.23 per diluted share), which represented its best estimate of the amount to resolve the state insurance investigations. On May 18, 2005, Gallagher reached an agreement with the Illinois Attorney General and Illinois Insurance Department. There was no lawsuit nor any findings of unlawful or deceitful conduct. As part of the agreement, the company will create a $27 million fund, none of which represents a fine or penalty, for the benefit of certain retail clients. The company also agreed to adopt certain business reforms including an agreement not to receive retail contingent commissions, but may accept contingent commissions from non-retail business. Gallagher continues to cooperate with other state regulatory authorities.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
 
A J. G & C.
RTHUR
ALLAGHER
O
C Q S F I- 2003 2005
ONDENSED
UARTERLY
EGMENT
INANCIAL
NFORMATION
THROUGH
(U - ) A
NAUDITED
IN
MILLIONS
EXCEPT
PER
SHARE
DATA
AND
OTHER
INFORMATION
DATA
LL
INFORMATION
RESTATED
TO
REFLECT
DISCONTINUED
OPERATIONS
2003 2004 2005 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q BROKERAGE SEGMENT Revenues $186.1 $200.9 $220.2 $233.3 $840.5 $202.5 $223.3 $239.8 $254.6 $920.2 $225.3 $246.8 $264.1 Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 26.9 38.5 55.4 52.1 172.9 33.5 44.2 56.6 52.1 186.4 (8.5) 43.5 53.4 Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 20.2 28.8 42.1 39.6 130.7 26.7 35.3 45.3 41.7 149.0 (0.6) 33.5 41.1 Growth  revenues 20% 17% 12% 11% 15% 9% 11% 9% 9% 9% 11% 11% 10% Pretax profit margin before litigation matters (1) 14% 19% 25% 22% 20% 17% 20% 24% 20% 20% 12% 18% 20% Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.22 $0.31 $0.45 $0.43 $1.41 $0.28 $0.37 $0.48 $0.44 $1.57 $(0.01) $0.35 $0.43 RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT Revenues $69.0 $70.9 $75.5 $76.6 $292.0 $81.4 $86.0 $88.1 $90.0 $345.5 $91.6 $89.6 $94.3 Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 10.4 9.8 10.4 10.2 40.8 12.4 14.0 15.5 16.3 58.2 17.2 18.5 16.5 Earnings from continuing operations 7.9 7.5 8.0 7.8 31.2 10.1 11.3 12.4 13.1 46.9 13.2 14.2 12.7 Growth  revenues 12% 19% 18% 19% 17% 18% 21% 17% 17% 18% 13% 4% 7% Pretax profit margin 15% 14% 14% 13% 14% 15% 16% 18% 18% 17% 19% 21% 18% Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.09 $0.08 $0.09 $0.08 $0.34 $0.11 $0.12 $0.13 $0.14 $0.50 $0.14 $0.15 $0.13 BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT COMBINED Revenues $255.1 $271.8 $295.7 $309.9 $1,132.5 $283.9 $309.3 $327.9 $344.6 $1,265.7 $316.9 $336.4 $358.4 Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 37.3 48.3 65.8 62.3 213.7 45.9 58.2 72.1 68.4 244.6 8.7 62.0 69.9 Earnings from continuing operations 28.1 36.3 50.1 47.4 161.9 36.8 46.6 57.7 54.8 195.9 12.6 47.7 53.8 Growth  revenues 18% 18% 13% 13% 15% 11% 14% 11% 11% 12% 12% 9% 9% Pretax profit margin before litigation matters (1) 15% 18% 22% 20% 19% 16% 19% 22% 20% 19% 14% 18% 20% Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $0.31 $0.39 $0.54 $0.51 $1.75 $0.39 $0.49 $0.61 $0.58 $2.07 $0.13 $0.50 $0.56 FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT Investment income (2) $15.1 $17.0 $37.2 $43.8 $113.1 $45.0 $57.3 $33.0 $27.9 $163.2 $30.0 $30.9 $31.0 Investment gains (losses) (25.7)    1.6 (0.4) (24.5) 2.5 2.1 2.6 0.9 8.1 (0.1) 3.8 0.5 Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes (21.0) 0.3 (1.3) 1.1 (20.9) 3.4 (0.3) (3.6) (6.8) (7.3) (133.4) (4.6) (4.3) Earnings (loss) from continuing operations (15.9) 0.1 (1.1) 0.9 (16.0) 2.5 (0.3) (3.0) (5.6) (6.4) (86.2) (3.5) (3.3) Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $(0.18) $   $(0.02) $0.01 $(0.19) $0.03 $   $(0.04) $(0.06) $(0.06) $(0.93) $(0.04) $(0.04) TOTAL COMPANY Revenues $244.5 $288.8 $334.5 $353.3 $1,221.1 $331.4 $368.7 $363.5 $373.4 $1,437.0 $346.8 $371.1 $389.9 Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 16.3 48.6 64.5 63.4 192.8 49.3 57.9 68.5 61.6 237.3 (124.7) 57.4 65.6 Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 12.2 36.4 49.0 48.3 145.9 39.3 46.3 54.7 49.2 189.5 (73.6) 44.2 50.5 Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.13 $0.39 $0.52 $0.52 $1.56 $0.41 $0.49 $0.57 $0.52 $2.01 $(0.80) $0.46 $0.52 Dividends declared per share $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.18 $0.72 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $1.00 $0.28 $0.28 $0.28 CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET Total assets $2,492.4 $2,644.3 $2,695.1 $2,901.6 $2,873.0 $3,218.2 $3,085.0 $3,237.9 $3,227.7 $3,444.4 $3,385.8 Total liabilities $1,947.6 $2,071.8 $2,104.5 $2,282.5 $2,225.0 $2,521.4 $2,342.1 $2,476.9 $2,545.0 $2,701.5 $2,601.3 Total stockholders' equity $544.8 $572.5 $590.6 $619.1 $648.0 $696.8 $742.9 $761.0 $682.7 $742.9 $784.5 OTHER INFORMATION Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 92,312 93,651 93,716 93,570 93,312 93,955 94,343 95,053 94,827 94,546 94,790 95,584 96,583 Common shares repurchased (000s) 239 515 1,140 970 2,864 555    615 613 1,783    59 11 Tangible net worth (3) $391.4 $417.0 $422.6 $396.2 $394.6 $427.5 $449.0 $386.8 $309.8 $342.6 $377.2 Book value per share $6.06 $6.32 $6.55 $6.88 $7.14 $7.58 $8.04 $8.26 $7.33 $7.85 $8.24 Tangible book value per share (4) $4.35 $4.60 $4.69 $4.40 $4.35 $4.65 $4.86 $4.20 $3.32 $3.62 $3.96 Annualized return on beginning tangible net worth (5) 12% 24% 33% 37% 37% 37% 43% 47% 48% 48% NMF NMF 10% Number of acquisitions closed 4 1 2 7 14 7 3 4 5 19 2 5 1 Workforce (includes acquisitions) 6,639 6,662 6,713 6,808 6,958 7,180 7,451 7,840 7,975 8,052 8,099 Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, investment (gains) losses, pension plan curtailment gain, depreciation, amortization and stock compensation expense (6) Earnings (loss) from continuing operations $12.2 $36.4 $49.0 $48.3 $145.9 $39.3 $46.3 $54.7 $49.2 $189.5 $(73.6) $44.2 $50.5 Litigation matters                               166.0       Investment (gains) losses 25.7    (1.6) 0.4 24.5 (2.5) (2.1) (2.6) (0.9) (8.1) 0.1 (3.8) (0.5) Pension plan curtailment gain                                  (10.0)    Depreciation 6.8 6.6 7.9 8.0 29.3 8.0 8.5 8.2 8.0 32.7 8.5 9.0 8.1 Amortization 1.9 2.0 2.3 2.9 9.1 3.0 5.8 4.1 4.8 17.7 5.3 5.3 5.1 Non-cash stock compensation 1.0 2.2 2.2 4.0 9.4 3.3 4.0 3.9 4.4 15.6 4.9 3.4 3.8 Tax effect (8.4) (2.6) (2.5) (3.6) (17.1) (2.2) (3.2) (2.7) (3.2) (11.3) (65.1) (0.9) (3.8) Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, investment (gains) losses, pension plan curtailment gain, depreciation, amortization and stock compensation expense (6) $39.1 $44.6 $57.3 $60.0 $201.0 $48.9 $59.3 $65.6 $62.4 $236.2 $46.1 $47.2 $63.2 On a diluted per share basis $0.42 $0.48 $0.61 $0.64 $2.15 $0.52 $0.63 $0.69 $0.66 $2.50 $0.49 $0.49 $0.65
 
Note: All information is as originally reported, except per share amounts restated for stock splits.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. President & CEO (630) 773-3800


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060131171947.txt.gz
TIME:20060131171947
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 31, 2006, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's fourth quarter and full year 2005 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
 
ITASCA, IL, January 31, 2006  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and full year ended December 31, 2005. A printer-friendly format is available at www.ajg.com.
 
Quarter Ended December 31
 
 
Year Ended December 31
 
 
"We are pleased to have 2005 behind us," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "During this past year, Gallagher resolved many open issues - we put most of the contingent commission matters to rest, we settled significant open litigation, we reorganized our international operations, we solidified our world-wide reinsurance operations under a common brand now called Gallagher Re, we froze our pension, we substantially reduced our Financial Services assets and related debt, while all along dealing with an unprecedented hurricane season and a softening insurance market place. Despite these challenges, Gallagher remains strong and our world-wide team is excited about our future. In January 2005, we increased our stockholder dividends 12% and last week we increased it another 7%, our cash flow is excellent, we have tangible net worth of over $350 million, no debt for general corporate purposes, and we have a new $450 million unsecured line of credit. Client retention is strong, we continue to hire excellent producers, there are many excellent acquisition opportunities in our pipeline, and we have been getting new client orders from both our domestic and international branches. As we enter 2006, we are positioned to continue building our world-wide brokerage and risk management businesses."
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage and Risk Management Combined Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, February 1, 2006 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to www.ajg.com.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
 
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2005 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2005 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Discontinued Operations
 
In fourth quarter 2005, Gallagher adjusted the previously reported amount for its first quarter 2005 discontinued operating results for a $5.0 million, or $0.05 per diluted share, income tax charge, related to the income tax provision on the sale of one of its medical claim management operations that occurred in first quarter 2005.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060213165546.txt.gz
TIME:20060213165546
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01.  
Regulation FD Disclosure
 
The January 2006 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at .
www.ajg.com
www.ajg.com
 
Item 9.01.  
Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


EXHIBIT 99.2
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060420171325.txt.gz
TIME:20060420171325
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On April 20, 2006, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's first quarter 2006 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, April 20, 2006  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2006. A printer-friendly format is available at www.ajg.com.
Quarter Ended March 31
 
"Despite the seasonality historically seen in our first quarter numbers, we are pleased with our growth and substantial improvement in our operating segments' pretax earnings," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "Growth in our international operations improved significantly and our domestic operations showed steady progress. Across the globe, our teams are energized and our clients are embracing the changing world of transparency."
Brokerage Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Friday, April 21, 2006 at 8:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to www.ajg.com.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2006 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060504160645.txt.gz
TIME:20060504160645
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
The April 2006 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
APRIL 2006
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; alternative insurance markets continue to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of such laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" of Gallagher's 2005 Annual Report on Form 10K.
 
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2005 was adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $15.0 million (or $9.8 million after tax), respectively. There were no such items in 2000 to 2004. These amounts, which Gallagher believes are non-recurring, were added back to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters and claims handling obligations. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation.
Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's 4th Largest Insurance Brokerage and Risk Management Services Firm 3rd Largest in U.S.
Brokerage  We sell a full range of property/casualty and employee benefit products and services, provide access to wholesale, reinsurance, captive and excess/surplus lines markets and provide generalized risk shifting consulting to our domestic and international clients Risk Management  We provide our domestic and international self-insured clients, as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department, with outsourced P/C claims payment and claims management services that assist them in managing risk exposures and reducing claims payment costs
 
Strengths
Unique corporate culture
Excellent history of growth and strong cash flows
Strong financial position
Solid balance sheet
No corporate debt (but maintain a $450 M credit facility)
Solid client retention
Excellent producer development and retention
Proven acquisition competency
155 deals, 1986 through 3/31/06
Lean, yet activist, corporate staff
 
Differentiators
Culture Driven Success
Client-first focus
Local company feel with global capabilities
Team-based approach
Committed to growth
Emphasis on professional development
Niche strategy  industry-focused practice groups
International network of brokers and agents
Innovative  created alternative market
"Network" philosophy of service that benefits clients
Strong claims management capabilities
 
Client Base
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Large Clients
Mid Market Clients
Smaller Clients
Risk Management
9
 
Segments
2005 Revenues
Brokerage 67%
Financial Services 8%
Risk Management 25%
2005 Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 73%
Financial Services (10%)
Risk Management 37%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
10
 
Brokerage Segment
Domestic Retail Brokerage 55%
Employee Benefit Brokerage 19%
Wholesale, Reinsurance, & International Brokerage 26%
Revenues as of 3/31/06  See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
11
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
We broker P/C insurance and risk shifting programs and provide risk management services for commercial, not-for-profit, institutional and governmental enterprises Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 25 different industry-specific practice units
12
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
13
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
We broker employee health, welfare and retirement insurance programs and assist in communication, administration and compliance consulting services Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 8 different industry-specific practice units
14
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
15
 
Wholesale Brokerage
We provide access for hard-to-place coverages, including surplus lines, to over 10,000 independent P/C brokers and agents Organized geographically via profit centers Over 80% of business is from non-Gallagher sources
16
 
Reinsurance Brokerage
"Gallagher Re" provides:
Property/Casualty, Life, and A&H expertise
Executed primarily through Treaty, Facultative and Program reinsurance services
Expert product knowledge with multinational servicing capabilities
Advisory, analytical and technical resources
Re-branded in 2005
Hubs in UK, US, Bermuda, Singapore and Australia
17
 
International Brokerage
Our teams based in US, UK & Bermuda provide US and International clients with access to international and alternative markets
Gallagher has an international network of independent brokers in 120 countries
Gallagher believes in global partners
"best available" broker in every country around the world is a better value for clients
18
 
Wholesale, Reinsurance and International Network
19
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth Drivers Organic
Experienced hires and teams
Grow our own
Increase niche practices
Strategic fit acquisitions
Geographic expansion
Expertise expansion
Network-wide coordination
Deep industry and product knowledge
20
 
Brokerage Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention
Align performance compensation Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
21
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions)
1100 900 700 500 300 100 $559 $972
2001 2005
17% CAGR
Total Revenues*
2005 pretax margins of 17%
200 150 100 50 0
2001
2005
14% CAGR
Pretax Earnings*
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
22
 
Risk Management Segment
"Gallagher Bassett" provides outsourced P/C claims payment and management services for self-insured clients as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department We DO NOT chase catastrophe overflow claims One of the world's largest claims administrators Business Insurance 90% of business is from non-Gallagher sources Network (vs. dedicated unit) philosophy
23
 
Risk Management Segment
24
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth Drivers Purely organic Unbundled trend International footprint Deep client intimacy Leverage technology
25
 
Risk Management Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions)
400 350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0 $232 $371
2001 2005
13% CAGR
Total Revenues
70 60 50 40 30 20 10 0 $29 $68
2001 2005
19% CAGR
Pretax Earnings
2005 pretax margin of 18%
2005 growth in diluted net earnings per share from continuing operations of 10%
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
27
 
Financial Services Segment
Segment in run-off mode
Expect to sell our 60% ownership in our home office building in 2006 Working on monetizing asset management business Current uncertainty with coal investments -Regardless, law expires end of 2007 Substantial reductions since 2002 Future cash flows will be used to buy brokers, pay dividends and buy-back stock
28
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets and Financial Guarantees* $400
$350
$300
$250
$200 $150 $100 $362 $133
2002
2005 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Net Assets*
Tax Adv Asset HO Other Mgmt Bldg
Low Income Housing $16M Alternative Energy $29M Asset Alliance $44M Home Office Building $12M Other $11M $ In Millions *As of 3/31/06
29
 
2005 Recap
Resolved numerous legacy issues Brokerage revenues up 10%, 2% organic Risk Management revenues up 9%, all organic, and pretax margin at 18%, best in industry Maintained $450 million unsecured credit facility Jan 05 increased dividend 12% 10 acquisitions
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
30
 
First Quarter 2006 - - Highlights
5% internal revenue growth in a soft market Brokerage margins increased Improved client retention Normalized tax rate due to synfuel uncertainty Jan 06 increased dividend 7% Gallagher Bassett on track
31
 
Where We're Going
Revenue and pretax growth of 15% per year Target enterprise-wide margin of 20+% Maintain solid, low-risk balance sheet Maximize shareholder returns through dividends and stock repurchases
32
 
How We Will Get There
Focus on Profitable Growth
Strong Management Group
Solid Customer Partnerships
Energized Sales Team
Operational Controls
Disciplined Capital Allocation
33
 
Summary: Why Invest?
21 Year Growth Story:
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) 3/31/06
Stock Price $ 1.72 $ 27.81
Market Cap $57 M $2.7 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $348 M
Annual Dividend/Share $ .03 $1.20*
*Indicated annual dividend
34
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues
From Continuing Operations*
(In millions) $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400 $643 $791 $961 $1,103 $1,232 $1,343
16% CAGR
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005
35
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings
From Continuing Operations*
(In millions) $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $99 $132 $156 $184 $211 $203
15% CAGR
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
36
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Since 1990, $1.7 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($551 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($659 M)
Shares Repurchased
($445 M)
Balance sheet with $3.60 in tangible net worth per share and no operating debt.
As of 3/31/06
Excludes cash payments made regarding special items discussed on Page 3
37
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Dividends Per Share
(restated for stock splits) $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1986
2006 $1.20*
19% Average Annual Increase
*Indicated
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way, Robert E. Gallagher  1984
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens ?everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other. We are a team. 16. Loyalty and respect are earned ?not dictated.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on ?not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength ?not a weakness.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances ?but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company
39

Exhibit 99.2


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060614163415.txt.gz
TIME:20060614163415
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.
Other Events
As previously reported by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher), tax credits and tax credit-related revenues associated with Gallagher's IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal investments will phase-out if the calendar year 2006 average of the commonly reported crude oil price (NYMEX Price) per barrel reaches certain levels.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This report contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of that term in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 (the Act) found at Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act). Additional written or oral forward-looking statements may be made by Gallagher from time-to-time in information provided to the Securities and Exchange Commission, press releases, its website, or otherwise. Statements contained in this report that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of the Act.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060725164107.txt.gz
TIME:20060725164107
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On July 25, 2006, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's second quarter 2006 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, July 25, 2006  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2006. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended June 30
 
Six Months Ended June 30
 
"I am pleased with our strong second quarter results. Our Brokerage Segment posted 9% organic revenue growth and our Risk Management Segment posted 10% organic revenue growth," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "On a combined basis, our Brokerage and Risk Management Segments posted 12% revenue growth and a 40% increase in pretax earnings, excluding contingent commission matters and pension plan curtailment gains. Around the globe, our team is energized and our clients are receiving excellent advice and service."
 
Brokerage Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
As previously reported in Gallagher's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June 14, 2006, tax credits and tax credit-related revenues associated with Gallagher's IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal investments will phase-out if the calendar year 2006 average of the commonly reported crude oil price (NYMEX Price) per barrel reaches certain levels.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights (continued)
 
 
Effective Tax Rate
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 26, 2006 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2006 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
Gallagher has a $4.4 million LOC outstanding related to the reclamation of a former IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal site.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060807103705.txt.gz
TIME:20060807103705
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
The July 2006 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
JULY 2006
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of such laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
 
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2005 was adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $15.0 million (or $9.8 million after tax), respectively. There were no such items in 2000 to 2004. These amounts, which Gallagher believes are non-recurring, were added back to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters and claims handling obligations. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation.
Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's 4th Largest Insurance Brokerage and Risk Management Services Firm
Brokerage  We sell a full range of property/casualty and employee benefit products and services, provide access to wholesale, reinsurance, captive and excess/surplus lines markets and provide generalized risk shifting consulting to our domestic and international clients Risk Management  We provide our domestic and international self-insured clients, as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department, with outsourced P/C claims payment and claims management services that assist them in managing risk exposures and reducing claims payment costs
 
Strengths
Unique corporate culture
Excellent history of growth and strong cash flows
Strong financial position
 Solid balance sheet
 Low corporate debt; $35m at 6/30/06 still maintaining a $450M credit facility
Solid client retention
Excellent producer development and retention
Proven acquisition competency
 159 deals, 1986 through 6/30/06
Lean, yet activist, corporate staff
 
Differentiators
 -  Culture Driven Success
 Client-first focus
 Local company feel with global capabilities
 Team-based approach
 Committed to growth
 Emphasis on professional development
 -  Niche strategy  industry-focused practice groups
 -  International network of brokers and agents
 -  Innovative  created alternative market
 -  "Network" philosophy of service that benefits clients
 -  Strong claims management capabilities
 
Client Base
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Risk Management
Large Clients
Mid Market Clients
Smaller Clients
9
 
Segments
2005 Revenues
2005 Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 67%
Brokerage 73%
Financial Services 8%
Risk Management 25%
Financial Services (10%)
Risk Management 37%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
10
 
Brokerage Segment
Domestic Retail Brokerage 54%
Employee Benefit Brokerage 18%
Wholesale, Reinsurance, & International Brokerage 28%
Revenues as of 6/30/06  See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
11
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
We broker P/C insurance and risk shifting programs and provide risk management services for commercial, not-for-profit, institutional and governmental enterprises Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 25 different industry-specific practice units
12
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
13
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
We broker employee health, welfare and retirement insurance programs and assist in communication, administration and compliance consulting services Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 8 different industry-specific practice units
14
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
15
 
Wholesale Brokerage
We provide access for hard-to-place coverages, including surplus lines, to over 10,000 independent P/C brokers and agents Organized geographically via profit centers Over 70% of business is from non-Gallagher sources
16
 
Reinsurance Brokerage
"Gallagher Re" provides:
 Property/Casualty, Life, and A&H expertise
 Executed primarily through Treaty, Facultative and Program reinsurance services
 Expert product knowledge with multinational servicing capabilities
 Advisory, analytical and technical resources
Re-branded in 2005
Hubs in UK, US, Bermuda, Singapore and Australia
17
 
International Brokerage
Our teams based in US, UK and Bermuda provide US and International clients with access to international and alternative markets
Gallagher has an international network of independent brokers in 120 countries
Gallagher believes in global partners
"best available" broker in every country around the world is a better value for clients
18
 
Wholesale, Reinsurance and International Network
19
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth Drivers Organic
 Experienced hires and teams
 Grow our own
 Increase industry-specific practice units
Strategic fit acquisitions
 Geographic expansion
 Expertise expansion
Network-wide coordination
Deep industry and product knowledge
20
 
Brokerage Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention
Align performance compensation Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
21
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions)
1100 900 700 500 300 100
17% CAGR
$559 $972
2001 2005
Total Revenues*
200 150 100 50 0
14% CAGR
$103 $135
2001 2005
Pretax Earnings*
2005 pretax margins of 17%
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
22
 
Risk Management Segment
"Gallagher Bassett" provides outsourced P/C claims payment and management services for self-insured clients as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department We DO NOT chase catastrophe overflow claims One of the world's largest claims administrators Business Insurance 80% of business is from non-Gallagher sources Network (vs. dedicated unit) philosophy
23
 
Risk Management Segment
24
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth Drivers Purely organic Unbundled trend International footprint Deep client intimacy Leverage technology
25
 
Risk Management Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions)
400 350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0
13% CAGR
$232 $371
70 60 50 40 30 20 10 0
19% CAGR
$29 $68
2001 2005
2001 2005
Total Revenues*
Pretax Earnings*
2005 pretax margin of 18%
2005 growth in diluted net earnings per share from continuing operations of 10%
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
27
 
Financial Services Segment
Segment in run-off mode
Expect to sell our 60% ownership in our home office building in 2006 Working on monetizing asset management business Current uncertainty with coal investments
 Purchased financial hedge on 6/12/06
 Regardless, law expires end of 2007 Substantial reductions since 2002
Future cash flows will be used to buy brokers, pay dividends and repurchase stock
28
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets and Financial Guarantees* $400
$350
$300
$250
$200 $150 $100 $362
2002 $126
2006* $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Net Assets*
Tax Adv Asset HO Other Mgmt Bldg
Low Income Housing $14M Alternative Energy $27M Asset Alliance $42M Home Office Building $12M Other $10M $ In Millions *As of 6/30/06
29
 
2005 Recap
Resolved numerous legacy issues Brokerage revenues up 10%, 2% organic Risk Management revenues up 9%, all organic, and pretax margin at 18%, best in industry Maintained $450 million unsecured credit facility Jan 05 increased dividend 12% 10 acquisitions
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
30
 
Second Quarter 2006 - - Highlights
Internal revenue growth of 9% in Brokerage and 10% in Risk Management* Combined - 12% revenue growth and 40% in pretax earnings* Increasing brokerage margins Improved client retention Strong new business June 06 bought financial hedge for oil price uncertainty and re-started 2 Syn/Coal plants
*Excluding contingent commission matters and pension plan curtailment gains
31
 
Where We're Going
Revenue and pretax growth of 15% per year Target enterprise-wide margin of 20+% Continue selective acquisition strategy Maintain solid, low-risk balance sheet Maximize shareholder returns through dividends and stock repurchases
32
 
How We Will Get There
Focus on Profitable Growth
- Strong Management Group
- Solid Customer Partnerships
- Energized Sales Team
- Operational Controls
- Disciplined Capital Allocation
33
 
Summary: Why Invest?
22 Year Growth Story:
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) 6/30/06
Stock Price $1.72 $25.34
Market Cap $57 M $2.5 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $344 M
Annual Dividend/Share $.03 $1.20*
* Indicated annual dividend
34
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues From Continuing Operations*
(In millions)
$1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400
16% CAGR
$643 $791 $961 $1,103 $1,232 $1,343
2000
2001
2002
2003
2004
2005
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
35
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings (In millions) From Continuing Operations* $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
15% CAGR
$99 $132 $156 $184 $211 $203
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
36
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Since 1990, $1.7 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($580 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($686 M)
Shares Repurchased
($456 M)
Balance sheet with $3.54 in tangible net worth per share and low corporate debt
As of 6/30/06
Excludes cash payments made regarding special items discussed on Page 3
37
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Dividends Per Share
(restated for stock splits) $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1986
* Indicated
19%
Average
Annual
Increase $1.20*
2006
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Culture Driven Success
The Gallagher Way, Robert E. Gallagher  1984
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens  everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other. We are a team. 16. Loyalty and respect are earned  not dictated.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on  not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength  not a weakness.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances  but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company
39

Exhibit 99.2


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060824171108.txt.gz
TIME:20060824171108
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.
Other Events
As previously announced, Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc. (GB), a third party administrator and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher), received a subpoena from the Office of the Attorney General of the State of New York on December 2, 2004 and the Office of the Attorney General of the State of Connecticut on July 24, 2006. On August 21, 2006, GB received a similar subpoena from the Office of the Attorney General for the State of Illinois. The subpoenas request information in connection with an investigation each State is individually conducting and none relate to Gallagher's brokerage operations. Gallagher is fully cooperating with these investigations.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20060830200517.txt.gz
TIME:20060830200517
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events
On August 30, 2006, the Company issued a press release announcing the death of Robert E. Gallagher, the Chairman of its Board of Directors. A copy of this press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Index
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Itasca, IL, August 30, 2006  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (AJG) reported today that Robert E. (Bob) Gallagher, Chairman of the Board, has passed away following a brief illness.
"My uncle Bob was a true leader and an inspiration both to his peers and the two generations of professionals who have followed him into this business. He was the center of the heart and soul of this company, which he loved deeply," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. "Bob's wit, intuition and knowledge of our industry were unparalleled. He will be deeply missed by everyone in our organization. We are extremely proud of his accomplishments and will work diligently to ensure that his legacy lives on."
Bob, 83, joined his father's insurance agency in 1947 after graduating from Cornell, working alongside his brothers John and Jim. A visionary and consummate insurance broker, he was instrumental in building the company into a global, billion dollar enterprise. In 1963, Bob was named President and Chief Executive Officer of Gallagher. The company went public in 1984 and, in 1990, Bob was elected Chairman of the Board. He continued to serve as CEO until 1995 and remained Chairman until his death.
Among his many contributions to Gallagher's legacy is a one-page list of 25 shared values he called "the rock foundation of the company and our culture." Concerned that the company's shared values could be jeopardized during its rapid expansion in the 1980s, Bob sat down one evening in 1984 and put them on paper under the title, "The Gallagher Way." More than 22 years later, every Gallagher employee is aware of these shared values, which are communicated regularly throughout the organization.
Throughout his career, Bob was actively involved in the insurance industry, including terms served as Director and President of the Insurance Institute of America. In 2001, he was named Insurance Industry Charitable Fund Man of the Year. His leadership and contributions extended into the community as well. He served as Chairman of the Advisory Board of St. Vincent's Infant Hospital in Chicago, and as a Director of the Big Shoulders program of the Chicago Archdiocese, the House of Good Shepherd and Chicago Catholic Charities. In 1994 he and his wife, Isabel, established and endowed The Gallagher Scholars Program through the Archdiocese of Chicago's Big Shoulders Fund, which annually helps fund Catholic school tuition for approximately 400 inner-city elementary and secondary students.
Bob is survived by his wife, Isabel, four children, 14 grandchildren and two great grandchildren.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20061020153546.txt.gz
TIME:20061020153546
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
On October 19, 2006, the Board of Directors of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) unanimously elected J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. as Chairman of the Board, effective immediately. Mr. Gallagher will also continue as Gallagher's President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Gallagher succeeds Robert E. Gallagher, who served as Chairman for 11 years until his death in August 2006.
Also on October 19, 2006, the Board of Directors of Gallagher elected William L. Bax to serve as a Director of Gallagher.
There is no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Bax and any other person pursuant to which Mr. Bax was elected as a Director of Gallagher.
A copy of the press release announcing the election of Mr. Gallagher as Chairman of the Board and Mr. Bax as a Director is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein in its entirety by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Index
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Itasca, IL, October 19, 2006  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. today declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of thirty cents ($.30) per share on the Common Stock of the Company, payable on January 15, 2007 to Shareholders of Record as of December 29, 2006.
Under separate action, the Board of Directors unanimously appointed J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. as Chairman of the Board effective immediately. He will also continue as the company's President and Chief Executive Officer. He succeeds Robert E. Gallagher who served as Chairman for 11 years until his death in late August 2006. Under Patrick's leadership, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. has grown from $350 million in revenues in 1994 to $1.5 billion in 2005.
The Board also announced that it has elected William L. Bax to serve on the company's Board of Directors. Mr. Bax retired in 2003 as Chicago Area Managing Partner of PricewaterhouseCoopers. He is a Director of Andrew Corporation and of Northern Funds/Northern Institutional Funds as well as a Director/Trustee of Children's Memorial Hospital, DePaul University and Chicago's Big Shoulders Fund. Mr. Bax is a 1966 graduate of DePaul University with a BS in Commerce.
Mr. J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO, said, "We are extremely pleased to welcome Bill to our Board. With over three decades of business, financial and human capital leadership experience at one of the world's finest professional services firms, he will be an excellent addition to our team. Our Board and executive management team look forward to working with Bill as we continue to build the company."
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20061024171121.txt.gz
TIME:20061024171121
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On October 24, 2006, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's third quarter 2006 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
99    Press release, dated October 24, 2006, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, October 24, 2006  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine-month period ended September 30, 2006. A printer-friendly format is available at
www.ajg.com
.
Quarter Ended September 30
 
"I am pleased with our solid third quarter results. Our Brokerage Segment posted 5% organic revenue growth and our Risk Management Segment posted 12% organic revenue growth," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., President and Chief Executive Officer. "For the nine months ended September 30, 2006, our combined Brokerage and Risk Management Segments posted a 24% increase in pretax earnings, excluding contingent commission matters and pension plan curtailment gains. Everyday, our global network of professionals focus on delivering excellent and high quality service to our clients."
 
Brokerage Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
Tax credits and tax credit-related revenues associated with Gallagher's IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal investments will phase-out if the calendar year 2006 average of the commonly reported crude oil price (NYMEX Price) per barrel reaches certain levels.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights (continued)
 
 
Effective Tax Rate
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 25, 2006 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to
www.ajg.com
.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2006 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Gallagher has a $4.4 million LOC outstanding related to the reclamation of a former IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal site.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20061031164325.txt.gz
TIME:20061031164325
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
The October 2006 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
OCTOBER 2006
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of such laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
 
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2005 was adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $15.0 million (or $9.8 million after tax), respectively. There were no such items in 2000 to 2004. These amounts, which Gallagher believes are non-recurring, were added back to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters and claims handling obligations. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation.
Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's 4th Largest Insurance Brokerage and Risk Management Services Firm
Brokerage  We sell a full range of property/casualty and employee benefit products and services, provide access to wholesale, reinsurance, captive and excess/surplus lines markets and provide generalized risk shifting consulting to our domestic and international clients Risk Management  We provide our domestic and international self-insured clients, as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department, with outsourced P/C claims payment and claims management services that assist them in managing risk exposures and reducing claims payment costs
 
Strengths
Unique corporate culture
Excellent history of growth and strong cash flows Strong financial position
 Solid balance sheet
 No corporate debt; still maintaining a $450M credit facility
Solid client retention
Excellent producer development and retention Proven acquisition competency
 162 deals, 1986 through 9/30/06
Lean, yet activist, corporate staff
 
Differentiators
Culture Driven Success
 Client-first focus
 Local company feel with global capabilities
 Team-based approach
 Committed to growth
 Emphasis on professional development
Niche strategy  industry-focused practice groups International network of brokers and agents Innovative  created alternative market "Network" philosophy of service that benefits clients Strong claims management capabilities
 
Client Base
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Risk Management
Large Clients
Mid Market Clients
Smaller Clients
9
 
Segments
2005 Revenues
Brokerage 67%
Financial Services 8%
Risk Management 25%
2005 Pretax Earnings
Brokerage 73%
Financial Services (10%)
Risk Management 37%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
10
 
Brokerage Segment
Domestic Retail Brokerage 55%
Employee Benefit Brokerage 18%
Wholesale, Reinsurance, & International Brokerage 27%
Revenues as of 9/30/06  See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
11
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
We broker P/C insurance and risk shifting programs and provide risk management services for commercial, not-for-profit, institutional and governmental enterprises Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 25 different industry-specific niche/practice groups
12
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
13
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
We broker employee health, welfare and retirement insurance programs and assist in communication, administration and compliance consulting services Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 7 different industry-specific niche/practice groups
14
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
15
 
Wholesale Brokerage
We provide access for hard-to-place coverages, including surplus lines, to over 10,000 independent P/C brokers and agents Organized geographically via profit centers Over 70% of business is from non-Gallagher sources
16
 
Reinsurance Brokerage
"Gallagher Re" provides:
 Property/Casualty, Life, and A&H expertise
 Executed primarily through Treaty, Facultative and Program reinsurance services
 Expert product knowledge with multinational servicing capabilities
 Advisory, analytical and technical resources
Re-branded in 2005
Hubs in UK, US, Bermuda, Singapore and Australia
17
 
International Brokerage
Our teams based in US, UK and Bermuda provide US and International clients with access to international and alternative markets
Gallagher has an international network of independent brokers in 120 countries
Gallagher believes in global partners
? "best available" broker in every country around the world is a better value for clients
18
 
Wholesale, Reinsurance and International Network
19
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth Drivers
Organic
 Experienced hires and teams
 Grow our own
 Increase industry-specific practice units
Strategic fit acquisitions
 Geographic expansion
 Expertise expansion
Network-wide coordination
Deep industry and product knowledge
20
 
Brokerage Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention
Align performance compensation Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
21
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions)
1100 900 700 500 300 100
17% CAGR
$559 $972
2001
2005
Total Revenues*
200 150 100 50 0
14% CAGR
$103 $135
2001
2005
Pretax Earnings*
2005 pretax margins of 17%
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
22
 
Risk Management Segment
"Gallagher Bassett" provides outsourced P/C claims payment and management services for self-insured clients as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department We DO NOT chase catastrophe overflow claims One of the world's largest claims administrators Business Insurance Over 80% of business is from non-Gallagher sources Network (vs. dedicated unit) philosophy
23
 
Risk Management Segment
24
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth Drivers
Purely organic Unbundled trend International footprint Deep client intimacy Leverage technology
25
 
Risk Management Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions)
400 350 300 250 200 150 100 50 0
13% CAGR
$232 $371
2001
2005
Total Revenues*
70 60 50 40 30 20 10 0
19% CAGR
$29 $68
2001
2005
Pretax Earnings*
2005 pretax margin of 18%
2005 growth in diluted net earnings per share from continuing operations of 10%
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
27
 
Financial Services Segment
Segment in run-off mode
Expect to sell our 60% ownership in our home office building in 2006 Working on monetizing asset management business Current uncertainty with coal investments
 Purchased financial hedge on 6/12/06
 Regardless, law expires end of 2007 Substantial reductions since 2002
Future cash flows will be used to buy brokers, pay dividends and repurchase stock
28
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets and Financial Guarantees* $400
$350
$300
$250
$200 $150 $100 $362 $129
2002
2006*
Net Assets* $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Low Income Housing $10M
Alternative Energy $35M
Asset Alliance $41M
Home Office Building $12M
Other $10M
Tax Adv
Asset Mgmt
HO Bldg
Other $ In Millions *As of 9/30/06
29
 
Third Quarter 2006Highlights
Internal revenue growth of 5% in Brokerage and 12% in Risk Management* Combined10% revenue and 15% pretax earnings growth* Increased brokerage margins to 21% Improved client retention Strong new business Closed 3 acquisitions  8 year to date
*Excluding contingent commission matters
30
 
Where We're Going
Revenue and pretax growth of 15% per year Target enterprise-wide margin of 20+% Continue selective acquisition strategy Maintain solid, low-risk balance sheet Maximize shareholder returns through dividends and stock repurchases
31
 
How We Will Get There
Focus on Profitable Growth
Strong Management Group Solid Customer Partnerships Energized Sales Team Operational Controls Disciplined Capital Allocation
32
 
Summary: Why Invest?
22 Year Growth Story:
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) 9/30/06
Stock Price $1.72 $26.67
Market Cap $57 M $2.6 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $365 M
Annual Dividend/Share $.03 $1.20*
*Indicated annual dividend
33
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues
From Continuing Operations*
(In millions) $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400
16 % CAGR
$643 $791 $961 $1,103 $1,232 $1,343
2000
2001
2002
2003
2004
2005
34
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings
From Continuing Operations*
(In millions) $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
15% CAGR
$99 $132 $156 $184 $211 $203
2000
2001
2002
2003
2004
2005
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
35
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Since 1990, $1.8 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($610 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($757 M)
Shares Repurchased
($457 M)
Balance sheet with $3.72 in tangible net worth per share and low corporate debt
As of 9/30/06
Excludes cash payments made regarding special items discussed on Page 3
36
 
37
Summary: Why Invest?
$0.00
$0.20
$0.40
$0.60
$0.80
$1.00
$1.20
Dividends Per Share
(restated for stock splits)
1986 2006
$1.20
19% Average Annual Increase
 
"The Gallagher Way",
Robert E. Gallagher, 1984 Culture Driven Success
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other. We are a team. 16. Loyalty and respect are earned not dictated.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength not a weakness.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company
38

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
1
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty (P/C) products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a fullservice employee benefits consultant.
OCTOBER 2006
NYSE: AJG INVESTMENT P R O F I L E
Stock Performance - Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500
As of SEPTEMBER 30, 2006 (unless otherwise indicated) www.ajg.com
1 01 1 02 1 03 1 04 1 05 1 00
300% 50% 100% 0% 150% 200% 250% 1 06
Gallagher S&P 500 Brokerage Segment .2 Acquisition Strategy .4 Risk Management Segment 4 Financial Services Segment . 5 Market Outlook .6 Condensed Financial Statements 7 Why Invest? ........8
Price .......$26.67 52-week high/low $31.7 7 - $24.42 Trailing 12-mos. revenues..$1.5 billion Market $2.6 billion Annual dividend .$ 1.20 Yield ...4.5 % Shares outstanding.......98.1 million End of fiscal year ....Dec ember 31 Price/earnings*.....18.1 x Number of employees....8, 469 Brokerage Segment Risk Management Segment Financial Services Segment
*Excludes discontinued operations, litigation related matters, retail contingent commission related matters and claims handling obligations.
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
Niche/Practice Groups
Agribusiness
Aviation & Aerospace Captives Casualty Construction Construction Project Solutions (Wrap Ups) Energy
Fine Arts
Global Risk Management Healthcare Higher Education Marine Personal Insurance Property Public Entity
Real Estate
- General CommercialHabitationalHospitalityShopping Centers Religious/Nonprofit Restaurant ServicesActuarialClaim AdvocacyLoss Control
Strategic Risk ServicesCyberRisk ServicesEnvironmentalFinancial ProductsLawyers ProfessionalManagement LiabilityPrivate Equity Transportation Worldwide Risk Services
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring P/C insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. In addition to generating business from its offices throughout the U.S., BSD pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operating divisions and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners.
BSD services clients of all sizes and is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of P/C insurance, over 75% of BSD's revenues are generated by more than two dozen specialized niches and practice groups. These cross-divisional teams target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This specialized focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. It allows for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these teams provide a competitive advantage.
Technological innovation is a key component of Gallagher's ongoing efforts to enhance client services and improve productivity. Through Gallagher Insighta proprietary, interactive online platformBSD clients can access their own password-protected Web portals to review and update account information. BSD professionals also use these portals to collaborate on and address client issues.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth over the next year will come from its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; from developing and managing alternative market mechanisms such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and through mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL DIVISION
DOMESTIC WHOLESALE BROKERAGE
Gallagher has built a substantial book of wholesale and excess/surplus lines business through acquisition and internal growth. In the U.S., this business is primarily generated by Risk Placement Services, Inc. (RPS) and its various operating units. RPS, which Gallagher formed from scratch in 1997, has grown rapidly to become one of the largest wholesale brokers in the U.S. Much of this business is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. An increasing amount of wholesale business is coming to Gallagher via the company's e-commerce portal, CoverageFirst.com, which now has more than 18,600 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
INTERNATIONAL RETAIL AND WHOLESALE P/C BROKERAGE
Gallagher offers retail and wholesale P/C brokerage and programs/program administration through various international operations.
Arthur J. Gallagher (UK) Limited, a Financial Services Authority (FSA) registered broker and approved Lloyd's of London broker, places risks for Gallagher and non-Gallagher producers and direct retail clients worldwide across all aviation, marine and non-marine classes.
Risk Management Partners Ltd., with offices in England and Scotland, markets insurance and risk management products and services to UK public entities.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
OCTOBER 2006
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL DIVISION (continued)
Arthur J. Gallagher Australasia, through its various operating companies, provides a full range of P/C solutions for wholesale and retail clients throughout Australia.
Arthur J. Gallagher (Bermuda) Limited offers wholesale P/C brokerage, programs and program administration through Gallagher and non-Gallagher producers.
REINSURANCE BROKERAGE
In 2005, Gallagher united all of its reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S., London, Bermuda, Australia and Singapore under the banner Gallagher Re to enhance brand awareness and facilitate resource sharing. Gallagher Re offers reinsurance brokerage and risk advisory services to a global client base, which includes insurance and reinsurance companies. It provides a wide range of P/C, life & accident and health expertise through treaty, program and facultative reinsurance services. Analytical capabilities, such as peril and natural hazard modeling, actuarial services and Dynamic Financial Analysis, are an intrinsic part of Gallagher Re's offerings.
CAPTIVE/RENT-A-CAPTIVE MANAGEMENT
Gallagher provides captive products and services to single parent, group and association captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups in leading offshore and onshore domiciles, including Bermuda, Grand Cayman, Hawaii, Vermont and Washington D.C.
STRATEGIC ALLIANCE NETWORK
Gallagher continues to strengthen its Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners. These relationships are based on strength, service capabilities and shared business philosophies. The network extends our client service capabilities to 120 countries around the world. In April 2006, we introduced a process to brand the network as the Gallagher Optimus Network. Ultimately, this move will give our preferred strategic partners a greater tie to the Gallagher organization, which should further enhance client services to our global accounts.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES DIVISION
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Compliance Consulting Merger & Acquisition Analysis Actuarial Services Executive Benefits/Financial Planning
Human Resource Services Retirement Plan Services
Employer Administrative Services Business Continuation
Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Gallagher Benefit Services offers expertise and guidance in all areas of employee benefits planning, delivery and administration, including executive benefits and financial planning, actuarial, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement brokerage and consulting, benefits outsourcing and human resource services. Changing benefit regulations, such as the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and Medicare Part D coverage, present ongoing challenges to employers. At the same time, benefit costs continue to soar.
To cope with these issues, employers are increasingly adopting disease management, wellness and consumer-driven healthcare programs. Gallagher Benefit Services continues to expand its technological, analytical and informational capabilities to help its clients address these and other issues. In addition, its branches hold a variety of training seminars for clients, focusing on such topics as consumer-driven healthcare, regulatory compliance, healthcare cost control initiatives, wellness and disease management initiatives, and integration of employer disability plans.
To provide more focused client support, Gallagher Benefit Services has established seven national practice groups in the following niches: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity & scholastic, religious, restaurant and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from mergers and acquisitions, its niche practice groups, cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, and assisting its clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
OCTOBER 2006
 
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 162 acquisitions from 1986 through September 2006, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these have been regional or local P/C brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Over the last decade, Gallagher has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, sales-oriented culture a profitable, growing business thats ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's historical acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
GALLAGHER BASSETT SERVICES
Expertise
Real-Time Claims Reporting
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management
Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education & Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the high-quality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as one of the world's largest claims administrators, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., UK, Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination. Gallagher Bassett has a diverse customer base with more than 80% of its claim management revenues derived from clients who do not utilize AJG as their primary broker.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims
INVESTMENT PROFILE
OCTOBER 2006
 
tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for more than a decade-and-a-half that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. During the third quarter of 2006, the system had more than 14,000 users and was averaging 21.5 million site hits and more than 75,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through the next year will come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the out-sourcing of insurance company claims departments.
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and optimizing tax benefits from Gallagher's investments. Financial Services has concentrated on tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax advantaged investments are comprised primarily of alternative energy investments and low-income housing developments. Gallagher has made investments in partnerships formed to develop energy that qualifies for tax credits under Internal Revenue Code (IRC) Section 29. These consist of waste-to-energy partnerships and synthetic coal (Syn/Coal) facilities. These investments helped to reduce Gallagher's effective income tax rate to 20% in 2004 and 23% in 2005. Through June 12, 2006, Gallagher idled two IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal facilities, which generate substantially all of Gallagher's tax credits, due to the impact of the estimated oil price phase-out of tax credits. Gallagher resumed production at these two facilities on June 12. As of September 30, 2006, Gallagher anticipates its 2006 tax rate to be approximately 24%.
Real estate investments include Gallagher's 60% ownership of a 25-story office building in Itasca, Illinois, that houses its home office operations and several of its profit centers. The building is almost 100% leased, with third parties occupying approximately 40%. Gallagher is in the process of selling its 60% interest in its home office land and building. Formal terms are in negotiation and the company anticipates that a sale will be completed by December 31, 2006.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to a two-thirds interest in 10 private investment management firms with approximately $3.0 billion under management at September 30, 2006.
Net Assets and
Financial Guarantees*
($ in millions) $400 $350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $362 $129
2002
2006*
Net Assets* ($ in millions) $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Tax Adv.
Asset Mgmt.
HO Bldg.
Other
Low-income Housing $10M Alternative Energy $35M Asset Alliance $41M
Home Office Building $12M
Other $10M
INVESTMENT PROFILE
OCTOBER 2006
 
MARKET OUTLOOK
The P/C market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an over-abundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000, the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%. A market correction began in 2000 and intensified in 2001 following the September 11th terrorist attacks. Double-digit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002.
In 2003, commercial P/C premiums stabilized and the market again began to soften, with premium rates falling, on average, throughout 2004, 2005 and the first half of 2006. One notable exception was coastal properties, which experienced significant rate hikes and coverage restrictions after 2005's unprecedented hurricane season and the resulting devastation. According to quarterly market surveys conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB), commercial P/C rate reductions in the first half of 2006 averaged about 3% across the U.S. In the third quarter of 2006, the CIAB survey indicated that average commercial premium rates were down by more than 5%. Coastal properties, on the other hand, continued to face capacity restrictions and increases in deductibles and exclusions, with premium levels at historic highs, according to survey respondents.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes self-insurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition has increased, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms.
The insurance industry remains under scrutiny by various regulatory bodies, including State Attorneys General and departments of insurance for various states, and legal actions by private litigants with respect to contingent compensation arrangements and various historical business practices. As previously reported, Gallagher entered into an Assurance of Voluntary Compliance (the AVC) on May 18, 2005, with both the Attorney General and Director of Insurance in the State of Illinois to resolve all issues related to certain investigations conducted by these Illinois State Agencies involving contingent commission arrangements. There was no lawsuit nor any finding of unlawful or deceitful conduct. As stipulated in the AVC, on January 12, 2006, Gallagher paid $26.9 million into a fund to be distributed to certain eligible policyholder clients. As of September 30, 2006, $18.4 million had been paid from the fund to eligible policyholders. In addition, under the AVC, Gallagher agreed to implement, to the extent not previously undertaken, certain business changes, including agreeing not to accept U.S.-domiciled retail contingent compensation as defined in the AVC. However, as allowed under the AVC, Gallagher has continued to accept contingent compensation from non-retail business, including business generated by wholesalers, managing general agents and managing general underwriters. In addition, the AVC allows Gallagher to collect retail contingent compensation related to contracts in place at entities it acquires for up to three years from the acquisition date. Accordingly, in 2005 Gallagher began to experience reduced contingent commission revenue, and in the first nine months of 2006, Gallagher received $2.1 million in retail contingent commission revenue verses $28.1 million in the first nine months of 2005. It is expected that future retail contingent commission revenues will continue to be substantially reduced.
In 2005, Gallagher recorded pretax charges totaling $73.6 million ($44.2 million after tax) in connection with the regulatory and legal actions by the State Attorneys General and private litigants related to contingent commissions and various other historical business practices, as described above. The 2005 charge represented Gallagher's best estimate of the amount required to resolve the state insurance investigations, which included all of the costs related to the funding and administration of the AVC, plus an accrual to resolve the pending litigation and an accrual for legal costs incurred or to be incurred to resolve these matters. Gallagher continues to be the subject of various regulatory and legal actions by State Attorneys General and private litigants investigating various historical business practices.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Except for the historical information and discussions, statements contained herein may contain certain "forward-looking statements" relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets, as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
OCTOBER 2006
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information2004 through 2006
(Unauditedin millions except per share data and other information data) All information restated to reflect discontinued operations.
2004 2005 2006
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues $202.5 $223.3 $239.8 $254.6 $920.2 $225.3 $246.8 $264.1 $264.6 $1,000.8 $225.2 $270.1 $286.9
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 33.5 44.2 56.6 52.1 186.4 (8.5) 43.5 53.4 (13.2) 75.2 17.9 47.7 60.0
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 19.8 26.1 33.4 30.7 110.0 (7.0) 23.1 28.3 (11.5) 32.9 10.5 28.6 35.4
Growthrevenues 9% 11% 9% 9% 9% 11% 11% 10% 4% 9% 0% 9% 9%
Pretax profit margin before litigation matters (1) 9% 17% 23% 18% 21% 5% 14% 20% 15% 17% 8% 17% 21%
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.21 $0.28 $0.35 $0.32 $1.16 $(0.07) $0.24 $0.29 $(0.12) $0.34 $0.11 $0.29 $0.36
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues $81.4 $86.0 $88.1 $90.0 $345.5 $91.6 $89.6 $94.3 $95.1 $370.6 $98.0 $98.4 $105.6
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 12.4 14.0 15.5 16.3 58.2 17.2 18.5 16.5 16.2 68.4 15.2 13.5 18.6
Earnings from continuing operations 7.6 8.5 9.5 9.9 35.5 10.1 10.9 9.7 9.6 40.3 9.0 8.2 11.3
Growthrevenues 18% 21% 17% 17% 18% 13% 4% 7% 6% 7% 7% 10% 12%
Pretax profit margin 15% 16% 18% 18% 17% 19% 21% 18% 17% 18% 16% 14% 18%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $0.08 $0.09 $0.10 $0.10 $0.37 $0.11 $0.11 $0.10 $0.10 $0.42 $0.09 $0.08 $0.12
BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT COMBINED
Revenues $283.9 $309.3 $327.9 $344.6 $1,265.7 $316.9 $336.4 $358.4 $359.7 $1,371.4 $323.2 $368.5 $392.5
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 45.9 58.2 72.1 68.4 244.6 8.7 62.0 69.9 3.0 143.6 33.1 61.2 78.6
Earnings from continuing operations 27.3 34.6 42.8 40.7 145.4 3.2 34.0 38.0 (2.0) 73.2 19.5 36.8 46.7
Growthrevenues 11% 14% 11% 11% 12% 12% 9% 9% 4% 8% 2% 10% 9%
Pretax profit margin before litigation matters (1) 11% 17% 22% 18% 20% 9% 16% 19% 16% 17% 10% 16% 20%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $0.29 $0.37 $0.45 $0.43 $1.54 $0.03 $0.36 $0.39 $(0.02) $0.76 $0.20 $0.37 $0.48
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income $45.0 $57.3 $33.0 $27.9 $163.2 $30.0 $30.9 $31.0 $17.0 $108.9 $4.3 $5.5 $37.9
Investment gains (losses) 2.5 2.1 2.6 0.9 8.1 (0.1) 3.8 0.5 (0.6) 3.6  (3.4) (9.2)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 3.4 (0.3) (3.6) (6.8) (7.3) (133.4) (4.6) (4.3) (4.1) (146.4) (4.1) (13.5) (17.8)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 12.0 11.7 11.9 8.5 44.1 (76.8) 10.2 12.5 9.5 (44.6) (2.4) (0.2) 3.5
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.13 $0.12 $ 0.12 $ 0.09 $ (0.07) $(0.81) $0.11 $0.13 $0.10 $(0.47) $(0.02) $ $0.03
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues $331.4 $368.7 $363.5 $373.4 $1,437.0 $346.8 $371.1 $389.9 $376.1 $1,483.9 $327.5 $370.6 $421.2
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 49.3 57.9 68.5 61.6 237.3 (124.7) 57.4 65.6 (1.1) (2.8) 29.0 47.7 60.8
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 39.3 46.3 54.7 49.2 189.5 (73.6) 44.2 50.5 7.5 28.6 17.1 36.6 50.2
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.41 $0.49 $0.57 $0.52 $2.00 $(0.80) $0.46 $0.52 $0.08 $0.30 $0.17 $0.37 $0.51
Dividends declared per share $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $1.00 $0.28 $0.28 $0.28 $0.28 $1.12 $0.30 $0.30 $0.30
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $2,873.0 $3,218.2 $3,085.0 $3,233.3 $3,227.7 $3,444.4 $3,385.8 $3,389.5 $3,135.1 $3,638.3 $3,415.1
Total liabilities $2,225.0 $2,521.4 $2,342.1 $2,472.3 $2,545.0 $2,701.5 $2,601.3 $2,620.4 $2,356.2 $2,837.1 $2,569.3
Total stockholders' equity $648.0 $696.8 $742.9 $761.0 $682.7 $742.9 $784.5 $769.1 $778.9 $801.2 $845.8
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 93,955 94,343 95,053 94,827 94,546 94,790 95,584 96,583 97,260 96,051 97,779 98,034 98,453
Common shares repurchased (000s) 555  615 613 1,783  59 11 6 76 18 431 10
Tangible net worth (2) $394.6 $427.5 $449.0 $386.8 $309.8 $342.6 $377.2 $350.9 $348.0 $343.8 $364.7
Book value per share $7.14 $7.58 $8.04 $8.26 $7.33 $7.85 $8.24 $8.04 $8.05 $8.24 $8.62
Tangible book value per share (3) $4.35 $4.65 $4.86 $4.20 $3.32 $3.62 $3.96 $3.67 $3.60 $3.54 $3.72
Annualized return on beginning tangible net worth (4) 37% 43% 47% 48% 48% NMF NMF 7% 8% 8% 20% 31% 39%
Number of acquisitions closed 7 3 4 5 19 2 5 1 2 10 1 4 3
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 6,958 7,180 7,451 7,840 7,975 8,052 8,099 8,135 8,248 8,358 8,469
Earnings (Loss) from Continuing Operations,
Before Litigation and Contingent Commission
Related Matters, Investment (Gains) Losses,
Claims Handling Obligations,
Pension Plan Curtailment, Depreciation,
Amortization, and Stock Compensation Expense (5)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations $39.3 $46.3 $54.7 $49.2 $189.5 $(73.6) $44.2 $50.5 $7.5 $28.6 $17.1 $36.6 $50.2
Litigation matters  166.0  38.6 204.6  -
Claim handling obligations  15.0 15.0  -
Investment (gains) losses (2.5) (2.1) (2.6) (0.9) (8.1) 0.1 (3.8) (0.5) 0.6 (3.6)  3.4 9.2
Pension plan curtailment gain  (10.0)  (10.0)  -
Depreciation 8.0 8.5 8.2 8.0 32.7 8.5 9.0 8.1 7.1 32.7 7.4 7.5 8.9
Amortization 3.0 5.8 4.1 4.8 17.7 5.3 5.3 5.1 5.0 20.7 5.5 5.5 5.9
Non-cash stock compensation 3.3 4.0 3.9 4.4 15.6 4.9 3.4 3.8 3.9 16.0 6.1 7.8 5.4
Tax effect (4.7) (6.5) (5.4) (6.5) (23.1) (73.9) (1.6) (6.6) (28.1) (110.2) (7.6) (9.7) (11.8)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations, investment (Gains) losses, pension plan curtailment gain, depreciation, amortization and stock compensation expense (6) $46.4 $56.0 $62.9 $59.0 $224.3 $37.3 $46.5 $60.4 $49.6 $193.8 $28.5 $51.1 $67.8
On a diluted per share basis $0.49 $0.59 $0.66 $0.62 $2.36 $0.39 $0.49 $0.63 $0.51 $2.02 $0.29 $0.52 $0.69
(1) Represents pretax earnings (loss) from continuing operations before the impact of pretax retail contingent commission related matters and claims handling obligations divided by total revenues, "excluding retail contingent commissions. Compensation expense and operating expense ration are computed using total revenues after excluding retail contingent commission matters. (2) Represents total stockholders' equity less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets.
(4) Represents year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity, less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets, as of the beginning of the year." (5) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of the impact of litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations,investment gains (losses), pension plan curtailment gain, depreciation, " amortization, amortization of deferred compensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense."
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
OCTOBER 2006
 
OCTOBER 2006 INVESTMENT PROFILE
8
WHY INVEST?
$200 $400 $60 $8 0 $1 000 $1 200 $1,400 $1,600 $669 $831 $998 $1,192 $1,403
Revenue Growth Total Revenues from Continuing Operations*(in millions) 17% CAGR
$1,455 00 01 02 03 04 05
Dividends Per Share (restated for stock splits)
86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04 05 06
$1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00 $1.20
19% Average Annual Increase
$0.00 $1.00 $2.00 $3.00 $4.00 $5.00 $6.00 $7.00 $8.00 $9.00
00 01 02 03 04 05
$3.95 $4.37 $5.96 $6.88 $8.26
GAAP Book Value Per Share 15% CAGR $8.04 $50 $100 $150 $200 $250 $99 $132 $156 $184 $211
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings from Continuing Operations*(in millions)
15% CAGR
$203 00 01 02 03 04 05 $50 $100 $150 $200 $250 $300 $88 $131 $169 $201$236
19% CAGR $0 $25 $50 $75 $100 $125 $150 $175 $200 99 00 01 02 03 $74 $91 $129 $168 $196 26% CAGR
Cash Earnings (in millions)
Earnings from Continuing Operations Before Litigation and Contingent Commission Related Matters, Claims Handling Obligations, Investment Gains (Losses), Pension Plan Curtailment Gain, Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense (in millions)
$210 00 01 02 03 04 05
*All information is as originally reported (excluding retail contingent commissions).
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Marsha J. Akin - Investor Relations | 630.773.3800


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20061208165452.txt.gz
TIME:20061208165452
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On December 7, 2006, in conjunction with the transaction described in Item 8.01 below, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) agreed to amend its existing lease for space in the Building (as defined below) to, among other things, extend the term from the current expiration date of February 28, 2011 to February 28, 2018 and to provide for a revised rent schedule. A copy of the lease amendment is attached to this report as Exhibit 10.5.2 and is incorporated herein by reference as though it were fully set forth herein. The description above is a summary of the lease amendment and is qualified in its entirety by the complete text of the amendment itself.
 
On December 7, 2006, HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership (the Seller), an Illinois limited partnership, and Wells Operating Partnership, L.P. (the Purchaser), a Delaware limited partnership, closed on a Purchase and Sale Agreement, which was entered into as of November 30, 2006, whereby the Seller agreed to sell its ownership interests in a twenty-seven story office building containing approximately 487,027 square feet of rentable area, and the related four-story parking structure accommodating approximately 1,374 parking spaces (collectively referred to as the Building), located at Two Pierce Road, Itasca, Illinois. AJG Two Pierce, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Gallagher, has a 60% ownership interest in HG/Two Pierce, L.L.C., an Illinois limited liability company, which has a 100% ownership interest in the Seller. In addition, Gallagher leases approximately 63% of the Building for its home office and several of its subsidiary operations.
Pursuant to the sale transaction, the total purchase price paid by Purchaser for the Building was $83.8 million. In addition, the Purchaser also reimbursed the Seller for a prepayment fee equal to $4.8 million incurred by the Seller in connection with the prepayment of the current mortgage and other loan documents. The outstanding balance on the mortgage as of the sale date was $75.2 million. Based on its ownership in the Seller, Gallagher is entitled to receive cash proceeds of approximately $8.0 million related to the sale, which will result in a pretax loss to Gallagher of approximately $4.5 million that will be recorded in fourth quarter 2006 in the Financial Services Segment.
In Gallagher's Form 8-K dated October 24, 2006 related to a press release setting forth its third quarter 2006 earnings, Gallagher provided guidance for its Financial Services Segment for fourth quarter 2006. Notwithstanding the impact of the events described above, considering the level of the anticipated average oil price for fourth quarter 2006 and resulting IRC Section 29 tax credit phase-out, Gallagher believes that its Financial Services Segment operating results for fourth quarter 2006 will still be within the earnings per share ranges previously provided.
This Form 8-K may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
Exhibit Index
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.5.2
THIS SIXTEENTH AMENDMENT TO LEASE is made as of this 7th day of December, 2006, by and between Wells REIT-Two Pierce Place, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Landlord") and Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation ("Tenant").
WHEREAS, Landlord's predecessor in interest and Tenant entered into a written lease dated July 26, 1989 (the "Original Lease"), as amended by that certain First Amendment to Lease dated as of May 20, 1991, that certain Second Amendment to Lease dated as of November 13, 1991, that certain Third Amendment to Lease dated as of July 14, 1992, that certain Fourth Amendment to Lease dated as of August 10, 1992, that certain Fifth Amendment to Lease dated as of August 31, 1992, that certain Sixth Amendment to Lease dated as of October 5, 1994, that certain Seventh Amendment to Lease dated as of February 10, 1999, that certain Eighth Amendment to Lease dated as of July 16, 2001, that certain Ninth Amendment to Lease dated as of November 13, 2002, that certain Tenth Amendment to Lease dated as of April 5, 2004, that certain Eleventh Amendment to Lease dated as of February 10, 2005 (the "Eleventh Amendment"), that certain Twelfth Amendment dated as of February 10, 2005 (the "Twelfth Amendment"), that certain Thirteenth Amendment dated as of February 10, 2005, that certain Fourteenth Amendment dated as of October 31, 2005, and that certain Fifteenth Amendment dated as of October 31, 2005 (collectively, the "Amended Lease") for approximately 306,259 rentable square feet (the "Current Premises"), as of January 1, 2007, and 631 square feet of storage space (the "Storage Space"), at Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois; and
WHEREAS, Landlord and Tenant have agreed to extend the term, all on the terms and conditions set forth herein.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and conditions hereinafter contained, Landlord and Tenant hereby agree as follows:
1. . The Term of the Amended Lease shall be extended from the current expiration date of February 28, 2011 until February 28, 2018 (the "Second Extension Term").
Lease Term
 
2. . Tenant shall pay as Monthly Base Rent for the Current Premises for the Second Extension Term the following amounts:
Base Rent
 
3. . Tenant shall pay as Monthly Storage Space Rental for the Storage Space for the Second Extension Term the following amounts:
Storage Space Rental
 
4. . Landlord shall have no obligation to alter or improve the Current Premises or Storage Space during the Second Extension Term and Tenant agrees to accept the Current Premises and Storage Space on the commencement date of the Second Extension Term in their then "AS IS" condition.
Improvements
5. . The first sentence of Paragraph 38(B) of the Original Lease is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Prevailing Market Rate
"The determination of Prevailing Market Rate, regardless of whether made by agreement between Landlord and Tenant or by the Appraisal Process, shall be based on lease terms and rental rates in Class "A" buildings of at least five (5) stories within a twenty (20) mile radius of the Building, which are comparable in services, amenities, quality and build out as those in the Building and Leased Premises, and shall take into account (1) the definition of rentable area or net rentable area, as the case may be, with respect to which the Prevailing Market Rate is computed, so that comparable useable area is being compared; (2) rental concessions then customarily being given or offered (such as, but not limited to, abatements, cost contributions, lease assumptions or take-overs, payment of moving or other expenses and construction allowances or leasehold improvements; (3) applicable distinctions between "gross" leases and "net" leases; (4) base year or base amounts used in calculating any pass-through of costs and expenses to tenants; and (5) customary brokerage commissions."
 
6. . The first sentence of Paragraph 41 of the Original Lease (Renewal Options) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Renewal Option
"Provided that there does not then exist an Event of Default hereunder with respect to (i) a breach of any material non-monetary obligation of Tenant hereunder, (ii) a breach of any monetary obligation of Tenant hereunder in excess of Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or (iii) a breach of Tenant's obligation to pay any Base Rent due hereunder, then Tenant shall have the right and option to renew this Lease (the "Third Renewal Option") by extending the Term for five (5) years commencing March 1, 2018, by providing Landlord with written notice thereof not later than September 1, 2016 (an "Intent to Renew Notice")."
7. . Paragraph 47 of the Original Lease (Building Identity) is hereby amended by adding the following at the end thereof:
Building Identity
"So long as this Lease remains in effect and Tenant and its Related Entities lease more square feet of rentable space in the Building than any other tenant thereof, Tenant will be permitted, at no additional rental charge, to erect signage in a location on the exterior of the Building selected by Tenant in its sole discretion, subject to Landlord's prior approval, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, reflecting Tenant's name, logo or a combination of both, at Tenant's sole discretion. Such signage must be approved by all local governmental authorities having jurisdiction over such signage and must meet all then existing contractual requirements and/or agreements of which Tenant has notice and which relate to signage on the exterior of the Building. At such time as Tenant and its Related Entities no longer lease more square feet of rentable space in the Building than any other tenant thereof, Tenant shall remove such signage. The erecting, maintaining and removing of such signage shall be performed at Tenant's sole cost and expense."
8. . Paragraph 55 of the Original Lease is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Parking
"A. Landlord at all times will provide sufficient parking in the Parking Structure so as to comply with all zoning and other requirements applicable to the Building. Commencing with the execution of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease by the parties, Landlord will provide Tenant with a total of sixteen (16) enclosed heated parking spaces (including fourteen (14) enclosed heated parking spaces previously provided to Tenant as of the date of such execution) at no charge to Tenant for the remaining Term of this Lease (including all renewal periods). The number of enclosed heated parking spaces will increase by one (1) space for every additional whole floor of additional space in the Building leased by Tenant throughout the remainder of the Term of this Lease (such increase to be effective at the time of occupancy of said additional space). Any such additional enclosed heated parking spaces will be at no charge to Tenant for the remaining Term of this Lease, including all renewal periods. Initial pass-cards, if necessary, shall be provided by Landlord at no cost to Tenant. Replacement pass-cards will be available for purchase from Landlord at an amount equal to Landlord's actual cost. The Parking Structure is intended for the sole use of the Building's tenants, their agents, employees, customers and invitees."
 
B. As of the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, Tenant is using sixty-six (66) reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure (in addition to the enclosed heated parking spaces described in A. above). Of such sixtysix (66) reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure, thirty (30) will be at no charge to Tenant through the remaining Term of this Lease, including all renewal periods. The charge for the remaining thirty-six (36) spaces shall be $360 per parking space per year during each of calendar years 2007, 2008 and 2009, payable in equal monthly installments of $30/each; provided, however, that to the extent that at any time during such three-year period, Landlord leases any reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure to employees of Tenant or any Related Entity that do not lease reserved parking spaces as of the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, for so long as such employees continue to lease such reserved parking spaces, such monthly charge shall be reduced by $30 for each parking space so leased by Landlord. Commencing on January 1, 2010 and thereafter through the remaining Term of this Lease, including all renewal periods, (i) there will be no charge for thirty (30) of the thirty-six (36) reserved parking spaces described in the preceding sentence, and (ii) Tenant shall have the right to use sixty (60) reserved parking spaces, all at no charge. To the extent that (i) at any time and from time to time during the period commencing on the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease and ending on December 31, 2009, Tenant desires to lease any reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure in excess of the sixty (60) reserved parking spaces described herein, or (ii) at any time and from time to time commencing on or after January 1, 2010, Tenant desires to lease any reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure in excess of the free sixty (60) reserved parking spaces described herein, in either such case, Tenant shall pay to Landlord the then prevailing market rate for comparable spaces. Landlord shall place signs in the Parking Structure designating such reserved parking spaces as being so reserved for Tenant, but Landlord shall have no responsibility or liability to Tenant by reason of the unauthorized use thereof by any third party. Landlord shall, however, make reasonable efforts to preserve Tenant's exclusive rights to such spaces and to prevent the repeated unauthorized use thereof."
9. . The following is hereby added at the end of paragraph 2(A). of Exhibit C to the Lease:
Specific Operating Expenses
"Tenant hereby agrees that Operating Costs may include expenses and costs incurred by Landlord in connection with the Parking Garage Repairs and the Window Gasket Repairs (as such terms are hereinafter defined) provided that (i) the maximum amount of Operating Costs attributable to the Parking Garage Repairs and Window Gasket Repairs shall not exceed $938,000, less the cost of any such Parking Garage Repairs which are performed prior to December 31, 2006, provided that Landlord determines that such Parking Garage Repairs were performed in a good and workmanlike manner reasonably acceptable to Landlord, and (ii) Tenant's Proportionate Share of the Operating Costs attributable to the Parking Garage Repairs and the Window Gasket Repairs will be payable in installments over a period of not less than twenty-four (24) months, provided that in any calendar year, Tenant's Proportionate Share of Operating Costs attributable to Parking Garage Repairs and Window Gasket
 
Repairs will not exceed $.96 per square foot of space comprising the Leased Premises and will be clearly delineated in each estimate of Operating Costs and each statement of actual Operating Costs delivered to Tenant. For purposes hereof, the "Parking Garage Repairs" shall refer to the items listed on Schedule 1 attached to the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease. For purposes hereof, the term "Window Gasket Repairs" shall mean the cutting and wet glazing of all the window gaskets at all elevations of the Building which work is commenced during the five (5) year period following the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease. Landlord agrees that commencing not later than April 15, 2007, the property management fees comprising Operating Costs shall not exceed the sum of three percent (3%) of the total base rents and additional rents for taxes and operating expenses (but excluding rents or other amounts paid for parking spaces or storage spaces) collected by such property manager from tenants in the Building, plus (i) the actual salaries and related employment benefits paid to employees of the property management company who perform management, maintenance and other similar functions related solely to the Building, and (ii) the allocable share of the actual salaries and related employment benefits paid to employees of the property management company who perform management, maintenance and other similar functions related to the Building and other properties owned by Landlord or its affiliates, provided said allocable share shall be calculated in a commercially reasonable manner by Landlord taking into account the actual relative amount of work and services performed by such employees for the benefit of the Building and for the benefit of such other properties. Tenant shall have the right to audit Landlord's allocation methodology for employees described in clause (ii) of the preceding sentence as part of any examination it makes of Landlord's books and records performed pursuant to Paragraph 66 of this Lease and an additional two (2) times per calendar year."
10. . A new Paragraph 75 will be added to the Lease as follows:
Gallagher Cafeteria
"At any time after the execution of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, Tenant will have the right to build out all or a portion of the first, second or thirteenth floors of the Building, at its sole discretion, provided that Tenant then leases said floor or portion thereof and for so long as Tenant continues to lease said floor or portion thereof, Tenant shall have the right to designate and use such floors or portions thereof as a cafeteria (the "Gallagher Cafeteria"). Landlord shall have the right to approve the plans and specification for the Gallagher Cafeteria, provided that such approval shall be limited to confirmation that such plans and specifications do not have an adverse effect on the structural integrity of the Building, are not in violation of any laws or ordinances applicable to the Building and would not result in a cafeteria that would be inconsistent with the overall quality of the Building. Landlord shall provide Tenant with its approval or disapproval of any proposed plans and specifications for the Gallagher Cafeteria, subject to the limitations contained in the preceding sentence, within ten (10) business days after receipt thereof, and in the event that Landlord fails to disapprove any such proposed plans and specifications within such ten (10) business day period, it shall be deemed to have approved the plans and specifications. The Gallagher Cafeteria will be operated by Tenant for the use of Tenant's employees, agents, patrons, customers and invitees on a subsidized or non-subsidized basis, as Tenant so elects from time to time, and used solely for the preparation of and meal consumption as well as
 
non-alcoholic beverages, provided that the Gallagher Cafeteria will be available for use during its regular hours of operation by other tenants of the Building at non-subsidized prices. Pursuant to this Paragraph 75, the Gallagher Cafeteria will be permitted by the Landlord and not be in violation of any use clause under this Lease nor any of Landlord's Rules and Regulations as contained in Exhibit E of this Lease. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Tenant shall have the right to close the Gallagher Cafeteria to other tenants of the Building so that it may be used for private functions not more than twenty (20) days (any one or more of which may be consecutive) in any calendar year, provided that Tenant posts a written notice in the vicinity of the Gallagher Cafeteria at least seven (7) days' prior to any day that the Gallagher Cafeteria will be closed to other tenants of the Building stating the date of such closure. Landlord represents and warrants to the Tenant that the addition of the Gallagher Cafeteria to the Building will not violate any other current or future tenant's lease rights. The parties will cooperate with one another in good faith in the efforts to build and operate the Gallagher Cafeteria. The parties agree that they will modify or add any applicable insurance coverages, as necessary, to open and operate the Gallagher Cafeteria in the Building, provided that any excess cost incurred by Landlord to make appropriate modifications to its insurance shall be reimbursed thereto by Tenant."
11. . A new Paragraph 76 will be added to the Lease as follows:
Gallagher Fitness Facility
"At any time after the execution of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, Tenant will have the right to build out all or a portion of any floor of the Building that it then leases, at its sole discretion, and so long as Tenant continues to lease such floor or portion thereof, Tenant shall have the right to designate and use such floor or portion thereof as a workout/fitness facility (the "Gallagher Fitness Facility"). Landlord shall have the right to approve the plans and specification for the Gallagher Fitness Facility, provided that such approval shall be limited to confirmation that such plans and specifications do not have an adverse effect on the structural integrity of the Building are not in violation of any laws or ordinances applicable to the Building. Landlord shall provide Tenant with its approval or disapproval of any proposed plans and specifications for the Gallagher Fitness Facility, subject to the limitations contained in the preceding sentence, within ten (10) business days after receipt thereof, and in the event that Landlord fails to disapprove any such proposed plans and specifications within such ten (10) business day period, it shall be deemed to have approved the plans and specifications. The Gallagher Fitness Facility will be operated by Tenant solely for the use of Tenant's employees, agents, patrons, customers and invitees. Pursuant to this Paragraph 76, the Gallagher Fitness Facility will be permitted by the Landlord and not be in violation of any use clause under this Lease nor any of Landlord's Rules and Regulations as contained in Exhibit E of this Lease. Landlord represents and warrants to the Tenant that the addition of the Gallagher Fitness Facility to the Building will not violate any other current or future tenant's lease rights. The parties will cooperate with one another in good faith in the efforts to build and operate the Gallagher Fitness Facility. The parties agree that they will modify or add any applicable insurance coverages, as necessary, to open and operate the Gallagher Fitness Facility in the Building, provided that any excess cost incurred by Landlord to make appropriate modifications to its insurance shall be reimbursed thereto by Tenant."
 
12. Paragraph 2 of the Eleventh Amendment is amended by deleting the description of Periods and Monthly Base Rent contained therein and substituting the following in lieu thereof:
 
13. . Paragraph 5 of the Twelfth Amendment is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Right of First Offer
"Tenant shall have the right of first offer on any space which becomes available for lease in the Building, from time to time, on or after the execution date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease ("Additional Space"), subject to any existing superior options of existing tenants in the Building. Landlord will deliver a written notice (a "Right of First Offer Notice") to Tenant containing the terms for the Additional Space within ten (10) business days of Landlord's knowledge that any space is available for lease in the Building. Tenant thereafter shall have a period of ten (10) business days in which to notify Landlord in writing of Tenant's desire to lease the Additional Space (an "Exercise Notice"). If Landlord does not receive an Exercise Notice within ten (10) business days after Landlord's delivery to Tenant of a Right of First Offer Notice, then Landlord shall be free to lease the Additional Space. The rent for the Additional Space will be the Prevailing Market Rate determined at the time Landlord's Right of First Offer Notice is delivered to Tenant. Landlord and Tenant agree to negotiate in good faith to determine the remainder of the terms under which the Additional Space will be leased, including, but not limited to, the amount of tenant improvement allowance, any abatements or concessions and the expiration date for the Additional Space. The Additional Space shall automatically be included in the Premises effective as of the Additional Commencement Date (as hereinafter defined) and all of the covenants, conditions and provisions of the Amended Lease shall thereupon be applicable to the Additional Space, except that (x) Tenant's proportionate share shall increase accordingly, and (z) the renewal option set forth in Paragraph 41 of the Original Lease shall apply to the Additional Space. As used herein, the term "Additional Commencement Date" shall mean the date set forth in a Right of First Offer Notice as the date that space in the Building will be available for lease, which date may not be less than sixty (60) days after the date of the Right of First Offer Notice.
 
14. . Tenant acknowledges that it has waived the payment of the installments of the construction allowance described in Paragraph 5 of the Twelfth Amendment (prior to such Paragraph 5 being deleted as provided herein) that are due on March 1, 2009 and March 1, 2010.
Waiver of Certain Payments
15. . Paragraph 6 of the Twelfth Amendment (Expansion Space Renewal Rent Rate) is hereby deleted and shall have no further force or effect.
Superseded Provision
16. . Tenant represents that Tenant has not directly dealt with any broker in connection with this Sixteenth Amendment and agrees to indemnify and hold Landlord and the managing agent and leasing agent harmless from all losses, damages, claims, liens, liabilities, costs and expense (including without limitation reasonable attorney's fees) arising from any claims or demands of any broker or brokers or finders for any commission or other compensation alleged to be due such broker or brokers or finders in connection with its participating on behalf of Tenant in the negotiation of this Sixteenth Amendment or in exhibiting the Current Premises or Storage Space.
Broker's Commission
17. . Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Amended Lease.
Terms of Amended Lease
18. . Except as otherwise amended hereby, the terms and covenants of the Amended Lease remain in full force and effect in accordance with their terms.
Incorporation of Amended Lease
19. . This Sixteenth Amendment may be executed in counterparts and all said counterparts shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Landlord and Tenant have executed this Sixteenth Amendment as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.41
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this "Agreement") is made and entered into as of the 30
th
day of November, 2006 (the "Effective Date") by and between HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership, an Illinois limited partnership ("Seller"), and Wells REITTwo Pierce Place, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Purchaser").
A. Seller is the owner of a certain twenty-seven (27) story office building containing approximately 487,027 square feet of rentable area (the "Building") and a certain four (4) story parking structure accommodating approximately 1,374 parking spaces (the "Parking Structure"), the Building and the Parking Structure together having an address of Two Pierce Road, Itasca, Illinois.
B. Seller desires to sell to Purchaser, and Purchaser desires to purchase from Seller, the Building and Parking Structure, and the other Property (as hereinafter defined) pertaining thereto, for the consideration, and upon and subject to the other terms and conditions, as hereinafter set forth in this Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing premises and the mutual undertakings and agreements of the parties as set forth below, Purchaser and Seller hereby agree as follows:
1. . Upon and subject to the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth in this Agreement, Seller hereby agrees to sell, transfer, assign and convey to Purchaser, and Purchaser hereby agrees to purchase, acquire and assume from Seller, all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to the following (collectively, the "Property"):
Property to Be Purchased and Sold
(a) : That certain parcel of land located in DuPage County, Illinois, and more particularly described in attached hereto and made a part hereof (the "Land"), together with all easements, rights-of-way, privileges, appurtenances and other rights, if any, pertaining thereto;
Land
Exhibit A
(b) : All buildings, structures, and other improvements now or hereafter erected or located on the Land or affixed thereto, including without limitation the Building and Parking Structure, and all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to any and all building systems, machinery and fixtures attached thereto or comprising a part thereof (collectively, the "Improvements"; and, together with the Land, the "Real Property");
Improvements
(c) : All machinery, equipment, building materials, appliances, furniture, furnishings, tools, instruments, parts and other articles of tangible personal property of every kind and nature whatsoever owned by Seller that are located on or used in connection with the Real Property and more particularly described in attached hereto and made a part hereof (collectively, the "Personal Property");
Personal Property
Exhibit B
(d) : The leases, licenses and other agreements with respect to the possession, use, or occupancy of space within the Improvements, whether presently existing or that are hereafter entered into by Seller and more particularly described in attached hereto and made a part hereof (the "Leases");
Leases
Exhibit C
(e) : Subject to proration as provided in below, the rents, license payments and other payments under or with respect to the Leases (the "Rents");
Rents
Section 15
(f) : The security and other deposits made under or with respect to the Leases and more particularly described in attached hereto and made a part hereof (the "Security Deposits");
Security Deposits
Exhibit D
(g) : To the extent assignable or transferable by Seller, any and all warranties and guaranties of third parties with respect to the Improvements and/or the Personal Property (collectively, the "Warranties");
Warranties
(h) : To the extent assignable or transferable by Seller, any and all permits, licenses, approvals and authorizations with respect to the possession, use, and/or occupancy of the Real Property and the Personal Property (collectively, the "Permits");
Permits
(i) : To the extent assignable or transferable by Seller, any and all service contracts, maintenance contracts, and other contracts and agreements with respect to the Real Property and/or the Personal Property, whether presently existing or that are hereafter entered into by Seller, as set forth in attached hereto and made a part hereof (the "Property Agreements"); provided, however, Seller will not assign or transfer those certain service contracts, maintenance contracts, and other contracts and agreements listed on attached hereto and Seller shall terminate such contracts and agreements as of the Closing Date; and
Property Agreements
Exhibit E
Exhibit Q
(j) : To the extent assignable or transferable by Seller, all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to all other contracts and agreements, books and records, utility use agreements, goodwill, and other intangible personal property of every kind and nature whatsoever which Seller now or hereafter owns, possesses, or otherwise has available to it pertaining to the Real Property and the Personal Property and the ownership, construction, and/or operation thereof (collectively, the "Additional Property").
Additional Property
However, Purchaser hereby acknowledges and agrees that "Property", the "Personal Property" and the "Additional Property" shall not include any cash or any accounts maintained by Seller with respect to the Property for any purpose (including, without limitation, any operating cash accounts or accounts required to be maintained by Seller's lender).
2. . Within three (3) Business Days (as hereinafter defined) after the Effective Date, Purchaser shall deposit with Chicago Title Insurance Company in Atlanta, Georgia, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent"), by wire transfer of immediately available funds, the amount of TWO MILLION and 00/100 DOLLARS ($2,000,000.00) (the "Deposit"), as earnest money. Seller shall have the right to terminate this Agreement if Purchaser fails to deposit the Initial Deposit during the three (3) Business Day
Earnest Money
 
period. Any interest earned by the Deposit shall be considered part of the Deposit. Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, the Deposit shall be held by the Escrow Agent, in escrow in accordance with the terms of attached hereto, for the mutual benefit of the parties hereto, in a federally-insured, interest-bearing account and applied against the Purchase Price (as hereinafter defined) at Closing (as hereinafter defined). Purchaser and Seller shall enter into any supplement to this Agreement reasonably required by the Escrow Agent for purposes of acknowledging Escrow Agent's standard escrow terms and conditions and incorporating the same into this Agreement. Purchaser and Seller shall share the cost of the Escrow Agent's fees and any expense associated with the escrow of the Deposit.
Exhibit F
3. . The total purchase price to be paid by Purchaser for the Property (the "Purchase Price") is EIGHTY-THREE MILLION SEVEN HUNDRED FIFTY THOUSAND and 00/100 DOLLARS ($83,750,000.00). Purchaser shall also pay to Seller a prepayment fee equal to FOUR MILLION EIGHT HUNDRED THOUSAND and 00/100 DOLLARS ($4,800,000.00) in connection with the prepayment of the current mortgage and other loan documents (the "Loan Documents") from Teachers Insurance and Annuity Association (the "TIAA Financing"), except that if the closing occurs after December 8, 2006, the prepayment fee shall be reduced to FOUR MILLION SIX HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND and 00/100 DOLLARS ($4,625,000). In the event that the prepayment fees or penalties are higher than the foregoing amount, Seller shall be responsible for any additional amounts owed. In the event that the prepayment fees or penalties are lower than the foregoing amount, Seller shall be entitled to retain the amount of the over payment. All escrows and other deposits held in connection with the TIAA Financing shall be paid to Seller and shall not be used to reduce the prepayment penalty. The Purchase Price, less the Deposit and subject to the adjustments for prorations and apportionments as provided in this Agreement, shall be paid on the Closing Date by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account or accounts designated by Seller.
Purchase Price
4. .
Title and Survey
(a) As evidence of title to the Real Property, within two (2) Business Days after the Effective Date, Purchaser shall order, at Seller's cost and expense, and upon receipt shall deliver to Seller, a commitment for an ALTA Form B owner's policy of title insurance (the "Commitment"), issued by Chicago Title Insurance Company (the "Title Company"), in which the Title Company agrees to insure good and marketable title to the fee simple estate in the Real Property subject to the matters therein disclosed, for the full amount of the Purchase Price, upon execution and delivery of a special warranty deed from Seller to Purchaser, along with copies of all documents relating to title exceptions referred to therein.
(b) Within two (2) Business Days after the Effective Date, Seller shall order, at Seller's cost and expense, and upon receipt deliver to Purchaser, a current survey for the Real Property (the "Survey"). The Survey shall (a) include a certification that it has been prepared in accordance with the Minimum Standard Detail Requirements for ALTA/ACSM Land Title Surveys as adopted by the American Land Title Association and the National Society of Professional Surveyors (2005), and (b) be certified to Purchaser and the Title Company.
 
(c) If the Commitment or Survey disclose any matters to which Purchaser objects, Purchaser shall notify Seller in writing of Purchaser's objections on or before 5:00 p.m. (Chicago Time) on the fifth (5
th
) day after whichever of the Commitment or Survey is the later to be delivered to Purchaser (the "Objection Period"). In the event Purchaser shall so notify Seller of any such objections prior to the expiration of the Objection Period, Seller shall have until 5:00 p.m. (Chicago Time) on the fifth (5
th
) day after Seller's receipt of Purchaser's written notice of objections in which to cure or remove Purchaser's objections. If Seller is unable or unwilling to cure or remove such objections within the five (5) day period, Purchaser may elect prior to the tenth (10
th
) day after Seller's receipt of Purchaser's written notice of objections to either terminate this Agreement by written notice to Seller, or waive the uncured or unremoved objections and proceed to Closing (without any reduction in the Purchase Price). Seller shall have no obligation to cure or remove any matters to which Purchaser objects except that Seller shall be obligated at Closing to discharge (i) all mortgages of Seller (regardless of whether Purchaser objects to such mortgages), and (ii) all undisputed monetary liens arising by, through or under Seller (collectively, the "Monetary Liens"). The term "mortgage" as used herein includes any mortgage, deed of trust, deed to secure debt and similar security instrument securing an indebtedness of Seller and encumbering the Property or any portion thereof; the terms "discharge" and "discharged" as used herein include compliance with a bonding procedure that allows the mortgage or item to be removed from the title exceptions in the title insurance policy. If Purchaser timely elects to terminate this Agreement pursuant to the preceding sentences, this Agreement shall terminate, the Deposit shall be returned to Purchaser, and neither party shall have any further obligation to the other arising out of this Agreement except for those obligations under this Agreement which expressly survive termination. Failure by Purchaser to provide Seller with Purchaser's written notice of termination pursuant to the preceding sentences shall be deemed an election by Purchaser to waive its objections, to proceed to Closing, and to accept such title as Seller is able to convey, but with Seller curing all Monetary Liens (without any reduction in the Purchase Price). Any matters regarding title and survey that Purchaser waives (or is deemed to have waived) pursuant to the foregoing provisions, shall be deemed "Permitted Exceptions".
(d) Whether or not Purchaser shall have furnished to Seller any notice of title objections pursuant to Section 4(c), Purchaser may, at or prior to Closing, notify Seller in writing of any objections to title first raised by the Title Company or the surveyor between (a) the effective date of the applicable Commitment and (b) the Closing Date; , , that Purchaser must notify Seller of any such objections on or before the date that is three (3) Business Days after Purchaser's first receipt of an updated commitment, updated survey or written notice from Seller (whichever first provides notice) of the condition giving rise to any such objection. With respect to any objections to title set forth in such notice, Seller shall have the same option to cure and Purchaser shall have the same option to accept title subject to such matters or to terminate this Agreement as set forth in above. If Seller elects to attempt to cure any such matters, Seller shall have the right, at its election, to extend the Closing Date by a reasonable additional time to effect such a cure, but in no event shall Closing be extended for more than thirty (30) days.
provided
however
Section 4(c)
 
5. . Intentionally Deleted
Inspections
6. . Seller hereby represents and warrants to Purchaser that the following statements are, and as of the Closing Date will be, true and correct in all material respects:
Seller's Representations and Warranties
(a) : Seller is a limited partnership duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the State of Illinois.
Due Organization
(b) : Seller has full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to consummate the transactions in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, and to comply with and fulfill the terms of this Agreement. Seller's execution and delivery of this Agreement, and consummation of the transactions by Seller in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, have been duly authorized by all necessary organizational action of Seller.
Power; Authorization
(c) : This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by Seller.
Execution
(d) : Neither execution and delivery by Seller of this Agreement, nor consummation of the transaction by Seller in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, nor compliance by Seller with or fulfillment by Seller of the terms of this Agreement, will violate, conflict with or result in a breach of the terms, conditions or provisions of, or constitute a default under, (i) the organizational documents of Seller, (ii) any material approval, restriction, condition, covenant, commitment, contract or agreement to which Seller is a party or by which Seller or the Property is otherwise bound, or (iii) any statute, ordinance, law, rule, regulation, policy, guideline, code, ruling, order, writ, injunction, decree or judgment of any federal, state, municipal or other governmental department, commission, board, bureau, agency, authority or instrumentality (collectively, "Governmental Authority") or any principle of common law (collectively, "Laws"), applicable to Seller or the Property.
No Violation
(e) : Except for any recordings or filings of the conveyance documents that may be necessary or appropriate in connection with the consummation of the transactions under this Agreement, no license, permit, certificate, order, authorization, consent, franchise, designation, declaration, filing, registration or approval of or with any Governmental Authority, or any other public or private body or person, is required to permit Seller to execute and deliver this Agreement, to consummate the transactions in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, or to comply with and fulfill the terms of this Agreement.
Required Consents
 
(f) : Seller has not received any outstanding written notice of any alleged material violation of or material nonconformity with any Law relating to, or any material restriction, condition, covenant, commitment, contract or agreement concerning, the ownership, operation, use and/or occupancy of the Property.
Compliance with Applicable Laws
(g) : There is no governmental or other action, suit, claim, investigation or proceeding pending or, to Seller's actual knowledge, threatened by or against Seller or the Real Property before any court or Governmental Authority; and no judgment, order, writ, injunction, decree, ruling or other similar command of any court or Governmental Authority has been served upon or, to Seller's actual knowledge, entered against, Seller or the Real Property, that is presently in effect.
Litigation
(h) : Seller has not made any binding agreement for the sale of the Property, or, given any person an agreement, option or right of first refusal to purchase all or any part of the Property, which remains outstanding.
Options
(i) : Except for the rights of tenants under their Leases, the Property is in the sole possession of Seller, and no other person has a right to possession or claims possession of all or any part of the Property
Possession
(j) : Seller has received no written notice and Seller has no actual knowledge of, any threatened or contemplated action by any Governmental Authority having the power of eminent domain, which might result in any part of the Real Property or Additional Property being taken by condemnation or conveyed in lieu thereof. Seller shall, immediately upon receiving any such notice or learning of any such contemplated or threatened action, give Purchaser written notice thereof.
Condemnation
(k) : The Leases described in attached hereto and made a part hereof constitute all of the leases and other occupancy agreements (and all amendments thereto), currently in effect with respect to the Property. The Leases are in full force and effect. Except as set forth in the Leases or on attached hereto and made a part hereof, there are no unpaid tenant improvement allowance or Landlord obligations to perform any tenant improvements under the Leases or unpaid leasing commissions. Seller has not delivered or received any written notice of default under the Leases that remains uncured. Seller has no knowledge of any defaults under the Leases or any event which with the passage of time or giving of notice would constitute a default under the Leases. No tenant has asserted any claim of offset or other defense in respect of the Leases or Seller's obligations under the Leases. Seller has not assigned, pledged, transferred, or otherwise encumbered any rights or benefits of Seller under the Leases, including, without limitation, the rents payable thereunder except as shown on the Commitment.
Leases
Exhibit C
Exhibit C
(l) : The Property Agreements constitute all of the Property Agreements currently in effect with respect to the Property. To the best of Seller's knowledge, all such Property Agreements are in full force and effect in accordance with their respective provisions and Seller has no knowledge of, and has received no notice of, any default, or claim of default, on the part of any party to any of such Property Agreements.
Property Agreements
 
(m) : There are no employees of the Property or Seller who will become employees of Purchaser or for which Purchaser shall be responsible in any way except pursuant to union contracts, true and complete copies of which have been delivered to Purchaser.
Employees
(n) : There is not pending against Seller (i) a petition in bankruptcy, whether voluntary or otherwise, (ii) an assignment for the benefit of creditors, (iii) any petition seeking reorganization or arrangement under the bankruptcy or insolvency laws of the United States or any state, or (iv) any other similar action brought under such bankruptcy or insolvency laws; and (b) no trustee or receiver has been appointed to take control over Seller or any part of the Property.
Bankruptcy; Insolvency
(o) : Seller has previously delivered or made available to Purchaser true and complete copies of the books and records used by Seller in the operation of the Property.
Books and Records
(p) : Except as set forth in the Phase I environmental assessment report for the Property delivered by Seller to Purchaser on or before the execution of this Agreement, as listed and described on attached hereto and made a part hereof (collectively the "Phase I Report"), or in any environmental report obtained by Purchaser or as otherwise disclosed to Purchaser in writing, to Seller's knowledge, Seller has received no written notification that any governmental or quasi-governmental authority has determined that there are any violations of environmental statutes, ordinances or regulations affecting the Property. As used herein, "Hazardous Substances" means all hazardous or toxic materials, substances, pollutants, contaminants, or wastes currently identified as a hazardous substance or waste in the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 (commonly known as "CERCLA"), as amended, the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act (commonly known as "SARA"), the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (commonly known as "RCRA"), or any other federal, state or local legislation or ordinances applicable to the Property.
Environmental Matters
Exhibit P
For purposes of this , references to the "actual knowledge" of Seller shall refer only to the actual knowledge of Jennifer Brock and Ronald C. Lunt (together, the "Designated Persons"), and shall not be construed to refer to the knowledge of any other owner, officer, manager, agent or employee of Seller or any of its affiliates or to impose on the Designated Persons any duty to investigate the matter to which such actual knowledge, or the absence thereof, pertains. Seller represents that the Designated Persons are the persons most knowledgeable about the Property and the most likely to receive notices and other communications about the Property.
Section 6
 
7. . EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN OR ELSEWHERE IN THIS AGREEMENT, PURCHASER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT PURCHASER IS PURCHASING AND ACQUIRING THE PROPERTY "AS-IS", "WHERE IS", AND WITH ALL FAULTS, AND THAT EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY STATED IN , SELLER HAS NOT MADE AND DOES NOT MAKE ANY REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, PROMISES, COVENANTS, AGREEMENTS OR GUARANTIES, WHETHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, WRITTEN OR ORAL, BY OPERATION OF LAW OR OTHERWISE, OF ANY KIND OR NATURE WHATSOEVER WITH RESPECT TO THE PROPERTY OR AS TO, CONCERNING OR WITH RESPECT TO (A) THE VALUE, NATURE, QUANTITY, QUALITY OR CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY, (B) THE INCOME TO BE DERIVED FROM THE PROPERTY, (C) THE SUITABILITY OF THE PROPERTY FOR ANY OR ALL ACTIVITIES AND USES THAT PURCHASER MAY CONDUCT THEREON, (D) THE COMPLIANCE OF OR BY THE PROPERTY OR ITS OPERATION WITH ANY LAWS, RULES, ORDINANCES OR REGULATIONS OF ANY APPLICABLE GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY OR BODY, (E) THE STATUS OF TITLE TO THE PROPERTY, (F) THE MANNER, QUALITY, STATE OF REPAIR OR LACK OF REPAIR OF THE PROPERTY, (G) THE ZONING OF THE PROPERTY, (H) THE STATUS OR CONTENT OF ANY PLANS, PERMITS, SURVEYS, OR OTHER DOCUMENTS RELATING TO THE PROPERTY, (I) THE CONTENT, COMPLETENESS OR ACCURACY OF THE TITLE COMMITMENT OR THE DUE DILIGENCE MATERIALS FURNISHED TO (OR TO BE FURNISHED TO) OR OBTAINED BY (OR TO BE OBTAINED BY) PURCHASER; (J) THE CONFORMITY OF THE IMPROVEMENTS TO ANY PLANS OR SPECIFICATIONS FOR THE PROPERTY, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ANY PLANS AND SPECIFICATIONS THAT MAY HAVE BEEN OR MAY BE PROVIDED TO PURCHASER; (K) THE CONFORMITY OF THE PROPERTY TO PAST, CURRENT OR FUTURE APPLICABLE ZONING OR BUILDING REQUIREMENTS; OR (L) ANY OTHER ASPECT OR COMPONENT OF THE PROPERTY. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, PURCHASER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT UNDERSTANDS AND AGREES THAT SELLER MAKES NO EXPRESS OR IMPLIED REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES OF FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, SUITABILITY, HABITABILITY, AND/OR MERCHANTABILITY WITH RESPECT TO THE PROPERTY OR ANY ASPECT OR CONDITION THEREOF. PURCHASER HEREBY AGREES THAT SELLER IS NOT LIABLE OR BOUND BY ANY GUARANTEES, PROMISES, STATEMENTS, REPRESENTATIONS, OR INFORMATION PERTAINING TO THE PROPERTY MADE OR FURNISHED BY ANY REAL ESTATE AGENT, BROKER, EMPLOYEE, SERVANT OR OTHER PERSON REPRESENTING OR PURPORTING TO REPRESENT SELLER'S INTERESTS, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN ABOVE. PURCHASER FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT PURCHASER IS RELYING SOLELY ON ITS OWN INSPECTIONS AND INVESTIGATIONS WITH RESPECT TO ALL MATTERS REGARDING THE PROPERTY AND ALL ASPECTS AND COMPONENTS THEREOF.
AS-IS, WHERE-IS TRANSACTION
SECTION 6
SECTION 6
SECTION 6
EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT SELLER BREACHES ANY OF ITS REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, PURCHASER, ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS HEREBY WAIVE, RELEASE AND AGREE NOT TO MAKE OR BRING ANY CLAIMS, SUITS OR ACTIONS (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ANY CLAIMS,
 
SUITS OR ACTIONS FOR CONTRIBUTION) AGAINST SELLER, OR SELLER'S AFFILIATES, SUCCESSORS OR ASSIGNS, WITH RESPECT TO ANY MATTERS PERTAINING TO THE PROPERTY OR ANY CONDITION OR ASPECT THEREOF.
8. . Purchaser hereby represents and warrants to Seller that the following statements are, and as of the Closing Date will be, true and correct in all material respects:
Purchaser's Representations and Warranties
(a) : As of the Effective Date, Purchaser is a limited partnership duly organized and validly existing under the Laws of the State of Delaware. If Purchaser assigns this Agreement pursuant to below at or prior to Closing, the assignee will be an entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under its jurisdiction of formation and, if required by applicable Law, will be qualified to do business and in good standing under the Laws of the State of Illinois.
Due Organization
Section 22
(b) : Purchaser has full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, to consummate the transactions in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, and to comply with and fulfill the terms of this Agreement; and there are no legal, contractual or other restrictions upon Purchaser's right, power or authority to purchase, acquire and assume the Property from Seller in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. Purchaser's execution and delivery of this Agreement, and consummation by Purchaser of the transactions in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, have been duly authorized by all necessary organizational action of Purchaser.
Power; Authorization
(c) : This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by Purchaser, and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of Purchaser, enforceable against Purchaser in accordance with its terms.
Execution
(d) : Neither the execution and delivery by Purchaser of this Agreement, nor consummation by Purchaser of the transaction in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, nor compliance by Purchaser with or fulfillment by Purchaser of the terms of this Agreement, will violate, conflict with or result in a breach of the terms, conditions or provisions of, or constitute a default under, (i) the organizational documents of Purchaser, (ii) any material approval, restriction, condition, covenant, commitment, contract or agreement to which Purchaser is a party or by which Purchaser is otherwise bound, or (iii) any Law applicable to Purchaser or its property.
No Violation
(e) : Subject to any recordings or filings of the conveyance documents that may be necessary or appropriate in connection with the consummation of the transactions under this Agreement, no license, permit, certificate, order, authorization, consent, franchise, designation, declaration, filing, registration or approval of or with any Governmental Authority, or any other public or private body or person, is required to permit Purchaser to execute and deliver this Agreement, to consummate the transaction in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, or to comply with and fulfill the terms of this Agreement.
Required Consents
 
9. . From the Effective Date through the Closing Date:
Seller's Covenants and Agreements
(a) : Seller shall maintain its existence; conduct its business and operations (including without limitation maintaining casualty and liability insurance) relating to the Property substantially in accordance with its past practices and procedures; not engage in any material transactions relating to the Property outside the ordinary course of business without Purchaser's prior consent, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed; use commercially reasonable efforts to preserve the goodwill of suppliers, distributors, tenants and other persons having business relations with it relating to the Property; and not sell, transfer, or assign, any material Property except in the ordinary course of business or with the prior consent of Purchaser, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed. Seller hereby acknowledges and agrees that, among other things, leases of space at the Property and any amendments or modifications thereto, except as provided below with respect to the Sixteenth Amendment to Lease with Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation ("Gallagher"), and new Property Agreements which will survive Closing and which are not terminable without penalty on not more than thirty (30) days notice shall require Purchaser's consent, acting in a commercially reasonable manner.
Continuity of Business
(b) : Seller shall promptly inform Purchaser upon Seller's receiving written notice of any existing or alleged (i) violation of or nonconformity with any Law relating to, or violation of or nonconformity with any restriction, condition, covenant, commitment, contract or agreement concerning, the ownership, operation, use and/or occupancy of the Property, including without limitation under any material Property Agreement, or (ii) violation of or default under any Permit relating to the ownership, operation, use and/or occupancy of the Property; provided, however, that Seller shall have the right, at its election, but not the obligation, to cure, correct or obtain the waiver of any such violation, breach or default.
Violations
10. . Without limiting Purchaser's rights under or above, Purchaser's obligations hereunder shall be subject to fulfillment of the following conditions precedent (individually, a "Purchaser's Condition"; collectively, "Purchaser's Conditions"); , , that Purchaser may agree to waive any Purchaser's Condition:
Conditions Precedent to Purchaser's Obligations
Section 4
Section 5
provided
however
(a) : Each of Seller's representations and warranties contained herein shall be true and correct in all material respects as of the Effective Date and as of the Closing Date.
Representations and Warranties
(b) : Seller shall have complied with, fulfilled and performed in all material respects each covenant, term and condition to be complied with, fulfilled or performed by it hereunder.
Covenants
 
(c) : No judgment, order, writ, injunction, decree, ruling or other similar command shall have been entered by, and no governmental or other action, suit, claim, investigation or proceeding shall be pending before, any court or Governmental Authority, challenging the legality, validity or propriety of this Agreement or the transactions hereunder, or otherwise relating to the consummation of the transactions hereunder; provided, however, that Purchaser hereby acknowledges that such suits, claims, investigations, and proceedings, if they are initiated by Purchaser, and any judgments, orders, writs, injunctions, decrees, rulings or similar commands that are entered as a result of any such suit, claim, investigation, or proceeding initiated by Purchaser, shall not be deemed to fall within this subsection (c).
Adverse Action
(d) : Purchaser shall have received from Seller all instruments, documents and other considerations described in .
Closing Considerations
Section 13
(e) : Purchaser shall have received from Seller prior to Closing a completed tenant estoppel certificate in favor of Purchaser from all tenants; provided, however, receipt of an estoppel from Covergys Information Management Group Inc. shall not be a condition to Purchaser's obligation to close, each substantially in the form of , attached hereto, alleging (i) no material discrepancies between the terms of the Leases as compared with the terms of the Leases set forth in the copies of the Leases delivered by Seller and Seller's representations and warranties herein; and (ii) no uncured default by Seller, as landlord, thereunder, and made a part hereof and dated within fifteen (15) days before the Closing Date; provided, however, if Seller is unable to obtain completed tenant estoppel certificates from all tenants, Seller may deliver estoppel certificates containing generally the information set forth in , except that "Tenant's knowledge" shall be amended to read "Landlord's knowledge," executed by Seller covering any tenant that occupies less than 10% of the net rentable square feet of the Building (the "Tenant Estoppel Certificate"), except Sun Microsystems, Inc. ("Sun"). In addition, the Sun estoppel must confirm that operating expenses are paid on a net basis, not increases over a base year. Any Tenant Estoppel Certificate which is received from a Tenant after Seller provides its own estoppel may be substituted for Seller's estoppel and Seller shall have no further liability thereunder, provided that such Tenant Estoppel Certificate contains no changes or, if changed, is otherwise reasonably acceptable to Purchaser. No Tenant Estoppel Certificate delivered hereunder shall be deemed defective merely by reason of the fact that a tenant has qualified any statement contained therein by a "best of knowledge" or similar standard. In addition, Purchaser shall have received from Seller at or prior to Closing a completed estoppel certificate in favor of Purchaser from: (i) the property owners association with respect to Schedule B, Exception X of that certain title commitment issued by Chicago Title Company, Order Number 1401 008359640 D2, with an effective date of October 19, 2006 (the "Title Commitment"); (ii) the owner of One Pierce with respect to Schedule B, Exception Z of the Title Commitment; and (iii) the owner of the sewer plant with respect to Schedule B, Exceptions V and AM of the Title Commitment (collectively, the "Title Estoppels"). The Title Estoppels shall be in a form reasonably acceptable to Purchaser (with Seller required to cure any default and pay any outstanding assessment raised by an estoppel).
Tenant Estoppels
Exhibit G
Exhibit G
 
(f) : The Title Company shall be irrevocably and unconditionally committed to issue to Purchaser a title policy as required pursuant to .
Title Policy
Section 4
(g) : The Sixteenth Amendment to Lease with Gallagher shall have been executed by Gallagher, as tenant and delivered in accordance with Section 13(h) hereof in the form attached hereto as .
Gallagher Amendment
Exhibit M
Purchaser shall promptly inform Seller in writing upon Purchaser's receiving actual knowledge of any circumstance, condition or fact which would or could cause any Purchaser's Condition not to be fulfilled. The failure to obtain the required Tenant Estoppels shall not constitute a default by Seller hereunder provided Seller used reasonable efforts in attempting to obtain such estoppels. In the event that Seller fails to obtain the required Tenant Estoppels prior to Closing, Seller shall have the right to extend the date of Closing for up to thirty (30) days in order to provide additional time to obtain such Tenant Estoppels.
11. . Seller's obligations hereunder shall be subject to fulfillment of the following conditions precedent (individually, a "Seller's Condition"; collectively, "Seller's Conditions"); , , that Seller may agree to waive any Seller's Condition:
Conditions Precedent to Seller's Obligations
provided
however
(a) : Each of Purchaser's representations and warranties contained herein shall be true and correct in all material respects as of the Effective Date and as of the Closing Date.
Representations and Warranties
(b) : Purchaser shall have complied with, fulfilled and performed in all material respects each covenant, term and condition to be complied with, fulfilled or performed by it hereunder.
Covenants
(c) : No judgment, order, writ, injunction, decree, ruling or other similar command shall have been entered by, and no governmental or other action, suit, claim, investigation or proceeding shall be pending or threatened before, any court or Governmental Authority, challenging the legality, validity or propriety of this Agreement or the transactions hereunder, or otherwise relating to the consummation of the transactions hereunder; provided, however, that Seller hereby acknowledges that such suits, claims, investigations, and proceedings, if they are initiated by Seller, and any judgments, orders, writs, injunctions, decrees, rulings or similar commands that are entered as a result of any such suit, claim, investigation, or proceeding initiated by Seller, shall not be deemed to fall within this subsection (c).
Adverse Actions
(d) : Seller shall have received from Purchaser all instruments, documents and other considerations described in .
Closing Considerations
Section 14
Seller shall promptly inform Purchaser in writing upon Seller's receiving actual knowledge of any circumstance, condition or fact which would or could cause any Seller's Condition not to be fulfilled.
 
12. . Subject to the satisfaction of the Seller's Conditions and Purchaser's Conditions, and subject to any provisions of this Agreement which expressly give either party the right to terminate this Agreement, the transactions under this Agreement shall be consummated at a "NY Style" closing (the "Closing") to be held at the downtown offices of Title Company (or such other location as the parties mutually agree) on December 7, 2006, or such other date as may be agreed to by Purchaser and Seller (the "Closing Date"). The Closing shall begin at or before 10:00 a.m. CST. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Seller may delay the Closing for up to thirty (30) days in the event that the pay-off letter and calculation of the prepayment fee under the TIAA Financing is not available by the date which is five (5) days prior to the Closing Date; in such instance, the Closing Date shall be five (5) days after such information is delivered to Purchaser by Seller.
Closing
13. . At the Closing, Seller shall execute and/or deliver to Purchaser the following instruments, documents and other considerations, all of which shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Purchaser and Seller:
Seller's Considerations
(a) : A duly authorized and executed special warranty deed in recordable form, conveying to Purchaser good and indefeasible fee simple title to the Real Property, subject only to the Leases and the Permitted Exceptions in the form attached hereto as .
Deed
Exhibit H
(b) : A quit claim bill of sale transferring the Personal Property to Purchaser, subject only to the Leases and Permitted Exceptions in the form attached hereto as .
Bill of Sale
Exhibit I
(c) : An instrument or instruments (which shall be in recordable form if necessary or appropriate) pursuant to which Seller assigns to Purchaser, and Purchaser assumes, the Leases and the Security Deposits relating thereto (subject to below) (the "Assignment and Assumption of Leases") in the form attached hereto as .
Assignment and Assumption of Leases
Section 15
Exhibit J
(d) : An instrument pursuant to which Seller assigns to Purchaser, and Purchaser assumes, the Property Agreements, Permits and Warranties, to the extent assignable by Seller (the "Assignment and Assumption of Property Agreements, Permits and Warranties") in the form attached hereto as .
Assignment and Assumption of Property Agreements, Permits and Warranties
Exhibit K
(e) . To the extent necessary or appropriate, additional instrument(s) pursuant to which Seller assigns, transfers and conveys to Purchaser, and Purchaser assumes and accepts, the Additional Property, to the extent assignable by Seller (the "Assignment and Assumption of Additional Property") in the form attached hereto as .
Assignment and Assumption of Additional Property
Exhibit L
(f) : The Tenant Estoppel Certificates, as required under .
Tenant Estoppel Certificates
Section 10(e)
 
(g) : The Broker's Lien Waiver (as hereinafter defined), as required under .
Broker's Lien Waiver
Section 26
(h) : The Sixteenth Amendment to the Gallagher Lease in form of attached hereto and incorporated herein executed by Gallagher, as tenant.
Gallagher Amendment
Exhibit M
(i) : A certificate to the effect that each of Seller's representations and warranties contained herein is true and correct in all material respects as of the Closing Date.
Closing Certificate
(j) : A standard form of Owner's affidavit (ALTA Statement) (but with respect to contracts only as to contracts entered into by Seller) to enable Title Company to delete those so-called "standard exceptions" to the Commitment, to the extent that they may be deleted with a Owner's affidavit as so modified.
Owner's Affidavit
(k) : City, county and state transfer tax declarations or similar instrument.
Transfer Tax Declarations
(l) : A waiver of any tax withholding which may be imposed upon Purchaser due to Seller's obligation to pay taxes (and if Seller fails to deliver any such waiver, Purchaser may withhold any amount required by law) or an indemnity reasonably satisfactory to Purchaser in lieu thereof which indemnity will be released upon delivery of appropriate waivers
Tax Waiver
(m) : An affidavit stating that Seller is not a "foreign person" as defined in Section 1445 of the Internal Revenue Code and the income tax regulations promulgated thereunder.
Certificate of Non-Foreign Status
(n) : A closing statement (the "Closing Statement").
Closing Statement
(o) : A notice, signed by Seller, to each of the tenants at the Property (the "Tenant Notices"), notifying them that the Closing has occurred and that Purchaser shall be responsible for their Security Deposits.
Tenant Notices
(p) : To the extent in Seller's possession, originals of all Leases, Property Agreements, Permits and Warranties.
Leases, Property Agreements, Permits and Warranties
(q) : Keys to the Real Property.
Keys
(r) : To the extent in Seller's possession, a copy of the plans and specifications for the Improvements.
Plans and Specifications
(s) : A copy of updated to the date of Closing.
Leases
Exhibit C
(t) : A recertification of Seller's warranties in the form attached hereto as .
Recertification
Exhibit N
 
(u) : A quitclaim assignment of any and all of Seller's rights to utilize the photographs of the Property contained in the offering memorandum and Seller shall cooperate with Buyer in connection with any attempt to contact the photographer and/or owner of the photographs and negatives thereof.
Photographs
(v) : Such other and further instruments and documents as Purchaser or the Title Company may deem reasonably necessary or desirable, or as may reasonably be required, to consummate the transactions under this Agreement, which can be furnished by Seller at nominal expense to Seller.
Other Considerations
(w) : The Title Estoppels, as required under .
Title Estoppels
Section 10(e)
14. . At the Closing, Purchaser shall execute and/or deliver to Seller the following instruments, documents and other considerations, all of which shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Seller and Purchaser:
Purchaser's Considerations
(a) : Immediately available funds for the Purchase Price due at Closing pursuant to (subject to such adjustments, credits and prorations as are provided in this Agreement).
Purchase Price
Section 3
(b) : The Assignment and Assumption of Leases.
Assignment and Assumption of Leases
(c) : The Assignment and Assumption of Property Agreements, Permits and Warranties.
Assignment and Assumption of Property Agreements, Permits and Warranties
(d) : If applicable, the Assignment and Assumption of Additional Property.
Assignment and Assumption of Additional Property
(e) : The Sixteenth Amendment to the Gallagher Lease in form of attached hereto and incorporated herein executed by Purchaser, as landlord.
Gallagher Amendment
Exhibit M
(f) : A certificate to the effect that each of Purchaser's representations and warranties contained herein is true and correct in all material respects as of the Closing Date.
Closing Certificate
(g) : City, county and state transfer tax declarations or similar instrument
Transfer Tax Declarations
.
(h) : The Closing Statement.
Closing Statement
(i) : The Tenant Notices, signed by Purchaser.
Tenant Notices
(j) : Such other and further instruments, documents and other considerations as Seller or the Title Company may deem reasonably necessary or desirable, or as may reasonably be required, to consummate the transactions under this Agreement.
Other Considerations
 
15. .
Apportionments; Transfer of Operations
(a) : The following items shall be apportioned or otherwise treated at Closing in accordance with the terms of this :
Apportionments
Section 15
(i) . Rents actually received by Seller prior to Closing with respect to the Property shall be pro-rated such that Seller shall be entitled to all Rents received and other amounts collected for periods preceding the Closing Date and Purchaser shall be entitled to all Rents and other amounts for periods from and after the Closing Date. With regard to Rents and other accounts receivable that are delinquent as of the Closing Date, (i) no proration will be made at the Closing, (ii) Purchaser will make a reasonable good faith effort after the Closing to collect such delinquent Rents and other accounts receivable in the ordinary course of Purchaser's operation of the Property, and (iii) Purchaser will apply all Rents and other accounts receivable collected first to the Rents and monetary obligations arising under the Leases from and after the Closing Date, and the excess amount, if any, shall be applied to the delinquent amount owed to Seller, and Purchaser shall promptly pay the same to Seller. It is agreed, however, that Purchaser will not be obligated to institute any lawsuit to collect delinquent Rents or other accounts receivable. In the event there are any delinquent Rents or other accounts receivable as of the Closing Date and the same are not collected by Purchaser and paid to Seller within sixty (60) days after the Closing Date, Seller shall have the right, upon written notice to Purchaser, to seek collection of such delinquent Rents and other accounts receivable using commercially reasonable efforts, and Seller agrees to identify itself in any correspondence with any such tenant that Seller is the prior landlord and prior owner of the Property and that its actions are not the actions of the current landlord and current owner of the Property, and Seller shall not seek to evict or otherwise affect any tenant's possession of its premises.
Rents and Other Accounts Receivable
(ii) . Seller shall, at Seller's option, either deliver to Purchaser any Security Deposits actually held by Seller pursuant to the Leases, or Seller may retain such Security Deposits and allow Purchaser a credit at Closing for the amount of such Security Deposits. In either case, Purchaser shall assume all responsibility for the Security Deposits from and after the Closing and Seller shall have no further liability or responsibility therefor. Seller shall deliver all documents necessary to appropriately transfer or cause the re-issuance of all non-cash Security Deposits (such as letters of credit) and pay all fees to accomplish such transfer. If there is any delay past Closing in the re-issuance of any non-cash Security Deposit, Seller will, upon Purchaser's certification that a default has occurred under the applicable Lease, call such Security Deposit and deliver the proceeds to Purchaser provided Purchaser indemnifies Seller from all loss, cost and expense, including attorneys fees and costs, arising therefrom.
Security Deposits
 
(iii) . All unpaid ad valorem real estate taxes for the Property payable during the current year and all prior years shall be prorated (on a cash basis) as of the Closing Date. Seller is entitled to all real estate tax collections from tenants due and payable up to and including the day prior to the Closing Date. Purchaser is entitled to all real estate tax collections from tenants due and payable from and after the Closing Date, including the day of Closing. Seller shall, prior to or at Closing, pay any general real estate tax bills which are due and payable as of the Closing Date. Purchaser shall be responsible for all real estate taxes and assessments for the year 2006 that become due and payable in 2007. Purchaser shall be responsible for, and shall indemnify, defend and hold Seller and its affiliates and successors harmless from and against, all real estate taxes and assessments with respect to the Property that are or that become due and payable after the Closing, and Seller shall have no liability or responsibility therefore.
Taxes
(iv) . All utility charges that accrue for periods prior to the Closing Date shall be the responsibility of Seller and all utility charges accruing for periods on and after the Closing Date shall be the responsibility of Purchaser. Prior to Closing, Purchaser and Seller shall cooperate to arrange for utility services to the Property to be discontinued in Seller's name, as of the end of the day immediately prior to the Closing Date, and to be reinstated in Purchaser's name as of the Closing Date. If the foregoing cannot be accomplished, then Seller will cause the meters for those utilities that cannot be transferred to Purchaser's name effective as of the Closing Date to be read, and telephone calls to be totaled, as of a date as close as reasonably possible to the Closing Date. In the event the actual amounts for such charges for utilities or telephone calls are not known as of Closing or cannot be billed separately to the responsible party, such charges shall be apportioned between the parties as of the Closing Date based upon the estimates agreed upon by the parties, and such apportionments shall be adjusted after Closing once the actual amounts thereof become known. Any charges for utilities which are paid on a monthly basis shall be apportioned at Closing as of the Closing Date. Seller shall receive a credit against the Purchase Price in the amount of any such utility charges that Seller has prepaid and for which Purchaser is responsible under this subsection. If the relevant utility credits Purchaser's account with the amount of any prepaid deposits previously made by Seller, at Closing, Purchaser shall succeed to the ownership of, and the Purchase Price shall be increased by, the amount of any and all such deposits for such utilities. Each party shall indemnify, defend and hold the other harmless from and against any utility costs or expenses for which it is respectively responsible under this subsection.
Utilities
(v) . Seller shall be responsible for all payments under the Property Agreements that accrue for periods prior to the Closing Date, and Purchaser shall be responsible for all payments under the Property Agreements that accrue for periods from and after the Closing Date.
Property Agreements
 
(vi) . Seller shall not transfer to Purchaser any insurance policies or coverage and Purchaser shall make its own arrangements for all insurance. Except as provided in below, any payments of insurance proceeds with respect to Seller's insurance shall belong to Seller.
Prepaid Insurance
Section 17
(vii) . Seller shall be responsible for payment of all finder's fees and brokerage commissions (if any) that are payable in connection with the primary lease term and any renewal periods which have commenced but not in connection with any renewal periods under the Leases which have not yet commenced or any expansion rights unexercised as of the date of this Agreement.
Leasing Commissions and Lease Costs
(viii) . Purchaser shall pay to Seller the amount with respect to the prepayments fees or penalties in connection with the prepayment of the TIAA Financing as provided in Paragraph 3.
TIAA Financing
(ix) . The existing management agreement between Seller and H.P.-Itasca Two Pierce L.L.C. ("H.P.-Itasca") with respect to the Property shall be terminated effective as of the Closing, and H.P.-Itasca shall waive any and all claims to leasing commissions pursuant to such agreement, except as otherwise expressly provided herein.
Management Agreement
(x) . Intentionally Deleted.
Convergys Subleases
(b) : Purchaser and Seller shall, at least three (3) Business Days prior to the scheduled Closing Date, jointly prepare the following:
Estimated and Final Adjustments
(i) a preliminary list of expenses paid by Seller which are attributable to post-Closing periods ("Prepaid Expenses"); and
(ii) a preliminary list of expenses to be assumed by Purchaser which are attributable to periods prior to Closing ("Assumed Expenses").
(c) : At Closing, Seller shall provide Purchaser with the necessary accounting records for applicable prior years to verify base amounts for each current tenant. In addition, Seller shall provide Purchaser with (i) a list of all reimbursable expenses, (ii) a list of all amounts due to and from tenants relating to expense or tax reimbursements, and (iii) a reconciliation schedule showing the expenses incurred, the amounts the tenants have been billed and the amounts collected from tenants ("Tenant Deposits"), all for the 2006 calendar year. Purchaser shall be responsible for preparing any required expense or tax reconciliation for the calendar year 2006. Purchaser shall use commercially reasonable efforts to bill tenants in accordance with their respective Leases for expenses or taxes for calendar year 2006 and upon receipt of the same from tenants shall reimburse Seller for Seller's proportionate share, based on the expenses or taxes for the respective periods of ownership. Upon Seller completing the reconciliation, if Seller owes any tenant any funds for the period of its ownership, Seller shall forthwith pay the
Tenant Deposits
 
same to Purchaser for reimbursement to the Tenant. To the extent any tenant is entitled to an audit relative to expenses or taxes for the applicable year, as between Seller and Purchaser, Purchaser shall, unless otherwise agreed in writing, be responsible for coordinating such audit, and Seller shall provide the auditor selected by Purchaser with all requested and available information relative to Seller's period of ownership. The cost of such audit, to the extent not borne by the tenants, shall be paid by Seller and Purchaser in proportion to their respective periods of ownership of the Property for the applicable year.
(d) : Except as otherwise described above, all such apportionments described above shall be made in a manner consistent with the principle that the income and expenses of the Property for all periods up to the Closing Date shall be attributable to Seller, and all income and expenses of the Property for all periods commencing from and after the Closing Date shall be attributable to Purchaser.
Transfer of Operations: Correction Period
Each of the items set forth in this shall be prepared by Seller and Purchaser based on their good faith estimates of the respective amounts thereof, and Purchaser and Seller shall cause their respective representatives to cooperate in good faith with a view to determining the amount by which the Purchase Price must be adjusted pursuant to this . Thereafter, Purchaser and Seller shall cooperate with a view to resolving, on or before the nine (9) month anniversary of the Closing Date, any errors or omissions in the apportionments discovered by either party, adjusting any apportionments based upon estimated amounts at the Closing to reflect actual charges, and any and all disputes that may exist between them regarding the Purchase Price adjustments required hereby. During such period, Purchaser and Seller, as the case may be, shall submit to the other party any amounts paid by it at the Closing that it disputes and any additional expenses paid or assumed by it that should have been included in the list of Assumed Expenses or Prepaid Expenses. Any dispute concerning said errors or omissions which cannot be resolved by agreement of the parties during such nine (9) month period shall be submitted within ten (10) days after such nine (9) month period to and determined by Ernst & Young on or before the ten (10) month anniversary of the Closing Date. Seller and Purchaser shall share equally the cost of retaining Ernst & Young. Any and all adjustments to the Purchase Price required by this shall be paid within ten (10) days after the parties' mutual agreement thereto (or, if no such agreement is obtained on or before the six (6) month anniversary of the Closing Date, promptly upon determination thereof by the aforementioned accounting firm.
Section 15
Section 15
Section 15
Seller shall be entitled to any and all refunds of taxes attributable to periods for which Seller or its predecessors paid the taxes, but shall be responsible to pay any such amounts due to tenants under their leases.
Without limiting the foregoing, Purchaser shall, to the extent of the credit received at Closing, indemnify, defend, and hold harmless Seller and its affiliates and successors from and against any matters for which Purchaser receives a credit against the Purchase Price pursuant to this . The provisions of this will survive the Closing.
Section 15
Section 15
 
16. . Seller shall deliver exclusive possession of the Property to Purchaser on the Closing Date, subject only to the Permitted Exceptions and the rights of tenants under their Leases, in substantially the same condition as on the Effective Date (except for ordinary wear and tear, any damage or loss caused by Purchaser or its employees, contractors, agents or representatives, and any damage or loss from casualty or condemnation).
Possession
17. . In the event that, prior to Closing, the Real Property is destroyed or materially damaged by casualty, or if material condemnation proceedings are commenced against the Real Property, Purchaser shall have the right to terminate this Agreement by giving written notice of termination to Seller within fifteen (15) days after receiving written notice of such damage, destruction or condemnation proceedings, in which case the Deposit shall immediately be returned to Purchaser and neither party shall have any further rights or obligations under this Agreement except for those which expressly survive termination of this Agreement. For purposes of the foregoing, "material damage by casualty" means loss or damage to the Real Property or any portion thereof by casualty such that the cost of repairing or restoring the Real Property in question to a condition substantially identical to that of the Real Property in question prior to the event of casualty would be, in the certified opinion of The Jenkins Group and a qualified contractor or architect selected by Purchaser, equal to or greater than Nine Hundred Fifteen Thousand Dollars and NO/100 ($915,000.00). For purposes of the foregoing, a "material condemnation" means any condemnation of any portion of the Real Property having a value equal to or greater than One Hundred Thousand Dollars and NO/100 ($100,000.00). Except to the extent Purchaser is permitted to terminate this Agreement pursuant to the preceding sentences, Purchaser shall, in the event of any casualty or condemnation with respect to the Property, accept the Property in its then condition and proceed with the Closing on the purchase of the Property under this Agreement, with no reduction, offset or abatement of or to the Purchase Price, except that the Purchase Price shall be reduced by the amount of any deductible applicable to Seller's insurance coverage. If Purchaser elects or is obligated to accept the Property and proceed to Closing, all proceeds of insurance or condemnation awards payable to Seller or received by Seller by reason of such damage, destruction or condemnation shall be paid or assigned to Purchaser at Closing.
Damage or Destruction; Condemnation
18. . Seller shall have the following obligations to Purchaser after the Closing:
Seller's Obligations After Closing
(a) : Seller shall from time to time, at Purchaser's request and without further consideration, perform such acts, and execute and deliver to Purchaser such other and further instruments, documents and other considerations, as Purchaser may reasonably request for more effective consummation of the transactions under this Agreement and satisfaction by Seller of its other obligations under this Agreement.
Further Assurances
19. . Purchaser shall have the following obligations to Seller after Closing:
Purchaser's Obligations After Closing
(a) : Purchaser shall maintain all books and records included in the Property in accordance with all applicable Laws; and, so long as Purchaser has possession of such books and records, Purchaser shall permit Seller to have access to and the right to copy the books and records relating to Seller's period of ownership of the Property during normal business hours, upon reasonable prior written notice, for any proper and reasonable purpose.
Books and Records
 
(b) : Purchaser shall from time to time, at Seller's request and without further consideration, perform such acts, and execute and deliver to Seller such other and further instruments, documents and other considerations, as Seller may reasonably request for more effective consummation of the transactions under this Agreement in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement and satisfaction by Purchaser of its other obligations under this Agreement.
Further Assurances
20. .
Defaults; Termination
(a) If Seller fails in any material respect to comply with, fulfill or perform any covenant or obligation to be complied with, fulfilled or performed by it under this Agreement, or Seller fails or refuses to consummate the transactions under this Agreement in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement other than by reason of nonfulfillment of any Seller's Condition, or by reason of a Purchaser's Default (as defined below) (any such event being herein referred to as a "Seller's Default"), or if any Purchaser's Condition described in is not fulfilled on or before the Closing Date or waived by Purchaser, then, and in any such event, Purchaser shall have the right, at its election, and in addition to any other rights and remedies it may have under , to terminate this Agreement by written notice from Purchaser to Seller, in which event all liabilities and obligations of the parties hereunder (except as provided in below) shall cease except for those which expressly survive termination of this Agreement, and the Deposit together with all interest earned thereon (except as described in below) shall be returned immediately to Purchaser, provided that if the Seller willfully frustrates the sale of the Property or if specific performance is not available, then in addition to the refund of the Deposit, Seller shall reimburse Purchaser for Purchaser's actual out-of-pocket costs and expenses in connection with its investigation of the Property not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000).
Section 10
Section 21
Section 21
Section 21
(b) If Purchaser fails in any material respect to comply with, fulfill or perform any covenant or obligation to be complied with, fulfilled or performed by it under this Agreement, or Purchaser fails or refuses to consummate the transactions under this Agreement in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement other than by reason of nonfulfillment of any Purchaser's Condition, or by reason of a Seller's Default (any such event being herein referred to as a "Purchaser's Default"), or any Seller's Condition described in is not fulfilled on or before the Closing Date or waived by Seller, then, and in any such event, Seller shall have the right, at its election, and in addition to any other rights and remedies it may have under , to terminate this Agreement by written notice from Seller to Purchaser, in which event all liabilities and obligations of the parties hereunder (except as provided in below) shall cease except for those which expressly survive termination of this Agreement. If Seller terminates this Agreement by reason of non-fulfillment of a Seller's Condition, all liabilities and obligations of the parties hereunder shall cease except for those which expressly survive termination of this Agreement, and the Deposit together with all interest earned thereon (except as described in below) shall be returned immediately to Purchaser.
Section 11
Section 21
Section 21
Section 21
 
21. .
Remedies for Default
(a)
IF SELLER COMMITS A DEFAULT PRIOR TO CLOSING, INCLUDING ANY BREACH OF WARRANTY, PURCHASER MUST, AS ITS SOLE REMEDY, EITHER (a) TERMINATE THIS AGREEMENT AND RECEIVE THE RETURN OF THE DEPOSIT, (b) ENFORCE SPECIFIC PERFORMANCE OF THIS AGREEMENT OR (c) IF, AND ONLY IF, SPECIFIC PERFORMANCE IS NOT AVAILABLE AS A REMEDY, RECEIVE THE RETURN OF THE DEPOSIT AND SUE SELLER FOR DAMAGES NOT TO EXCEED FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($500,000). PURCHASER MUST SEND SELLER WRITTEN NOTICE OF WHICH REMEDY PURCHASER ELECTS TO PURSUE WITHIN TEN (10) DAYS AFTER PURCHASER'S KNOWLEDGE OF SELLER'S DEFAULT. IF PURCHASER DOES NOT SO ELECT OR IF PURCHASER ELECTS TO PURSUE LITIGATION AS ITS REMEDY AND DOES NOT COMMENCE THE LITIGATION WITHIN THIRTY (30) DAYS AFTER NOTIFYING SELLER THAT PURCHASER IS ELECTING LITIGATION AS ITS REMEDY, PURCHASER'S SOLE REMEDY WILL BE TO TERMINATE THIS AGREEMENT AND RECEIVE THE RETURN OF THE DEPOSIT.
(b) In the event the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement do not occur by reason of a Purchaser's Default, Seller shall be entitled, as its sole remedy, to terminate this Agreement as described in above and to retain the Deposit and any interest accrued thereon as liquidated damages. The payment to Seller of the Deposit as liquidated damages is not intended to be a forfeiture or penalty but is intended to constitute liquidated damages to Seller. However, the foregoing provisions of this subsection (b) shall not be deemed to prohibit or limit Seller's right to seek actual, compensatory damages, post-Closing, with respect to Purchaser's breach of Purchaser's representations or warranties under this Agreement; and shall not be deemed to prohibit or limit Seller's right to seek damages, the remedy of specific performance, an injunction, or other appropriate relief with respect to any breach of Purchaser's obligations under , , or of this Agreement or under any provision of this Agreement pursuant to which Purchaser has agreed to indemnify, defend, or hold harmless Seller, its affiliates and/or successors for any matters. Furthermore, the foregoing provisions shall not be deemed to prohibit or limit Seller's right to seek reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to enforce the provisions of this subsection (b) or any other provision of this Agreement.
Section 20
Sections 5
15
19
23
(c) Any claim that Purchaser may have at any time against Seller for a breach of any representation or warranty, whether known or unknown, which is not asserted by notice from Purchaser to Seller within one (1) year after the Closing Date or, if notice is sent, litigation to enforce the claim is not commenced within sixty (60) days after said notice will not be valid or effective, and Seller will have no liability with respect thereto. Seller shall have no liability to Purchaser for a breach of any representations or warranties unless all such breaches exceed Twenty Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000) and in no event shall Seller's liability for all such breaches exceed the aggregate amount of One Million Six Hundred Seventy-Five Thousand Dollars ($1,675,000).
 
22. . This Agreement shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors, heirs, administrators and assigns. Purchaser may assign this Agreement, without Seller's consent, to an Affiliate of Purchaser. Otherwise, Purchaser shall not assign this Agreement without Seller's prior written consent, which may be withheld or granted in Seller's sole discretion. However, if Purchaser assigns this Agreement to an Affiliate of Purchaser, Purchaser shall promptly provide Seller with written notice of such assignment. Notwithstanding any such assignment to an Affiliate of Purchaser, or any assignment to which Seller may consent, Purchaser shall nonetheless remain fully liable to perform all of the obligations of Purchaser under this Agreement. As used in this , an "Affiliate" of Purchaser shall mean an entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with Purchaser (with "control" of an entity meaning the power, through ownership of voting securities, to direct the management and policies of such entity).
Successors and Assigns; Assignment
Section 22
23. .
Publicity; Confidentiality
(a) Seller and Purchaser each hereby covenant and agree that, prior to the Closing, neither Seller nor Purchaser shall issue any press release or other public statement with respect to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby (a "Release"), without the prior written consent of the other party (except to the extent required by Law). If either Seller or Purchaser is required by applicable Law to issue a Release prior to the Closing, such party shall, at least two (2) Business Days prior to the issuance of the same, deliver a copy of the proposed Release to the other party for its review and approval. The covenants and obligations of the parties under this shall survive the Closing.
Section 23
(b) Until such time as the Closing occurs under this Agreement, Purchaser and its employees, agents and representatives shall hold in strictest confidence all data, documents and information obtained with respect to the Property and furnished by Seller, its employees, agents or representatives, whether obtained or furnished before or after the execution and delivery of this Agreement, and including without limitation all Property Information (collectively, the "Confidential Information"), and shall not use such Confidential Information except for analyzing whether or not to consummate the transaction under this Agreement. Purchaser shall not disclose any Confidential Information except to those employees, agents, representatives, affiliates, potential investors, consultants, lenders and clients of Purchaser who have a need to know of such Confidential Information in order to evaluate or to assist Purchaser with evaluating whether to proceed with the transactions under this Agreement, and Purchaser shall inform all such employees, agents, representatives, consultants, lenders and clients of Purchaser's obligations of confidentiality under this Agreement. In the event this Agreement is terminated for any reason, Purchaser shall promptly return to Seller any Confidential Information. "Confidential Information" shall not include information that (1) is or becomes a matter of public knowledge, (2) is provided from other sources readily available to the public, other than as a result of disclosure by
 
Purchaser in violation of this Agreement, (3) was lawfully in Purchaser's possession prior to the disclosure by Seller, (4) was provided to Purchaser by a third party without restrictions, or (5) is independently developed or prepared by Purchaser, its employees, agents, advisors, or representatives. In the event of a breach by Purchaser or its employees, agents, representatives, consultants, employees or clients of this , Seller shall be entitled to an injunction restraining Purchaser or its employees, agents, representatives, consultants, lender or clients from disclosing, in whole or in part, such Confidential Information. Nothing herein shall be construed as prohibiting Seller from pursuing any other available remedy at law or in equity for such breach by Purchaser.
Section 23
(c) Notwithstanding the terms of this Agreement, Purchaser may disclose Confidential Information required to be disclosed pursuant to a requirement of law, a final order of a court or pursuant to a subpoena or to assure securities regulations compliance; provided, however, that Purchaser shall provide prompt written notice thereof to Seller (so long as such notice to Seller is not prohibited by law) in order to enable Seller to obtain timely injunctive relief or other adequate protective relief from such disclosure.
24. . No failure on the part of either party at any time to require performance by the other party of any term of this Agreement shall be taken or held to be a waiver of such term or in any way affect such party's right to enforce such term, and no waiver on the part of either party of any term of this Agreement shall (unless the waiving party expressly in writing agrees otherwise) be taken or held to be a waiver of any subsequent breach of that term or of any other term of this Agreement or the breach thereof.
No Waiver
25. . Except as specifically provided to the contrary in this Agreement, each party shall bear its own expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement and the transactions hereunder, and neither party shall be liable to the other party for any such expenses, whether or not the Closing is consummated. However, Seller shall be responsible for payment at Closing of: (a) the fees of its own attorneys; (b) the fees in connection with obtaining an ALTA Form B owner's policy of title insurance (the "Owner's Policy") covering the Real Property and all usual and customary endorsements; (c) the fees in connection with providing Purchaser with the Survey; (d) all state and county transfer taxes, documentary stamp taxes and similar charges relating to the transfer of the Property; and (e) the costs of curing all title objections and Monetary Liens for which Seller is responsible under this Agreement (if any) (other than any prepayment fees or penalties under the TIAA Financing). Purchaser shall be responsible for payment at Closing of: (a) the fees of its own attorneys, engineers and other professionals engaged to conduct Purchaser's due diligence inspection of the Property, (b) all recording fees in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (c) all municipal transfer taxes, documentary stamp taxes and similar charges relating to the transfer of the Property; and (d) the cost of any endorsements to the Owner's Policy that Purchaser desires which are not usual and customary endorsements. At Closing, Purchaser and Seller shall equally share the Title Company's insured closing fee.
Costs
 
26. .Seller shall be responsible for any and all broker's fees due Cushman & Wakefield of Illinois Inc. and any other broker representing Seller in connection with the transaction contemplated by this Agreement and shall provide to Purchaser a Broker's Lien Waiver (the "Brokers Lien Waiver") from Cushman & Wakefield of Illinois Inc. and any other broker representing Seller at Closing. Purchaser hereby represents and warrants to Seller that Purchaser has not been represented by any broker, finder or other such person or entity in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and hereby represents and warrants to Seller that there is no commission or other such fee or payment due from Seller to Purchaser or to any agent or representative of Purchaser in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Purchaser hereby agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless Seller and its affiliates and successors from and against any losses, liabilities, damages or claims (including without limitation reasonable attorneys' fees and costs) that Seller or its affiliates or successors may suffer or incur as a result of a breach of the foregoing representations and warranties of Purchaser.
Brokers
27. . The invalidity or unenforceability of any particular provision of this Agreement shall not affect the other provisions, and this Agreement shall be construed in all respects as if such invalid or unenforceable provision had not been contained herein.
Severability
28. . The provisions hereof are solely for the benefit of Purchaser and Seller, and their respective legal representatives, successors and assigns, and shall not be deemed or construed to create any rights for the benefit of any other person.
Benefit
29. . Whenever a singular word is used herein, it shall also include the plural wherever required by the context, and vice versa; and whenever any gender is used herein, it shall also include the other genders wherever required by the context. The terms and conditions hereof represent the results of bargaining and negotiations between the parties, each of which has been represented by counsel of its own selection, and neither of which has acted under duress or compulsion, whether legal, economic or otherwise, and represent the results of a combined draftsmanship effort. Consequently, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with their usual and customary meanings, and the parties hereby expressly waive and disclaim, in connection with interpretation and construction of this Agreement, any rule of law or procedure that would require otherwise, specifically including, but not limited to, any rule of law to the effect that ambiguous or conflicting terms or conditions contained in this Agreement shall be interpreted or construed against the party who (or whose counsel) prepared this Agreement or any earlier draft of this Agreement.
Construction
30. . Time is of the essence with respect to the parties' performance of their respective obligations under this Agreement.
Time of Essence
31. . This Agreement contains the entire understanding between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof. All representations, promises, and prior or contemporaneous understandings between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof are merged into and expressed in this Agreement; and any and all prior understandings between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof are hereby canceled. This Agreement shall not be amended, modified or supplemented without the written agreement of both parties.
Entire Agreement; Written Modifications
 
32. . This Agreement shall be governed by and subject to, and shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, the Laws of the State of Illinois, notwithstanding any State's conflicts of laws provisions to the contrary.
Governing Law
33. . The captions herein are for convenience and identification purposes only, are not an integral part of this Agreement, and are not to be considered in interpretation of any part of this Agreement
Captions
34. . All notices, requests, demands, consents and other communications required or permitted under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly and properly given on the date of service if delivered personally or by facsimile, or, if mailed, on the second Business Day after such notice is deposited in a receptacle of the United States Postal Service, registered or certified mail, first class postage prepaid, return receipt requested, or on the first Business Day after deposit with a nationally-recognized overnight delivery service (, FedEx), in all events addressed appropriately as follows:
Notices
e.g.
 
 
or to such other address as shall be furnished in writing by either party to the other party by notice in accordance with this Section.
35. . This Agreement may be executed in separate and/or multiple counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed an original, but all of such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
36. . The term "Business Day", as used in this Agreement, shall mean any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or a national banking holiday. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, any reference to "days" shall mean calendar days rather than "Business Days". If any date specified herein is, or any period specified herein expires on, a Saturday, Sunday or national banking holiday, then such date or the expiration date of such period, as the case may be, shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day.
Business Days; Expiration of Time Periods
37. . Nothing contained herein shall be deemed or construed to constitute Seller and Purchaser as partners or joint venturers of one another or of any person claiming by, through or under Seller or Purchaser in the conduct of their respective businesses.
No Partnership
38. . If any action is instituted in connection with any controversy arising out of this Agreement, and on any appeal from any judgment or decree entered therein, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover, in addition to costs, such sum as the court may adjudge reasonable as attorneys' fees in such action.
Attorneys' Fees
 
39. . H.P.-Itasca and AJG Two Pierce, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("AJG") shall, at Closing, each deposit with the Escrow Agent a letter of credit from an "A" rated bank or other financial institution (the "Letters of Credit") in the amount of SIX HUNDRED SEVENTY THOUSAND and 00/100 DOLLARS ($670,000.00) and ONE MILLION FIVE THOUSAND and 00/100 DOLLARS ($1,005,000.00), respectively. The Letters of Credit shall be held by the Escrow Agent, in accordance with the terms of attached hereto, and may be drawn upon pro rata by Escrow Agent in the event that Seller breaches any representations or warranties contained herein In the event that the Escrow Agent is authorized to draw upon the Letters of Credit, the Letters of Credit shall be drawn upon as follows: (i) sixty percent (60%) of the amount to be drawn shall be drawn from the letter of credit deposited by AJG; and (ii) forty percent (40%) of the amount to be drawn shall be drawn from the letter of credit deposited by H.P.-Itasca. The expiry date of the Letters of Credit shall not be before the date which is one (1) year after the Closing Date, and the beneficiary of the Letters of Credit shall be Escrow Agent. The Letters of Credit shall be returned to the parties depositing such Letters of Credit no later than the date which is one (1) year after the Closing Date.
Post Closing Escrow
Exhibit O
 
, the parties have executed this Agreement to be effective as of the Effective Date.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
 
 
 
 
Chicago Title and Trust Company hereby (i) accepts appointment as "Escrow Agent" under the foregoing Agreement and (ii) agrees to hold, invest and disburse the Deposit and Letter of Credit (as defined in the Agreement), together with all interest earned thereon, according to the terms and conditions of the foregoing Agreement.
Dated: November __, 2006.
 
 
PARCEL 1 (PARCEL G-3):
That part of the North
 1
/
2
of Section 5, Township 40 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, described as follows: Beginning at a point on the Southwesterly line of Pierce Road per ordinance accepting dedication thereof recorded December 2, 1981 as Document Number R81-63577, said point being 1526.51 feet North and 623.67 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest
 1
/
4
of Section 5, aforesaid, as measured along the West line of said Northwest
 1
/
4
and along a line at right angles thereto; the following three courses are along the Southwesterly line of said Pierce Road; thence Southeasterly along a curved line convex Northeasterly and having a radius of 4550.66 feet, an arc distance of 536.40 feet to a point of tangency (the chord of said arc bears South 58 degrees 25 minutes 59 seconds East, 536.09 feet); thence South 55 degrees 03 minutes 59 seconds East along a line tangent to said last described curved line at said last described point, 104.80 feet to a point of curvature; thence Southeasterly along a curved line convex Southwesterly, having a radius of 1381.14 feet and being tangent to said last described line at said last described point, an arc distance of 84.30 feet to a point 1139.73 feet North and 1236.89 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest
 1
/
4
of Section 5, aforesaid, as measured along the West line of said Northwest
 1
/
4
and along a line at right angles thereto (the chord of said arc bears South 56 degrees 48 minutes 25 seconds East, 84.29 feet); thence South 77 degrees 46 minutes 05 seconds West, 38.07 feet; thence South 25 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds West, 295.50 feet; thence South 70 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds West, 52.72 feet; thence South 25 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds West, 212.74 feet; to a point 652.99 feet North and 935.37 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest
 1
/
4
of Section 5 aforesaid, as measured along the West line of said Northwest
 1
/
4
and along a line at right angles thereto; thence North 65 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds West, 127.42 feet; thence South 62 degrees 34 minutes 49 seconds West, 102.63 feet; thence North 74 degrees 09 minutes 58 seconds West, 36.48 feet; to a point 669.52 feet North and 693.68 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest
 1
/
4
of Section 5, aforesaid, as measured along the West line of said Northwest
 1
/
4
and along a line at right angles thereto; thence North 74 degrees 09 minutes 58 seconds West, 96.10 feet; thence North 40 degrees 51 minutes 25 seconds West, 109.36 feet; to a point 778.45 feet North and 529.68 feet East of the Southwest corner of the Northwest
 1
/
4
of Section 5, aforesaid, as measured along the West line of said Northwest
 1
/
4
and along a line at right angles thereto; thence North 15 degrees 27 minutes 18 seconds East, 214.09 feet; thence North 06 degrees 10 minutes 27 seconds West, 151.74 feet; thence North 15 degrees 15 minutes 48 seconds East, 301.92 feet; thence North 56 degrees 41 minutes 11 seconds West, 54.14 feet; thence North 15 degrees 15 minutes 48 seconds East, 72.39 feet; to the place of beginning, in DuPage County, Illinois.
 
Lobby:
Black Leather Sofas (2)
Black Leather Arm Chairs (4)
Round Mahogany Cocktail Tables (2)
Mahogany Console Tables (2)
Console Table Lamps (4)
Framed Pictures (2)
Seasonal Silk Plant Arrangements (total 9)
Christmas (3)
Winter through Summer (3)
Fall (3)
Custom Black Entry mat with Two Pierce Place Lettering
Ashton Carpet Area Rugs (2)
East Link Caf:
Entry Mat for Vestibule
Custom Window Valances
Sony 50" Plasma TV
Metal Palm Tree Wall Accessory
Upholstered Wicker Lounge Chairs (4)
Glass Top Tables (3)
Silk Palm Trees (3)
Framed Art Pictures (7)
Dining Tables (10)
Wicker Dining Chairs (34)
Wicker Console Table
Custom Mahogany Laminate trash receptacle
7' Artificial pre-lit Christmas tree with decorations
Lower Level Lobby:
Black Leather Wing Back Chairs (2)
Mahogany Side Table
Mahogany Shelving Wall Cabinet
Silk Palm Trees (2)
Silk Wildflower Arrangement
7' Artificial pre-lit Christmas Trees (3)
9' Artificial pre-lit Christmas Tree (1)
Artificial pre-lit Christmas Wreaths (2)
Management Office:
Conference Table & Chairs (6)
Cherry Curio wall unit
 
Mahogany Sideboard table with lamp
Mahogany framed Mountain Eagle picture
Cherry wall clock
Cherry wall shelves (6)
6' Silk Tree
Round laminate kitchen table & chairs (5)
Reception furniture  sofa, loveseat & wing back chairs (2)
Smoking Patio Gazebo with benches (2)
Custom Exterior Lanterns & Poles
Custom Exterior Black Granite Planters (4)
Elevator Lobby Wall Sconce (16)
Security Card Access System
Security Cameras and Security Monitors
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1. Escrow Agent shall deposit the Deposit in an interest-bearing, FDIC insured escrow account in a federally-insured institution. All interest earned shall be deemed a portion of the Deposit and belong to the party which ultimately becomes entitled to the Deposit (or, if each of the parties becomes entitled to a portion of the Deposit, shall be disbursed to each of the parties, pro rata, based on the portions of the Deposit to which they respectively are entitled).
2. If the Closing takes place, Escrow Agent shall deliver the Deposit to, or upon the instructions of, Seller at the Closing.
3. If this Agreement is terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement or if the Closing does not take place under this Agreement by reason of the failure of Purchaser or Seller to comply with its obligations under this Agreement, then Escrow Agent shall pay the Deposit as required by the terms of this Agreement; , , that notwithstanding the foregoing, Escrow Agent shall not pay over the Deposit to any party hereunder unless and until the following procedure is complied with: The party requesting disbursement of the Deposit (the "Requesting Party") shall deliver written notice to Escrow Agent and to the other party hereto, requesting such disbursement. Within five (5) days after receipt of such notice of request, the non-requesting party shall either: (a) agree to permit such disbursement by Escrow Agent, or (b) inform Escrow Agent in writing (with a copy to the Requesting Party) that the non-requesting party does not agree to permit such disbursement. If the non-requesting party acts under , then Escrow Agent shall make the disbursement as requested by the Requesting Party. If the non-requesting party acts under , then Escrow Agent shall not make any disbursement except as provided in below. If the non-requesting party fails to respond during the foregoing five (5) day period, its non-response shall be deemed to be the response of the non-requesting party under  on the last day of such five (5) day period.
provided
however
clause (a)
clause (b)
Section 5
clause (a)
4. It is agreed that;
(a) the duties of Escrow Agent are only as herein specifically provided and are purely ministerial in nature, and Escrow Agent shall incur no liability whatever except for its willful misconduct, negligence, or breach of this Agreement, as long as Escrow Agent has acted in good faith;
(b) in the performance of its duties hereunder, Escrow Agent shall be entitled to rely upon any document, instrument or signature reasonably believed by it to be genuine and signed by the applicable party or its successor;
(c) Escrow Agent may assume that any person purporting to give any notice of instructions in accordance with the provisions hereof has been duly authorized to do so;
(d) Escrow Agent shall not be bound by any modification or rescission of this Agreement unless in writing and signed by Seller and Purchaser, and to the extent such modification or rescission of this Agreement would affect Escrow Agent's rights or obligations under this Agreement, by Escrow Agent;
 
(e) Seller and Purchaser shall jointly and severally reimburse and indemnify Escrow Agent for, and hold it harmless against, any and all loss, liability, costs or expenses in connection herewith, including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, incurred without willful misconduct, negligence or breach of this Agreement on the part of Escrow Agent; and
(f) Seller and Purchaser each hereby release Escrow Agent from any act done or omitted to be done by Escrow Agent in good faith without its negligence, willful misconduct or breach of this Agreement in the performance of Escrow Agent's duties hereunder.
5. Escrow Agent is acting as a stake-holder only with respect to the Deposit. If there is any dispute as described above as to whether Escrow Agent is obligated to deliver all or any portion of the Deposit or as to whom the proceeds of the Deposit are to be delivered, Escrow Agent shall not be required to make any delivery, but in such event Escrow Agent shall hold the Deposit until receipt by Escrow Agent of an authorization in writing, signed by Seller and Purchaser, directing the disposition of the Deposit, or, in the absence of such authorization, Escrow Agent shall hold the Deposit until the final determination of the rights of the parties in an appropriate proceeding. If such written authorization is not given, or proceedings for such determination have not begun within ninety (90) days after the date Escrow Agent receives written notice of such dispute, and thereafter diligently continued, Escrow Agent may, but is not required to, bring an appropriate action or proceeding for leave to deposit the Deposit in court, pending such determination. Escrow Agent shall be reimbursed for all costs and expenses of such action or proceeding including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, by the party determined not to be entitled to the Deposit, or if the Deposit is split between Seller and Purchaser, such costs of Escrow Agent shall be split, , between Seller and Purchaser, based upon the amount of Deposit received by each. Upon making delivery of the Deposit in the manner provided in this Agreement, Escrow Agent shall have no further liability hereunder.
pro rata
6. Notices to Escrow Agent shall be directed to Escrow Agent at its address set forth below its signature page to this Agreement (or to such other address as Escrow Agent shall hereafter specify in writing by written notice to Seller and Purchaser), and shall be given in the manner described in of this Agreement. Notices provided by Escrow Agent to either party shall be given in the manner described in of this Agreement, at the addresses of the parties as set forth in of this Agreement (or to such other address as a party shall hereafter specify in writing by written notice to Escrow Agent and the other party).
Section 35
Section 35
Section 35
7. Escrow Agent has executed this Agreement solely to confirm (a) receipt of the Deposit and (b) that Escrow Agent, upon receipt thereof, will hold the Deposit in escrow, pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement.
 
 
The undersigned, (""), having the power and authority to do so, acknowledging that you and any assignee of your right to purchase and your respective lenders have the right to rely on the provisions hereof and realizing that you and such others are, in fact, relying on such provisions in purchasing certain property known as Two Pierce Road, Itasca, Illinois (""), hereby states, certifies, and affirms the following to you:
                                
Tenant
Property
1. Tenant is the tenant under that certain Lease dated (""), between ("") and Tenant, whereby Tenant leased Suite at the Property () from Landlord .
                                
Lease
                                
Landlord
                
"Premises"
2. The Lease is in full force and effect, has not been modified, changed, altered, extended, or amended in any respect whatsoever (except as specifically set forth below) and constitutes the complete agreement between Landlord and Tenant with respect to the leasing of the Premises. The term "Lease," as used herein, shall include any modifications described in this paragraph 2 and indicated below:
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
3. The rent to be paid by the Tenant under the Lease as of the date hereof is as follows:
3.1 :
Base Rent
3.1.1 : $ per month due in advance on the first day of each month.
Present
                
3.2 Additional monthly amounts due under the Lease consist of the following:
Additional Rent:
 
 
4. To the best of the Tenant's knowledge, Tenant and Landlord have performed all of their obligations under the Lease.
5. The Tenant has been in possession of the Premises since , . The term of the Lease commenced on , , and[, assuming execution of the Sixteenth Amendment to Lease- ] shall expire on , 20.
                    
        
                    
            
Gallagher only
                    
    
6. Except as specifically set forth below, Tenant asserts no claim (a) of offset, defense, or counterclaim to the payment of rent or other charges payable under the Lease, or (b) against Landlord for any obligation of Landlord under the Lease:
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       
7. Tenant is paying all rent and other charges in accordance with the provisions of the Lease and Tenant is not in default in making any of such payments. All base rent has been paid through and including , 2006. There has been no prepayment of rent under the Lease other than as expressly required thereunder.
                    
8. Tenant has no knowledge of any fact or circumstance that, by itself or with the giving of notice or the passage of time or both, would constitute a default by Landlord or Tenant under the Lease. Landlord is in compliance with all of its obligations under the Lease, including, without limitation, with respect to parking.
9. Tenant has not been granted any options, reduced or free rent or other concessions or rights except as expressly set forth in the Lease.
10. Tenant has paid to the Landlord, and the Landlord is holding on behalf of the Tenant, a security deposit in the amount of $.
                        
11. The Premises have been completed and delivered to Tenant in accordance with the terms of the Lease and have been accepted unconditionally by Tenant. Landlord's obligation to pay for tenant improvements, if any, has been satisfied.
12. Tenant has received no notice and has no actual knowledge of any prior assignment, hypothecation, or pledge of the rights of Landlord under the Lease or the rents or other amounts payable thereunder, except with respect to the existing loan from Teachers Insurance and Annuity Association (the "TIAA Financing").
13. The Lease has not been assigned (in whole or in part) except in connection with the TIAA Financing and the Premises have not been sublet (in whole or in part), except as follows:
14. No voluntary or involuntary action in bankruptcy is pending against Tenant in any state or federal court.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has caused this Certificate to be duly executed as of the day of , 2006.
            
                        
 
 
This Instrument Prepared by:
Jeffrey B. Schamis, Esq.
Seyfarth Shaw LLP
55 E. Monroe Street, Suite 4200
Chicago, IL 60603
Upon Recording, Return to:
Cindy Malone
Chicago Title Insurance Company
171 North Clark Street
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Property Address:
Two Pierce Road
Itasca, Illinois 60143
03-05-101-010
P.I.N.
Deed made as of this day of , 2006 by HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership, an Illinois limited partnership (the ), having an address at 300 Park Boulevard, Itasca, Illinois 60143 to (the ), having an address at .
                
            
"Grantor"
                                
"Grantee"
                    
Grantor, for and in consideration of the sum of Ten and No/100 Dollars ($10.00) and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, grants, bargains, and sells with the special warranty covenants set forth below unto Grantee that certain real property situated in the County of DuPage, State of Illinois described on attached hereto (the ), together with the hereditaments and appurtenances pertaining to such Property, TO HAVE AND TO HOLD the Property, together with the foregoing appurtenances, forever.
Exhibit A
"Property"
Grantor, for itself, and its successors, hereby covenants and agrees that, except for the Permitted Exceptions described on attached hereto, it has not done or suffered to be done anything whereby the Property hereby granted is, or may be, in any manner encumbered. Grantor further covenants and agrees, to the foregoing extent, to defend title to the Property against all persons lawfully claiming, by, through or under Grantor.
Exhibit B
 
Grantor has caused this Special Warranty Deed to be executed and delivered as of the day and year first above written.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
 
 
I, the undersigned, a Notary Public in and for the County and State aforesaid, do hereby certify that , a managing member of H.P.  Itasca Two Pierce, L.L.C., an Illinois limited liability company, the Managing Member of HG/Two Pierce, L.L.C., an Illinois limited liability company, which in turn is the sole general partner of HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership, an Illinois limited partnership (the "Partnership"), personally known to me to be the person holding such office in such corporation whose name is subscribed to the foregoing Special Warranty Deed, appeared before me this day in person and acknowledged that he/she signed and delivered said Deed as his/her free and voluntary act and as the free and voluntary act of said Partnership for the uses and purposes therein set forth.
                   
GIVEN under my hand and notarial seal this day of , 2006.
            
                
 
My Commission expires:
:
Mail Tax Bills to
 
 
 
KNOW ALL MEN BY THESE PRESENTS, that HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership, an Illinois limited partnership (the "Seller"), for and in consideration of the sum of Ten Dollars and other valuable consideration to it in hand paid by , a (the "Purchaser"), the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, hereby sells, assigns, transfers and conveys unto said Purchaser All machinery, equipment, building materials, appliances, furniture, furnishings, tools, instruments, parts and other articles of tangible personal property of every kind and nature whatsoever owned by Seller that are located on and used in connection with the Real Property described in attached hereto and more particularly described in attached hereto and made a part hereof (collectively, the "Personal Property"), as is, where is, and without warranty of use, and without warranty, express or implied, of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose.
                   
                   
Exhibit "A"
Exhibit B
Seller hereby represents and warrants to Purchaser that Seller is the absolute owner of the Personal Property free and clear of all liens, charges and encumbrances, and that Seller has full right, power and authority to sell the personal property and to make this Bill of Sale
all of said personal property unto Purchaser, its successors and assigns, to its own use forever.
TO HAVE AND TO HOLD
, Seller has executed this Bill of Sale as of the day of , 2006.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
            
            
 
 
 
 
(the "Assignment") is made as of this day of , 2006 between HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership, an Illinois limited partnership ("Assignor"), and , a ("Assignee").
THIS ASSIGNMENT OF LEASES
            
            
                   
                   
For and in consideration of the sum of Ten Dollars ($10.00) and other valuable consideration to it in hand paid by Assignee to Assignor, and the mutual covenants herein contained, the receipt and sufficiency of the foregoing consideration being hereby acknowledged by the parties hereto, Assignor hereby assigns, transfers, sets over and conveys to Assignee all of Assignor's right, title and interest in, to and under any and all existing and outstanding leases, licenses and occupancy agreements (collectively, the "Leases"), of the improvements located on the real property being more particularly described on , attached hereto, and incorporated herein by this reference, including without limitation, all those Leases described on attached hereto and incorporated herein by this reference, together with all security deposits tendered under the Leases remaining in the possession of Assignor.
Exhibit A
Exhibit "B"
Assignee does hereby assume and agree to perform all of Assignor's obligations as lessor under the Leases first accruing from and after the date hereof, including without limitation, claims made by tenants with respect to the tenants' security deposits to the extent paid, credited or assigned to Assignee by Assignor. Assignee agrees to indemnify, protect, defend and hold Assignor harmless from and against any and all liabilities, losses, costs, damages and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) arising out of any breach or default in Assignee's obligations hereunder.
Assignor agrees to indemnify, protect, defend and hold Assignee harmless from and against any and all liabilities, losses, costs, damages and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) arising out of any breach or default in Assignor's obligations as lessor under the Leases first accruing before the date hereof.
This Assignment shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of Assignor and Assignee and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns.
This Assignment may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Assignor and Assignee have each executed this Assignment as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
(the "Assignment") is made as of the day of , 2006 between HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership, an Illinois limited partnership ("Assignor"), and , a ("Assignee").
THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF PROPERTY AGREEMENTS, PERMITS AND WARRANTIES
            
            
              
              
Pursuant to that certain Sale Agreement dated , 2006 between Assignor and (the "Sale Agreement") and in consideration of the sum of Ten Dollars ($10.00) and other valuable consideration to it in hand paid by Assignee to Assignor, and the mutual covenants herein contained, the receipt and sufficiency of the foregoing consideration being hereby acknowledged by the parties hereto, Assignor hereby assigns, transfers, sets over and conveys to Assignee all of Assignor's right, title and interest, to the extent assignable, in, to and under any and all of the following, to wit:
              
              
 
 
 
All items described in (ii) and (iii) above are hereinafter collectively referred to as "Intangible Property."
Assignee does hereby assume and agree to perform all of Assignor's contractual obligations under the Property Agreements first accruing from and after the date hereof. Assignee agrees to indemnify, protect, defend and hold Assignor harmless from and against any and all liabilities, losses, costs, damages and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) arising out of any breach or default in Assignee's obligations under this paragraph.
Assignor agrees to indemnify, protect, defend and hold Assignee harmless from and against any and all liabilities, losses, costs, damages and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) arising out of any breach or default in Assignor's contractual obligations under the Property Agreements first accruing before the date hereof.
This Assignment shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of Assignor and Assignee and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns.
This Assignment may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Assignor and Assignee have each executed this Assignment as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
THIS SIXTEENTH AMENDMENT TO LEASE is made as of this day of , 2006, by and between Wells REIT-Two Pierce Place, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Landlord") and Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation ("Tenant").
            
            
WHEREAS, Landlord's predecessor in interest and Tenant entered into a written lease dated July 26, 1989 (the "Original Lease"), as amended by that certain First Amendment to Lease dated as of May 20, 1991, that certain Second Amendment to Lease dated as of November 13, 1991, that certain Third Amendment to Lease dated as of July 14, 1992, that certain Fourth Amendment to Lease dated as of August 10, 1992, that certain Fifth Amendment to Lease dated as of August 31, 1992, that certain Sixth Amendment to Lease dated as of October 5, 1994, that certain Seventh Amendment to Lease dated as of February 10, 1999, that certain Eighth Amendment to Lease dated as of July 16, 2001, that certain Ninth Amendment to Lease dated as of November 13, 2002, that certain Tenth Amendment to Lease dated as of April 5, 2004, that certain Eleventh Amendment to Lease dated as of February 10, 2005 (the "Eleventh Amendment"), that certain Twelfth Amendment dated as of February 10, 2005 (the "Twelfth Amendment"), that certain Thirteenth Amendment dated as of February 10, 2005, that certain Fourteenth Amendment dated as of October 31, 2005, and that certain Fifteenth Amendment dated as of October 31, 2005 (collectively, the "Amended Lease") for approximately 306,259 rentable square feet (the "Current Premises"), as of January 1, 2007, and 631 square feet of storage space (the "Storage Space"), at Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois; and
WHEREAS, Landlord and Tenant have agreed to extend the term, all on the terms and conditions set forth herein.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and conditions hereinafter contained, Landlord and Tenant hereby agree as follows:
1. . The Term of the Amended Lease shall be extended from the current expiration date of February 28, 2011 until February 28, 2018 (the "Second Extension Term").
Lease Term
 
2. . Tenant shall pay as Monthly Base Rent for the Current Premises for the Second Extension Term the following amounts:
Base Rent
 
3. . Tenant shall pay as Monthly Storage Space Rental for the Storage Space for the Second Extension Term the following amounts:
Storage Space Rental
 
4. . Landlord shall have no obligation to alter or improve the Current Premises or Storage Space during the Second Extension Term and Tenant agrees to accept the Current Premises and Storage Space on the commencement date of the Second Extension Term in their then "AS IS" condition.
Improvements
5. . The first sentence of Paragraph 38(B) of the Original Lease is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Prevailing Market Rate
"The determination of Prevailing Market Rate, regardless of whether made by agreement between Landlord and Tenant or by the Appraisal Process, shall be based on lease terms and rental rates in Class "A" buildings of at least five (5) stories within a twenty (20) mile radius of the Building, which are comparable in services, amenities, quality and build out as those in the Building and Leased Premises, and shall take into account (1) the definition of rentable area or net rentable area, as the case may be, with respect to which the Prevailing Market Rate is computed, so that comparable useable area is being compared; (2) rental concessions then customarily being given or offered (such as, but not limited to, abatements, cost contributions, lease assumptions or take-overs, payment of moving or other expenses and construction allowances or leasehold improvements; (3) applicable distinctions between "gross" leases and "net" leases; (4) base year or base amounts used in calculating any pass-through of costs and expenses to tenants; and (5) customary brokerage commissions."
 
6. . The first sentence of Paragraph 41 of the Original Lease (Renewal Options) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Renewal Option
"Provided that there does not then exist an Event of Default hereunder with respect to (i) a breach of any material non-monetary obligation of Tenant hereunder, (ii) a breach of any monetary obligation of Tenant hereunder in excess of Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or (iii) a breach of Tenant's obligation to pay any Base Rent due hereunder, then Tenant shall have the right and option to renew this Lease (the "Third Renewal Option") by extending the Term for five (5) years commencing March 1, 2018, by providing Landlord with written notice thereof not later than September 1, 2016 (an "Intent to Renew Notice")."
7. Paragraph 47 of the Original Lease (Building Identity) is hereby amended by adding the following at the end thereof:
Building Identity.
"So long as this Lease remains in effect and Tenant and its Related Entities lease more square feet of rentable space in the Building than any other tenant thereof, Tenant will be permitted, at no additional rental charge, to erect signage in a location on the exterior of the Building selected by Tenant in its sole discretion, subject to Landlord's prior approval, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, reflecting Tenant's name, logo or a combination of both, at Tenant's sole discretion. Such signage must be approved by all local governmental authorities having jurisdiction over such signage and must meet all then existing contractual requirements and/or agreements of which Tenant has notice and which relate to signage on the exterior of the Building. At such time as Tenant and its Related Entities no longer lease more square feet of rentable space in the Building than any other tenant thereof, Tenant shall remove such signage. The erecting, maintaining and removing of such signage shall be performed at Tenant's sole cost and expense."
8. . Paragraph 55 of the Original Lease is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Parking
"A. Landlord at all times will provide sufficient parking in the Parking Structure so as to comply with all zoning and other requirements applicable to the Building. Commencing with the execution of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease by the parties, Landlord will provide Tenant with a total of sixteen (16) enclosed heated parking spaces (including fourteen (14) enclosed heated parking spaces previously provided to Tenant as of the date of such execution) at no charge to Tenant for the remaining Term of this Lease (including all renewal periods). The number of enclosed heated parking spaces will increase by one (1) space for every additional whole floor of additional space in the Building leased by Tenant throughout the remainder of the Term of this Lease (such increase to be effective at the time of occupancy of said additional space). Any such additional enclosed heated parking spaces will be at no charge to Tenant for the remaining Term of this Lease, including all renewal periods. Initial pass-cards, if necessary, shall be provided by Landlord at no cost to Tenant. Replacement pass-cards will be available for purchase from Landlord at an amount equal to Landlord's actual cost. The Parking Structure is intended for the sole use of the Building's tenants, their agents, employees, customers and invitees."
 
B. As of the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, Tenant is using sixty-six (66) reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure (in addition to the enclosed heated parking spaces described in A. above). Of such sixtysix (66) reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure, thirty (30) will be at no charge to Tenant through the remaining Term of this Lease, including all renewal periods. The charge for the remaining thirty-six (36) spaces shall be $360 per parking space per year during each of calendar years 2007, 2008 and 2009, payable in equal monthly installments of $30/each; provided, however, that to the extent that at any time during such three-year period, Landlord leases any reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure to employees of Tenant or any Related Entity that do not lease reserved parking spaces as of the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, for so long as such employees continue to lease such reserved parking spaces, such monthly charge shall be reduced by $30 for each parking space so leased by Landlord. Commencing on January 1, 2010 and thereafter through the remaining Term of this Lease, including all renewal periods, (i) there will be no charge for thirty (30) of the thirty-six (36) reserved parking spaces described in the preceding sentence, and (ii) Tenant shall have the right to use sixty (60) reserved parking spaces, all at no charge. To the extent that (i) at any time and from time to time during the period commencing on the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease and ending on December 31, 2009, Tenant desires to lease any reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure in excess of the sixty (60) reserved parking spaces described herein, or (ii) at any time and from time to time commencing on or after January 1, 2010, Tenant desires to lease any reserved parking spaces in the Parking Structure in excess of the free sixty (60) reserved parking spaces described herein, in either such case, Tenant shall pay to Landlord the then prevailing market rate for comparable spaces. Landlord shall place signs in the Parking Structure designating such reserved parking spaces as being so reserved for Tenant, but Landlord shall have no responsibility or liability to Tenant by reason of the unauthorized use thereof by any third party. Landlord shall, however, make reasonable efforts to preserve Tenant's exclusive rights to such spaces and to prevent the repeated unauthorized use thereof."
9. . The following is hereby added at the end of paragraph 2(A). of Exhibit C to the Lease:
Specific Operating Expenses
"Tenant hereby agrees that Operating Costs may include expenses and costs incurred by Landlord in connection with the Parking Garage Repairs and the Window Gasket Repairs (as such terms are hereinafter defined) provided that (i) the maximum amount of Operating Costs attributable to the Parking Garage Repairs and Window Gasket Repairs shall not exceed $938,000, less the cost of any such Parking Garage Repairs which are performed prior to December 31, 2006, provided that Landlord determines that such Parking Garage Repairs were performed in a good and workmanlike manner reasonably acceptable to Landlord, and (ii) Tenant's Proportionate Share of the Operating Costs attributable to the Parking Garage Repairs and the Window Gasket Repairs will be payable in installments over a period of not less than twenty-four (24) months, provided that in any calendar year, Tenant's Proportionate Share of Operating Costs attributable to Parking Garage Repairs and Window Gasket
 
Repairs will not exceed $.96 per square foot of space comprising the Leased Premises and will be clearly delineated in each estimate of Operating Costs and each statement of actual Operating Costs delivered to Tenant. For purposes hereof, the "Parking Garage Repairs" shall refer to the items listed on Schedule 1 attached to the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease. For purposes hereof, the term "Window Gasket Repairs" shall mean the cutting and wet glazing of all the window gaskets at all elevations of the Building which work is commenced during the five (5) year period following the date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease. Landlord agrees that commencing not later than April 15, 2007, the property management fees comprising Operating Costs shall not exceed the sum of three percent (3%) of the total base rents and additional rents for taxes and operating expenses (but excluding rents or other amounts paid for parking spaces or storage spaces) collected by such property manager from tenants in the Building, plus (i) the actual salaries and related employment benefits paid to employees of the property management company who perform management, maintenance and other similar functions related solely to the Building, and (ii) the allocable share of the actual salaries and related employment benefits paid to employees of the property management company who perform management, maintenance and other similar functions related to the Building and other properties owned by Landlord or its affiliates, provided said allocable share shall be calculated in a commercially reasonable manner by Landlord taking into account the actual relative amount of work and services performed by such employees for the benefit of the Building and for the benefit of such other properties. Tenant shall have the right to audit Landlord's allocation methodology for employees described in clause (ii) of the preceding sentence as part of any examination it makes of Landlord's books and records performed pursuant to Paragraph 66 of this Lease and an additional two (2) times per calendar year."
10. . A new Paragraph 75 will be added to the Lease as follows:
Gallagher Cafeteria
"At any time after the execution of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, Tenant will have the right to build out all or a portion of the first, second or thirteenth floors of the Building, at its sole discretion, provided that Tenant then leases said floor or portion thereof and for so long as Tenant continues to lease said floor or portion thereof, Tenant shall have the right to designate and use such floors or portions thereof as a cafeteria (the "Gallagher Cafeteria"). Landlord shall have the right to approve the plans and specification for the Gallagher Cafeteria, provided that such approval shall be limited to confirmation that such plans and specifications do not have an adverse effect on the structural integrity of the Building, are not in violation of any laws or ordinances applicable to the Building and would not result in a cafeteria that would be inconsistent with the overall quality of the Building. Landlord shall provide Tenant with its approval or disapproval of any proposed plans and specifications for the Gallagher Cafeteria, subject to the limitations contained in the preceding sentence, within ten (10) business days after receipt thereof, and in the event that Landlord fails to disapprove any such proposed plans and specifications within such ten (10) business day period, it shall be deemed to have approved the plans and specifications. The Gallagher Cafeteria will be operated by Tenant for the use of Tenant's employees, agents, patrons, customers and invitees on a subsidized or non-subsidized basis, as Tenant so elects from time to time, and used solely for the preparation of and meal consumption as well as
 
non-alcoholic beverages, provided that the Gallagher Cafeteria will be available for use during its regular hours of operation by other tenants of the Building at non-subsidized prices. Pursuant to this Paragraph 75, the Gallagher Cafeteria will be permitted by the Landlord and not be in violation of any use clause under this Lease nor any of Landlord's Rules and Regulations as contained in Exhibit E of this Lease. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Tenant shall have the right to close the Gallagher Cafeteria to other tenants of the Building so that it may be used for private functions not more than twenty (20) days (any one or more of which may be consecutive) in any calendar year, provided that Tenant posts a written notice in the vicinity of the Gallagher Cafeteria at least seven (7) days' prior to any day that the Gallagher Cafeteria will be closed to other tenants of the Building stating the date of such closure. Landlord represents and warrants to the Tenant that the addition of the Gallagher Cafeteria to the Building will not violate any other current or future tenant's lease rights. The parties will cooperate with one another in good faith in the efforts to build and operate the Gallagher Cafeteria. The parties agree that they will modify or add any applicable insurance coverages, as necessary, to open and operate the Gallagher Cafeteria in the Building, provided that any excess cost incurred by Landlord to make appropriate modifications to its insurance shall be reimbursed thereto by Tenant."
11. . A new Paragraph 76 will be added to the Lease as follows:
Gallagher Fitness Facility
"At any time after the execution of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease, Tenant will have the right to build out all or a portion of any floor of the Building that it then leases, at its sole discretion, and so long as Tenant continues to lease such floor or portion thereof, Tenant shall have the right to designate and use such floor or portion thereof as a workout/fitness facility (the "Gallagher Fitness Facility"). Landlord shall have the right to approve the plans and specification for the Gallagher Fitness Facility, provided that such approval shall be limited to confirmation that such plans and specifications do not have an adverse effect on the structural integrity of the Building are not in violation of any laws or ordinances applicable to the Building. Landlord shall provide Tenant with its approval or disapproval of any proposed plans and specifications for the Gallagher Fitness Facility, subject to the limitations contained in the preceding sentence, within ten (10) business days after receipt thereof, and in the event that Landlord fails to disapprove any such proposed plans and specifications within such ten (10) business day period, it shall be deemed to have approved the plans and specifications. The Gallagher Fitness Facility will be operated by Tenant solely for the use of Tenant's employees, agents, patrons, customers and invitees. Pursuant to this Paragraph 76, the Gallagher Fitness Facility will be permitted by the Landlord and not be in violation of any use clause under this Lease nor any of Landlord's Rules and Regulations as contained in Exhibit E of this Lease. Landlord represents and warrants to the Tenant that the addition of the Gallagher Fitness Facility to the Building will not violate any other current or future tenant's lease rights. The parties will cooperate with one another in good faith in the efforts to build and operate the Gallagher Fitness Facility. The parties agree that they will modify or add any applicable insurance coverages, as necessary, to open and operate the Gallagher Fitness Facility in the Building, provided that any excess cost incurred by Landlord to make appropriate modifications to its insurance shall be reimbursed thereto by Tenant."
 
12. Paragraph 2 of the Eleventh Amendment is amended by deleting the description of Periods and Monthly Base Rent contained therein and substituting the following in lieu thereof:
 
13. . Paragraph 5 of the Twelfth Amendment is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Right of First Offer
"Tenant shall have the right of first offer on any space which becomes available for lease in the Building, from time to time, on or after the execution date of the Sixteenth Amendment to this Lease ("Additional Space"), subject to any existing superior options of existing tenants in the Building. Landlord will deliver a written notice (a "Right of First Offer Notice") to Tenant containing the terms for the Additional Space within ten (10) business days of Landlord's knowledge that any space is available for lease in the Building. Tenant thereafter shall have a period of ten (10) business days in which to notify Landlord in writing of Tenant's desire to lease the Additional Space (an "Exercise Notice"). If Landlord does not receive an Exercise Notice within ten (10) business days after Landlord's delivery to Tenant of a Right of First Offer Notice, then Landlord shall be free to lease the Additional Space. The rent for the Additional Space will be the Prevailing Market Rate determined at the time Landlord's Right of First Offer Notice is delivered to Tenant. Landlord and Tenant agree to negotiate in good faith to determine the remainder of the terms under which the Additional Space will be leased, including, but not limited to, the amount of tenant improvement allowance, any abatements or concessions and the expiration date for the Additional Space. The Additional Space shall automatically be included in the Premises effective as of the Additional Commencement Date (as hereinafter defined) and all of the covenants, conditions and provisions of the Amended Lease shall thereupon be applicable to the Additional Space, except that (x) Tenant's proportionate share shall increase accordingly, and (z) the renewal option set forth in Paragraph 41 of the Original Lease shall apply to the Additional Space. As used herein, the term "Additional Commencement Date" shall mean the date set forth in a Right of First Offer Notice as the date that space in the Building will be available for lease, which date may not be less than sixty (60) days after the date of the Right of First Offer Notice.
 
14. . Tenant acknowledges that it has waived the payment of the installments of the construction allowance described in Paragraph 5 of the Twelfth Amendment (prior to such Paragraph 5 being deleted as provided herein) that are due on March 1, 2009 and March 1, 2010.
Waiver of Certain Payments
15. . Paragraph 6 of the Twelfth Amendment (Expansion Space Renewal Rent Rate) is hereby deleted and shall have no further force or effect.
Superseded Provision
16. . Tenant represents that Tenant has not directly dealt with any broker in connection with this Sixteenth Amendment and agrees to indemnify and hold Landlord and the managing agent and leasing agent harmless from all losses, damages, claims, liens, liabilities, costs and expense (including without limitation reasonable attorney's fees) arising from any claims or demands of any broker or brokers or finders for any commission or other compensation alleged to be due such broker or brokers or finders in connection with its participating on behalf of Tenant in the negotiation of this Sixteenth Amendment or in exhibiting the Current Premises or Storage Space.
Broker's Commission
17. . Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Amended Lease.
Terms of Amended Lease
18. . Except as otherwise amended hereby, the terms and covenants of the Amended Lease remain in full force and effect in accordance with their terms.
Incorporation of Amended Lease
19. . This Sixteenth Amendment may be executed in counterparts and all said counterparts shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Landlord and Tenant have executed this Sixteenth Amendment as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
is made as of this day of , 2006, by HGC/Two Pierce Limited Partnership, an Illinois limited partnership ("Seller") in favor of ("Buyer").
THIS CERTIFICATE
            
            
            
, Seller and Buyer entered into that certain Purchase and Sale Agreement with an Effective Date of May , 2006 (the "Sale Agreement"), with respect to the purchase and sale of property located at Two Pierce Place, Itasca, County of DuPage, State of Illinois described therein; and
WHEREAS
            
, the Sale Agreement provides that all of the warranties of Seller in the Sale Agreement shall be reaffirmed by Seller at Closing.
WHEREAS
, for good and valuable consideration, Seller hereby certifies to Buyer that, as of the date hereof, that all of Seller's warranties set forth in the Sale Agreement, including, but not limited to, those set forth in Section 6 of the Sale Agreement, were true, correct, and complete on the date of the Sale Agreement, and remain true, correct, and complete on the date hereof, without exception.
NOW, THEREFORE
 
 
1. In the event that Escrow Agent is authorized to draw upon the Letters of Credit pursuant to below, the Letters of Credit shall be drawn upon as follows: (i) sixty percent (60%) of the amount to be drawn shall be drawn from the letter of credit deposited by AJG; and (ii) forty percent (40%) of the amount to be drawn shall be drawn from the letter of credit deposited by H.P.-Itasca. In the event that the Letters of Credit are drawn upon, Escrow Agent shall deposit such funds in an interest-bearing, FDIC insured escrow account in a federally-insured institution. All interest earned shall be deemed a portion of the respective Letters of Credit and belong to the party which ultimately becomes entitled to the Letters of Credit (or, if each of the parties becomes entitled to a portion of the Letters of Credit, shall be disbursed to each of the parties, pro rata, based on the portions of the Letters of Credit to which they respectively are entitled).
Section 2
2. In the event that the Letters of Credit are not drawn upon within one (1) year from the date hereof, Escrow Agent shall, without notice to or consent from Purchaser, return the Letters of Credit to the parties depositing such Letters of Credit immediately. Escrow Agent shall not draw upon the Letters of Credit or pay over any funds to any party hereunder unless and until the following procedure is complied with: The party requesting disbursement of the Letters of Credit (the "Requesting Party") shall deliver written notice to Escrow Agent and to the other parties hereto, requesting such disbursement. Such disbursement request notice must include copies of: (a) the notice of Seller's breach of representation or warranty delivered to Seller pursuant to of this Agreement; and (b) the document(s) evidencing the commencement of litigation to enforce the breach of representation or warranty claim. In the event that (a) the Letters of Credit are set to expire prior to the expiration of the sixty (60) day period Purchaser has to commence litigation to enforce the breach of representation or warranty claim; and (b) Purchaser has delivered written notice to Escrow Agent and to the other parties hereto requesting a disbursement, along with a copy of the notice of Seller's breach of representation or warranty, then Escrow Agent shall draw pro rata upon the Letters of Credit in the amount of the draw request and hold such funds in accordance with above; provided, however, if Purchaser does not deliver to Escrow Agent the document(s) evidencing the commencement of litigation to enforce the breach of representation or warranty claim within such sixty (60) day period, Escrow Agent shall immediately return the escrow funds to the respective parties. Within five (5) business days after receipt of such notice of request, the non-requesting party shall either: (a) agree to permit such disbursement by Escrow Agent, or (b) inform Escrow Agent in writing (with a copy to the Requesting Party) that the non-requesting party does not agree to permit such disbursement. If the non-requesting party acts under , then Escrow Agent shall make the disbursement as requested by the Requesting Party. If the non-requesting party acts under , then Escrow Agent shall not make any disbursement except as provided in below. If the non-requesting party fails to respond during the foregoing five (5) business day period, its non-response shall be deemed to be the response of the non-requesting party under  on the last day of such five (5) business day period. In the event that the Requesting Party makes a draw request and the non-requesting party objects to such request and the Letters of Credit are set to expire prior to resolution of the foregoing dispute, Escrow Agent shall, prior to the expiry of the Letters of Credit, draw pro rata upon the Letters of Credit in the amount of the draw request and hold such funds in accordance with above.
Section 21(c)
Section 1
clause (a)
clause (b)
Section 4
clause (a)
Section 1
 
3. It is agreed that;
(a) the duties of Escrow Agent are only as herein specifically provided and are purely ministerial in nature, and Escrow Agent shall incur no liability whatever except for its willful misconduct, negligence, or breach of this Agreement, as long as Escrow Agent has acted in good faith;
(b) in the performance of its duties hereunder, Escrow Agent shall be entitled to rely upon any document, instrument or signature reasonably believed by it to be genuine and signed by the applicable party or its successor;
(c) Escrow Agent may assume that any person purporting to give any notice of instructions in accordance with the provisions hereof has been duly authorized to do so;
(d) Escrow Agent shall not be bound by any modification or rescission of this Agreement unless in writing and signed by Seller and Purchaser, and to the extent such modification or rescission of this Agreement would affect Escrow Agent's rights or obligations under this Agreement, by Escrow Agent;
(e) Seller and Purchaser shall jointly and severally reimburse and indemnify Escrow Agent for, and hold it harmless against, any and all loss, liability, costs or expenses in connection herewith, including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, incurred without willful misconduct, negligence or breach of this Agreement on the part of Escrow Agent; and
(f) Seller and Purchaser each hereby release Escrow Agent from any act done or omitted to be done by Escrow Agent in good faith without its negligence, willful misconduct or breach of this Agreement in the performance of Escrow Agent's duties hereunder.
4. Escrow Agent is acting as a stake-holder only with respect to the Letters of Credit. If there is any dispute as described above as to whether Escrow Agent is obligated to deliver all or any portion of the Letters of Credit or as to whom the proceeds of the Letters of Credit are to be delivered, Escrow Agent shall not be required to make any delivery, but in such event Escrow Agent shall hold the Letters of Credit until receipt by Escrow Agent of an authorization in writing, signed by Seller and Purchaser, directing the disposition of the Letters of Credit, or, in the absence of such authorization, Escrow Agent shall hold the Letters of Credit until the final determination of the rights of the parties in an appropriate proceeding. If such written authorization is not given, or proceedings for such determination have not begun within ninety (90) days after the date Escrow Agent receives written notice of such dispute, and thereafter diligently continued, Escrow Agent may, but is not required to, bring an appropriate action or proceeding for leave to deposit the Letters of Credit in court, pending such determination. Escrow Agent shall be reimbursed for all costs and expenses of
 
such action or proceeding including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, by the parties determined not to be entitled to the Letters of Credit, or if the Letters of Credit are split between H.P.-Itasca, AJG and Purchaser, such costs of Escrow Agent shall be split, , between H.P.-Itasca, AJG and Purchaser, based upon the amount of Letters of Credit received by each. Upon making delivery of the Letters of Credit in the manner provided in this Agreement, Escrow Agent shall have no further liability hereunder.
pro
rata
5. Notices to Escrow Agent shall be directed to Escrow Agent at its address set forth below its signature page to this Agreement (or to such other address as Escrow Agent shall hereafter specify in writing by written notice to Seller and Purchaser), and shall be given in the manner described in of this Agreement. Notices provided by Escrow Agent to either party shall be given in the manner described in of this Agreement, at the addresses of the parties as set forth in of this Agreement (or to such other address as a party shall hereafter specify in writing by written notice to Escrow Agent and the other party).
Section 35
Section 35
Section 35
6. Escrow Agent has executed this Agreement solely to confirm (a) receipt of the Letters of Credit and (b) that Escrow Agent, upon receipt thereof, will hold the Letters of Credit in escrow, pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20061229170508.txt.gz
TIME:20061229170508
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On December 29, 2006, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. and its subsidiaries and affiliates (Gallagher) reached an agreement to resolve all claims in the Federal Multi-District class action litigation (MDL) pending in the New Jersey Federal District Court against commercial insurers and brokers relating to industry-wide contingent commission matters. Gallagher admitted no wrongdoing, but chose to conclude its involvement, rather than prolong what could be a costly and burdensome lawsuit. Gallagher established a provision for this matter in 2005, and as a result, substantially all of the costs associated with the MDL settlement have been reserved for in its previously reported balance sheet. Gallagher will incur a pretax charge in its fourth quarter 2006 earnings of between $5.0 million to $10.0 million to increase its reserve for the costs to be incurred to administratively conclude the MDL settlement and to resolve other regulatory and civil litigation matters.
The MDL settlement, which is subject to court approval, provides for Gallagher to distribute $28.0 million to current and former clients and others that used a broker to purchase retail insurance from 1994 to 2005. Gallagher will also pay $8.85 million in plaintiff's attorney fees.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Index
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Itasca, IL, December 29, 2006Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. announced today that it has agreed to resolve all claims in the Federal Multi-District (MDL) class action pending in the New Jersey Federal District Court against commercial insurers and brokers relating to industry-wide contingent commission matters. Gallagher admitted no wrongdoing, but said it chose to conclude its involvement, rather than prolong what could be a costly and burdensome lawsuit. Gallagher established a provision for this matter in 2005, and as a result, substantially all of the costs associated with the MDL settlement have been reserved for in its previously reported balance sheet. Gallagher will incur a pretax charge in its fourth quarter 2006 earnings of between $5.0 million to $10.0 million to increase its reserve for the costs to be incurred to administratively conclude the MDL settlement and to resolve other regulatory and civil litigation matters.
The settlement, which is subject to court approval, provides for Gallagher to distribute $28.0 million to current and former clients and others that used a broker to purchase retail insurance from 1994 to 2005. The company will also pay $8.85 million in plaintiff's attorney fees.
"We are pleased to put this legal matter behind us so we can focus all of our efforts on doing what we do bestproviding our clients with high-quality, cost-effective insurance and risk management services," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20070130170810.txt.gz
TIME:20070130170810
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On January 30, 2007, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's fourth quarter and full year 2006 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, January 30, 2007  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and full year ended December 31, 2006. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
 
Percentages used hereinafter are computed excluding retail contingent commission revenues, expenses related to settling contingent commission matters, expense impacts related to medical and pension plan changes and expenses related to claims handling obligations. See notes to fourth quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
"I'm extremely pleased with the meaningful progress our Brokerage Services Segment made during 2006," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer. "For the year, revenues were up 10%, organic growth was 6% and pretax earnings for the segment were up 31%. We improved our pretax margin by 2.5%, our merger and acquisition activity has returned to historical levels and our brokerage teams are thriving in the new transparent world. This is an outstanding effort in light of the turmoil that has been facing the insurance brokerage industry for over two years.
"Our Risk Management Segment posted revenue growth of 8% during 2006, all of which was organic, but fell slightly short of our margin expectations. We announced last year that we were targeting a 2006 margin of 15% to 16%, but posted a respectable 14% margin for the year. Pretax margin decreased because we maintained our staffing levels in anticipation of higher reported claims - which did not occur. This lower than expected frequency seems to be a trend throughout the insurance industry. We are off to a good start in 2007 and believe we are well positioned to grow into our excess capacity in 2007.
"Our Financial Services Segment had a busy year as we increased the pace of disposing of our non-core investments and reducing related off-balance sheet commitments. We eliminated most of the debt on our balance sheet and only a few investments remain.
"2005 and 2006 were the most difficult years in Gallagher's 79 year history. I am optimistic with so many distractions behind us, particularly the recent settlement of our portion of the class action litigation that is still facing the insurance industry. Despite these challenges, Gallagher is now nearly debt free, our current dividend yield of 4.3% is the best of all the public brokers, and most importantly, our teams have hung together and continue to deliver high quality professional services to our clients. Gallagher has a deep and undying culture that served us well in tough times and positions us well for the future."
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
During fourth quarter 2006, significant progress was made in reducing Financial Services' assets and related financial commitments as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment - IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Investments
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment - IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Investments (continued)
 
 
 
 
Effective Tax Rate
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, January 31, 2007 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 120 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2006 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2006 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20070131122429.txt.gz
TIME:20070131122429
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On January 25, 2007, AJG Capital, Inc. (the Seller), an Illinois corporation and a 90% owned subsidiary of AJG Financial Services, Inc. (Gallagher), entered into a Share Purchase Agreement with Aviacargo 27125/27347, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and Erste Finance Malta Limited Partnership, a Maltese limited liability company, (collectively the Buyers) under which the Seller agreed to sell its 100% ownership in Aviacargo Leasing Limited (Aviacargo) to the Buyers. Aviacargo is an airplane leasing company that leases two cargo airplanes to the French Postal Service. The transaction closed on January 25, 2007.
Under the Share Purchase Agreement, the total purchase price paid by the Buyers for Aviacargo was $0.7 million, which resulted in an after tax loss to Gallagher of approximately $5.0 million that was recorded in fourth quarter 2006 in the Financial Services Segment. As part of the transaction, $27.5 million of net fixed assets and $27.9 million of debt were transferred to the Buyers. A copy of the Share Purchase Agreement is attached to this report as Exhibit 10.42 and is incorporated herein by reference as though it were fully set forth herein. The description above is a summary of the Share Purchase Agreement and is qualified in its entirety by the complete text of the agreement itself.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Index
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 10.42
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SHARE PURCHASE AGREEMENT, dated as of January 25, 2007 (as from time to time amended, modified or supplemented, this ""), by and between AJG CAPITAL, INC., an Illinois corporation (""), AVIACARGO 27125/27347, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), and ERSTE FINANCE MALTA LIMITED, a Maltese limited liability company ("") (each of Automatic and EFM, a "", and, collectively, the "").
Agreement
Transferor
Automatic
EFM
Transferee
Transferees
WHEREAS, Transferor owns two ordinary shares, with par value 1 euro per share, of Aviacargo Leasing Limited, an Irish company limited by shares (the ""), constituting all issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company (each such individual share, a "", and, collectively, the "");
Company
Share
Shares
WHEREAS, Transferor desires to sell to each Transferee, and each Transferee desires to purchase from Transferor, one Share on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements set forth in this Agreement, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
Section 1. Definitions
1.1 .
Definitions
"" in respect of each Aircraft, has the meaning set forth in the applicable Lease.
Acceptance Certificate
"" means any action, suit, proceeding, arbitration or Governmental or Regulatory Authority investigation or audit.
Actions or Proceedings
"" means Erste Bank der oesterreichischen Sparkassen AG, London Branch, solely in its capacity as administrative agent.
Administrative Agent
"" means either or both, as the context may require, of the Boeing 737-3H6F aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27125, and the Boeing 737-3H6F aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27347, each with associated Engines, or any replacement engine and associated documentation, all as more fully described in the respective Lease.
Aircraft
"" means either or both, as the context may require, of the Boeing model 737-3H6F aircraft (excluding Engines or engines from time to time installed thereon) with
Airframe
manufacturer's serial number 27125 and registration mark F-GIXR and any and all related parts, and the Boeing model 737-3H6F aircraft (excluding Engines or engines from time to time installed thereon) with manufacturer's serial number 27347 and registration mark F-GIXS and any and all related parts.
"" of any Person means all assets and properties of every kind, nature, character and description (whether real, personal or mixed, whether tangible or intangible, whether absolute, accrued, contingent, fixed or otherwise and wherever situated), including the goodwill related thereto, operated, owned or leased by such Person, including without limitation cash, cash equivalents, Investment Assets, accounts and notes receivable, chattel paper, documents, instruments, general intangibles, real estate, equipment, inventory, goods and Intellectual Property.
Assets and Properties
"" means the Financial Statements for the most recent fiscal year of the Company delivered to Purchaser pursuant to Section 5.1.13.
Audited Financial Statements
"" means the last day of the most recent fiscal year of the Company for which Financial Statements are delivered to the Transferees pursuant to Section 5.1.13.
Audited Financial Statement Date
"" means all files, documents, instruments, papers, books and records relating to the Business or Condition of the Company, including without limitation financial statements, Tax Returns and related work papers and letters from accountants, budgets, pricing guidelines, ledgers, journals, deeds, title policies, minute books, share certificates and statutory books and registers, Contracts, Licenses, customer lists, computer files and programs, retrieval programs, operating data and plans and environmental studies and plans.
Books and Records
"" means the business, condition (financial or otherwise), results of operations, Assets and Properties and prospects of the Company taken as a whole.
Business or Condition of the Company
"" means a day other than Saturday, Sunday or any day on which banks located in Illinois, Florida, London or Malta are authorized or obligated to close.
Business Day
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 2.2.
Closing
"" means the date on which the Closing occurs.
Closing Date
"" means any agreement, lease, license, evidence of Indebtedness, mortgage, indenture, security agreement or other contract (whether written or oral).
Contract
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 3.
Deposit
"" means the Direction Generale de l'Aviation Civile, the French civil aviation authority.
DGAC
"" means the Loan Agreement, dated April 7, 2000, between Company, as borrower, the banks and financial institutions named therein as Banks, and Dresdner Kleinwort Wasserstein Limited, as agent, as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Dresdner Loan Agreement
 
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in the Leases.
Encumbrance
"" means each of the two (2) CFM International, Inc. model CFM56-3C1 engines, bearing, with respect to the Aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27125, engine manufacturer's serial numbers 856468 and 856470, and, with respect to the Aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27347, engine manufacturer's serial numbers 857685 and 857686 whether or not from time to time installed on the applicable Airframe or any other airframe.
Engine
"" means the Loan Agreement [27125 and 27347] dated as of the date hereof between the Company, as borrower, the lenders listed therein, and the Administrative Agent.
Erste Bank Loan Facility
"" means the loans made pursuant to the Dresdner Loan Agreement.
Existing Financing
"" means the financial statements of the Company delivered to the Transferees pursuant to Section 5.1.13.
Financial Statements
"" means the election made by the Transferor on March 10, 2003 to treat the Company (a "foreign eligible entity," as that term is used in United States Treasury Regulations section 301.7701-3) as an entity disregarded from its owner for United States federal tax purposes, effective beginning January 1, 2003.
Form 8832 Election
"" means Irish generally accepted accounting principles, consistently applied throughout the specified period and in the immediately prior comparable period.
GAAP
"" means any court, tribunal, arbitrator, authority, agency, commission, official or other instrumentality of Ireland, the United States, any foreign country or any domestic or foreign state, county, city or other political subdivision.
Governmental or Regulatory Authority
"" of any Person means all obligations of such Person (i) for borrowed money, (ii) evidenced by notes, bonds, debentures or similar instruments, (iii) for the deferred purchase price of goods or services (other than trade payables or accruals incurred in the ordinary course of business), (iv) under capital leases and (v) in the nature of guarantees of the obligations described in clauses (i) through (iv) above of any other Person.
Indebtedness
"" means all patents and patent rights, trademarks and trademark rights, trade names and trade name rights, service marks and service mark rights, service names and service name rights, brand names, inventions, processes, formulae, copyrights and copyright rights, trade dress, business and product names, logos, slogans, trade secrets, industrial models, processes, designs, methodologies, computer programs (including all source codes) and related documentation, technical information, manufacturing, engineering and technical drawings, know-how and all pending applications for and registrations of patents, trademarks, service marks and copyrights.
Intellectual Property
 
"" means all debentures, notes and other evidences of Indebtedness, stocks, securities (including rights to purchase and securities convertible into or exchangeable for other securities), interests in joint ventures and general and limited partnerships, mortgage loans and other investment or portfolio assets owned of record or beneficially by the Company and issued by any Person other than the Company (other than trade receivables generated in the ordinary course of business of the Company).
Investment Assets
"" or "" means the knowledge of any officer, director or employee of Transferor or the Company.
Knowledge of Transferor
Known to Transferor
"" means all laws, statutes, rules, regulations, ordinances and other pronouncements having the effect of law of Ireland, the United States, any foreign country or any domestic or foreign state, county, city or other political subdivision or of any Governmental or Regulatory Authority.
Laws
"" means that certain Aircraft Lease Agreement dated April 6, 2000, as amended and restated on December 21, 2005, in respect of the Aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27125 and that certain Aircraft Lease Agreement dated April 6, 2000, as amended and restated on December 21, 2005, in respect of the Aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27347, each between the Company, as lessor, and the Lessee, each as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Leases
"" means Europe Airpost S.A., a French socit anonyme.
Lessee
"" means the Lessee Consent (with respect to the Aircraft with manufacturer's serial number 27125) and Lessee Consent (with respect to the Aircraft with manufacturer's serial number 27347), each dated as of the Closing Date, by and between the Company, the Administrative Agent, and consented to by Lessee, substantially in the form attached as Exhibit A to this Agreement.
Lessee Consents
"" means all Indebtedness, obligations and other liabilities of a Person (whether absolute, accrued, contingent, fixed or otherwise, or whether due or to become due).
Liabilities
"" means all licenses, permits, certificates of authority, authorizations, approvals, registrations, franchises and similar consents granted or issued by any Governmental or Regulatory Authority.
Licenses
"" means any mortgage, pledge, assessment, security interest, lease, lien, adverse claim, levy, charge or other encumbrance of any kind, or any conditional sale Contract, title retention Contract or other Contract to give any of the foregoing.
Liens
"" and "" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 10.1 hereof.
Loss
Losses
"" with respect to any Person means any security, right, subscription, warrant, option, "phantom" stock right or other Contract that gives the right to (i) purchase or otherwise receive or be issued any shares of capital stock of such Person or any security of any kind convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for any shares of capital stock of such Person or (ii) receive or exercise any benefits or rights similar to any rights enjoyed by or accruing to the
Option
 
holder of shares of capital stock of such Person, including any rights to participate in the equity or income of such Person or to participate in or direct the election of any directors or officers of such Person or the manner in which any shares of capital stock of such Person are voted.
"" means any writ, judgment, decree, injunction or similar order of any Governmental or Regulatory Authority (in each such case whether preliminary or final).
Order
"" means any Lien created by the entering into of the Relevant Documents.
Permitted Lien
"" means any individual, corporation, body corporate, limited company, limited liability company, trust, partnership (general or limited), unincorporated association, joint venture, association, joint-stock company, government or government entity.
Person
"" means $675,000.
Purchase Amount
"" has the meaning ascribed thereto in Section 5.1.10.
Relevant Documents
"" has the same meaning as in the Tax Deed.
Revenue Authority
"" means this Agreement, the Transferor Parent Guarantee, the Share Transfer Form, Tax Deed, and any other agreements, documents, certificates and instruments executed and delivered in connection therewith.
Sale Documents
"" means the election made pursuant to Section 338 on Internal Revenue Service ("IRS") Form 8023 to treat the purchase of the shares of Aviacargo Leasing Limited as the purchase of Aviacargo Leasing Limited's assets, effective with the tax year ending December 31, 2002.
Section 338 Election
"" has the meaning ascribed to it in the forepart of this Agreement.
Shares
"" means the share/stock transfer forms, each dated as of the date hereof, between the Transferor and each of the Transferees.
Share Transfer Form
"" means the loan agreement dated April 12, 2002 and amended December 21, 2005 between Transferor and the Company.
Subordinated Loan Agreement
has the same meaning as in the Tax Deed.
"Tax", "Taxes" or "Taxation"
"" means the deed of tax covenant entered into between the Transferor and the Transferees on Closing.
Tax Deed
"" means any return, declaration, report, claim for refund, or information return or statement relating to Taxes, including any schedule or attachment thereto, and including any amendment thereof, including, where permitted or required, combined or consolidated returns for any group of entities that include the Company.
Tax Return
"" means those warranties and representations contained in Section 5.2.
Tax Warranties
 
"" means the Taxes Consolidation Act 1997.
TCA
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 7.
Transfer Taxes
"" means, with respect to each Transferee, such Transferee and its affiliates, officers, directors, agents, partners, members and employees.
Transferee Indemnitees
"" means the Transferor and its affiliates, officers, directors, agents, partners, members and employees.
Transferor Indemnitees
"" means AJG Financial Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Transferor Parent
"" means that certain Guarantee Agreement made as of the date hereof by the Transferor Parent in favor of the Transferees.
Transferor Parent Guarantee
"" means value added tax.
VAT
1.2 . Unless the context of this Agreement otherwise requires, (i) words of any gender include each other gender; (ii) words using the singular or plural number also include the plural or singular number, respectively; (iii) the terms "hereof," "herein," "hereby" and derivative or similar words refer to this entire Agreement; (iv) the terms "Article", "Section", "Schedule" and "Exhibit" refer to the specified Article, Section, Schedule or Exhibit of or to this Agreement; (v) the phrase "ordinary course of business" refers to the business of the Company, and (vi) whenever the words "include," "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation." Whenever this Agreement refers to a number of days, such number shall refer to calendar days unless Business Days are specified. All accounting terms used herein and not expressly defined herein shall have the meanings given to them under GAAP. Other capitalized terms used herein and not expressly defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed thereto in the Leases.
Construction of Certain Terms and Phrases
Section 2. Sale of Shares and Closing
2.1 . Transferor agrees to sell to each Transferee, and each Transferee agrees to purchase from Transferor, all of the right, title and interest of Transferor in and to one Share at the Closing on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement.
Sale and Purchase
2.2 . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the transaction contemplated by Section 2.1 shall occur (the "") on or about January , 2007 or such other date, if any, as may be agreed to by the parties hereto. If the Closing has not occurred on or prior to January 31, 2007, or as otherwise extended in writing as may be agreed to by the parties hereto, then, if no party hereto is in default of its obligations hereunder or under any of the Sale Documents, no party hereto shall have any further obligations hereunder or under any other Sale Documents and the Deposit shall be immediately returned to the Transferees.
Closing
Closing
    
2.3 . At any time or from time to time after the Closing, Transferor shall execute and deliver to each Transferee a duly completed
Further Assurances; Post-Closing Cooperation
 
and executed Share Transfer Form and such other documents and instruments, provide such materials and information and take such other actions as such Transferee may reasonably request more effectively to vest title to the respective Share in such Transferee and, to the full extent permitted by Law, to put such Transferee in actual possession and operating control of the Company and its Assets and Properties and Books and Records, and otherwise to cause Transferor to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to which it is a party.
Section 3. Purchase Amount
On the Closing Date, subject to the satisfaction of all conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.1, the Transferees shall pay to Transferor an aggregate amount equal to the Purchase Amount (minus the Deposit). Payment of the Purchase Amount to Transferor shall be made in immediately available funds by wire transfer to:
 
or to such other account as Transferor may specify to Transferees on or prior to the Closing Date.
On November 6, 2006, Transferees deposited an amount of $200,000 with the Transferor as a deposit with respect to the Shares to be purchased hereunder (the ""). Upon the sale of the Shares to Transferees hereunder on the Closing Date, the Deposit shall be applied by the Transferees to the payment of the Purchase Amount for such Shares. The Deposit shall be non-refundable unless any of the conditions precedent to Transferees' obligations in respect of the purchase of the Shares set forth herein are not satisfied or unless otherwise provided herein.
Deposit
Section 4. Conditions Precedent
4.1 . Transferees' obligation to purchase the Shares and pay the Purchase Amount on the Closing Date is subject to the satisfaction of all of the following conditions on or prior to the Closing Date:
Conditions Precedent to the Purchase
4.1.1 . Each Transferee shall have received (i) the fully executed Lessee Consents, dated as of the Closing Date; (ii) copies of bills of sale evidencing the Company's title to the Aircraft; (iii) the fully executed Transferor Parent Guarantee, dated as of the Closing Date; (iv) the fully executed Tax Deed; and (v) the Acceptance Certificate for each of the Aircraft.
Agreements
4.1.2 [Reserved]
4.1.3 . All representations and warranties of Transferor contained in this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on the Closing Date.
Representations and Warranties True
 
4.1.4 . Each Transferee shall have completed an inspection of the Aircraft (including the records of the Aircraft), which shall have been satisfactory to such Transferee in its sole and absolute discretion. On the Closing Date the Aircraft shall be, and such Transferee shall be satisfied that the Aircraft is, in the same condition as when such Transferee shall have completed the inspection on November 2, 2006 and found the condition of the Aircraft satisfactory.
Inspection
4.1.5 . No event of default, or any event which with notice and/or the passage of time could become an event of default (including a Total Loss or Termination Event (each as defined in the respective Lease), or any event which with notice and/or the passage of time could become an Termination Event (as defined in the respective Lease)), shall have occurred and be continuing with respect to the Relevant Documents.
No Event of Default
4.1.6 . Each Transferee shall have received an insurance broker's letter in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Transferee confirming that all insurance required to be maintained pursuant to Article 16 of the Leases (as amended pursuant to the respective Lessee Consents) is in full force and effect and shall name such Transferee and its directors, officers, employees, shareholders, affiliates and servants and such Transferee's lenders and financiers as additional insureds with respect to the Aircraft.
Insurance
4.1.7 . Each Transferee shall have received a certificate dated the Closing Date and executed by the Secretary or any Assistant Secretary of the Transferor certifying attachment of true, correct and complete copies of each of the following: (a) Articles of Incorporation of Transferor, as amended, certified by the Secretary of State of the State of Illinois, (b) Articles of Incorporation of Transferor Parent, as amended, certified by the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, (c) a Certificate of Good Standing of Transferor, dated as of a recent date and issued by the Secretary of State of the State of Illinois, (d) a Certificate of Good Standing of Transferor Parent, dated as of a recent date and issued by the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware, (e) copies of the resolution(s) or consent(s) of each of Transferor and Transferor Parent authorizing the execution, delivery and performance of the Sale Documents to which it is a party and (f) certified incumbency certificates from each of the Transferor and Transferor Parent identifying by name, title and specimen signature the Persons authorized to execute and deliver the Sale Documents to which it is a party.
Evidence of Authority
4.1.8 . Each Transferee shall have received the following legal opinions, each dated the Closing Date and in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Transferee:
Opinions of Counsel
 
 
 
4.1.9 . On the Closing Date, no legal or governmental action, suit or proceeding shall have been instituted or threatened before any court, administrative
No Proceedings
 
agency or tribunal nor shall any order, judgment or decree have been issued or proposed to be issued by any court, administrative agency or tribunal, in either case, to set aside, restrain, enjoin or prevent the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby.
4.1.10 . On the Closing Date, the performance of the transactions contemplated hereby, upon the terms and conditions set forth herein, shall not, in the reasonable judgment of each Transferee (after consultation with outside counsel), violate, and shall not subject such Transferee to any penalty or liability under, any Law, rule or regulation binding upon such Transferee.
Illegality
4.1.11 . Transferor shall have performed and complied with, in all material respects, each agreement, covenant and obligation required by this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to be so performed or complied with by Transferor at or before the Closing.
Performance
4.1.12 . Transferor shall have duly taken such action as is reasonably required to be taken by it with respect to the transfer, sale and assignment of the Shares in accordance with the provisions of the Relevant Documents, and shall otherwise have satisfied or be in material compliance with all conditions or requirements under such Relevant Documents applicable to the transfer of the Shares.
Compliance with Relevant Documents
4.1.13 . The Existing Financing shall have been refinanced pursuant to the Erste Bank Loan Facility on the Closing Date.
Existing Financing
4.1.14 . Each Transferee shall have completed a review of the Leases and other Relevant Documents, which shall have been satisfactory to such Transferee in its sole and absolute discretion.
Review of Relevant Documents
4.1.15 . Transferor shall have delivered to each Transferee a certificate, dated the Closing Date and executed in the name and on behalf of Transferor by the Chairman of the Board, the President or any Executive or Senior Vice President of Transferor, confirming compliance with the conditions set forth in Section 4.1.3.
Officers' Certificates
4.1.16 . All consents (or in lieu thereof waivers) to the performance by each Transferee and Transferor of their respective obligations under this Agreement and the other Sale Documents or to the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby as are required under any Contract to which such Transferee, Transferor, Transferor Parent, or the Company is a party or by which any of their respective Assets and Properties are bound (a) shall have been obtained, (b) shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Transferee, (c) shall not be subject to the satisfaction of any condition that has not been satisfied or waived and (d) shall be in full force and effect, except where the failure to obtain any such consent (or in lieu thereof waiver) could not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate with other such failures, to materially adversely affect such Transferee or the Business or Condition of the Company or otherwise result in a material diminution of the benefits of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to such Transferee.
Third Party Consents
 
4.1.17 . Transferor shall have delivered to each Transferee such other documents, certificates and opinions as such Transferee may reasonably request.
Other Documents
4.2 . Transferor's obligation to sell the Shares on the Closing Date is subject to the satisfaction of all of the following conditions on or prior to the Closing Date:
Conditions Precedent to the Sale
4.2.1 . Transferor shall have received the Purchase Amount in accordance with Section 3 hereof.
Purchase Amount
4.2.2 . All representations and warranties of Transferees contained in Section 5.2 shall be true and correct on the Closing Date.
Representations and Warranties
4.2.3 . Transferor shall have received (1) certified documentation evidencing the due authorization by all necessary action of the execution, delivery and performance by each Transferee of this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to which it is a party, and (2) a certified incumbency certificate from each Transferee identifying by name, title, and specimen signature, the Persons authorized to execute and deliver the Sale Documents to which it is a party.
Evidence of Authority
4.2.4 . Each Transferee shall have complied with all requirements of such Transferee applicable with respect to the transfer of the Shares set forth in the Relevant Documents.
Compliance with Transfer Requirements
4.2.5 . On the Closing Date, the performance of the transactions contemplated hereby, upon the terms and conditions set forth herein, shall not, in the reasonable judgment of Transferor (after consultation with outside counsel), violate, and shall not subject Transferor to any penalty or liability under, any Law, rule or regulation binding upon Transferor.
Illegality
4.2.6 . On the Closing Date, no legal or governmental action, suit or proceeding shall have been instituted or threatened before any court, administrative agency or tribunal nor shall any order, judgment or decree have been issued or proposed to be issued by any court, administrative agency or tribunal, in either case, to set aside, restrain, enjoin or prevent the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby.
No Proceedings
Section 5. Representations and Warranties
5.1 . In order to induce each Transferee to enter into this Agreement and to have the Transferees pay the Purchase Amount, Transferor hereby makes, as of the date hereof and as of the Closing Date, the following representations and warranties to each Transferee, each of which representations and warranties shall survive the Closing without limitation.
Representations and Warranties of Transferor
5.1.1 . Transferor is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Illinois and has requisite corporate power and authority to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and all other Sale Documents executed by it in connection herewith.
Organization, Power, Etc
 
5.1.2 . The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to be executed by Transferor and the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby relating to Transferor have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action of Transferor, and no other corporate action on the part of the Transferor is necessary. This Agreement and each other Sale Document to which Transferor is a party have been duly executed and delivered by Transferor, and, upon due authorization, execution and delivery by the other parties hereto and thereto, this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to which Transferor is a party shall be the legal, valid and binding obligations of Transferor enforceable against Transferor in accordance with their respective terms, except as may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar Laws affecting creditors' rights generally or by equitable principles.
Authorization and Binding Effect
5.1.3 . There are no Actions or Proceedings pending or, to the Knowledge of Transferor, threatened against, relating to or affecting Transferor, the Company or any of their respective Assets and Properties.
Litigation
5.1.4 . Neither the execution and delivery by Transferor of this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to which Transferor is a party, nor the performance by Transferor of its obligations hereunder and thereunder, (1) requires the consent or approval of, the giving of notice to, the registration or filing with or the taking of any action in respect of, any federal or state governmental authority on the part of Transferor except such as have been duly obtained, given, made or taken, and except routine reporting or regulatory requirements with governmental authorities which do not affect the validity, legality or enforceability of the transactions contemplated hereby, provided that no representation is made with respect to any consent, approval or registration, or action, under any Law of any jurisdiction relating to the Aircraft or the ownership, use or operation thereof, or (2) violates any Law, rule or regulation binding on Transferor, or any order, writ, injunction or decree of any court or governmental agency or instrumentality binding on Transferor, or (3) contravenes Transferor's corporate charter documents, or (4) will result in any material breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any material agreement, document or instrument to which Transferor is a party or by which it is bound, or result in an Encumbrance on the Aircraft or Liens on the Shares.
No Consent; No Violation
5.1.5 . Transferor has not received, and to the Knowledge of Transferor, there has been no written (including via electronic communication) claim, dispute or notice thereof arising under or relating to the Leases or any other Relevant Document between the Lessee and the Company relating to any financial obligations of the Lessee under the Relevant Documents.
Lessee Disputes
5.1.6 . Transferor is the sole owner of the Shares. The Shares are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid, non-assessable and were not issued to Transferor in violation of any purchase or call option, right of refusal, subscription right, preemptive right or any other similar rights. There are no outstanding Options with respect to the Company. Transferor owns the Shares, beneficially and of record, free and clear of all Liens, and upon execution and delivery of the Sale Documents by Transferor, such title to the Shares shall be transferred to Transferees free and clear of all Liens. The Company has good and marketable title to each of the Aircraft free and clear of all Liens other than Permitted Liens.
Title
 
5.1.7 . The Company is, as of the Closing Date, and has been since May 23, 2002, a special purpose vehicle created for the sole purpose of owning the Aircraft and carrying out the transactions contemplated by the Leases and financing the Aircraft (pursuant to the Existing Financing).
Transaction
5.1.8 . To the Knowledge of Transferor, there has been no event that would constitute an event of default, or any event which with notice and/or the passage of time could become an event of default (including a Total Loss or Termination Event (each as defined in the respective Lease), or any event which with notice and/or the passage of time could become an Termination Event (as defined in the respective Lease), and Transferor has received no written notice of termination or default under any Relevant Document.
Termination Event
5.1.9 . To the Knowledge of Transferor, there has been no Total Loss or an event that, with the lapse of time or the making of a determination, might become a Total Loss and Transferor has received no written (including via electronic communication) notice of any accident or physical damage to any Airframe or to any Engine occurring between the time of the last inspection of the Aircraft by a Transferee on November 2, 2006 and the Closing Date.
Total Loss
5.1.10 . Set forth in to this Agreement is a complete list of all Contracts or other arrangements to which the Company is a party or by which any of its Assets and Properties is bound (such documents listed on hereto, collectively, the "").
Relevant Documents
Schedule 5.1.10
Schedule 5.1.10
Relevant Documents
5.1.11 . No Rent that is payable under any Lease or any other Relevant Document on any date subsequent to the Closing Date has been prepaid (other than the Rent payment made on December 13, 2006), has been waived, has been compromised or has been forgiven.
Prepaid Rent
5.1.12 . All fees and expenses of the Company pursuant to or in any way related to the Assets and Properties of the Company or any Lease due and owing on or prior to the Closing Date have been fully paid by Lessee or Transferor through and including the Closing Date.
Company Fees
5.1.13 . Prior to the execution of this Agreement, Transferor has delivered to each Transferee true and complete copies of the following financial statements:
Financial Statements
(a) the audited balance sheets of the Company as of December 31, 2005, and the related audited statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flows for such fiscal year then ended, together with a true and correct copy of the report on such audited information by Ernst & Young; and
(b) the unaudited balance sheets of the Company as of October 31, 2006, and the related unaudited statements of operations and stockholders' equity for the portion of the fiscal year then ended.
Except as set forth in the notes thereto and as disclosed in , all such financial statements (i) were prepared in accordance with GAAP, (ii) fairly present the financial condition and results of operations of the Company as of the respective dates thereof and for the respective periods covered thereby, and (iii) were compiled from the Books and Records of the
Schedule 5.1.13
 
Company regularly maintained by management of the Company (or Transferor on behalf of the Company), and used to prepare the financial statements of the Company in accordance with the principles stated therein. The Company (or Transferor on behalf of the Company) has maintained its respective Books and Records in a manner sufficient to permit the preparation of financial statements in accordance with GAAP.
5.1.14 . Except for the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the transactions to take place pursuant hereto on or prior to the Closing Date, since the Audited Financial Statement Date the Company has conducted its business in the ordinary course of business and there has not been any material adverse change, or any event or development which, individually or together with other such events, could reasonably be expected to result in a material adverse change, in the Business or Condition of the Company.
Absence of Changes
5.1.15 . Except as reflected or reserved against in the balance sheet included in the Audited Financial Statements or in the notes thereto or as disclosed in or any other Schedule hereto, there are no Liabilities against, relating to or affecting the Company or any of their respective Assets and Properties.
No Undisclosed Liabilities
Schedule 5.1.15
5.1.16 . contains a true and complete list of all Licenses used in and material, individually or in the aggregate, to the business or operations of the Company (and all pending applications for any such Licenses), setting forth the grantor, the grantee, the function and the expiration and renewal date of each. Prior to the execution of this Agreement, Transferor has delivered to each Transferee true and complete copies of all such Licenses. Except as disclosed in :
Licenses
Schedule 5.1.16
Schedule 5.1.16
 
 
 
5.1.17 . Since its inception, at no time did the Company ever have any employees.
Employees
5.1.18 . The Company has no (a) bank account or safe deposit box at any bank, trust company, securities broker or other financial institution or (b) Investment Assets.
Bank and Brokerage Accounts; Investment Assets
5.1.19 . Except as set forth in , the Company does not have any powers of attorney or comparable delegations of authority outstanding.
No Powers of Attorney
Schedule 5.1.19
 
5.1.20 . No original copy of either Lease has been designated the "chattel paper original" and neither the Transferor nor the Company is in possession of an original copy of either Lease.
Lease Chattel Paper
5.1.21 . All Indebtedness of the Company in respect of the Subordinated Loan Agreement shall have been forgiven by the Transferor.
Subordinated Loan
5.1.22 . All material facts relating to the Business or Condition of the Company have been disclosed to Transferee in or in connection with this Agreement. No representation or warranty contained in this Agreement and the other Sale Documents, and no statement contained in the Schedules hereto or in any certificate, list or other writing furnished to Transferee pursuant to any provision of this Agreement and the other Sale Documents (including without limitation the Financial Statements), contains any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements herein or therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Disclosure
5.2 .
Taxes
(a) The Company has no liability in respect of Tax (actual or contingent) that is not fully provided for in the Audited Financial Statements.
(b) Since the Audited Financial Statements Date:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) The Company is resident in Ireland for Tax purposes and has not been at any time resident in any jurisdiction other than or in addition to Ireland for Tax purposes, and has never carried on any trade in any other country (whether through a branch, agency, permanent establishment or otherwise) and has not at any time paid Tax on income, profits or gains to any Tax, revenue or fiscal authority in any other country except Ireland
(d) With the exception of the Irish corporation tax returns for the tax years ended December 31, 2002 and December 31, 2003, the Company has filed, within the time prescribed by Law, all Tax Returns required to be filed by applicable Law prior to the date hereof. All Tax Returns were (and, as to Tax Returns not filed as of the date hereof, will be) true, complete and correct and filed on a timely basis. The Company (i) has paid all Taxes that are due, or claimed or asserted by any taxing authority to be due, from the Company for the periods covered by the Tax Returns.
(e) The Company has duly and properly submitted all claims, elections, amendments to claims, withdrawals of claims and disclaimers which have been assumed to have been made for the purposes of the Audited Financial Statements with the exception of elections pursuant to Section 452 TCA. All outstanding Section 452 elections have been submitted at the date of this Agreement.
(f) The Company has sufficient and proper records relating to past events, including any claims or elections made to calculate the tax liability or relief which would arise on any
 
disposal or on the realization of any asset owned by the Company at the Audited Financial Statements Date or acquired by the Company since the Audited Financial Statements Date but before Completion.
(g) The Company is not required to file any tax return in a jurisdiction other than Ireland. No Revenue Authority outside of Ireland has asserted that the Company is required to file a Tax Return in such jurisdiction.
(h) There are no Tax Liens upon the Assets and Properties of the Company except Liens for Taxes not yet due.
(i) The Company has complied (and until the Closing Date will comply) with all applicable Laws, rules, and regulations relating to the payment and withholding of Taxes (including withholding and reporting requirements in respect of any amounts payable pursuant to the Dresdner Loan Agreement, the Subordinated Loan Agreement and the Leases and has, within the time and in the manner prescribed by Law, paid over to the proper governmental authorities all amounts withheld.
(j) The Company has not requested (and no request has been made on its behalf) any extension of time within which to file any Tax Return. The Company has not executed any outstanding waivers or comparable consents regarding the application of the statute of limitations for any Taxes or Tax Returns (and no extensions have been executed on their behalf). In the five years prior to the Closing Date no deficiency for any Taxes has been suggested, proposed, asserted or assessed against the Company that has not been resolved and paid in full.
(k) No assessments, audits or other administrative proceedings or court proceedings are presently pending or to the knowledge of Transferor threatened with regard to any Taxes or Tax Returns of the Company.
(l) No power of attorney or similar delegation currently in force has been granted by the Company concerning any Tax matter.
(m) The Company has not received any written ruling or concession of a Revenue Authority relating to Taxes, or any other written and legally binding agreement with a Revenue Authority relating to Taxes.
(n) Transferor has made available (or, in the case of Tax Returns to be filed on or before the Closing Date, will make available) to each Transferee complete and accurate copies of all Tax Returns and associated work papers filed by or on behalf of the Company for all taxable years ending on or prior to the Closing Date.
(o) The Company does not now have and did not formerly have any employees or subsidiaries or other entities in which it held any interests.
(p) Consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Sale Documents will not cause the Company to become subject to any Taxes.
 
(q) Transferor has at all times on and after May 23, 2002 owned all of the outstanding ownership interests in the Company and the Company has at all times been an Irish company limited by shares.
(r) The Company has never been the obligor under any instruments for borrowed money other than the Dresdner Loan Agreement and the Subordinated Loan Agreement.
(s) Neither Transferor nor the Company have filed any elections regarding the United States federal income tax character or treatment of the Company or the activities of the Company apart from the Section 338 Election and the Form 8832 Election.
(t) For Irish corporate tax purposes, immediately following the Closing the tax written down value of the Aircraft of the Company is not less than USD$5,833,750 in the aggregate.
(u) As of December 31, 2005, the Company had a Case I trading loss forward for Irish corporate tax purposes available to offset against future trading income is USD$31,860,959.
(v) No asset has been disposed of by the Company to a Connected Person of the Company otherwise than at arms' length.
(w) The Company is registered for the purposes of VATA 1972 and has made, given, obtained and kept complete, correct and up-to-date returns (other than Irish VAT returns with due dates March 19, 2004, January 19, 2004, November 19, 2003 and September 19, 2003, which were filed after the due date), records, invoices and other documents appropriate or required for VAT purposes and is not in arrears with any payments or returns due and has not been required by the Revenue Commissioners or any other fiscal authority to give security or further security under Section 23A VATA 1972.
(x) The Company has never been treated as a member of a VAT group under either Section 8(8) VATA 1972 and no application has at any time been made for the Company to be treated as a member of a VAT group.
(y) All customs duties, excise duties, common agricultural policy charges, value added tax and other taxes, duties, charges or levies payable to the Revenue Commissioners (or the customs and excise service) upon the importation of goods and assets imported, owned or used by the Company have been properly accounted for and recorded or have been paid in full.
(z) Every document in the possession of or under the control of the Company or which affords any right or rights to the Company has been duly and properly stamped and the Company has no outstanding liability for stamp duty, or capital duty or interest or penalties relating to same.
(aa) The Company has not been involved in any transaction involving any instrument in relation to which a claim for exemption from stamp duty or capital duty was made in accordance with either Sections 79, 80 and 119 of the Stamp Duties Consolidation Act 1999.
 
(ab) Since February 24, 2000, the Company has not acquired from any other company (whether another group member or otherwise) any asset in circumstances where the companies were, at the time of the acquisition, members of the same group of companies for Tax purposes.
(ac) Since February 24, 2000, the Company has not been involved in any transaction falling within the provisions of Sections 621 and 622 TCA or Part 21 TCA.
(ad) In respect of all dividends paid, the Company has fully and correctly complied with the provisions of Chapter 8A of Part 6 TCA and has deducted and accounted for all appropriate dividend withholding Tax and has no outstanding liability in respect of dividend withholding Tax.
(ae) In respect of all dividends paid by the Company which were exempt from dividend withholding Tax, the Company has received an appropriate declaration in the form prescribed in TCA from the recipients of such dividends, evidencing that dividend withholding Tax was not payable.
(af) The Company has not been involved in any Tax avoidance transaction within the meaning of Section 811 TCA.
(ag) The Company has not committed any act nor made any omission which might constitute an offence under Section 1078 TCA (aiding, abetting, assisting etc taxation evasion) or any other similar provision.
(ah) The Company obtained a VAT 60B authorization in respect of services supplied to Europe Airpost S.A. valid until July 21, 2008, and has provided a true, correct, and complete copy of such certificate to Transferees.
5.3 . In order to induce Transferor to enter into this Agreement and to sell and assign the Shares, each Transferee hereby makes, as of the date hereof and as of the Closing Date, the following representations and warranties to Transferor.
Representations and Warranties of Transferees
5.3.1 . Transferee is a limited liability company duly organized and validly existing and in good standing under the Laws of its jurisdiction of organization and has requisite corporate power and authority to enter into and perform its obligations under this Agreement and all other Sale Documents executed by it in connection herewith.
Organization, Power, Etc
5.3.2 . The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Sale Documents to be executed by Transferee and the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby relating to Transferee have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action of Transferee. This Agreement and each other Sale Document to which Transferee is a party have been duly executed and delivered by Transferee, and, upon due authorization, execution and delivery by the other parties hereto and thereto, this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to which Transferee is a party shall be the legal, valid and binding obligations of Transferee enforceable against Transferee in accordance with their respective terms, except as may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar Laws affecting creditors' rights generally or by equitable principles.
Authorization and Binding Effect
 
5.3.3 . There is no action, suit, proceeding or claim pending or, to the knowledge of Transferee, threatened against Transferee, nor is there any investigation by any governmental agency pending or, to the knowledge of Transferee, threatened, in each case, with respect to the Shares, the Aircraft, the Leases, this Agreement or any other Sale Document to which it is a party, which, if adversely determined, would have a material adverse effect on the ability of Transferee to perform its obligations under this Agreement or any other Sale Document to which it is a party.
Litigation
5.3.4 . Neither the execution and delivery by Transferee of this Agreement and the other Sale Documents to which Transferee is a party, nor the performance by Transferee of its obligations hereunder, (1) requires the consent or approval of, the giving of notice to, the registration or filing with or the taking of any action in respect of, any federal or state governmental authority on the part of Transferee except such as have been duly obtained, given, made or taken, and except routine reporting or regulatory requirements with governmental authorities which do not affect the validity, legality or enforceability of the transactions contemplated hereby, provided that no representation is made with respect to any consent, approval or registration, or action, under any Law of any jurisdiction relating to the Aircraft or the ownership, use or operation thereof, or (2) violates any Law, rule or regulation binding on Transferee, or any order, writ, injunction or decree of any court or governmental agency or instrumentality binding on Transferee, or (3) contravenes Transferee's organizational documents, or (4) will result in any material breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, any material agreement, document or instrument to which Transferee is a party or by which it is bound.
No Consent; No Violation
5.3.5 . Transferee has complied with and satisfies all requirements of an assignee or transferee of the Shares contained in the Relevant Documents to permit Transferor to transfer the Shares to Transferee.
Compliance
Section 6. Further Representations, Warranties and Covenants
6.1 . Transferor has made or will make available to each Transferee at the offices of the Company all of the Books and Records, and if at any time after the Closing Transferor discovers in its possession or under its control any other Books and Records, it will forthwith deliver such Books and Records to Transferee.
Books and Records
Section 7. Taxes
Transferor shall pay all sales, use, transfer, recording, gains, stock transfer and other similar Taxes and fees (other than Irish stamp duty) ("") arising out of or in connection with the transactions effected pursuant to this Agreement and the other Sale Documents, and shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless each Transferee Indemnitee and the Company on an after-Tax basis with respect to such Transfer Taxes. Transferor shall file all necessary documentation and Tax Returns with respect to such Transfer Taxes.
Transfer Taxes
 
Section 8. [RESERVED]
Section 9. Certain Reserved Rights.
Transferor hereby agrees to transfer to Transferees, in immediately available funds and as soon as practicable upon receipt thereof, any and all amounts paid by Lessee, including with respect to any Security Deposits (as defined in the Leases) which Transferor has previously received or which Transferor may receive after the Closing Date.
Each party hereto agrees for the benefit of the other that in the event it shall receive any written notice from Lessee, the Company or any other Person which relates to, or affects the rights or obligations of the other party under, the provisions of this section, such party receiving such notice will promptly forward such notice to the other party; , , that the failure to provide such notice shall not give rise to any liability to the party failing to give such notice.
provided
however
Section 10. Indemnities
10.1 . Subject to this Section 10, with respect to each Transferee, Transferor hereby covenants and agrees that it will pay and assume liability for, and indemnify, protect, defend, save and keep harmless each Transferee Indemnitee, on an after-Tax basis, from and against (a) any and all liabilities, Taxes, fees, duties, charges, withholdings, obligations, losses, damages, settlements, claims, actions, suits, penalties, costs and expenses (including, without limitation, reasonable fees and expenses of counsel) of whatsoever kind and nature (individually a "" and collectively, "") which may at any time or from time to time be imposed upon, incurred by or asserted against such Transferee Indemnitee in any way relating to, resulting from or arising out of (i) the Shares and any Relevant Documents in respect of or to the extent attributable to the period prior to the Closing Date, (ii) any inaccuracy or breach of any representation or warranty made by Transferor under this Agreement or any Sale Document (other than in respect of clause (z) and clause (aa) of the Tax Warranties), (iii) any failure by Transferor to have observed or performed any of its obligations under or in connection with this Agreement or any Sale Document, or (iv) the continuing existence after the Closing Date of any Liens attributable to Transferor or, to the knowledge of Transferor, to the Company (excluding the Existing Financing); (b) any and all Losses which may arise in any manner out of or in relation to injury to or death of any Persons whomsoever or loss or damage to any property of any Person and which may result from, or arise in any manner out of, or be attributable to (i) the condition, ownership, leasing, manufacture, purchase, delivery, possession, disposition, use or operation of the Aircraft either in the air or on the ground, in each case prior to the Closing Date, or (ii) any defect in the Aircraft arising from its manufacture or any material or article used therein or from the design, testing or use thereof or from any maintenance, service, repair, overhaul or testing of the Aircraft, in each case prior to the Closing Date; , , that Transferor's obligations under this clause (b) to any Transferee Indemnitee shall not extend to any Losses that are caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Transferee Indemnitee; and that in respect of this clause (b) Transferor shall be subrogated to all rights and remedies which the Transferee Indemnitees may have against the manufacturers of the Aircraft; and (c) any Losses which may at any time or from time to time be imposed upon, incurred by or asserted against such Transferee Indemnitee in any way relating to, resulting from or arising out of clause 18 of the Dresdner Loan Agreement.
Transferor's Indemnity
Loss
Losses
provided
however
provided
further
 
10.2 . Subject to this Section 10, and except as otherwise provided in Section 7 hereof, each Transferee, on a joint and several basis, hereby covenants and agrees to pay and assume liability for, and indemnify, protect, defend, save and keep harmless, each Transferor Indemnitee, on an after-Tax basis, from and against (a) any and all Losses (other than any income, franchise, doing business and similar Taxes imposed on a Transferor Indemnitee) which may at any time or from time to time be imposed upon, incurred by or asserted against any Transferor Indemnitee in any way relating to, resulting from or arising out of (i) the Shares and any Relevant Documents in respect of or to the extent attributable to the period from and after the Closing Date, (ii) any inaccuracy or breach of any representation or warranty made by such Transferee under this Agreement or any other agreement related to this transaction to which such Transferee is a party, or (iii) any failure by such Transferee to have observed or performed any of its obligations under or in connection with this Agreement or any Sale Document; and (b) any and all Losses which may arise in any manner out of or in relation to injury to or death of any Persons whomsoever or loss or damage to any property of any Person and which may result from, or arise in any manner out of, or be attributable to (i) the condition, ownership, leasing, manufacture, purchase, delivery, possession, disposition, use or operation of the Aircraft either in the air or on the ground, in each case from and after the Closing Date, or (ii) any defect in the Aircraft arising from its manufacture or any material or article used therein or from the design, testing or use thereof or from any maintenance, service, repair, overhaul or testing of the Aircraft, in each case from and after the Closing Date; , , that such Transferee's obligations under this clause (b) to any Transferor Indemnitee shall not extend to any Losses that are caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Transferor Indemnitee; and than in respect of this clause (b) such Transferee shall be subrogated to all rights and remedies which the Transferor Indemnitees may have against the manufacturers of the Aircraft.
Transferee's Indemnity
provided
however
provided further
10.3 . It is the intention of the parties to treat any indemnity payment made under this Agreement as an adjustment to the relevant Purchase Amount for all Tax purposes to the extent permitted by Law, and the parties agree to file their Tax Returns accordingly.
Tax Treatment of Indemnities
10.4 .
Notice of Claims; Determination
10.4.1
Any Transferee Indemnitee or Transferor Indemnitee seeking indemnification hereunder (the "") shall give promptly to the party obligated to provide indemnification to such Indemnified Party (the "") a written notice (a "") describing in reasonable detail the facts giving rise to the claim for indemnification hereunder and shall include in such Claim Notice (if then known) the amount or the method of computation of the amount of such claim, and a reference to the provision of this Agreement or any other agreement, document or instrument executed hereunder or in connection herewith upon which such claim is based; provided, however, that the failure of any Indemnified Party to give the Claim Notice promptly as required by this Section 10.4.1 shall not affect such Indemnified Party's rights under this Section 10.
Indemnified Party
Indemnitor
Claim Notice
 
10.4.2
After the giving of any Claim Notice pursuant hereto, the amount of indemnification to which an Indemnified Party shall be entitled under this Section 10 shall be determined: (i) by the written agreement between the Indemnified Party and the Indemnitor; (ii) by a final judgment or decree of any court of competent jurisdiction; or (iii) by any other means to which the Indemnified Party and the Indemnitor shall agree. The judgment or decree of a court shall be deemed final when the time for appeal, if any, shall have expired and no appeal shall have been taken or when all appeals taken shall have been finally determined. The Indemnified Party shall have the burden of proof in establishing the amount of Losses suffered by it. All amounts due to the Indemnified Party as so finally determined shall be paid by wire transfer within thirty (30) calendar days after such final determination.
10.5
Third Person Claims.
10.5.1 In order for a party to be entitled to any indemnification provided for under this Agreement in respect of, arising out of or involving a claim or demand made by any third Person against the Indemnified Party, such Indemnified Party must notify the Indemnitor in writing, and in reasonable detail, of the third Person claim promptly after receipt by such Indemnified Party of written notice of the third Person claim. Thereafter, the Indemnified Party shall deliver to the Indemnitor, within five (5) calendar days after the Indemnified Party's receipt thereof, copies of all notices and documents (including court papers) received by the Indemnified Party relating to the third Person claim. Notwithstanding the foregoing, should a party be physically served with a complaint with regard to a third Person claim, the Indemnified Party must notify the Indemnitor with a copy of the complaint within five (5) calendar days after receipt thereof and shall deliver to the Indemnitor within five (5) calendar days after the receipt of such complaint copies of notices and documents (including court papers) received by the Indemnified Party relating to the third Person claim (or in each case such earlier time as may be necessary to enable the Indemnitor to respond to the court proceedings on a timely basis).
10.5.2 In the event of the initiation of any legal proceeding against the Indemnified Party by a third Person, the Indemnitor shall have the sole and absolute right after the receipt of notice, at its option and at its own expense, to be represented by counsel of its choice and to control, defend against, negotiate, settle or otherwise deal with any proceeding, claim, or demand which relates to any loss, liability or damage indemnified against hereunder; provided, however, that the Indemnified Party may participate in any such proceeding with counsel of its choice and at its expense. The parties hereto agree to cooperate fully with each other in connection with the defense, negotiation or settlement of any such legal proceeding, claim or demand. Such cooperation shall include the retention and the provision of records and information which is reasonably relevant to such third Person claim, and making employees available in a mutually convenient basis to provide additional information and explanation of any material provided hereunder. To the extent the Indemnitor elects not to defend such proceeding, claim or demand, and the Indemnified Party defends against or otherwise deals with any such proceeding, claim or demand, the Indemnified Party may retain counsel, at the expense of the
 
Indemnitor, and control the defense of such proceeding. Neither the Indemnitor nor the Indemnified Party may settle any such proceeding, which settlement obligates the other party to pay money, to perform obligations or to admit liability without the written consent of the other party, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed; provided that the consent of the Indemnified Party shall not be required if the Indemnitor agrees in writing to pay any amounts payable pursuant to such settlement and such settlement includes a full and conditional release of the Indemnified Party. After any final judgment or award shall have been rendered by a court, arbitration board or administrative agency of competent jurisdiction and the time in which to appeal therefrom has expired, or a settlement shall have been consummated, or the Indemnified Party and the Indemnitor shall arrive at a mutually binding agreement with respect to each separate matter alleged to be indemnifiable by the Indemnitor hereunder, the Indemnified Party shall forward to the Indemnitor notice of any sums due and owing by it with respect to such matter and the Indemnitor shall pay all of the sums so owing to the Indemnified Party by wire transfer within thirty (30) calendar days after the date of such notice.
10.5.3 This Clause 10.5 shall not apply to any claim for indemnification relating to a breach of the Tax Warranties. The provisions of Clause 4 of the Tax Deed shall apply instead.
10.6 .
Limitations
10.6.1 . Each of the parties agrees to take all reasonable steps to mitigate their respective Losses upon and after becoming aware of any event or condition which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any Losses that are indemnifiable hereunder.
Mitigation
10.6.2 . Upon making any payment to the Indemnified Party for any indemnification claim pursuant to this Section 10, the Indemnitor shall be subrogated, to the extent of such payment, to any rights which the Indemnified Party may have against any third parties with respect to the subject matter underlying such indemnification claim and the Indemnified Party shall assign any such rights to the Indemnitor.
Subrogation
Section 11. Tax Matters
11.1 .
Tax Filings
(a) Transferor shall timely prepare and file (or cause to be so prepared and filed) all Tax Returns required by Law covering the Company for all taxable periods ending on or before the Closing Date (""). Transferor shall prepare all Pre-Closing Tax Returns consistent with its prior practices and in accordance with the tax accruals on the books and records of the Company and will not amend any Pre-Closing Tax Return without the written approval of each Transferee, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. Transferor shall timely pay all Taxes related to Pre-Closing Tax Returns (""). The Transferees shall procure that the Company shall cause all Pre-Closing Tax Returns to be authorized, signed and submitted to the appropriate Revenue Authority with such amendments as the Transferees shall reasonably request.
Pre-Closing Tax Returns
Pre-Closing Taxes
 
(b) The Transferees shall prepare (or cause to be prepared) and file or cause to be filed when due all Tax Returns that are required to be filed by or with respect to the Company after the Closing Date and shall remit any Taxes due in respect of such Tax Returns. With respect to Tax Returns that are required to be filed by or with respect to the Company for any Tax Period that begins before and ends after the Closing Date (such periods "" and such Tax Returns ""), such Straddle Returns shall be prepared in a manner consistent with past practice (unless otherwise required by Law), and the Transferor shall be responsible for Taxes due in respect of that portion of such Straddle Returns as ends on the Closing Date (""), calculated as provided in the next paragraph. The Transferees shall notify Transferor of any amounts due from Transferor in respect of any Straddle Return no later than ten (10) Business Days prior to the date on which such Straddle Return is due, and Transferor shall remit such payment to the Transferees no later than five (5) Business Days prior to the date such Straddle Return is due. The Transferees shall deliver any Straddle Return to the Transferor for its review at least thirty (30) days prior to the date on which such Tax Return is required to be filed. If Transferor disputes any item on such Tax Return, it shall notify the Transferees no later than ten (10) days from receipt of such Tax Return of such disputed item (or items) and the basis for its objection and the Transferees shall consider such objections in good faith. The parties shall act in good faith to resolve any such dispute prior to the date on which the relevant Tax Return is required to be filed. If the parties cannot resolve any disputed item, the item in question shall be resolved by an independent accounting firm mutually acceptable to Transferor and Transferees. The fees and expenses of such accounting firm shall be borne equally by Transferor and Transferees.
Straddle Periods
Straddle Returns
Straddle Pre-Closing Taxes
(c) In the case of any Taxes of the Company that are payable with respect to Straddle Periods, the portion of any such Taxes that are attributable to the portion of the Straddle Period that ends on the Closing Date shall (i) in the case of Taxes that are based upon or related to income or receipts or imposed on a transactional basis be deemed equal to the amount that would be payable if the Tax year or period ended on the Closing Date; and (ii) in the case of other Taxes be allocated pro rata per day between the period ending on the Closing Date and the period beginning after the Closing Date. For purposes of clause (i) of the preceding sentence, any exemption, deduction, credit or other item that is calculated on an annual basis shall be allocated pro rate per day between the period ending on the Closing Date and the period beginning after the Closing Date.
11.2 . After the Closing Date, the parties will cooperate with each other in the preparation of all Tax Returns and will provide (or cause to be provided) any records and other information requested by the party preparing the applicable Tax Return, and will provide access to, and the cooperation of its respective auditors. The parties will cooperate with each other in connection with any Tax investigation, audit or other proceeding. Nothing in this Clause 11 will oblige the Company or the Transferees to procure that the Company submit a Pre-Closing Tax Return that is not complete, true and accurate in all material respects.
Tax Cooperation
 
Section 12. Total Loss.
In the event of a Total Loss with respect to any of the Aircraft prior to the Closing Date, this Agreement shall terminate automatically and Transferor shall immediately return the Deposit to the Transferees.
Section 13. Notices.
Any notice required or permitted under this Agreement or any other Sale Document shall be in writing. Notices under this Agreement or any other Sale Document shall be delivered in person or by air courier, or shall be sent by telefacsimile, addressed to the intended recipient as set forth in Schedule 1 hereto. Notice shall be deemed effective upon actual receipt.
Section 14. Miscellaneous.
14.1 . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon each of the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns.
Binding Effect
14.2 . Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby are consummated, each of the parties hereto shall bear and be responsible for its own costs and expenses incurred in connection with the negotiation, preparation, execution and delivery of the Sale Documents, and any other agreements, documents and instruments relating hereto, and no such party shall have any right of reimbursement or indemnity for such costs and expenses as against any other party; provided that Transferor shall pay any costs and expenses of Lessee and DGAC counsel in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Sale Documents.
Transaction Costs and Expenses
14.3 . This Agreement constitutes, on and as of the date hereof, the entire agreement of the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof, and all prior or contemporaneous understandings or agreements, whether written or oral, between the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof are hereby superseded in their entirety.
Entire Agreement
14.4 . No provision of any Sale Document may be amended, changed, waived or discharged orally, but only by an instrument in writing specifying the provision intended to be amended, changed, waived or discharged and signed by the party against whom enforcement of such amendment, change, waiver or discharge is sought and no provision of any Sale Document shall be varied, contradicted or explained by any oral agreement, course of dealing or performance or any other matter not set forth in an agreement in writing and signed by the party against whom enforcement of such agreement is sought.
Amendments
14.5 . Neither party may assign any of its rights or delegate any of its obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the other party; , , that on or after the Closing Date, any Transferee and/or any of its assigns may assign its rights under this agreement without consent of Transferor.
Assignment
provided
however
14.6 . The division of this Agreement into Articles and Sections, and the insertion of headings, are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the construction or interpretation of this Agreement.
Headings and References
 
14.7 . This Agreement may be executed in any number of separate counterparts by each of the parties hereto, all such counterparts together constituting but one and the same instrument. Copies of this Agreement and the documents to be delivered hereunder, if transmitted by facsimile, shall be deemed to be and treated the same as executed originals; provided that the original of any document delivered by facsimile transmission shall, upon request, also be delivered by mail or private delivery service.
Counterparts
14.8 . Any failure at any time of either party to enforce any provision of any Sale Document shall not constitute a waiver of such provision or prejudice the right of such party to enforce such provision at any subsequent time.
Non-Waiver
14.9 . The representations, warranties and indemnities herein of each party hereto shall survive the execution and delivery of, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by, this Agreement until the later of (a) the date on which the applicable statute of limitations period for the representations, warranties and indemnities contained in Section 5.2 hereof and in the Tax Deed expires; and (b) the date which is one year after the Expiry Date of the Leases, including any Extension Periods (as such terms are defined in the Leases); that the representations and warranties contained in Sections 5.1.2 and 5.1.6 hereof and indemnities related thereto shall survive indefinitely; further that any representation, warranty, or indemnity that would otherwise terminate in accordance with clause (a) or (b), above will continue to survive if a Claim Notice shall have been timely given under Section 10 on or prior to such termination date, until the related claim for indemnification has been satisfied or otherwise resolved as provided in Section 10.
Survival
provided
provided
14.10 . If any provision of any Sale Document is or becomes void or unenforceable by force or operation of Law, the other provisions shall remain valid and enforceable, but if such provision being void or unenforceable shall affect the substance of the bargain between the parties, the parties shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to affect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible.
Invalid Provisions
14.11 . All prices, amounts and payments referred to herein shall be in United States Dollars.
Currency
14.12 . Each party agrees to indemnify and hold the other parties harmless from and against any and all claims, suits, damages, costs and expenses (including, but not limited to, reasonable attorneys' fees) asserted by agents, brokers or other third parties, representing or allegedly representing such party, for any commission or compensation of any nature whatsoever based upon the sale or transfer between Transferor and Transferees of the Shares hereunder.
Brokers
14.13 . Each Sale Document (except for the Tax Deed) shall in all respects, including all matters of construction, validity and performance, be governed by, and construed and enforced in accordance with, the Laws of the State of New York, as would be applicable to contracts entered into in that state between citizens of that state and to be performed wholly within that state, without reference to any rules governing conflicts of Laws. The parties consent to service of process by mail courier or hand delivery, at the addresses set forth in Schedule 1 hereto or such other address as notified by a party to the other from time to time pursuant to Section 13 hereto.
Governing Law
 
14.14 . In connection with any matter arising out of the Sale Documents, each of the parties hereto hereby expressly submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York and to the Supreme Court of the State of New York located in the Borough of Manhattan, New York County, New York. Final judgment against any party hereto in any suit, action or proceeding so brought in such courts shall be conclusive and may be enforced in any other jurisdiction by suit on the judgment or as otherwise permitted by applicable Law, a certified or true copy of which shall be conclusive evidence of the facts and of the amount of any indebtedness or liability of such party.
Consent to Jurisdiction
Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue in any suit, action or proceeding brought in any court located in the Borough of Manhattan, New York County, New York, and irrevocably waives any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in any inconvenient forum. Each party agrees that service of process may be made by personal service of a copy of the summons and complaint or other legal process in any such suit, action or proceeding, or by registered or certified mail (postage prepaid) to the address of such party provided in Schedule 1 hereto, or by any other method of service provided for under the applicable Laws in effect in the State of New York.
 
The parties have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and delivered by their respective duly authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
Transferor:
AJG Capital, Inc.
c/o Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Gallagher Center
Two Pierce Place, 23
rd
Floor
Itasca, IL 60143
Attn: David R. Long, Vice President
Fax: 630-285-4272
Transferee:
Aviacargo 27125/27347, LLC
c/o Automatic LLC
2665 South Bayshore Drive, Suite 1006
Coconut Grove, FL 33131
Attn: Manager
Fax: 305-858-7757
Transferee:
Erste Finance Malta Limited
c/o Erste Bank (Malta) Ltd
72 Regent House
Bisazza Street
SLM 15
Malta
Attn: Martin Sadleder
Fax: 356 347 151
, dated April 7, 2000, between Company, as borrower, the banks and financial institutions named therein as Banks, and Dresdner Kleinwort Wasserstein Limited, as agent, as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Loan Agreement
, dated April 6, 2000, as amended and restated on December 21, 2005, in respect of the Aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27125 between the Company, as lessor, and Europe Airpost S.A., as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time
Aircraft Lease Agreement
, dated April 6, 2000, as amended and restated on December 21, 2005, in respect of the Aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27347, between the Company, as lessor, and Europe Airpost S.A., as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time.
Aircraft Lease Agreement
 
THIS LESSEE CONSENT [MSN 27347] dated as of January , 2007 (this "") is among ERSTE BANK DER OESTERREICHISCHEN SPARKASSEN AG, LONDON BRANCH, a bank organized under the laws of Austria acting through its London Branch, as Administrative Agent on behalf of the Lenders (together with its successors in such capacity, the ""), AVIACARGO LEASING LIMITED, an Irish company limited by shares (the ""), and EUROPE AIRPOST S.A., a French socit anonyme (the "").
    
Agreement
Agent
Lessor
Lessee
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Share Purchase Agreement dated as of January , 2007 by and between AVIACARGO 27125/27347, LLC and ERSTE FINANCE MALTA LIMITED, as transferees (each, a "", and, collectively, the ""), and AJG Capital, Inc., as transferor, the Transferees own all of the outstanding shares of the Lessor;
    
Transferee
Transferees
WHEREAS, the Lessor and the Lessee are parties to the Aircraft Lease Agreement dated April 6, 2000, as amended on May 23, 2002 and amended and restated on December 21, 2005 (the "") in respect of one Boeing model 737-300F aircraft bearing manufacturer's serial number 27347 (the ""), together with two CFM International Inc. CFM56-3C-1 aircraft engines with manufacturer's serial numbers 857685 and 857686 (each an "" and collectively, the "");
Lease
Aircraft
Engine
Engines
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Mortgage and Security Agreement [27125 and 27347] dated as of the date hereof executed by the Lessor in favor of the Agent (the "") and the Loan Agreement, dated as of even date herewith among the Lessor, the lenders listed therein (the "") and the Agent (the ""), the Lenders have extended credit to the Lessor to enable it to refinance existing indebtedness in connection with the Aircraft, and the Lessor has granted to the Agent, on behalf of the Lenders, a security interest in and lien on the Aircraft and the Lessor has assigned to the Agent, on behalf of the Lenders, its rights under the Lease, in each case in order to secure its obligations to the Agent and the Lenders. The Loan Agreement, Mortgage and the other loan documents executed in connection therewith are hereafter the "";
Mortgage
Lenders
Loan Agreement
Loan Documents
 
WHEREAS, it is a condition to the Loan Documents that the parties hereto enter into this Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, the parties confirm and agree as follows:
1. . The Lessor hereby notifies the Lessee that pursuant to the Loan Documents, the Lessor has assigned to the Agent, on behalf of the Lenders, all of its right, title and interest in and to the Aircraft and all of its rights as lessor under the Lease, as collateral security for the obligations described in the Loan Documents. In accordance with such assignment, the Agent is entitled to exercise all rights, remedies, powers and privileges of lessor under the Lease; however, the Lessee may conclusively rely on notices and instructions received from the Lessor unless and until the Agent notifies the Lessee in writing to the contrary. The Lessee hereby consents to the security interests on the Lessor's interest in the Aircraft and the Lease which is created by the Mortgage. The Lessee agrees that neither the Agent nor its successors or assigns shall be liable for any obligations or duties of "Lessor" under the Lease or any other document by its execution of this Agreement or the Loan Documents, nor shall the assignment of the Lease to the Agent pursuant to the Loan Documents give rise to any duties or obligations on the part of the Agent or its successors or assigns owing to the Lessee, except as expressly contemplated in this Agreement. Notwithstanding the assignment of the Lease to the Agent pursuant to the Loan Documents, the Lessor agrees that it shall at all times remain obligated to perform all obligations of "Lessor" under the Lease. For the avoidance of doubt, the parties confirm and agree that the "Agent" for all purposes of this Agreement shall be Erste Bank der oesterreichischen Sparkassen AG, London Branch, and that Dresdner Kleinwort Wasserstein Limited shall have no further interest in the Lease.
Notice of Security Interest
2. . The Agent and the Lessor agree that, except as expressly contemplated herein, nothing contained herein or in any Loan Document constitutes a modification or waiver of any of the Lessee's rights under the Lease, and in connection therewith but in no manner in limitation of the generality thereof, nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed or construed to impose upon the Lessee any obligation to make any payments under the Lease in excess of the amounts provided therein or to incur any incremental burden, risk or expense not contemplated thereby.
Lessee's Rights
3. . The Lessor hereby notifies the Lessee that, effective on the date hereof, (a) all payments of "Rent" and other payments (other than the "Security Deposit") under the Lease due on or after the date hereof shall be paid by wire transfer to the Agent at: Bank of America NT & SA, CHIPS 959, ABA No.: 026009593, SWIFT Code: B0FAUS3N, for further credit to Erste Bank der oesterreichischen Sparkassen AG, London Branch, SWIFT Code: GIBAGB2X, Account No.: 6550-1-60881, Reference: EAP 27347 Rent, and (b) all payments in respect of the Security Deposit under the Lease due on or after the date hereof shall be paid by wire transfer to the Agent at: Bank of America NT & SA, CHIPS 959, ABA No.: 026009593, SWIFT Code: B0FAUS3N, for further credit to Erste Bank der oesterreichischen Sparkassen
Payments
 
AG, London Branch, SWIFT Code: GIBAGB2X, Account No.: 6550-1-60881, Reference: Aviacargo Security Deposit (or, in either case, such other financial institution as the Agent shall direct the Lessee in writing). The Lessee agrees that it will make all such payments to such account(s) in accordance with the Lease.
4. . Notwithstanding any provisions herein or in the Loan Documents to the contrary, each of the Lessor and the Agent confirms to and agrees with the Lessee that so long as no Termination Event (as defined in the Lease) has occurred and is continuing, neither the Lessor nor the Agent will interfere, or permit any Person acting by, through or under it to disturb the quiet use, possession and enjoyment of the Aircraft by the Lessee in accordance with the Lease.
Quiet Enjoyment
5. . The Lessee hereby represents and warrants on and as of the date hereof that:
Representations and Warranties of the Lessee
(a) the Lease, as amended, constitutes the entire agreement between the Lessee and the Lessor with respect to the Aircraft (including the Engines) and has not been amended, modified, supplemented or assigned and the Lease is in full force and effect as to the Lessee;
(b) no amounts may currently be offset by the Lessee from Rent due under the Lease and there have been no prepayments by the Lessee of Rent under the Lease;
(c) no default, Termination Event or Total Loss (in each case as defined in the Lease) under the Lease has occurred and is continuing;
(d) all of the representations and warranties of the Lessee set forth in Clause 2 of the Lease are true and correct as of the date hereof; and
(e) no original copy of the Lease has been designated as the "chattel paper original" and the Lessee does not possess an original copy of the Lease.
 
6. . The Lessor hereby directs the Lessee to designate the Agent as sole loss payee under the hull insurance policies required to be maintained under Clause 16 of the Lease. With respect to all liability insurance policies required pursuant to Clause 16 of the Lease, the Lessor hereby directs and the Lessee hereby agrees to cause the Lenders, the Agent, the Transferees, and each of their respective affiliates, officers, directors, employees and agents, to be named as additional insureds thereunder. The Lessee shall cause all insurance certificates and reports required to be delivered pursuant to Clause 16 of the Lease to be addressed and delivered to the Agent in addition to the Lessor.
Insurance
7. . The Lessee hereby confirms and agrees that the Lenders, the Agent, the Transferees, and each of their respective directors, officers, employees, servants, agents, shareholders and controlling persons and successors and assigns constitute "Indemnitees" (as such term is defined in the Lease) and are entitled to all rights and privileges of indemnification owed by the Lessee to the Lessor.
Indemnification
8. . The Lessee hereby agrees and undertakes promptly to replace all nameplates referenced under Clause 13.1.8 of the Lease with such nameplates which shall bear the following inscription:
Insignia
"THIS [AIRFRAME/ENGINE] IS OWNED BY AVIACARGO LEASING LIMITED AND SUBJECT TO A MORTGAGE IN FAVOR OF ERSTE BANK DER OESTERREICHISCHEN SPARKASSEN AG, LONDON BRANCH, AS ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT FOR THE LENDERS"
9. . Notwithstanding any provision in the Lease to the contrary, Lessee agrees that no later than January 25, 2007 it will cause a Letter of Credit to be issued in the name of the Agent by HSBC Bank, Paris Branch. If, thereafter, the Lessee elects to replace such Letter of Credit with a new Letter of Credit, then the Lessee hereby agrees to issue such Letter of Credit in the name of the Agent from a bank acceptable to the Agent.
Letter of Credit
10. . Except as may otherwise be specified in this Agreement, all communications hereunder and under the Lease will be deemed sufficient if in writing and personally delivered, or sent via registered mail, postage prepaid, or sent by reputable overnight courier, or sent by facsimile, addressed:
Notices
 
If to the Lessee:
Europe Airpost S.A.
Btiment Le Raphal
22 avenue des Nations (Villepinte)
BP 49015
95911 ROISSY CDG CEDEX
Attention: M. Maurice Serinet
Facsimile: +33 1 48 17 75 65
If to the Lessor:
Aviacargo Leasing Limited
c/o Matsack Trust Limited
30 Herbert Street
Dublin 2
Ireland
Attention: Company Secretary
Facsimile: +365 1 619 9010
With a copy to:
DLA Piper US LLP
203 North LaSalle Street, Suite 1900
Chicago, Illnois 60601
United States
Attention: Stephen A. Landsman, Esq.
Facsimile: +011 312 630 6330
 
If to the Agent:
Erste Bank der oesterreichischen Sparkassen AG, London Branch
68 Cornhill
London EC3V 3QE
England
Attention: Stewart Tanner
Facsimile: (44 207) 283-7142
or such other address as may hereafter be furnished in writing in accordance with the terms hereof by any party to all other parties.
11. . This Agreement shall be binding upon and enforceable against the parties hereto and their successors and permitted assigns. THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK INCLUDING ALL MATTERS OF CONSTRUCTION, VALIDITY AND PERFORMANCE, WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAWS. This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, including facsimile transmittals, each of which shall be deemed an original and all of which, when taken together, shall constitute one and the same document. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES THE RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY SUIT, ACTION OR OTHER PROCEEDING AMONG OR BETWEEN ANY OF THE PARTIES HERETO. The parties hereto consent to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of each of the any state or federal court located in New York, New York with respect to all matters arising out of this Agreement. The parties hereto hereby expressly submit and consent in advance to such jurisdiction and venue in any action or proceeding commenced by any of them in any of such courts and agree that jurisdiction and venue is proper in such courts. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement and supersedes all prior agreements and undertakings among the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof. No term or provision of this Agreement may be changed or waived orally, but only by an instrument in writing signed by the parties intended to be bound thereby.
Miscellaneous
12. . This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original and all of which, when taken together, shall constitute one and the same Agreement. A facsimile transmitted signature to this Agreement shall be deemed an acceptable written approval of an executing party hereto.
Counterparts
*    *    *
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed and delivered this Lessee Consent [MSN 27347] by their respective officers or attorneys as of the date first above written.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20070208153320.txt.gz
TIME:20070208153320
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
The January 2007 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
JANUARY 2006
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of such laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
 
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2006 and 2005 were adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations and to eliminate the impact of medical and pension plan changes. Charges in 2006 related to retail contingent commission related matters and medical plan changes totaled $9.0 million (or $5.4 million after tax) and $7.5 million (or $4.5 million after tax), respectively. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $15.0 million (or $9.8 million after tax), respectively. In addition, Gallagher recognized a pension curtailment gain of $10.0 million (or $6.0 million after tax) in 2005. There were no such charges or gains in 2001 to 2004. These adjustments, which Gallagher believes are for non-recurring items, were made to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2006 and 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations and medical and pension plan changes. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation.
Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
World's 4th Largest Insurance Brokerage and Risk Management Services Firm
Brokerage  We sell a full range of property/casualty and employee benefit products and services, provide access to wholesale, reinsurance, captive and excess/surplus lines markets and provide generalized risk shifting consulting to our domestic and international clients
Risk Management  We provide our domestic and international self-insured clients, as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department, with outsourced P/C claims payment and claims management services that assist them in managing risk exposures and reducing claims payment costs
 
Strengths
Unique corporate culture
History of growth
Financial flexibility
Solid balance sheet Strong cash flows
No corporate related debt; still maintaining a $450M credit facility
Excellent producer development and retention Proven acquisition strategy
165 deals, 1986 through 12/31/06
Lean, yet activist, corporate staff
 
Differentiators
Culture Driven Success
Client-first focus
Local company feel with global capabilities Team-based approach Committed to growth Emphasis on professional development
Niche strategy  industry-focused practice groups International network of brokers and agents Innovative  created alternative market "Network" philosophy of service that benefits clients Strong claims management capabilities
 
Client Base
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Large Clients
Mid-Market Clients
Smaller Clients
 
Client Base
Brokerage
Risk Management
Large Clients
Mid Market Clients
Smaller Clients
9
 
Segments
2006 Revenues*
Brokerage 69%
Financial Services 5%
Risk Management 26%
2006 Pretax Earnings*
Brokerage 88%
Financial Services (17)%
Risk Management 29%
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
10
 
Brokerage Segment
Domestic Retail Brokerage 55%
Employee Benefit Brokerage 18%
Wholesale, Reinsurance, & International Brokerage 27%
Revenues as of 12/31/06  See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
11
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
We broker P/C insurance and risk shifting programs and provide risk management services for commercial, not-for-profit, institutional and governmental enterprises Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 25 different industry-specific niche/practice groups
12
 
Domestic Retail Brokerage
13
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
We broker employee health, welfare and retirement insurance programs and assist in communication, administration and compliance consulting services Organized geographically via profit centers Matrix of 7 different industry-specific niche/practice groups
14
 
Employee Benefit Brokerage
15
 
Wholesale Brokerage
We provide access for hard-to-place coverages, including surplus lines, to over 10,000 independent P/C brokers and agents Organized geographically via profit centers Over 60% of business is from non-Gallagher sources
16
 
Reinsurance Brokerage
"Gallagher Re" provides:
P/C, Life, and A&H expertise
Executed primarily through Treaty, Facultative and Program reinsurance services Expert product knowledge with multinational servicing capabilities Advisory, analytical and technical resources
Operations in UK, US, Bermuda, Singapore and Australia
17
 
International Brokerage
Our teams based in US, UK and Bermuda provide US and International clients with access to international and alternative markets
Gallagher has an international network of independent brokers in 120 countries
Gallagher believes in global partners
"best available" broker in every country around the world is a better value for clients
18
 
Wholesale, Reinsurance and International Network
19
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth Drivers
Organic
Experienced hires and teams Grow our own
Increase industry-specific practice units
Strategic fit acquisitions
Geographic expansion Expertise expansion
Network-wide coordination
Deep industry and product knowledge
20
 
Brokerage Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention
Align performance compensation Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
21
 
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions) $1,100 $559 $900 $700 $500 $300 $100
16% CAGR
2001 2006
Total Revenues*
15% CAGR
$200 $150 $100 $50 $0
$103 $168
2001 2006 Pretax Earnings*
2006 pretax margins of 16%
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
22
 
Risk Management Segment
"Gallagher Bassett" provides outsourced P/C claims payment and management services for self-insured clients as well as insurance companies that outsource their claims department We DO NOT chase catastrophe overflow claims One of the world's largest claims administrators Business Insurance Over 80% of business is from non-Gallagher sources Network (vs. dedicated unit) philosophy
23
 
Risk Management Segment
24
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth Drivers
Purely organic Unbundled trend International footprint Deep client intimacy Leverage technology
25
 
Risk Management Segment
Profit Drivers
Maximize client retention Control operating expenses Leverage technology Commitment to quality
26
 
Risk Management Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions) $500 $400 $300 $200 $100 $0
12% CAGR
$232 $401
2001 2006 Total Revenues*
2006 pretax margin of 14% $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
12% CAGR
$29 $56
2001 2006 Pretax Earnings*
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
27
 
Financial Services Segment
Segment in run-off mode since 2002 In December, sold ownership in:
Home office building
Low income housing developer
In January, sold 90% ownership in airplane leasing company Eliminated substantially all related debt Continue to monetize asset management business Current uncertainty with coal investments
Purchased financial hedge on 1/17/07 Regardless, law expires end of 2007
Future cash flows will be used to buy brokers, pay dividends and repurchase stock
28
 
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets and Financial Guarantees*
$400 $350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $362 $89
2002 2006* $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Net Assets*
Tax Adv Other Mgmt Asset
Low Income Housing $3M Alternative Energy $43M Asset Alliance $28M Other $8M $ In Millions *As of 12/31/06
29
 
2006 in Review
Brokerage
Developed a new business model
Revenue growth of 10%pretax earnings growth of 31% Internal revenue growth of 6% Improved pretax margins by 2.5% Closed 11 acquisitionsannualized revenues of $54m Settled Multi-District Federal class action litigation
Risk Management
Revenue growth of 8%pretax margins of 14% Lower than expected claim frequencyindustry trend
Financial Services
Nearing end of investment disposal process
15th straight year of dividend increases Repurchased 1.2 million shares
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
30
 
Where We Are Going
Revenue and pretax growth of 15% per year Target enterprise-wide margin expansion to 20+% Solid organic growth Maximize shareholder returns through dividends and stock repurchases
31
 
How We Make It Happen
Developing consistent growth through
Hiring sales-oriented producers Strong internship program Active acquisition campaign Solid customer partnerships Ongoing operational efficiencies Disciplined capital allocation
32
 
Summary: Why Invest?
22 Year Growth Story:
1984 IPO
(Restated for stock splits) 12/31/06
Stock Price $1.72 $29.55
Market Cap $57 M $2.9 B
Tangible Net Worth $23 M $334 M
Annual Dividend/Share $.03 $1.24*
*Indicated annual dividend
33
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues (In millions) From Continuing Operations* $1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400
15% CAGR
$1,103 $961 $791 $1,470 $1,343 $1,232
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006
34
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings (In millions) From Continuing Operations* $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $156 $132 $184 $211 $193 $225
15 % CAGR
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
35
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Since 1990, $1.9 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($642 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($735 M)
Shares Repurchased
($477 M)
Balance sheet with $3.40 in tangible net worth per share and low corporate debt
As of 12/31/06
Excludes cash payments made regarding special items discussed on Page 3
36
 
Summary: Why Invest?
Dividends Per Share
(restated for stock splits) $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00 $1.24*
19% Average Annual Increase
Year
1986 2007
*Indicated  On January 18, 2007, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.31 per share quarterly dividend.
37
 
"The Gallagher Way",
Robert E. Gallagher, 1984 Culture Driven Success
Shared values at Gallagher are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Gallagher's Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens ?everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other. We are a team. 16. Loyalty and respect are earned ?not dictated.
22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on ?not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength ?not a weakness.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances ?but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
38

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
Brokerage Segment Risk Management Segment Financial Services Segment
NYSE: AJG Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT P R O F I L E
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firm. Gallagher provides a full range of property/casualty (P/C) products and services to clients of all sizes. It is also one of the world's premier alternative risk transfer and third-party claims managers and a fullservice employee benefits consultant.
Stock Performance  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. vs. S&P 500
300%
50%
100%
0%
150%
200%
250%
Gallagher S&P 500
JANUARY 2007
Brokerage Segment 2
Acquisition Strategy 4
Risk Management Segment 4
Financial Services Segment 5
Market Outlook 6
Condensed Financial Statements 7
Why Invest? 8
As of DECEMBER 31, 2006 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $29.55
52-week high/low $30.42$24.42
Trailing 12-mos. revenues $1.5 billion
Market cap $2.9 billion
Indicated annual dividend* $1.24
Yield 4.2 %
Shares outstanding 98.4 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/earnings** 21 x
Number of employees 8,757
**Excludes litigation related matters, retail contingent commission related matters, medical and pension plan changes and
claims handling obligations.
www.ajg.com
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
BROKERAGE SERVICES RETAIL DIVISION
Niche/Practice Groups
Agribusiness Fine Arts Real Estate Strategic Risk Services
Aviation & Aerospace Global Risk Management General Commercial Habitational CyberRisk Services Environmental
Captives Casualty Construction Healthcare Higher Education Marine Hospitality Shopping Centers Religious/Nonprofit Financial Products Lawyers Professional Management Liability Private Equity
Construction Project Solutions (Wrap Ups) Energy Personal Insurance Property Public Entity Restaurant ServicesActuarial Claim Advocacy Transportation Worldwide Risk Services
Loss Control
Gallagher's Brokerage Services Retail Division (BSD) specializes in structuring P/C insurance and risk management programs for commercial, industrial, institutional and governmental organizations. In addition to generating business from its offices throughout the U.S., BSD pursues cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operating divisions and with the company's Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners.
BSD services clients of all sizes and is a leading provider of insurance programs for middle-market commercial clients. While it brokers all types of P/C insurance, over 75% of BSD's revenues are generated by more than two dozen specialized niches and practice groups. These crossdivisional teams target areas of business in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. This specialized focus provides advantages both in new business production and account retention. It allows for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. The detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these teams provide a competitive advantage.
Technological innovation is a key component of Gallagher's ongoing efforts to enhance client services and improve productivity. Through Gallagher Insighta proprietary, interactive online platformBSD clients can access their own password-protected Web portals to review and update account information. BSD professionals also use these portals to collaborate on and address client issues.
BSD anticipates its greatest revenue growth over the next year will continue to come from its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; from developing and managing alternative market mechanisms such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and through mergers and acquisitions.
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL DIVISION
DOMESTIC WHOLESALE BROKERAGE
Gallagher has built a substantial book of wholesale and excess/surplus lines business through acquisition and internal growth. In the U.S., this business is primarily generated by Risk Placement Services, Inc. (RPS) and its various operating units. RPS, which Gallagher formed from scratch in 1997, has grown rapidly to become one of the largest wholesale brokers in the U.S. Much of this business is generated by producers outside the Gallagher network. An increasing amount of wholesale business is coming to Gallagher via the company's e-commerce portal, CoverageFirst.com, which now has more than 18,600 registered independent agent, wholesale broker and managing general agent users.
INTERNATIONAL RETAIL AND WHOLESALE
P/C BROKERAGE
Gallagher offers retail and wholesale P/C brokerage and programs/program administration through various international operations.
Arthur J. Gallagher (UK) Limited, a Financial Services Authority (FSA) registered broker and approved Lloyd's of London broker, places risks for Gallagher and non- Gallagher producers and direct retail clients worldwide across all aviation, marine and non-marine classes.
Risk Management Partners Ltd., with offices in England and Scotland, markets insurance and risk management products and services to UK public entities.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
JANUARY 2007
 
SPECIALTY MARKETING AND INTERNATIONAL DIVISION (continued)
Arthur J. Gallagher Australasia, through its various operating companies, provides a full range of P/C solutions for wholesale and retail clients throughout Australia.
Arthur J. Gallagher (Bermuda) Limited offers wholesale P/C brokerage, programs and program administration through Gallagher and non-Gallagher producers.
REINSURANCE BROKERAGE
Gallagher's reinsurance brokerage operations in the U.S., London, Bermuda, Australia and Singapore are united under the banner Gallagher Re to enhance brand awareness and facilitate resource sharing. Gallagher Re offers reinsurance brokerage and risk advisory services to a global client base, which includes insurance and reinsurance companies. It provides a wide range of P/C, life & accident and health expertise through treaty, program and facultative reinsurance services. Analytical capabilities, such as peril and natural hazard modeling, actuarial services and Dynamic Financial Analysis, are an intrinsic part of Gallagher Re's offerings.
CAPTIVE/RENT-A-CAPTIVE MANAGEMENT
Gallagher provides captive products and services to single parent, group and association captives, rent-acaptives and risk retention groups in leading offshore and onshore domiciles, including Bermuda, Grand Cayman, Hawaii, Vermont and Washington D.C.
STRATEGIC ALLIANCE NETWORK
Gallagher continues to strengthen its Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners. These relationships are based on strength, service capabilities and shared business philosophies. The network extends our client service capabilities to 120 countries around the world. In 2006, we introduced a process to brand the network as the Gallagher Optimus Network. Ultimately, this move will give our preferred strategic partners a greater tie to the Gallagher organization, which should further enhance client services to our global accounts.
GALLAGHER BENEFIT SERVICES DIVISION
Capabilities
Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting Human Resource Services
Healthcare Data Analysis/Benchmarking Retirement Plan Services
Compliance Consulting Employer Administrative Services
Merger & Acquisition Analysis Business Continuation
Actuarial Services Compensation Program Design/Analysis
Executive Benefits/Financial Planning
Gallagher Benefit Services offers expertise and guidance in all areas of employee benefits planning, delivery and administration, including executive benefits and financial planning, actuarial, data analysis and benchmarking, retirement brokerage and consulting, benefits outsourcing and human resource services. Changing benefit regulations, such as the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and Medicare Part D coverage, present ongoing challenges to employers. At the same time, benefit costs continue to soar.
To cope with these issues, employers are increasingly adopting disease management, wellness and consumerdriven healthcare programs. Gallagher Benefit Services continues to expand its technological, analytical and informational capabilities to help its clients address these and other issues. In addition, its branches hold a variety of training seminars for clients, focusing on such topics as consumer-driven healthcare, regulatory compliance, healthcare cost control initiatives, wellness and disease management initiatives, and integration of employer disability plans.
To provide more focused client support, Gallagher Benefit Services has seven national practice groups in the following niches: healthcare, higher education, hospitality, public entity & scholastic, religious, restaurant and transportation. Its strongest near-term growth opportunities are expected to come from mergers and acquisitions, its niche practice groups, cross-selling opportunities with other Gallagher operations, and assisting its clients and prospects in addressing their most pressing benefit priorities.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
JANUARY 2007
 
ACQUISITION STRATEGY
Gallagher made 165 acquisitions from 1986 through December 2006, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. The majority of these have been regional or local P/C brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Over the last decade, Gallagher has also increased its acquisition activity in the benefits consulting area. Acquisitions typically fall within the $5 million to $15 million range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, sales-oriented culture
a profitable, growing business thats ability to compete would be enhanced by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's historical acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture and incentive-based compensation structure.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
GALLAGHER BASSETT SERVICES
Expertise
Real-Time Claims Reporting Managed Care Services
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Loss Control Services
Appraisal Services Safety Programs
Litigation Management Settlement Management
Information Management Education & Training
Gallagher Bassett has built a reputation as the highquality, cost-effective provider in the multi-billion dollar market for third-party P/C claims management services. Claims management involves managing clients' risk exposures as well as managing and paying their claims. Based on revenues from self-insured clients, Gallagher Bassett currently ranks as one of the world's largest claims administrators, according to Business Insurance magazine. It has offices in the U.S., UK, Australia and Canada.
Gallagher Bassett's primary business is contracted claims management. It provides claims management services for workers compensation, liability, auto, property and integrated disability management programs. It also offers information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination. Gallagher Bassett has a diverse customer base with more than 80% of its claim management revenues derived from clients who do not utilize AJG as their primary broker.
The corporate world's growing interest in self-insurance and alternative risk transfer is stimulating client demand for claims management as an unbundled function, since many self-insuring corporations and public entities require more comprehensive loss reporting and claims
INVESTMENT PROFILE
JANUARY 2007
 
tracking services than are typically provided by an insurance company. With Gallagher Bassett's sophisticated claims management data systems and extensive network, it has reached a point where scale gives it a distinct competitive advantage. The division has also maintained an unwavering commitment to quality for more than a decade-and-a-half that has significantly reduced its rework and processing costs, leading to an exceptional annual client retention rate.
Gallagher Bassett's Web-based, proprietary claims and loss control information management system, risxfacs.com, brings diverse elements of intelligent risk management together in a comprehensive system that streamlines client loss and claim processes. During the fourth quarter of 2006, the system had 14,500 users and was averaging nearly 21 million site hits and 75,000 visitor sessions per month.
The division expects its most significant growth prospects through the next year will come from Fortune 1000 companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments.
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
The Financial Services segment is responsible for managing Gallagher's investments and optimizing tax benefits from Gallagher's investments. Financial Services has concentrated on tax-advantaged, real estate and asset management investments.
Tax advantaged investments are comprised primarily of alternative energy investments and low-income housing developments. Gallagher has made investments in partnerships formed to develop energy that qualifies for tax credits under Internal Revenue Code (IRC) Section 29. These consist of waste-to-energy partnerships and synthetic coal (Syn/Coal) facilities. These investments helped to reduce Gallagher's effective income tax rate in 2005 and 2006.
Asset management is primarily comprised of Gallagher's 25% minority interest in Asset Alliance Corporation, which generally owns up to a two-thirds interest in 10 private investment management firms with approximately $3.1 billion under management at December 31, 2006.
During the fourth quarter of 2006, Gallagher continued the process of disposing assets held in its Financial Services Segment. In December, Gallagher sold its indirect 60% ownership interest in its home office building in Itasca, Illinois, and its 27% interest in a lowincome housing developer. Also, in January 2007, Gallagher sold its 90% ownership interest in an airplane leasing company. The completion of these transactions eliminates over $100 million of debt from this segment.
Net Assets and
Financial Guarantees* ($ in millions)
2002 2006
$362
$89
$50
$100
$150
$200
$250
$300
$350
$400
Net Assets* ($ in millions)
$0
$10
$20
$30
$40
$50
$60
Low-income Housing $3M
Alternative Energy $43M
Asset Alliance $28M
Other $8M
Tax Adv. Asset Mgmt. Other
INVESTMENT PROFILE JANUARY 2007
 
MARKET OUTLOOK
The P/C market is cyclical, fluctuating between periods of broad coverage availability and widespread rate reductions (referred to as a "soft" market), and periods of significant rate increases and limited coverage availability (referred to as a "hard" market). Hard markets are typically triggered when rates have been driven so low that underwriting losses exceed total premiums collected, threatening insurer solvency on a large-scale basis.
Throughout the 1990s, an over-abundance of underwriting capacity created an extremely competitive environment for most P/C insurers, putting them under significant pressure to reduce premium rates despite growing underwriting losses. As a result, between 1992 and 2000 the overall cost of managing risk for U.S. corporations dropped 42%. A market correction began in 2000 and intensified in 2001 following the September 11th terrorist attacks. Doubledigit rate increases and coverage restrictions continued throughout 2002.
In 2003, commercial P/C premiums stabilized and the market again began to soften, with premium rates falling, on average, throughout 2004, 2005 and 2006. One notable exception was coastal properties, which experienced significant rate hikes and coverage restrictions following 2005's unprecedented hurricane season and the resulting devastation. According to quarterly market surveys conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB), commercial P/C rate reductions in the first half of 2006 averaged about 3% across the U.S. The magnitude of rate decreases accelerated in the second half, averaging 5% in the third quarter and almost 10% in the fourth quarter. Coastal properties, however, continued to face capacity restrictions and increases in deductibles and exclusions, with premium levels at historic highs, according to survey respondents.
Insurance brokers, as intermediaries between insurers and their customers, normally assume no underwriting risk. Their role is to add value to the transaction by explaining to clients the complex array of insurance and risk management products available; negotiating with insurers for optimum rates and coverage terms and conditions; and helping to place complex risks for clients and other brokers. Large brokers such as Gallagher also help insurance companies transfer some of their own risk to reinsurance providers. As compensation, brokers receive commissions from insurers or fees directly from clients.
In addition to structuring traditional P/C programs, Gallagher assists many clients in managing risk through the alternative market, a segment that includes selfinsurance, captives, rent-a-captives and risk retention groups. According to industry estimates, these mechanisms now account for nearly 50% of the total commercial P/C market in the U.S. When traditional coverage becomes more expensive and harder to obtain, interest in alternative market mechanisms escalates. While competition has increased, Gallagher continues to see a strong interest in alternative market mechanisms.
The insurance industry remains under scrutiny by various regulatory bodies, including State Attorneys General and departments of insurance for various states, and legal actions by private litigants with respect to contingent compensation arrangements and various historical business practices. As previously reported, Gallagher entered into an Assurance of Voluntary Compliance (the AVC) on May 18, 2005, with both the Attorney General and Director of Insurance in the State of Illinois to resolve all issues related to certain investigations conducted by these Illinois State Agencies involving contingent commission arrangements. There was no lawsuit nor any finding of unlawful or deceitful conduct. As stipulated in the AVC, on January 12, 2006, Gallagher paid $26.9 million into a fund to be distributed to certain eligible policyholder clients. As of December 31, 2006, $18.4 million had been paid from the fund to eligible policyholders. In addition, under the AVC, Gallagher agreed to implement, to the extent not previously undertaken, certain business changes, including agreeing not to accept U.S.-domiciled retail contingent compensation as defined in the AVC. However, as allowed under the AVC, Gallagher has continued to accept contingent compensation from non-retail business, including business generated by wholesalers, managing general agents and managing general underwriters. In addition, the AVC allows Gallagher to collect retail contingent compensation related to contracts in place at entities it acquires for up to three years from the acquisition date. Accordingly, in 2005 Gallagher began to experience reduced contingent commission revenue, and in 2006, Gallagher received $2.5 million in retail contingent commission revenue verses $28.8 million in 2005.
On December 29, 2006, Gallagher reached an agreement to resolve all claims in a Federal Multi-District class action litigation (MDL) pending in the New Jersey Federal District Court. The MDL, which names dozens of insurers, reinsurers and brokers, focuses on industry-wide contingent commission matters. While admitting no wrongdoing, Gallagher chose to conclude its involvement rather than prolong what could be a costly and burdensome lawsuit. Subject to court approval, Gallagher's settlement of $28.0 million plus plaintiff's attorney fees resolves substantially all pending civil actions against the company related to those matters. In 2005, Gallagher established a provision for this matter that covered substantially all of the costs associated with this settlement. However, in the fourth quarter of 2006, Gallagher recorded a pretax charge of $9.0 million for administrative expenses related to the MDL and to resolve other regulatory and civil litigation matters. Gallagher continues to be the subject of various regulatory and legal actions by State Attorneys General and private litigants investigating various historical business practices.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Except for the historical information and discussions, statements contained herein may contain certain "forward-looking statements" relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets, as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, we have provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on our Web site at www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE JANUARY 2007
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information2004 through 2006
(Unauditedin millions except per share data and other information data) All information restated to reflect discontinued operations.
2004 2005 2006
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues $202.5 $223.3 $239.8 $254.6 $920.2 $225.3 $246.8 $264.1 $264.6 $1,000.8 $225.2 $270.1 $286.9 $288.5 $1,070.7
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 33.5 44.2 56.6 52.1 186.4 (8.5) 43.5 53.4 (13.2) 75.2 17.9 47.7 60.0 31.7 157.3
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 19.8 26.1 33.4 30.7 110.0 (7.0) 23.1 28.3 (11.5) 32.9 10.5 28.6 35.4 18.3 92.8
Growthrevenues excluding retail contingent commissions 9% 11% 9% 9% 9% 11% 11% 10% 4% 9% 0% 9% 9% 9% 10%
Pretax profit margin (1) 9% 17% 23% 18% 17% 5% 11% 20% 15% 13% 8% 17% 21% 16% 16%
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.21 $0.28 $0.35 $0.32 $1.16 $(0.07) $0.24 $0.29 $(0.12) $0.34 $0.11 $0.29 $0.36 $0.18 $0.94
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues $81.4 $86.0 $88.1 $90.0 $345.5 $91.6 $89.6 $94.3 $95.1 $370.6 $98.0 $98.4 $105.6 $99.3 $401.3
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 12.4 14.0 15.5 16.3 58.2 17.2 18.5 16.5 16.2 68.4 15.2 13.5 18.6 6.0 53.3
Earnings from continuing operations 7.6 8.5 9.5 9.9 35.5 10.1 10.9 9.7 9.6 40.3 9.0 8.2 11.3 3.5 32.0
Growthrevenues 18% 21% 17% 17% 18% 13% 4% 7% 6% 7% 7% 10% 12% 4% 8%
Pretax profit margin (1) 15% 16% 18% 18% 17% 19% 21% 18% 17% 18% 16% 14% 18% 9% 14%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $0.08 $0.09 $0.10 $0.10 $0.38 $0.11 $0.11 $0.10 $0.10 $0.42 $0.09 $0.08 $0.12 $0.04 $0.33
BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT COMBINED
Revenues $283.9 $309.3 $327.9 $344.6 $1,265.7 $316.9 $336.4 $358.4 $359.7 $1,371.4 $323.2 $368.5 $392.5 $387.8 $1,472.0
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 45.9 58.2 72.1 68.4 244.6 8.7 62.0 69.9 3.0 143.6 33.1 61.2 78.6 37.7 210.6
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 27.4 34.6 42.7 40.6 145.5 3.2 34.0 38.0 (2.0) 73.2 19.5 36.8 46.7 21.8 124.8
Growth-revenues 11% 14% 11% 11% 12% 12% 9% 9% 4% 8% 2% 10% 9% 9% 9%
Pretax profit margin (1) 11% 17% 22% 18% 17% 9% 16% 19% 16% 14% 10% 16% 20% 14% 15%
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.29 $0.37 $0.45 $0.43 $1.54 $0.03 $0.36 $0.39 $(0.02) $0.76 $0.20 $0.37 $0.48 $0.22 $1.27
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income $45.0 $57.3 $33.0 $27.9 $163.2 $30.0 $30.9 $31.0 $17.0 $108.9 $4.3 $5.5 $37.9 $39.4 $87.1
Investment gains (losses) 2.5 2.1 2.6 0.9 8.1 (0.1) 3.8 0.5 (0.6) 3.6 (3.4) (9.2) (12.5) (25.1)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 3.4 (0.3) (3.6) (6.8) (7.3) (133.4) (4.6) (4.3) (4.1) (146.4) (4.1) (13.5) (17.8) (22.1) (57.5)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 12.0 11.7 11.9 8.5 44.1 (76.8) 10.2 12.5 9.5 (44.6) (2.4) (0.2) 3.5 2.8 3.7
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.13 $0.12 $0.12 $0.09 $0.47 $(0.81) $0.11 $0.13 $0.10 $(0.46) $(0.02) $$0.03 $0.03 $0.04
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues $331.4 $368.7 $363.5 $373.4 $1,437.0 $346.8 $371.1 $389.9 $376.1 $1,483.9 $327.5 $370.6 $421.2 $414.7 s 1,534.0
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 49.3 57.9 68.5 61.6 237.3 (124.7) 57.4 65.6 (1.1) (2.8) 29.0 47.7 60.8 15.6 153.1
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 39.3 46.3 54.7 49.2 189.5 (73.6) 44.2 50.5 7.5 28.6 17.1 36.6 50.2 24.6 128.5
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $0.41 $0.49 $0.57 $0.52 $2.00 $(0.80) $0.46 $0.52 $0.08 $0.30 $0.17 $0.37 $0.51 $0.25 $1.31
Dividends declared per share $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $0.25 $1.00 $0.28 $0.28 $0.28 $0.28 $1.12 $0.30 $0.30 $0.30 $0.30 $1.20
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $2,873.0 $3,218.2 $3,085.0 $3,233.3 $3,227.7 $3,444.4 $3,444.4 $3,385.8 $3,389.5 $3,135.1 $3,638.3 $3,415.1 $3,420.1
Total liabilities $2,225.0 $2,521.4 $2,342.1 $2,472.3 $2,545.0 $2,701.5 $2,601.3 $2,620.4 $2,356.2 $2,837.1 $2,569.3 $2,601.3 $2,556.0
Total stockholders' equity $648.0 $696.8 $742.9 $761.0 $742.9 $7 $682.7 $784.5 $769.1 $778.9 $801.2 $845.8 $864.1
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 93,955 94,343 95,053 94,827 94,546 94,790 95,584 96,583 97,260 96,051 97,779 98,034 98,453 99,382 98,401
Common shares repurchased (000s) 555 615 613 1,783 59 11 6 76 18 431 10 706 1,165
Tangible net worth (2) $394.6 $427.5 $449.0 $386.8 $309.8 $342.6 $377.2 $350.9 $348.0 $348.0 $343.8 $364.7 $334.4
Bookvalue per share $7.14 $7.58 $8.04 $8.26 $7.33 $7.85 $8.24 $8.04 $8.05 $8.24 $8.62 $8.78
Tangible bookvalue per share (3) $4.35 $4.65 $4.86 $4.20 $3.32 $3.62 $3.96 $3.67 $3.60 $3.54 $3.72 $3.40
Annualized return on beginning tangible net worth (4) 37% 43% 47% 48% 48% NMF NMF 7% 8% 8% 20% 31% 39% 37% 37%
Number of acquisitions closed 7 3 4 5 19 2 5 1 2 10 1 4 3 3 11
Workforce (includes acquisitions) 6,958 7,180 7,451 7,840 7,975 8,052 8,099 8,135 8,248 8,358 8,469 8,757
Earnings (Loss) from Continuing Operations, Before Litigation and Contingent Commission Related Matters, Claims Handling Obligations, Investment (Gains) Losses, Medical and Pension Plan Changes, Depreciation, Amortization, and Stock Compensation Expense (5) Earnings (loss) from continuing operations $39.3 $46.3 $54.7 $49.2 $189.5 $(73.6) $44.2 $50.5 $7.5 $28.6 $17.1 $36.6 $50.2 $24.6 s 128.5
Litigation matters 166.0 38.6 204.6 9.0 9.0
Claims handling obligations 15.0 15.0
Investment (gains) losses (2.5) (2.1) (2.6) (0.9) (8.1) 0.1 (3.8) (0.5) 0.6 (3.6) 3.4 9.2 12.5 25.1
Medical and pension plan changes- (10.0) (10.0)- 7.5 7.5
Depreciation 8.0 8.5 8.2 8.0 32.7 8.5 9.0 8.1 7.1 32.7 7.4 7.5 8.9 8 31.8
Amortization 3.0 5.8 4.1 4.8 17.7 5.3 5.3 5.1 5.0 20.7 5.5 5.5 5.9 7.7 24.6
Non-cash stock compensation 3.3 4.0 3.9 4.4 15.6 4.9 3.4 3.8 4.0 16.1 6.1 7.8 5.4 5.3 24.6
Tax effect (4.7) (6.5) (5.4) (6.5) (23.1) (73.9) (1.6) (6.6) (28.1) (110.2) (7.6) (9.6) (11.8) (20.0) (49.0)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations, investment (gains) losses, medical and pension plan changes, depreciation, amortization and stock compensation expense (6) $46.4 $56.0 $62.9 $59.0 $224.3 $37.3 $46.5 $60.4 $49.7 $193.9 $28.5 $51.2 $67.8 $54.6 s 202.1
On a diluted per share basis $0.49 $0.59 $0.66 $0.62 $2.37 $0.39 $0.49 $0.63 $0.51 $2.02 $0.29 $0.52 $0.69 $0.55 s 2.05
(1) Represents pretax earnings (loss) from continuing operations before the impact of pretax retail contingent commission related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims handling obligations divided by total revenues, excluding retail contingent commissions.
(4) Represents year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity, less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets, as of the beginning of the year.
(5) Represents net earnings before the after-tax effect of the impact of litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations,investment gains (losses), medical and pension plan changes, amortization, amortization of deferred compensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE JANUARY 2007
 
WHY INVEST?
Total Revenues from
Continuing Operations**(in millions)
15% CAGR
$822
$998
$1,192
$1,403 $1,455
$1,532
$200
$400
$600
$800
$1,000
$1,200
$1,400
$1,600
01 02 03 04 05 06
Brokerage & Risk Management
Pretax Earnings from
Continuing Operations**(in millions)
15% CAGR
$132
$156
$184
$211
$193
$225
$50
$100
$150
$200
$250
01 02 03 04 05 06
Earnings from Continuing Operations Before
Litigation and Contingent Commission Related
Matters, Claims Handling Obligations,
Investment Gains (Losses), Medical and Pension
Plan Changes, Depreciation, Amortization
and Stock Compensation Expense (in millions)
$128
$163
$189
$224
$194
$202
15% CAGR
$50
$100
$150
$200
$250
$300
01 02 03 04 05 06
GAAP Book Value Per Share
$4.37
$5.96
$6.88
$8.26
$8.04
$8.78
14% CAGR
$1.00
$2.00
$3.00
$4.00
$5.00
$6.00
$7.00
$8.00
$9.00
$10.00
Dividends Per Share (restated for stock splits)
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
$0.05
$1.24*
19% Average Annual Increase
86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04 05 06 07
*Indicated-On January 18, 2007, Gallagher Board of Directors declared a $0.31 per share quarterly dividend.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Marsha J. AkinInvestor Relations | 630.773.3800
**All information as originally reported (excluding discontinued operations, litigation related matters, retail contingent commission
related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims handling obligations).
INVESTMENT PROFILE JANUARY 2007


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20070424164506.txt.gz
TIME:20070424164506
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On April 24, 2007, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's first quarter 2007 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

 
ITASCA, IL, April 24, 2007  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2007. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended March 31
 
 
Percentages used hereinafter are computed excluding retail contingent commission revenues. See notes to first quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 for information and reconciliations relating to certain non-GAAP information presented herein.
"Overall, I'm encouraged by 9% growth in both of our core segments, closing seven new brokerage acquisitions and posting a 16% margin in our Risk Management Segment," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer. "However, I'm not pleased with a 1.5% slippage in our Brokerage Segment's margins. Domestic P&C brokerage revenues and margins saw pressure from the ever-softening market and we continue to experience margin dilution from building out our global reinsurance brokerage unit. On the other hand, our employee benefits brokerage unit saw both excellent revenue growth and expanding margins. As we continue to build our global franchise, our sales and service teams are putting behind the distractions of 2005 and 2006. Every day, they are working hard to give our clients the highly valued advice and service they have come to expect from Gallagher for the last 80 years."
Brokerage Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Highlights (continued)
 
Risk Management Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
Information regarding IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal facilities follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
Corporate Debt
 
 
 
 
 
Effective Tax Rate
 
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, April 25, 2007 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in seven countries and does business in 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
See notes to first quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2007 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20070515171846.txt.gz
TIME:20070515171846
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
The slides containing information presented at the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 2007 Annual Stockholders' Meeting is attached hereto as an exhibit to this report and is incorporated herein in its entirety by this reference. This exhibit may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." This exhibit include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
99.1        Slides presented at the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 2007 Annual Stockholders' Meeting.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Exhibit 99.1
Welcome to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2007 Annual Stockholders' Meeting
Tuesday, May 15, 2007
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Please turn off all cell phones and PDAs at this time.
Thank you for your cooperation.
2
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Stockholders' Meeting
May 15, 2007
 -  Formal Annual Meeting
 -  Financial Results  2006
 -  10-Year Review
 -  Financial Results  1st Quarter 2007
 -  Segment Highlights
 -  Questions & Answers
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
ROBERT E. GALLAGHER 1923-2006
The employees of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. pay tribute to our Chairman, Robert E. Gallagher, who passed away on August 30, 2006.
A true leader, philanthropist and consummate insurance broker,
Bob was a source of inspiration to us all.
Over his 58 year career, he was instrumental in growing
a small Chicago insurance agency into a global, billion-dollar
enterprise while fostering a culture based on integrity,
client focus and teamwork.
We miss you, Bob, but you will always be with us.
Your vision will guide us and the values you instilled in our company
will continue to light our way.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
www.ajg.com
4
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Way
Shared values at AJGCo. are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value?
These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to.
What are some of AJGCo.'s Shared Values?
1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients.
2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another.
3. We push for professional excellence.
4. We can all improve and learn from one another.
5. There are no second class citizens - everyone is important and everybody's job is important.
6. We're an open society.
7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness.
8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital.
9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader.
15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other.
We are a team.
25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances - but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs.
When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.
Robert E. Gallagher - May, 1984
5
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Corporate Officer Retirements
 -  2006
 Nick Elsberg
 Brian King
 Warren Van der Voort
 -  2007
 Chris Greb
 Elizabeth Brinkerhoff
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
New Faces
 -  2006
 William Bax elected to Board of Directors
 David Ross appointed Corporate Vice President/Managing Director, London Brokerage Operations
 Dave Melchers hired as Corporate Vice President/Chief Information Officer
 -  2007
 Susan McGrath hired as Corporate Vice President/Chief Human Resource Officer
7
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Board of Directors
 -  William L. Bax
 -  T. Kimball Brooker
 -  Gary P. Coughlan
 -  Ilene S. Gordon
 -  Elbert O. Hand
 -  David S. Johnson
 -  Kay W. McCurdy
 -  James R. Wimmer
Past CEO  A. James Gallagher, Jr.
8
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Formal Annual Meeting
2007
9
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Stockholders' Meeting
May 15, 2007
 -  Formal Annual Meeting
 -  Financial Results  2006
10
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; alternative insurance markets continue to grow, which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of such laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain matters described above, see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006.
11
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2006 and 2005 were adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations and to eliminate the impact of medical and pension plan changes. Charges in 2006 related to retail contingent commission related matters and medical plan changes totaled $9.0 million (or $5.4 million after tax) and $7.5 million (or $4.5 million after tax), respectively. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $15.0 million (or $9.8 million after tax), respectively. In addition, Gallagher recognized a pension curtailment gain of $10.0 million (or $6.0 million after tax) in 2005. There were no such charges or gains in 2001 to 2004. These adjustments, which Gallagher believes are for non-recurring items, were made to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2006 and 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations and medical and pension plan changes. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation.
Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
12
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Financial Results  2006
(in millions, except per share and employee data)
2006 2005 Change
Total revenues $1,534.0 $1,483.9 $50.1
Pretax earnings from continuing operations before litigation and retail contingent commission matters, claims handling obligations, and medical and pension plan changes $167.1 $178.0 ($10.9)
Amounts related to litigation and retail contingent commission matters, claims handling obligations, and medical and pension plan changes ($14.0 ) ($180.8) $166.8
Pretax earnings (loss) from continuing operations $153.1($2.8) $155.9
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
13
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Financial Results  2006
(in millions, except per share and employee data)
2006 2005 Change
Earnings from continuing operations $128.5 $28.6 $99.9
Earnings (loss) from discontinued operations  $2.2 ($2.2 )
Net earnings $128.5 $30.8 $97.7
Diluted net earnings per share $1.31 $.32 $.99
Dividends per share $1.20 $1.12 $.08
Number of employees at year-end 8,757 8,135 622
Total revenues per employee $175,000 $179,000 ($4,000)
Return on beginning stockholders' equity 18% 19% (1%)
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
14
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Financial Results  2006 Brokerage & Risk Management Before Retail Contingent Commission Matters, Claims Handling Obligations, and Medical and Pension Plan Changes*
(in millions, except per share and employee data)
2006 2005 Change
Total revenues* $1,469.5 $1,342.6 $126.9
Pretax earnings from continuing operations* $224.6 $193.4 $31.2
Earnings from continuing operations* $133.2 $103.9 $29.3
Diluted earnings from continuing operations per share* $1.35 $1.08 $.27
Number of employees at year-end 8,757 8,135 622
Total revenues per employee* $168,000 $165,000 $3,000
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
15
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2006 Recap
 -  Brokerage
 Developed a new business model
 Revenue growth of 10%  pretax earnings growth of 31%
 Internal revenue growth of 6%
 Improved pretax margins by 2.5%
 Closed 11 acquisitions  annualized revenues of $54M
 -  Risk Management
 Revenue growth of 8%  pretax margins of 14%
 Lower than expected claim frequency  industry trend
 -  Financial Services
 Nearing end of investment disposal process
 -  15th straight year of dividend increases
 -  Repurchased 1.2 million shares
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
16
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Federal Class Action
 -  Impacts most other brokers and insurers
 -  Announced settlement of our portion  December 29, 2006
 -  Avoids substantial future costs/distractions
 -  Client letters go out in May 2007
 -  Claim filing deadline  November 2007
 -  Payments to client claims in December 2007
 -  Done
17
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Companywide, we produced more than $198 million, excluding acquisitions, in new business in 2006!
18
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Training and Development
 -  College Internship Program
 150 participants in 2006
 Expect more than 150 in 2007
 -  Executive Development Program (launched in 2000)
 -  Corporate Training Department
 Classroom; online, instructor-led; and online, self-paced training
 New Learning Management System now being rolled out
 -  Automates and streamlines processes and workload
 -  Creates central repository for training and learning objects
19
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Where We're Going
 -  Revenue and pretax growth of 15% per year
 -  Target enterprise-wide margin expansion to 20+%
 -  Solid organic growth
 -  Maximize shareholder returns through dividends and stock repurchases
20
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Market Conditions
 -  CIAB Market Survey indicated rate reductions on commercial P/C accounts throughout 2006, averaging about 10% in fourth quarter
 -  Exception was coastal and earthquake-exposed properties, which faced rate increases, higher deductibles and coverage restrictions
 -  In first quarter 2007, competition intensified, with premium reductions averaging more than 11% and no worsening of catastrophe-exposed property rates
21
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Stockholders' Meeting
May 15, 2007
 -  Formal Annual Meeting
 -  Financial Results  2006
 -  10-Year Review
22
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Total Revenues
(in millions)
UP 165%
$1,531.5
2006
$577.1
1997
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
23
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Pretax Earnings from Continuing Operations
UP 110%
$167.1
2006
Before Retail Contingent Commission Matters and Medical Plan Changes
(in millions)
$79.4
1997
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
24
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Earnings from Continuing Operations
Before Retail Contingent Commission Matters and Medical Plan Changes
(in millions)
$54.1
1997
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
UP 153%
$136.9
2006
25
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Total Revenues Per Employee
$123,000
1997
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
UP 42%
$175,000
2006
26
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Annual Dividends Per Share
$.31
1997
UP 287%
$1.20
2006
27
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Stock Price Per Share
As of December 31
$8.61
1997
UP 243%
$29.55
2006
28
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Market Capitalization
As of December 31
$571M
1997
UP 408%
$2.9B
2006
29
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Why Invest?
Since 1990, $1.9 Billion Cash Flow from Ops
Dividends Paid
($642 M)
Reinvested in Operations
($735 M)
Shares Repurchased
($477 M)
Balance sheet with $3.40 in tangible net worth per share and low corporate debt
As of 12/31/06
Excludes cash payments made regarding special items discussed in non-GAAP measures
30
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
23 Year Growth Story
1984 IPO
Dec 31, 2006
Stock Price $1.72 $29.55 Market Cap $57M $2.9B Tangible Net Worth $23M $334M Annual Dividend/Share $.03 $1.24*
Including Dividend Reinvestment, Compound Annual Growth Rate of 19%
* Indicated annual dividend for 2007
31
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Stockholders' Meeting
May 15, 2007
 -  Formal Annual Meeting
 -  Financial Results  2006
 -  10-Year Review
 -  Financial Results  1st Quarter 2007
32
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Financial Results  1Q 2007
(in millions, except per share data)
2007 2006 Change
Total revenues $388.2 $327.5 $60.7
Pretax earnings from continuing operations $21.5 $29.0 ($7.5)
Provision for income taxes $1.7 $11.9 ($10.2)
Earnings from continuing operations $19.8 $17.1 $2.7
Diluted net earnings per share $.20 $.17 $.03
Dividends per share $.31 $.30 $.01
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
33
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Segment Results 1Q 2007
(in millions, except per share data)
Brokerage Segment (from continuing operations and excluding retail contingent commission matters)
2007 2006 Change %
Total revenues $245.2 $224.2 $21.0 9%
Pretax earnings $14.7 $16.9 ($2.2) (13%)
Pretax profit margin 6% 8% (2%) (25%)
Risk Management Segment
2007 2006 Change %
Total revenues $106.8 $98.0 $8.8 9%
Pretax earnings $16.7 $15.2 $1.5 10%
Pretax profit margin 16% 16% % %
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
34
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
1Q 2007  Overview
 -  Brokerage
 1% internal revenue growth in a very soft market
 Closed 7 acquisitions  Annualized revenues of $39.5M
 Revenue growth and expanding margins in Employee Benefits Brokerage unit
 -  Risk Management
 Good start for GB
 Strong new business, domestic and international
 -  Overall effective tax rate of 8% for 1Q 07 vs 41% in 1Q 06
 -  January 2007  increased dividend 3%
35
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Stockholders' Meeting
May 15, 2007
 -  Formal Annual Meeting
 -  Financial Results  2006
 -  10-Year Review
 -  Financial Results  1st Quarter 2007
 -  Segment Highlights
36
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
2006
Total Revenues
Pretax Earnings
Brokerage
69%
Brokerage
88%
Financial
Services
5%
Risk Management
26%
Financial
Services
(17)%
Risk Management
29%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
37
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Three Distinct Segments
 -  Brokerage
 North America Retail P/C (U.S. and Canada)
 Captive Management  Domestic, Bermuda and Grand Cayman
 U.S. Wholesale, MGA & MGU
 London Retail and Wholesale
 Reinsurance  U.S. and International
 International Strategic Alliance Network
 U.S. Employee Benefits
 -  Risk Management  Gallagher Bassett
 U.S. Claims Management
 International Claims Management
 -  Financial Services
38
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brokerage Segment
Growth & Profits (in millions)
16% CAGR
1,100 900 700 500 300 100
$559 2001 $1,068 2006
Total Revenues*
 -  2006 pretax margins of 16%
15% CAGR
200 150 100 50 0
$103 2001 $168 2006
Pretax Earnings*
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
39
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
North America Retail P/C
 -  Matrix Operating Structure
 Retail Branches
 Niche/Practice Groups
40
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
North America Retail P/C  Niche/Practice Groups
(represents approximately 75% of business)
 -  Aviation
 -  Captives
 -  Casualty
 -  Construction
 -  Construction Project Solutions (Wrap Ups)
 -  Energy
 -  Fine Arts
 -  Food & Fiber / Agribusiness
 -  Global Risk Management
 -  Healthcare
 -  Higher Education
 -  Marine
 -  Personal Insurance
 -  Property
 -  Public Entity
 -  Real Estate
 General Commercial
 Habitational
 Hospitality
 Shopping Centers
 -  Religious/Nonprofit
 -  Restaurant
 -  Services
 Actuarial
 Claim Advocacy
 Loss Control
 -  Strategic Risk Services
 CyberRisk Services
 Environmental
 Financial Products
 Lawyers Professional
 Management Liability
 Private Equity
 -  Tech and Telecom
 -  Transportation
 -  Worldwide Risk Services
41
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Captive Management
 -  Artex Risk Solutions, Inc.
 Formed at beginning of 2007
 Single, unified brand dedicated to alternative risk transfer industry
 Combines Arthur J. Gallagher (Bermuda), Innovative Risk Services and Gallagher Captive Services with captive management units in Bermuda, Grand Cayman, Hawaii and Vermont
42
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
North America Retail P/C  Acquisitions
2006
 -  Adams & Associates International, Ltd.
 -  Commonwealth Premium Finance Corporation
 -  Robert Keith & Associates, Inc.
 -  S. P. Tarantino Insurance Brokerage, Inc.
 -  William H. Connolly & Co.
2007
 -  Fishermans Insurance Services, Inc.
 -  InterNational Insurance Group, Ltd.
 -  Lowndes Lambert Group Canada, Ltd.
 Gives us a retail presence throughout Canada
 -  Melton Insurance Associates, Inc.
 -  Tropp & Company, Inc.
43
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
U. S. Wholesale
 -  Risk Placement Services
 Formed from scratch in 1997
 One of the largest wholesale brokers in U.S.
 Much of business generated by producers outside Gallagher network
44
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
U.S. Wholesale  Acquisitions
2006
 -  Lemac & Associates, Inc.
 -  Sobieski & Bradley, Inc.
2007
 -  ISG International, Inc.
45
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
International Retail & Wholesale P/C
 -  Gallagher Global Risks
 Lloyd's Broker
 London and International
 -  Risk Management Partners
 Public Entity Business
 England and Scotland
 -  Arthur J. Gallagher Australasia
 Retail and Wholesale
 Australia and New Zealand
46
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Reinsurance Brokerage
 -  All reinsurance brokerage operations worldwide operate under brand name Gallagher Re, Inc.
 -  Offices in U.S., U.K., Bermuda, Australia, Singapore and Beijing
 -  Announced agreement with NYMEX in Dec. 2006 to list Property Damage Risk futures and options contracts
47
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
International Strategic Alliance Network
 -  Non-owned network of leading independent brokers
 Offers flexibility in choosing best broker for client
 Account can be moved if not handled properly
 -  More than 100 countries around the world
 -  Combined with owned offices, provides comprehensive, worldwide sales and service network
48
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
U.S. Employee Benefits
Capabilities
 -  Employee Benefits Brokerage/Consulting
 -  Actuarial Services/Predictive Modeling
 -  Healthcare Data Analysis and Claims Benchmarking
 -  Pharmacy/Rx Consulting Services
 -  Legislative Compliance Support
 -  Employee Communications Tools/Resources
 -  Executive Benefits/Financial Planning
 -  Human Resources Consulting Services
 -  Compensation Program Design/Analysis
 -  Retirement Plan Services
 -  International Benefits Resources
49
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
U.S. Employee Benefits
Growth Focus
 -  Niche marketing (7 niches)
 -  Cross-selling opportunities with North America Retail
 -  Merger & acquisition opportunities
 -  Assisting clients/prospects with 4 top priorities
 Controlling health and welfare costs
 Providing better retirement tools/information
 Benefits communication and administration
 Compliance with federal and state regulations
50
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Employee Benefits Brokerage
Acquisitions
2006
 -  Benefit Management Group, Inc.
 -  Mid America Group, Inc.
 -  The Rains Group, Inc.
 -  Y.S. Liedman & Associates
2007
 -  Financial Profiles, Inc.
 -  Elite Benefits Insurance Marketing Services, Inc.
 -  The Producer's Choice, Inc.
51
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Risk Management Segment  Gallagher Bassett
Growth & Profits (in millions)
12% CAGR
$500 $400 $300 $200 $100 $0
$232 2001 $401 2006
Total Revenues*
 -  2006 pretax margin of 14%
12% CAGR
$80 $70 $60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
$29 2001 $56 2006
Pretax Earnings*
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
52
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Gallagher Bassett
World's largest P/C claims administrator in 2006, according to Business Insurance magazine
53
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Gallagher Bassett  Capabilities
 -  Real-Time Claims Reporting
 -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
 -  Appraisal Services
 -  Litigation Management
 -  Information Management
 -  Managed Care Services
 -  Loss Control Services
 -  Safety Programs
 -  Settlement Management
 -  Education and Training
54
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Gallagher Bassett  Strengths
 -  Demand for unbundled claims management services remains strong in U.S. and abroad
 -  The low-cost, high-quality provider
 -  Cost of building infrastructure a barrier to entry for new players
 -  Terrific growth potential
55
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Gallagher Bassett  Strengths
Risxfacs.com
 -  Customizable, real-time reports
 -  Averaging 21 million site hits per month
 -  Averaging 75,600 visitor sessions per month
 -  15,000 users  growing monthly
56
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Gallagher Bassett  Strengths
International
 -  Offices in England (5), Scotland (2), Australia (5) and Canada (1)
 -  More than 15% of workforce outside U.S. at year-end 2006
 -  International revenues up 54% in 2006
 -  5-year average growth of 21%
 -  Growing UK commercial business  should represent more than 50% of international revenues by year-end 2007
57
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Gallagher Bassett
Growth Focus
 -  Fortune 1,000 companies
 -  Outsourcing of insurance company claims departments
 -  Captives
 -  Program business
 -  Expanding global opportunities
58
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
This slide intentionally blank
Contained client copyright-protected logos
59
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Financial Services Segment
 -  Segment in run-off mode since 2002
 -  Sold ownership in:
 Home office building
 Low income housing developer
 Airplane leasing company
 -  Eliminated substantially all investment-related debt
 -  Continue to monetize asset management investment
 -  Current uncertainty with coal investments
 Purchased financial hedge on 1/17/07
 Regardless, law expires end of 2007
Future cash flows will be used to buy brokers, pay dividends and repurchase stock
60
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Financial Services Segment
Net Assets
and Financial Guarantees*
$400 $350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
$362 2002
$89 2006*
$ In Millions
*As of 12/31/06
Net Assets*
$60 $50 $40 $30 $20 $10 $0
Tax Adv Asset Mgmt Other
Low Income Housing $3M
Alternative Energy $43M
Asset Alliance $28M
Other $8M
61
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
A Growth Company
62
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brokerage & Risk Management Total Revenues from Continuing Operations*
(in millions)
$1,600 $1,400 $1,200 $1,000 $800 $600 $400
15% CAGR
$791 $961 $1,103 $1,232 $1,343 $1,470
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
63
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings from Continuing Operations*
15% CAGR
$250 $200 $150 $100 $50
$132 $156 $184 $211 $193 $225
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
64
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Shareholder Value
Brokerage & Risk Management Diluted Earnings Per Share from Continuing Operations Excluding Retail Contingent Commission Matters and Nonrecurring Items*
11% CAGR
$1.80 $1.60 $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
$0.88 $1.02 $1.19 $1.32 $1.08 $1.35
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
65
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brokerage & Risk Management Earnings Before Retail Contingent Commissions Matters, Claims-Handling Obligations, Medical and Pension Plan Changes, Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense*
13% CAGR
$250 $200 $150 $100 $50
$100 $124 $151 $178 $155 $179
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures
66
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Dividends Per Share
(restated for stock splits)
19% Average Annual Increase
$1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
1986 $1.24* 2007
* Indicated annual dividend for 2007
67
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Questions & Answers
68
 
2007 Annual Stockholders' Meeting
Tuesday, May 15, 2007


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20070724164549.txt.gz
TIME:20070724164549
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On July 24, 2007, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's second quarter 2007 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, July 24, 2007  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and six months ended June 30, 2007. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended June 30
 
Percentages used hereinafter are computed excluding retail contingent commission revenues. See notes to second quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 for information and reconciliations relating to certain non-GAAP information presented herein.
"I'm pleased with our second quarter results. Our combined Brokerage and Risk Management Segments grew revenues 13%, grew pretax earnings 19% and improved our pretax margin by nearly a full point. In addition, during the quarter we repurchased 4.2 million shares of our stock and today we announce that the Board reauthorized another 7 million share repurchase program," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer. "In particular, I'm extremely pleased with the results of our Brokerage Segment. Even with the continued downward pressure on insurance
 
pricing, this Segment had 5% organic revenue growth, closed four new brokerage acquisitions and increased margins 1.2 points to 19%. During the quarter our domestic P/C retail margins improved, our wholesale brokerage revenues grew nicely, our employee benefits brokerage unit continued to have excellent revenue growth and expanding margins, and our international operations are growing well. Despite strong revenue growth, our Risk Management Segment saw margin pressure from increased costs to service new business."
Reauthorization of Stock Repurchase Plan
 
Brokerage Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
Information regarding IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal facilities follows:
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Corporate Debt
 
 
 
 
 
Effective Tax Rate
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 25, 2007 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in eight countries and does business in 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of our Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2007 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20070803153930.txt.gz
TIME:20070803153930
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On August 3, 2007, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) entered into a Note Purchase Agreement (the Purchase Agreement) with certain accredited institutional investors (collectively, the Purchasers), pursuant to which Gallagher issued and sold to the Purchasers $100 million aggregate principal amount of Gallagher's 6.26% Senior Notes, Series A, due August 3, 2014 (the Series A Notes) and $300 million aggregate principal amount of Gallagher's 6.44% Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017 (the Series B Notes and, together with the Series A Notes, the Notes) in a private placement.
Under the terms of the Purchase Agreement, the Notes are redeemable by Gallagher at any time, in whole or in part, at 100% of the principal amount of such Note being redeemed, together with accrued and unpaid interest and a "make-whole amount" (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) with respect to each Note.
The Purchase Agreement contains customary provisions for transactions of this type, including representations and warranties regarding Gallagher and its subsidiaries and various covenants, including covenants that require Gallagher to maintain specified financial ratios. The Purchase Agreement provides for customary events of default, generally with corresponding grace periods, including, without limitation, payment defaults with respect to the Notes, covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other agreements evidencing indebtedness of Gallagher or its subsidiaries, certain judgments against Gallagher or its subsidiaries and events of bankruptcy involving Gallagher or its material subsidiaries.
The Notes are senior unsecured obligations of Gallagher and rank equal in right of payment with all other senior unsecured indebtedness of Gallagher and are unconditionally guaranteed by several of Gallagher's wholly-owned domestic subsidiaries.
The terms of the Notes were established pursuant to the Purchase Agreement, a copy of which is filed herewith as Exhibit 4.1. A copy of the form of each series of the Notes is filed herewith as Exhibit 4.2. Additional information pertaining to the Notes is contained in Item 2.03 of this report and is incorporated into this Item 1.01 by reference.
The Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the Securities Act). Gallagher offered and sold the Notes to the Purchasers pursuant to an exemption from registration provided by Section 4(2) of the Securities Act in reliance in part on representations made by the Purchasers in the Purchase Agreement.
 
On August 3, 2007, Gallagher issued $100 million aggregate principal amount of the Series A Notes and $300 million aggregate principal amount of the Series B Notes pursuant to the terms of the Purchase Agreement (described in Item 1.01 of this report).
The significant terms of the Notes are as follows:
 
The Series A Notes will bear interest at a rate of 6.26% per year. Interest on the Series A Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on February 3 and August 3 of each year, beginning on February 3, 2008. The Series B Notes will bear interest at a rate of 6.44% per year. Interest on the Series A Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on February 3 and August 3 of each year, beginning on February 3, 2008.
Interest -
The Notes are senior unsecured obligations of Gallagher and rank equal in right of payment with all other senior unsecured indebtedness of Gallagher.
Ranking -
The Notes are unconditionally guaranteed by several of Gallagher's wholly-owned domestic subsidiaries.
Guaranty -
The Notes are redeemable by Gallagher at any time, in whole or in part, at 100% of the principal amount of such Note being redeemed, together with interest thereon and a "make-whole amount" (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) with respect to each Note.
Redemption by Gallagher -
If within 90 days after a "change in control" Gallagher (or its successor) does not have an "investment grade rating", Gallagher is obligated to offer to prepay all of the outstanding Notes at the principal amount thereof plus accrued interest (but without any "make-whole amount") (as each term is defined in the Note Purchase Agreement).
Repurchase of the Notes at the Option of Holders upon Change in Control -
The information contained in Item 1.01 of this report is incorporated into this Item 2.03 by reference.
The description of each of the Purchase Agreement and Notes in this report is a summary and is qualified in its entirety by reference to Exhibits 4.1 and 4.2.
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Dated as of August 3, 2007
T E P L
O
ACH
OF
THE
URCHASERS
ISTED
IN
S A H:
CHEDULE
ERETO
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), agrees with each of the purchasers whose names appear at the end hereof (each, a and, collectively, the ) as follows:
"Company"
"Purchaser"
"Purchasers"
S 1. A N.
ECTION
UTHORIZATION
OF
OTES
The Company will authorize the issue and sale of (a) $100,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 6.26% Senior Notes, Series A, due August 3, 2014 (the ) and (b) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 6.44% Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017 (the ; the Series A Notes and the Series B Notes are hereinafter collectively referred to as the such term to include any such notes issued in substitution therefor pursuant to ). The Notes shall be substantially in the form set out in and, respectively. Certain capitalized and other terms used in this Agreement are defined in ; and references to a "" or an are, unless otherwise specified, to a Schedule or an Exhibit attached to this Agreement.
"Series A Notes"
"Series B Notes"
"Notes,"
Section 13
Exhibit 1-A
Exhibit 1-B
Schedule B
Schedule
"Exhibit"
S 2. S P N.
ECTION
ALE
AND
URCHASE
OF
OTES
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company will issue and sell to each Purchaser and each Purchaser will purchase from the Company, at the Closing provided for in , Notes in the principal amount and in the series specified opposite such Purchaser's name in at the purchase price of 100% of the principal amount thereof. The Purchasers' obligations hereunder are several and not joint obligations and no Purchaser shall have any liability to any Person for the performance or non-performance of any obligation by any other Purchaser hereunder.
Section 2.1. Purchase and Sale of Notes.
Section 3
Schedule A
(a) The payment by the Company of all amounts due with respect to the Notes and the performance by the Company of its obligations under this Agreement will be absolutely and unconditionally guaranteed by each of the Material Wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiaries listed on (together with any additional Material Wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary which delivers a guaranty pursuant to , the ) pursuant to the guaranty agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (as the same may be amended, modified, extended or renewed, the ).
Section 2.2. Subsidiary Guaranties.
Schedule 2.2
Section 9.7
"Subsidiary Guarantors"
Exhibit 2.2(a)
"Subsidiary Guaranty"
(b) The holders of the Notes acknowledge and agree that any Subsidiary Guarantor shall be automatically discharged and released from the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party pursuant to the written request of the Company, that (i) such Subsidiary Guarantor has been released and discharged as an obligor and guarantor under and in respect of all Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement and the Company so certifies to the holders of the Notes in a certificate which accompanies such request for release and discharge, (ii) any such release and discharge shall be expressly conditioned upon receipt by the holders of the Notes of a written agreement executed by the Subsidiary Guarantor to be released pursuant to which such Subsidiary Guarantor shall agree that if, for any reason whatsoever, it thereafter becomes an obligor or guarantor under and in respect of any Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement, then such Subsidiary Guarantor shall contemporaneously provide written notice thereof to the holders of the Notes accompanied by an executed Subsidiary Guaranty or Guaranty Supplement of such Subsidiary Guarantor, and (iii) at the time of such release and discharge, the Company shall deliver a certificate of a Responsible Officer to the holders of the Notes to the effect that no Default or Event of Default exists.
provided
(c) The Company agrees that it will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary or Affiliate to, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration or remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, to any creditor of the Company or of any Subsidiary Guarantor as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any such creditor of any release or discharge of any Subsidiary Guarantor with respect to any liability of such Subsidiary Guarantor as an obligor or guarantor under or in respect of Indebtedness of the Company, unless such consideration or remuneration is concurrently paid, on the same terms, ratably to the holders of all of the Notes then outstanding.
S 3C.
ECTION
.
LOSING
The sale and purchase of the Notes to be purchased by each Purchaser shall occur at the offices of Chapman and Cutler LLP, 111 West Monroe Street, Chicago, Illinois 60603, at 10:00 .. Chicago time, at a closing (the ) on August 3, 2007 or on such other Business Day thereafter on or prior to August 31, 2007 as may be agreed upon by the Company and the Purchasers. At the Closing, the Company will deliver to each Purchaser the Notes of the series to be purchased by such Purchaser in the form of a single Note (or such greater number of Notes in denominations of at least $100,000 as such Purchaser may request) dated the date of the Closing and registered in such Purchaser's name (or in the name of its nominee), against delivery by such Purchaser to the Company or its order of immediately available funds in the amount of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of immediately available funds for the account of the Company to account number 265-977-9, Account Name: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.  Delaware Dividend Account, at Harris N.A., Chicago, IL (ABA No.: 071-000-288). If at the Closing the Company shall fail to tender such Notes to any Purchaser as provided above in this , or any of the conditions specified in shall not have been fulfilled to such Purchaser's satisfaction, such Purchaser shall, at its election, be relieved of all further obligations under this Agreement, without thereby waiving any rights such Purchaser may have by reason of such failure or such nonfulfillment.
A
M
"Closing"
Section 3
Section 4
 
S 4. C C.
ECTION
ONDITIONS
TO
LOSING
Each Purchaser's obligation to purchase and pay for the Notes to be sold to such Purchaser at the Closing is subject to the fulfillment to such Purchaser's satisfaction, prior to or at the Closing, of the following conditions:
. (a) The representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement shall be correct when made and at the time of the Closing.
Section 4.1. Representations and Warranties
(b) The representations and warranties of each Subsidiary Guarantor in the Subsidiary Guaranty shall be correct when made and at the time of Closing.
. (a) The Company shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in this Agreement required to be performed or complied with by it prior to or at the Closing, and after giving effect to the issue and sale of the Notes (and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated by ), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 4.2. Performance; No Default
Section 5.14
(b) Each Subsidiary Guarantor shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in the Subsidiary Guaranty required to be performed and complied with by it prior to or at the Closing.
.
Section 4.3. Compliance Certificates
(a) . The Company shall have delivered to such Purchaser an Officer's Certificate, dated the date of the Closing, certifying that the conditions specified in , and have been fulfilled.
Officer's Certificate
Sections 4.1(a)
4.2(a)
4.9
(b) Each Subsidiary Guarantor shall have delivered to such Purchaser a certificate of an authorized officer, dated the date of the Closing, certifying that the conditions set forth in , and have been fulfilled.
Subsidiary Guarantor Officer's Certificate.
Section 4.1(b)
4.2(b)
4.9
(c) . The Company shall have delivered to such Purchaser a certificate of its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, dated the date of Closing, certifying as to the resolutions attached thereto and other corporate proceedings relating to the authorization, execution and delivery of the Notes and this Agreement.
Secretary's Certificate
(d) . Each Subsidiary Guarantor shall have delivered to such Purchaser a certificate of its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, dated the date of Closing, certifying as to the resolutions attached thereto and other corporate proceedings relating to the authorization, execution and delivery of the Subsidiary Guaranty.
Subsidiary Guarantor Secretary's Certificate
 
. Such Purchaser shall have received opinions in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser, dated the date of the Closing (a) from Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors, covering the matters set forth in and covering such other matters incident to the transactions contemplated hereby as such Purchaser or its counsel may reasonably request (and the Company hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) (b) from Walter D. Bay, Esq., General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, covering the matters set forth in and covering such other matters incident to the transactions contemplated hereby as such Purchaser or its counsel may reasonably request (and the Company hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) and (c) from Chapman and Cutler LLP, the Purchasers' special counsel in connection with such transactions, substantially in the form set forth in and covering such other matters incident to such transactions as such Purchaser may reasonably request.
Section 4.4. Opinions of Counsel
Exhibit 4.4(a)
Exhibit 4.4(b)
Exhibit 4.4(c)
. On the date of the Closing such Purchaser's purchase of Notes shall (a) be permitted by the laws and regulations of each jurisdiction to which such Purchaser is subject, without recourse to provisions (such as section 1405(a)(8) of the New York Insurance Law) permitting limited investments by insurance companies without restriction as to the character of the particular investment, (b) not violate any applicable law or regulation (including, without limitation, Regulation T, U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) and (c) not subject such Purchaser to any tax, penalty or liability under or pursuant to any applicable law or regulation, which law or regulation was not in effect on the date hereof. If requested by such Purchaser, such Purchaser shall have received an Officer's Certificate certifying as to such matters of fact as such Purchaser may reasonably specify to enable such Purchaser to determine whether such purchase is so permitted.
Section 4.5. Purchase Permitted by Applicable Law, Etc
. Contemporaneously with the Closing, the Company shall sell to each other Purchaser, and each other Purchaser shall purchase, the Notes to be purchased by it at the Closing as specified in .
Section 4.6. Sale of Other Notes
Schedule A
. Without limiting the provisions of , the Company shall have paid on or before the Closing the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of the Purchasers' special counsel referred to in to the extent reflected in a statement of such counsel rendered to the Company at least one Business Day prior to the Closing.
Section 4.7. Payment of Special Counsel Fees
Section 15.1
Section 4.4
. A Private Placement Number issued by Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau (in cooperation with the Securities Valuation Office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) shall have been obtained for each series of the Notes.
Section 4.8. Private Placement Number
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary Guarantor shall have changed its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization, as applicable, or been a party to any merger or consolidation or succeeded to all or any substantial part of the liabilities of any other entity, at any time following the date of the most recent financial statements referred to in .
Section 4.9. Changes in Corporate Structure
Schedule 5.5
 
At least three Business Days prior to the date of the Closing, each Purchaser shall have received written instructions signed by a Responsible Officer on letterhead of the Company confirming the information specified in including (a) the name and address of the transferee bank, (b) such transferee bank's ABA number and (c) the account name and number into which the purchase price for the Notes is to be deposited.
Section 4.10. Funding Instructions.
Section 3
. All corporate and other proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and all documents and instruments incident to such transactions shall be reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser and its special counsel, and such Purchaser and its special counsel shall have received all such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as such Purchaser or such special counsel may reasonably request.
Section 4.11. Proceedings and Documents
S 5R W C.
ECTION
.
EPRESENTATIONS
AND
ARRANTIES
OF
THE
OMPANY
The Company represents and warrants to each Purchaser that:
. The Company is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The Company has the corporate power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Notes and to perform the provisions hereof and thereof.
Section 5.1. Organization; Power and Authority
. This Agreement and the Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company, and this Agreement constitutes, and upon execution and delivery thereof each Note will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (a) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (b) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Section 5.2. Authorization, Etc
. The Company, through its agents, BMO Capital Markets and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., has delivered to each Purchaser a copy of a Private Placement Memorandum, dated July 2007 (such Private Placement Memorandum, together with the Exhibits thereto, the ), relating to the transactions contemplated hereby. The Memorandum fairly describes, in all material respects, the general nature of the business and principal properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries. This Agreement, the Memorandum and the documents, certificates or other writings delivered to the Purchasers by or on behalf of the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and identified in , and the financial statements listed in (this Agreement, the Memorandum and such documents, certificates or other writings and such financial statements
Section 5.3. Disclosure
"Memorandum"
Schedule 5.3
Schedule 5.5
 
delivered to each Purchaser prior to July 30, 2007 being referred to, collectively, as the ), taken as a whole, do not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in light of the circumstances under which they were made. Since December 31, 2006, there has been no change in the financial condition, operations, business, properties or prospects of the Company or any Subsidiary except changes that individually or in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There is no fact known to the Company that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect that has not been set forth herein or in the Disclosure Documents.
"Disclosure Documents"
. (a)  contains (except as noted therein) complete and correct lists (i) of the Company's Subsidiaries, showing, as to each Subsidiary, the correct name thereof, the jurisdiction of its organization, and the percentage of shares of each class of its capital stock or similar equity interests outstanding owned by the Company and each other Subsidiary, (ii) of the Company's Affiliates, other than Subsidiaries, and (iii) of the Company's directors and senior officers.
Section 5.4. Organization and Ownership of Shares of Subsidiaries; Affiliates
Schedule 5.4
(b) All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of each Subsidiary shown in as being owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries have been validly issued, are (in the case of capital stock) fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Company or another Subsidiary free and clear of any Lien (except as otherwise disclosed in ).
Schedule 5.4
Schedule 5.4 or Schedule 5.15
(c) Each Subsidiary identified in is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each such Subsidiary has the corporate or other power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease and to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact other than that which could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule 5.4
(d) No Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to, any legal, regulatory, contractual or other restriction (other than this Agreement, the agreements listed on and limitations imposed by law) restricting the ability of such Subsidiary to pay dividends out of profits or make any other similar distributions of profits to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that owns outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of such Subsidiary.
Schedule 5.4
The Company has delivered to each Purchaser copies of the financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries listed on . All of said financial statements (including in each case the related schedules and notes) fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the respective dates specified in such financial statements and the
Section 5.5. Financial Statements; Material Liabilities.
Schedule 5.5
 
consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the respective periods so specified and have been prepared in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the periods involved except as set forth in the notes thereto (subject, in the case of any interim financial statements, to normal year-end adjustments). To the knowledge of the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries do not have any Material liabilities that are not disclosed on such financial statements or otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Documents.
. The execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the Notes will not (a) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of the Company or any Subsidiary under, any Material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, corporate charter or by-laws, or any other Material agreement or instrument to which the Company or any Subsidiary is bound or by which the Company or any Subsidiary or any of their respective properties may be bound or affected, (b) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to the Company or any Subsidiary or (c) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to the Company or any Subsidiary.
Section 5.6. Compliance with Laws, Other Instruments, Etc
. No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by the Company of this Agreement or the Notes.
Section 5.7. Governmental Authorizations, Etc
(a) Except as disclosed in the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006 or the Company's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007, there are no actions, suits, investigations or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary or any property of the Company or any Subsidiary in any court or before any arbitrator of any kind or before or by any Governmental Authority that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.8. Litigation; Observance of Agreements, Statutes and Orders.
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default under any term of any agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it is bound, or any order, judgment, decree or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority or is in violation of any applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation (including without limitation Environmental Laws or the USA Patriot Act) of any Governmental Authority, which default or violation, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have filed all tax returns that are required to have been filed in any jurisdiction, and have paid all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes and assessments levied upon them or their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent such taxes and assessments have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent, except for any taxes and assessments (a)the amount of which is not individually or in the aggregate Material or (b)the amount, applicability or validity of which is currently being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and
Section 5.9. Taxes
 
with respect to which the Company has established adequate reserves on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP. The Company knows of no basis for any other tax or assessment that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The charges, accruals and reserves on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries in respect of Federal, state or other taxes for all fiscal periods are, in the judgment of the Company, adequate. The Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries have been finally determined (whether by reason of completed audits or the statute of limitations having run) for all fiscal years up to and including the fiscal year ended December 31, 2004.
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to their respective properties that individually or in the aggregate are Material, including all such properties reflected in the most recent audited balance sheet referred to in or purported to have been acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary after said date (except as sold or otherwise disposed of in the ordinary course of business), in each case free and clear of Liens prohibited by this Agreement. All leases that individually or in the aggregate are Material are valid and subsisting and are in full force and effect in all material respects.
Section 5.10. Title to Property; Leases
Section 5.5
(a) The Company and its Subsidiaries own or possess all licenses, permits, franchises, authorizations, patents, copyrights, proprietary software, service marks, trademarks and trade names, or rights thereto, without known conflict with the rights of others, except those conflicts that, individually and in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.11. Licenses, Permits, Etc.
(b) To the knowledge of the Company, no product of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries infringes in any respect with any license, permit, franchise, authorization, patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned by any other Person, except to the extent any such infringement could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) To the knowledge of the Company, there is no Material violation by any Person of any right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned or used by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
. (a) The Company and each ERISA Affiliate have operated and administered each Plan in compliance with all applicable laws except for such instances of noncompliance as have not resulted in and could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any ERISA Affiliate has incurred any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans (as defined in section 3 of ERISA), and no event, transaction or condition has occurred or exists that could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any such liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, in either case pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or to such penalty or excise tax provisions or to section 401(a)(29) or 412 of the Code or section 4068 of ERISA, other than such liabilities or Liens as would not be individually or in the aggregate Material.
Section 5.12. Compliance with ERISA
 
(b) The present value of the aggregate benefit liabilities under each of the Plans (other than Multiemployer Plans), determined as of the end of such Plan's most recently ended plan year on the basis of the actuarial assumptions specified for funding purposes in such Plan's most recent actuarial valuation report, did not exceed the aggregate current value of the assets of such Plan allocable to such benefit liabilities. The term "benefit liabilities" has the meaning specified in Section 4001 of ERISA and the terms "current value" and "present value" have the meaning specified in section 3 of ERISA.
(c) The Company and its ERISA Affiliates have not incurred withdrawal liabilities (and are not subject to contingent withdrawal liabilities) under Section 4201 or 4204 of ERISA in respect of Multiemployer Plans that individually or in the aggregate are Material.
(d) The expected post retirement benefit obligation (determined as of the last day of the Company's most recently ended fiscal year in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 106, without regard to liabilities attributable to continuation coverage mandated by Section 4980B of the Code) of the Company and its Subsidiaries is not Material or has otherwise been disclosed in the financial statements set forth on .
Schedule 5.5
(e) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the issuance and sale of the Notes hereunder will not involve any transaction that is subject to the prohibitions of Section 406 of ERISA or in connection with which a tax could be imposed pursuant to Section 4975(c)(1)(A)-(D) of the Code. The representation by the Company in the first sentence of this is made in reliance upon and subject to the accuracy of such Purchaser's representation in as to the sources of the funds used to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser.
Section 5.12(e)
Section 6.2
. Neither the Company nor anyone acting on its behalf has offered the Notes or any similar securities for sale to, or solicited any offer to buy any of the same from, or otherwise approached or negotiated in respect thereof with, any Person other than the Purchasers and not more than 52 other Institutional Investors, each of which has been offered the Notes at a private sale for investment. Neither the Company nor anyone acting on its behalf has taken, or will take, any action that would subject the issuance or sale of the Notes to the registration requirements of Section 5 of the Securities Act or to the registration requirements of any securities or blue sky laws of any applicable jurisdiction.
Section 5.13. Private Offering by the Company
The Company will apply the proceeds of the sale of the Notes as set forth in "Description of the Offering and Use of Proceeds" of the Memorandum. No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of buying or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 CFR 221), or for the purpose of buying or carrying or trading in any securities under such circumstances as to involve the Company in a violation of Regulation X of said Board (12 CFR 224) or to involve any broker or dealer in a violation of Regulation T of said Board (12 CFR 220), in each case, in contravention of applicable margin stock regulations. Margin stock does not constitute more than 15% of the value of the consolidated assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries and the Company does not have any present intention that margin stock will
Section 5.14. Use of Proceeds; Margin Regulations.
 
constitute more than 15% of the value of such assets. As used in this , the terms "margin stock" and "purpose of buying or carrying" shall have the meanings assigned to them in said Regulation U.
Section 5.14
. (a)  sets forth the outstanding Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of June 30, 2007, which list is complete and correct in all material respects (including a description of the obligors and obligees, principal amount outstanding and collateral therefor, if any, and Guaranty thereof, if any), since which date there has been no Material change in the amounts, interest rates, sinking funds, installment payments or maturities of the Indebtedness of the Company or its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default and no waiver of default is currently in effect, in the payment of any principal or interest on any Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary and no event or condition exists with respect to any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary that would permit (or that with notice or the lapse of time, or both, would permit) one or more Persons to cause such Indebtedness to become due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment.
Section 5.15. Existing Indebtedness; Future Liens
Schedule 5.15
(b) Except as disclosed in , neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has agreed or consented to cause or permit in the future (upon the happening of a contingency or otherwise) any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, to be subject to a Lien not permitted by .
Schedule 5.15
Section 10.4
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to any provision contained in, any instrument evidencing Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary, any agreement relating thereto or any other agreement (including, but not limited to, its charter or other organizational document) which limits the amount of, or otherwise imposes restrictions on the incurring of, Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary, except as specifically indicated in .
Schedule 5.15
. (a) Neither the sale of the Notes by the Company hereunder nor its use of the proceeds thereof will violate the Trading with the Enemy Act, as amended, or any of the foreign assets control regulations of the United States Treasury Department (31 CFR, Subtitle B, Chapter V, as amended) or any enabling legislation or executive order relating thereto.
Section 5.16. Foreign Assets Control Regulations, Etc
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) is a Person described or designated in the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List of the Office of Foreign Assets Control or in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism Order or (ii) engages in any dealings or transactions with any such Person. The Company and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with the USA Patriot Act to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such law could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for any payments to any governmental official or employee, political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage, in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, assuming in all cases that such Act applies to the Company.
 
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is subject to regulation under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, the ICC Termination Act of 1995, as amended, or the Federal Power Act, as amended.
Section 5.17. Status under Certain Statutes
. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement and the Notes rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured Senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of the Company, including, without limitation, all senior unsecured Indebtedness of the Company described in hereto.
Section 5.18. Notes Rank Pari Passu
pari passu
Schedule 5.15
. (a) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any claim or has received any notice of any claim, and no proceeding has been instituted raising any claim against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or other assets, alleging any damage to the environment or violation of any Environmental Laws, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.19. Environmental Matters
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any facts which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any claim, public or private, of violation of Environmental Laws or damage to the environment emanating from, occurring on or in any way related to real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or to other assets or their use, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has stored any Hazardous Materials on real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or has disposed of any Hazardous Materials in a manner contrary to any Environmental Laws in each case in any manner that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(d) All buildings on all real properties now owned, leased or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary are in compliance with applicable Environmental Laws, except where failure to comply could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
S 6. R P.
ECTION
EPRESENTATIONS
OF
THE
URCHASERS
Each Purchaser severally represents that (a)it is purchasing the Notes for its own account or for one or more separate accounts maintained by such Purchaser or for the account of one or more pension or trust funds and not with a view to the distribution thereof; provided that the disposition of such Purchaser's or their property shall at all times be within such Purchaser's or such pension or trust fund's control and (b) is an "Accredited Investor" as defined in Regulation D of the Securities Act and an experienced and sophisticated investor with such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters as is necessary to evaluate the merits and risks of an investment in the Notes. Each Purchaser understands that the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and may be resold
Section 6.1. Purchase for Investment.
 
only if registered pursuant to the provisions of the Securities Act or if an exemption from registration is available, except under circumstances where neither such registration nor such an exemption is required by law, and that the Company is not required to register the Notes.
. Each Purchaser severally represents that at least one of the following statements is an accurate representation as to each source of funds (a ) to be used by such Purchaser to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser hereunder:
Section 6.2. Source of Funds
"Source"
(a) the Source is an "insurance company general account" (as the term is defined in the United States Department of Labor's Prohibited Transaction Exemption () 95-60) in respect of which the reserves and liabilities (as defined by the annual statement for life insurance companies approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (the )) for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any employee benefit plan together with the amount of the reserves and liabilities for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any other employee benefit plans maintained by the same employer (or affiliate thereof as defined in PTE 95-60) or by the same employee organization in the general account do not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total reserves and liabilities of the general account (exclusive of separate account liabilities) plus surplus as set forth in the NAIC Annual Statement filed with such Purchaser's state of domicile; or
"PTE"
"NAIC Annual Statement"
(b) the Source is a separate account that is maintained solely in connection with such Purchaser's fixed contractual obligations under which the amounts payable, or credited, to any employee benefit plan (or its related trust) that has any interest in such separate account (or to any participant or beneficiary of such plan (including any annuitant)) are not affected in any manner by the investment performance of the separate account; or
(c) the Source is either (i) an insurance company pooled separate account, within the meaning of PTE 90-1, or (ii) a bank collective investment fund, within the meaning of the PTE 91-38 and, except as have been disclosed by such Purchaser to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (c), no employee benefit plan or group of plans maintained by the same employer or employee organization beneficially owns more than 10% of all assets allocated to such pooled separate account or collective investment fund; or
(d) the Source constitutes assets of an "investment fund" (within the meaning of Part V of the QPAM Exemption) managed by a "qualified professional asset manager" or "QPAM" (within the meaning of Part V of the QPAM Exemption), no employee benefit plan's assets that are included in such investment fund, when combined with the assets of all other employee benefit plans established or maintained by the same employer or by an affiliate (within the meaning of SectionV(c)(1) of the QPAM Exemption) of such employer or by the same employee organization and managed by such QPAM, exceed 20% of the total client assets managed by such QPAM, the conditions of Part I(c) and (g) of the QPAM Exemption are satisfied, as of the last day of
 
its most recent calendar quarter, the QPAM does not own a 10% or more interest in the Company and no Person controlling or controlled by the QPAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section V(e) of the QPAM Exemption) owns a 20% or more interest in the Company (or less than 20% but greater than 10%, if such person exercises control over the management or policies of the Company by reason of its ownership interest) and (i) the identity of such QPAM and (ii) the names of all employee benefit plans whose assets are included in such investment fund have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (d); or
(e) the Source constitutes assets of a "plan(s)" (within the meaning of Section IV of PTE 96-23 (the )) managed by an "in-house asset manager" or "INHAM" (within the meaning of Part IV of the INHAM Exemption), the conditions of Part I(a), (g) and (h) of the INHAM Exemption are satisfied, neither the INHAM nor a Person controlling or controlled by the INHAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section IV(d) of the INHAM Exemption) owns a 5% or more interest in the Company and (i) the identity of such INHAM and (ii) the name(s) of the employee benefit plan(s) whose assets constitute the Source have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (e); or
"INHAM Exemption"
(f) the Source is a governmental plan; or
(g) the Source is one or more employee benefit plans, or a separate account or trust fund comprised of one or more employee benefit plans, each of which has been identified to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (g); or
(h) the Source does not include assets of any employee benefit plan, other than a plan exempt from the coverage of ERISA.
As used in this , the terms "employee benefit plan", "governmental plan", "party in interest" and "separate account" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in section 3 of ERISA.
Section 6.2
S 7. I C.
ECTION
NFORMATION
AS
TO
THE
OMPANY
. The Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.1. Financial and Business Information
(a)  within 60 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each quarterly fiscal period in each fiscal year of the Company (other than the last quarterly fiscal period of each such fiscal year), duplicate copies of:
Quarterly Statements
"Form 10-Q"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at the end of such quarter (compared to the previous fiscal year end), and
 
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such quarter and (in the case of the second and third quarters) for the portion of the fiscal year ending with such quarter (compared to the corresponding periods in the previous fiscal year),
all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP applicable to quarterly financial statements generally, and certified by a Senior Financial Officer as fairly presenting, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported on and their results of operations and cash flows, subject to changes resulting from year-end adjustments; that delivery within the time period specified above of copies of the Company's Form 10-Q prepared in compliance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-Q if it shall have timely made such Form 10-Q available on "EDGAR" and on its home page on the worldwide web (at the date of this Agreement located at: http//www.ajg.com) and shall have given each Purchaser prior notice of such availability on EDGAR and on its home page in connection with each delivery (such availability and notice thereof being referred to as );
provided
Section 7.1(a)
provided, further,
"Electronic Delivery"
(b)  within 120 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, duplicate copies of,
Annual Statements
"Form 10-K"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries, as at the end of such year, and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries, for such year,
setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP, and accompanied by an opinion thereon of independent public accountants of recognized national standing, which opinion shall state that such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported upon and their results of operations and cash flows and have been prepared in conformity with GAAP, and that the examination of such accountants in connection with such financial statements has been made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, and that such audit provides a reasonable basis for such opinion in the circumstances, that the delivery within the time period specified above of the Company's Form 10-K for such fiscal year (together with the Company's annual report to stockholders, if any, prepared pursuant to Rule 14a-3 under the Exchange Act) prepared in accordance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC, shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-K if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
provided
Section 7.1(b)
provided, further,
 
(c)  promptly upon their becoming available, one copy of (i) each financial statement, report, notice or proxy statement sent by the Company or any Subsidiary to its principal lending banks as a whole (excluding information sent to such banks in the ordinary course of administration of a bank facility, such as information relating to pricing and borrowing availability or to its public securities holders generally) and (ii) each regular or periodic report, each registration statement (without exhibits except as expressly requested by such holder and excluding registration statements on Form S-8), and each prospectus and all amendments thereto (excluding those related to plans or plan interests registered on a Form S-8 registration statement) filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC and of all press releases and other statements made available generally by the Company or any Subsidiary to the public concerning developments that are Material; that with respect to any such report, registration statement or prospectus filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC, the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such report, registration statement or prospectus if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
SEC and Other Reports
provided
(d)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of the existence of any Default or Event of Default or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default hereunder or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default of the type referred to in , a written notice specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
Notice of Default or Event of Default
Section 11(f)
(e)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of any of the following, a written notice setting forth the nature thereof and the action, if any, that the Company or an ERISA Affiliate proposes to take with respect thereto:
ERISA Matters
(i) with respect to any Plan, any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA and the regulations thereunder, for which notice thereof has not been waived pursuant to such regulations as in effect on the date hereof; or
(ii) the taking by the PBGC of steps to institute, or the threatening by the PBGC of the institution of, proceedings under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Plan, or the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of a notice from a Multiemployer Plan that such action has been taken by the PBGC with respect to such Multiemployer Plan; or
(iii) any event, transaction or condition that could result in the incurrence of any liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights,
 
properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or such penalty or excise tax provisions, if such liability or Lien, taken together with any other such liabilities or Liens then existing, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
(f)  promptly, and in any event within 30 days of receipt thereof, copies of any notice to the Company or any Subsidiary from any Federal or state Governmental Authority relating to any order, ruling, statute or other law or regulation that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
Notices from Governmental Authority
(g)  with reasonable promptness, such other data and information relating to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or relating to the ability of the Company to perform its obligations hereunder and under the Notes as from time to time may be reasonably requested by any such holder of Notes.
Requested Information
. Each set of financial statements delivered to a holder of Notes pursuant to or shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer setting forth (which, in the case of Electronic Delivery of such financial statements, shall be by separate concurrent delivery of such certificate to each holder of Notes):
Section 7.2. Officer's Certificate
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
(a)  the information (including detailed calculations) required in order to establish whether the Company was in compliance with the requirements of through , inclusive, during the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished (including with respect to each such Section, where applicable, the calculations of the maximum or minimum amount, ratio or percentage, as the case may be, permissible under the terms of such Sections, and the calculation of the amount, ratio or percentage then in existence) and, to the extent that the Agreement Accounting Principles applied in connection with determining compliance with the requirements of through and are not the same as the generally accepted accounting principles used in preparation of the financial statements delivered pursuant to or , a reconciliation of the consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Subsidiaries delivered pursuant to or and the financial information used to determine compliance with the requirements of through and ; and
Covenant Compliance
Sections 10.1
Section 10.3
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
(b)  a statement that such Senior Financial Officer has reviewed the relevant terms hereof and has made, or caused to be made, under his or her supervision, a review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries from the beginning of the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished to the date of the certificate and that such review shall not have disclosed, to the best of such Senior Financial Officer's knowledge and belief, the existence during such period of any condition or event that constitutes a Default or an Event of Default or, if any such condition or event existed or exists (including, without
Event of Default
 
limitation, any such event or condition resulting from the failure of the Company or any Subsidiary to comply with any Environmental Law), specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company shall have taken or proposes to take with respect thereto.
. The Company shall permit the representatives of each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.3. Visitation
(a)  if no Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of such holder and upon reasonable prior notice to the Company, to visit the principal executive office of the Company, to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with the Company's Senior Financial Officers, and (with the consent of the Company, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld) to visit during normal business hours the other offices and properties of the Company and each Subsidiary, all at such reasonable times and as often as may be reasonably requested in writing; and
No Default
(b)  if a Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of the Company, to visit and inspect any of the offices or properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, to examine all their respective books of account, records, reports and other papers, to make copies and extracts therefrom, and to discuss their respective affairs, finances and accounts with their respective Senior Financial Officers and independent public accountants (and by this provision the Company authorizes said accountants to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries), all at such times and as often as may be requested, that prior to disclosure of any material non public information pursuant to this , the holders of the Notes shall, if requested by the Company, provide the Company with reasonable assurance that such disclosure will be held in confidence in accordance with the requirements of Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC, subject to the last sentence of .
Default
provided
Section 7.3
Section 20
S 8. P N.
ECTION
REPAYMENT
OF
THE
OTES
. As provided therein, the entire unpaid principal balance of each series of the Notes shall be due and payable on the respective stated maturity dates thereof.
Section 8.1. Maturity
. The Company may, at its option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the Notes of any series, in an amount not less than 10% of the aggregate principal amount of such series of Notes then outstanding in the case of a partial prepayment, at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, together with interest accrued thereon to the date of such prepayment, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount. The Company will give each holder of Notes of any series it intends to prepay written notice of each optional prepayment under this not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment. Each such notice shall specify such date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of each series of Notes to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each Note held by such holder to be
Section 8.2. Optional Prepayments with Make-Whole Amount
Section 8.2
 
prepaid (determined in accordance with ), and the interest to be paid on the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such prepayment, the Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes of any series being prepaid a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified prepayment date.
Section 8.3
. In the case of each partial prepayment of any series of Notes pursuant to , the principal amount of the Notes of such series to be prepaid shall be allocated pro rata among all holders of such series of Notes at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof not theretofore called for prepayment.
Section 8.3. Allocation of Partial Prepayments
Section 8.2
. In the case of each prepayment of Notes of any series pursuant to this , the principal amount of each Note to be prepaid shall mature and become due and payable on the date fixed for such prepayment (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any. From and after such date, unless the Company shall fail to pay such principal amount when so due and payable, together with the interest and Make-Whole Amount, if any, as aforesaid, interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. Any Note paid or prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Company and cancelled and shall not be reissued, and no Note shall be issued in lieu of any prepaid principal amount of any Note.
Section 8.4. Maturity; Surrender, Etc
Section 8
. The Company will not and will not permit any Affiliate to purchase, redeem, prepay or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, any of the outstanding Notes or any part or portion thereof except (a) upon the payment or prepayment of the Notes in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and the Notes or (b) pursuant to an offer to purchase made by the Company or an Affiliate pro rata to the holders of all Notes of a series at the time outstanding upon the same terms and conditions. Any such offer shall provide each holder with sufficient information to enable it to make an informed decision with respect to such offer, and shall remain open for at least 15 Business Days. If the holders of more than 10% of the principal amount of the Notes of any series then outstanding accept such offer, the Company shall promptly notify the remaining holders of Notes of such series of such fact and the expiration date for the acceptance by holders of such Notes of such offer shall be extended by the number of days necessary to give each such remaining holder at least 5 Business Days from its receipt of such notice to accept such offer. The Company will promptly cancel all Notes acquired by it or any Affiliate pursuant to any payment, prepayment or purchase of Notes pursuant to any provision of this Agreement and no Notes may be issued in substitution or exchange for any such Notes.
Section 8.5. Purchase of Notes
. The term means, with respect to any Note, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such Note over the amount of such Called Principal; that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Section 8.6. Make-Whole Amount
"Make-Whole Amount"
provided
means, with respect to any Note, the principal of such Note that is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Called Principal"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
 
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on such Note is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
"Discounted Value"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, 0.50% (50 basis points) over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as "Page PX1" (or such other display as may replace Page PX1) on Bloomberg Financial Markets for the most recently issued actively traded on the run U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (or any comparable successor publication) for U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. In the case of each determination under clause (i) or clause (ii), as the case may be, of the preceding paragraph, such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond-equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable Note.
"Reinvestment Yield"
means, with respect to any Called Principal, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (a) such Called Principal into (b) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (i) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (ii) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
"Remaining Average Life"
 
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date; that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of such Note, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to or .
"Remaining Scheduled Payments"
provided
Section 8.2
12.1
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Settlement Date"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
(a) . The Company will, within five Business Days after any Responsible Officer has knowledge of the occurrence of any Change in Control, give written notice of such Change in Control to each holder of Notes. If within 90 days after such Change in Control, the Company does not, for any reason, have an Investment Grade Rating, a "" shall be deemed to have occurred. If a Change in Control Event has occurred, the Company shall promptly give written notice thereof to the holders of Notes, and such notice shall contain and constitute an offer to prepay Notes as described in subparagraph (b) of this and shall be accompanied by the certificate described in subparagraph (e) of this .
Section 8.7. Mandatory Offer to Prepay Upon Change in Control.
Notice of Change in Control and Change in Control Event
Change in Control Event
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(b) The offer to prepay the Notes contemplated by subparagraph (a) of this shall be an offer to prepay, in accordance with and subject to this , all, but not less than all, the Notes held by each holder (in this case only, "" in respect of any Note registered in the name of a nominee for a disclosed beneficial owner shall mean such beneficial owner) on a date specified in such offer (the ""). Such date shall be a Business Day not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after the date of such offer.
Offer to Prepay Notes.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
holder
Proposed Prepayment Date
(c) A holder of Notes may accept the offer to prepay made pursuant to this by causing a written notice of such acceptance to be delivered to the Company not later than 15 days prior to the Proposed Prepayment Date. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond to the offer to prepay made pursuant to this within the specified time period shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder.
Acceptance/Rejection.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(d) Prepayment of the Notes to be prepaid pursuant to this shall be at 100% of the principal amount of such Notes, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment, but in no event with a Make-Whole Amount or other premium. The prepayment shall be made on the Proposed Prepayment Date.
Prepayment.
Section 8.7
(e) Each offer to prepay the Notes pursuant to this shall be accompanied by a certificate, executed by a Senior Financial Officer and dated the date
Officer's Certificate.
Section 8.7
 
of such offer, specifying: (i) the Proposed Prepayment Date; (ii) that such offer is made pursuant to this ; (iii) the principal amount of each Note offered to be prepaid; (iv) the interest that would be due on each Note offered to be prepaid, accrued to the Proposed Prepayment Date; (v) that the conditions of this have been fulfilled; (vi) in reasonable detail, the nature of the Change in Control Event; and (vii) any written response from the relevant rating agency.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(f) shall be deemed to have occurred if any person (as such term is used in Section 13(d) and Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) or related persons constituting a group (as such term is used in Rule 13d-5 under the Exchange Act):
Certain Definitions. "Change in Control"
(i) become the "beneficial owners" (as such term is used in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the total voting power of all classes then outstanding of the Voting Stock of the Company; or
(ii) acquire after the date of the Closing (x) the power to elect, appoint or cause the election or appointment of at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the Company, through beneficial ownership of the capital stock of the Company or otherwise, or (y) all or substantially all of the assets of the Company.
in respect of any Person means, at the time of determination, at least two of the following ratings of its senior, unsecured, non-credit enhanced, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money: (i) by Standard & Poor's Rating Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, or any successor thereof, "BBB-" or better, (ii) by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereof, "Baa3" or better, or (iii) by any other nationally recognized statistical rating agency, an equivalent or better rating.
"Investment Grade Rating"
(g) All calculations contemplated in this involving the capital stock of any Person shall be made with the assumption that all convertible Securities of such Person then outstanding and all convertible Securities issuable upon the exercise of any warrants, options and other rights outstanding at such time were converted at such time and that all options, warrants and similar rights to acquire shares of capital stock of such Person were exercised at such time.
Section 8.7
S 9. A C.
ECTION
FFIRMATIVE
OVENANTS
The Company covenants that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
. Without limiting , the Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations to which each of them is subject, including, without limitation, ERISA, the USA Patriot Act and Environmental Laws, and will obtain and maintain in effect all licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations necessary to the ownership of their respective properties or to the conduct of their respective businesses, in each case to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations or failures to obtain or maintain in effect such licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.1. Compliance with Law
Section 10.9
 
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurers, insurance with respect to their respective properties and businesses against such casualties and contingencies, of such types, on such terms and in such amounts (including deductibles, co-insurance and self-insurance, if adequate reserves are maintained with respect thereto) as is customary in the case of entities of established reputations engaged in the same or a similar business and similarly situated.
Section 9.2. Insurance
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain and keep, or cause to be maintained and kept, their respective properties in good repair, working order and condition (other than ordinary wear and tear), so that the business carried on in connection therewith may be properly conducted at all times; that this shall not prevent the Company or any Subsidiary from discontinuing the operation and the maintenance of any of its properties if such discontinuance is desirable in the conduct of its business and the Company has concluded that such discontinuance could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.3. Maintenance of Properties
provided
Section 9.3
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, file all tax returns required to be filed in any jurisdiction and to pay and discharge all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes, assessments, governmental charges, or levies imposed on them or any of their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent the same have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent and all claims for which sums have become due and payable that have or might become a Lien on properties or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary; that neither the Company nor any Subsidiary need pay any such tax, assessment, charge, levy or claim if (a) the amount, applicability or validity thereof is contested by the Company or such Subsidiary on a timely basis in good faith and in appropriate proceedings, and the Company or a Subsidiary has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary or (b) the nonpayment of all such taxes, assessments, charges, levies and claims in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.4. Payment of Taxes and Claims
provided
. Subject to , the Company will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence. Subject to , the Company will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect the legal existence of each of its Subsidiaries (unless merged into the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary) and all rights and franchises of the Company and its Subsidiaries unless, in the good faith judgment of the Company, the termination of or failure to preserve and keep in full force and effect such legal existence, right or franchise could not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.5. Legal Existence, Etc
Section 10.5
Section 10.6
. The Notes and all other obligations of the Company under this Agreement are and at all times shall rank at least in right of
Section 9.6. Notes to Rank Pari Passu
pari passu
 
payment with all other present and future unsecured Senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of the Company which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other unsecured Indebtedness of the Company.
. The Company will cause each Subsidiary which is an obligor or guarantor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement to concurrently enter into the Subsidiary Guaranty, and within three Business Days thereafter will deliver to each of the holders of the Notes the following items:
Section 9.7. Guaranty by Subsidiaries
(a) an executed counterpart of the Subsidiary Guaranty or joinder agreement in respect of the Subsidiary Guaranty, as appropriate;
(b) a certificate signed by the President, a Vice President or another authorized Responsible Officer of such Subsidiary making representations and warranties to the effect of those contained in and , but with respect to such Subsidiary and the Subsidiary Guaranty;
Sections 5.1, 5.2, 5.6
5.7
(c) such documents and evidence with respect to such Subsidiary as the Required Holders may reasonably request in order to establish the existence and good standing of such Subsidiary and the authorization of the transactions contemplated by the Subsidiary Guaranty; and
(d) an opinion of counsel satisfactory to the Required Holders to the effect that the Subsidiary Guaranty has been duly authorized, executed and delivered and constitutes the legal, valid and binding contract and agreement of such Subsidiary enforceable in accordance with its terms, except as an enforcement of such terms may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by general equitable principles and will rank at all times at least in right of payment with all other unsecured and unsubordinated Indebtedness of such Subsidiary.
pari passu
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain proper books of record and account and, in the case of the Company, in conformity with GAAP and all applicable requirements of any Governmental Authority having legal or regulatory jurisdiction over the Company, or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Section 9.8. Books and Records
S 10. N C.
ECTION
EGATIVE
OVENANTS
The Company covenants that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of Consolidated Indebtedness as of the last day of the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended Excess Cash, as of the last day of the same such period, to EBITDA for such most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be greater than 3.25 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.1. Cash Flow Leverage Ratio.
minus
 
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of EBITDAR to Fixed Charges for the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be less than 1.75 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.2. Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit Consolidated Priority Indebtedness to exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.3. Limitations on Consolidated Priority Indebtedness.
The Company will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent (each of the following, a ):
Section 10.4. Limitation on Liens.
provided
"Permitted Lien"
(a) Liens for taxes, assessments, governmental charges or levies; that payment thereof is not at the time required by ;
provided
Section 9.4
(b) Liens arising under statutes or by operation of law, Liens in connection with worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, social security and other similar laws (including, without limitation, pledges or deposits securing liability to insurance carriers under insurance or self-insurance arrangements), Liens to secure the performance of bids, tenders, trade, government or other similar contracts, obligations for utilities, leases, licenses, statutory obligations, completion guarantees, surety, judgment, appeal or performance bonds, or other similar bonds, or other Liens of like general nature, in any such case incurred in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness; that (i) any such Lien secures only amounts not due and payable or the payment of which is being contested in good faith by appropriate actions or proceedings and (ii) any such Lien does not materially impair the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole or the value of the related property for the purposes of such business;
provided
(c) mechanics', workmen's, materialmen's, attorney's, landlords', carriers' or other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness and in each such case with respect to obligations which are not due or that are bonded or that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
(d) Liens of or resulting from any court proceeding, judgment or award, (i) the time for the appeal or petition for rehearing of which shall not have expired, or (ii) in respect of which the Company or a Subsidiary shall be prosecuting an appeal or proceeding for a review and in respect of which a stay of execution pending such appeal or proceeding for review shall have been secured; that the Company or such Subsidiary (1) is contesting such proceeding, judgment or award on a timely basis, in good faith and by appropriate proceedings, and (2) has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be;
provided
 
(e) Liens securing Indebtedness of a Subsidiary to the Company or to another Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(f) Liens existing as of the date of the Closing and described on hereto;
Schedule 5.15
(g) Liens on property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries created solely for the purpose of securing purchase money indebtedness (including in connection with the acquisition, construction or improvement of property) or Capitalized Lease Obligations and, representing or incurred to finance, refinance or refund the purchase price of property; that no such Lien shall extend to or cover other property of the Company or such Subsidiary other than the respective property so acquired, constructed or improved, and the principal amount of indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall at no time exceed the total purchase price (or cost of construction or improvement) of such property;
provided
(h) Liens existing on property of a Person at the time such Person is consolidated with or merged into the Company or a Subsidiary or becomes a Subsidiary, or any Lien existing on any property acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary at the time such property is so acquired (whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby shall have been assumed); that (i) no such Lien shall have been created or assumed in contemplation of such consolidation or merger or such Person's becoming a Subsidiary or such acquisition of property, (ii) each such Lien shall extend solely to the item or items of property so acquired and, if required by the terms of the instrument originally creating such Lien, other property which is an improvement to or is acquired for specific use in connection with such acquired property;
provided
(i) customary rights of set off, revocation, refund or chargeback under deposit agreements or under the Uniform Commercial Code in favor of banks or other financial institutions where the Company or any Subsidiary maintains deposits in the ordinary course of business;
(j) Liens constituting (i) survey restrictions, encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, condemnations, easements, encroachments, covenants, rights of way, defects, irregularities and rights or restrictions of record on the title or use of real property, and (ii) leases, subleases, licenses or sublicenses granted to others in the ordinary course of business and Liens covering property subject to any lease which was not entered into in violation of this Agreement securing the interest of the lessor or other Person under such lease, which in any such case does not materially detract from the value of the subject property or materially impair the use thereof in the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole;
 
(k) any encumbrance or restriction (including, but not limited to, put and call agreements, rights of first refusal, and voting or equity holder agreements) with respect to equity or ownership interests in any joint venture or similar arrangement pursuant to any joint venture or similar agreement in any such case not entered into in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness;
(l) Liens other than those permitted by any of the foregoing subsections (a) through (k); that all Indebtedness secured by any such Liens, in the aggregate with all other Consolidated Priority Indebtedness at such time, does not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles; and
provided
(m) any extension, renewal or replacement of any Lien permitted by the preceding clauses (e), (f), (g) and (h) of this ; that (i) no additional property (other than improvements thereon) shall be encumbered by such Liens, (ii) the unpaid principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not be increased on or after the date of such extension, renewal or replacement and (iii) at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default would exist, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the extension, renewal or replacement of such Lien.
Section 10.4
provided
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
The Company will not consolidate with or merge with any other Person or convey, transfer, sell or lease all or substantially all of its assets in a single transaction or series of transactions to any Person unless:
Section 10.5. Mergers, Consolidations, Etc.
(a) the successor formed by such consolidation or the survivor of such merger or the Person that acquires by conveyance, transfer, sale or lease all or substantially all of the assets of the Company as an entirety, as the case may be, is a solvent corporation or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the United States or any state thereof (including the District of Columbia), and, if the Company is not such successor or survivor, such corporation or limited liability company (i) shall have executed and delivered to each holder of any Notes its assumption of the due and punctual performance and observance of each covenant and condition of this Agreement and the Notes and (ii) shall have caused to be delivered to each holder of any Notes an opinion of nationally recognized independent counsel or other independent counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders, to the effect that all agreements or instruments effecting such assumption are enforceable in accordance with their terms and comply with the terms hereof;
(b) each Subsidiary Guarantor shall have affirmed in writing its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party (unless and to the extent any such Subsidiary Guaranty was terminated or released as expressly permitted by or otherwise in accordance with the terms of this Agreement); and
Section 2.2(b)
 
(c) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such transaction.
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
Except as permitted by , the Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of, including by way of merger (collectively a ), any assets, including capital stock of Subsidiaries, in one or a series of transactions, to any Person, other than:
Section 10.6. Sale of Assets.
Section 10.5
"Disposition"
(a) Dispositions in the ordinary course of business;
(b) Dispositions by a Subsidiary to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary or by the Company to a Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(c) Dispositions of the Company's interest in Chem-Mod LLC, Chem-Mod International LLC, C-Quest Technologies LLC or C-Quest Technologies International LLC; or
(d) Dispositions not otherwise permitted bythrough, inclusive, provided that:
Sections 10.6(a)
10.6(c)
(i) in the good faith opinion of the Company, the Disposition is in exchange for consideration having a fair market value at least equal to that of the property exchanged and is in the best interest of the Company or such Subsidiary;
(ii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such Disposition; and
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
(iii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, the aggregate net book value of all assets that were the subject of any Disposition occurring in the then current fiscal year would not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Assets as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal year of the Company, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may, or may permit a Subsidiary to, make a Disposition and the assets subject to such Disposition shall not be subject to or included in the foregoing limitation and computation contained in clause (iii) of the preceding sentence if, within 365 days of such Disposition:
(1) the net proceeds from such Disposition are reinvested in productive assets to be used in the existing business of the Company or a Subsidiary; or
 
(2) the net proceeds from such Disposition are applied to the payment or prepayment of the Notes or any other outstanding Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary ranking with or senior to the Notes (other than Indebtedness of the Company owing to a Subsidiary or an Affiliate or Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or an Affiliate).
pari passu
For purposes of foregoing clause (2), the Company shall offer to prepay (on a Business Day not less than 30 or more than 60 days following such offer) the Notes on a pro rata basis with any such other Indebtedness that the Company elects to include in such offer at a price of 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment (but in no event with a Make Whole Amount or other premium); provided that if any holder of the Notes declines or rejects such offer, the net proceeds that would have been paid to such holder may be used by the Company for general corporate purposes. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond in writing not later than fifteen Business Days prior to the proposed prepayment date to an offer to prepay made pursuant to this shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder. To the extent that any holder of the Notes rejects or is deemed to have rejected such offer of prepayment, the Company may use the aggregate amount of such prepayments so rejected for general corporate purposes.
Section 10.6
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to enter into directly or indirectly any Material transaction or Material group of related transactions (including without limitation the purchase, lease, sale or exchange of properties of any kind or the rendering of any service) with any Affiliate (other than the Company or another Subsidiary), except upon terms and conditions which are no less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than would be obtainable in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person not an Affiliate and except for benefit and compensation plans and arrangements approved by the Board of Directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any such Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary.
Section 10.7. Transactions with Affiliates
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to engage in any business if, as a result, the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, would then be engaged would be substantially changed from the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, are engaged on the date of this Agreement as described in the Memorandum.
Section 10.8. Line of Business
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to (a) become a Person described or designated in the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List of the Office of Foreign Assets Control or in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism Order or (b) knowingly engage in any dealings or transactions with any such Person.
Section 10.9. Terrorism Sanctions Regulations
S 11. E D.
ECTION
VENTS
OF
EFAULT
An shall exist if any of the following conditions or events shall occur and be continuing:
"Event of Default"
(a) the Company defaults in the payment of any principal or Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Note when the same becomes due and payable, whether at maturity or at a date fixed for prepayment or by declaration or otherwise; or
 
(b) the Company defaults in the payment of any interest on any Note for more than five Business Days after the same becomes due and payable; or
(c) the Company defaults in the performance of or compliance with any term contained in or or; or
Section 7.1(d)
Sections 10.1, 10.2
10.3
(d) the Company defaults in the performance of or compliance with any term contained herein (other than those referred to in , and ) and such default is not remedied within 45 days after the earlier of (i) a Responsible Officer obtaining actual knowledge of such default and (ii) the Company receiving written notice of such default from any holder of a Note (any such written notice to be identified as a "notice of default" and to refer specifically to this ); or
Sections 11(a)
(b) 
(c)
Section 11(d)
(e) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of the Company or by any officer of the Company in this Agreement or in any writing furnished by the Company pursuant to this Agreement, proves to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made or any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of a Subsidiary Guarantor or by any officer of a Subsidiary Guarantor in the Subsidiary Guaranty or in any writing furnished by a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the Subsidiary Guaranty, proves to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(f) (i) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default (as principal or as guarantor or other surety) in the payment of any principal of or premium or make-whole amount or interest on any Indebtedness that is outstanding in an aggregate principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets beyond any period of grace provided with respect thereto, or (ii) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default in the performance of or compliance with any term of any evidence of any Indebtedness in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets or of any mortgage, indenture or other agreement relating thereto or any other condition exists, and as a consequence of such default or condition such Indebtedness has become, or has been declared, due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment, or (iii) as a consequence of the occurrence or continuation of any event or condition (other than the passage of time or the right of the holder of Indebtedness to convert such Indebtedness into equity interests), the Company or any Subsidiary has become obligated to purchase or repay Indebtedness before its regular maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets; or
 
(g) the Company or any Material Subsidiary (i) is generally not paying, or admits in writing its inability to pay, its debts as they become due, (ii) files, or consents by answer or otherwise to the filing against it of, a petition for relief or reorganization or arrangement or any other petition in bankruptcy, for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar law of any jurisdiction, (iii) makes an assignment of any substantial part of its property for the benefit of its creditors, (iv) consents to the appointment of a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, (v) is finally adjudicated as insolvent or to be liquidated, or (vi) takes corporate action for the purpose of any of the foregoing; or
(h) a court or Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction enters an order appointing, without consent by the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries, a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, or constituting an order for relief or approving a petition for relief or reorganization or any other petition in bankruptcy or for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy or insolvency law of any jurisdiction, or ordering the dissolution, winding-up or liquidation of the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries, or any such petition shall be filed against the Company or any of its Material Subsidiaries and such petition shall not be dismissed within 60 days; or
(i) a final judgment or judgments for the payment of money aggregating in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets (excluding for purposes of such determination such amount of any insurance proceeds paid by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of such judgment or judgments or unconditionally acknowledged in writing to be payable by the insurance carrier that issued the related insurance policy) are rendered against one or more of the Company and its Subsidiaries and which judgments are not, within 60 days after entry thereof, bonded, discharged or stayed pending appeal, or are not discharged within 60 days after the expiration of such stay; or
(j) if (i) any Plan shall fail to satisfy the minimum funding standards of ERISA or the Code for any plan year or part thereof or a waiver of such standards or extension of any amortization period is sought or granted under section 412 of the Code, (ii) a notice of intent to terminate any Plan shall have been or is reasonably expected within the immediately following two-month period, to be filed with the PBGC or the PBGC shall have instituted proceedings under ERISA Section 4042 to terminate or appoint a trustee to administer any Plan or the PBGC shall have notified the Company or any ERISA Affiliate that a Plan may become a subject of any such proceedings, (iii) the aggregate "amount of unfunded benefit liabilities" (within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(18) of ERISA) under all Plans, determined in accordance with Title IV of ERISA, shall exceed the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets, (iv) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate shall have incurred or is reasonably expected to incur any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, (v) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate withdraws from any Multiemployer Plan, or (vi) the Company or any
 
Subsidiary establishes or amends any employee welfare benefit plan that provides post-employment welfare benefits in a manner that would increase the liability of the Company or any Subsidiary thereunder; and any such event or events described in clauses (i) through (vi) above, either individually or together with any other such event or events, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(k) any Subsidiary Guaranty shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such Subsidiary Guaranty is invalid, void or unenforceable or any Subsidiary Guarantor which is a party to such Subsidiary Guaranty shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under such Subsidiary Guaranty, but excluding any Subsidiary Guaranty which ceases to be in full force and effect in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 2.2(b)
As used in , the terms "employee benefit plan" and "employee welfare benefit plan" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in Section 3 of ERISA.
Section 11(j)
S 12. R D, E .
ECTION
EMEDIES
ON
EFAULT
TC
. (a) If an Event of Default with respect to the Company described in or  (other than an Event of Default described in clause (i) of or described in clause (vi) of by virtue of the fact that such clause encompasses clause (i) of ) has occurred, all the Notes then outstanding shall automatically become immediately due and payable.
Section 12.1. Acceleration
Section 11(g)
(h)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
(b) If any other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Required Holders may at any time at their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes then outstanding to be immediately due and payable.
(c) If any Event of Default described in or has occurred and is continuing, any holder or holders of Notes at the time outstanding affected by such Event of Default may at any time, at its or their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes held by it or them to be immediately due and payable.
Section 11(a) 
(b)
Upon any Note becoming due and payable under this , whether automatically or by declaration, such Note will forthwith mature and the entire unpaid principal amount of such Note, plus (i) all accrued and unpaid interest thereon (including, but not limited to, interest accrued thereon at the Default Rate) and (ii) the Make-Whole Amount determined in respect of such principal amount (to the full extent permitted by applicable law), shall all be immediately due and payable, in each and every case without presentment, demand, protest or further notice, all of which are hereby waived. The Company acknowledges, and the parties hereto agree, that each holder of a Note has the right to maintain its investment in the Notes free from repayment by the Company (except as herein specifically provided for), and that the provision for payment of a Make-Whole Amount by the Company in the event that any Notes are prepaid or are accelerated as a result of an Event of Default, is intended to provide compensation for the deprivation of such right under such circumstances.
Section 12.1
 
. If any Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, and irrespective of whether any Notes have become or have been declared immediately due and payable under , the holder of any Note at the time outstanding may proceed to protect and enforce the rights of such holder by an action at law, suit in equity or other appropriate proceeding, whether for the specific performance of any agreement contained herein or in any Note, or for an injunction against a violation of any of the terms hereof or thereof, or in aid of the exercise of any power granted hereby or thereby or by law or otherwise.
Section 12.2. Other Remedies
Section 12.1
. At any time after any Notes have been declared due and payable pursuant to or , the Required Holders, by written notice to the Company, may rescind and annul any such declaration and its consequences if (a) the Company has paid all overdue interest on such Notes, all principal of and Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Notes that are due and payable and are unpaid other than by reason of such declaration, and all interest on such overdue principal and Make-Whole Amount, if any, and (to the extent permitted by applicable law) any overdue interest in respect of such Notes, at the Default Rate, (b) the Company shall not have paid any amounts which have become due solely by reason of such declaration, (c) all Events of Default and Defaults, other than non-payment of amounts that have become due solely by reason of such declaration, have been cured or have been waived pursuant to , and (d) no judgment or decree has been entered for the payment of any monies due pursuant hereto or to such Notes. No rescission and annulment under this will extend to or affect any subsequent Event of Default or Default or impair any right consequent thereon.
Section 12.3. Rescission
Section 12.1(b)
(c)
Section 17
Section 12.3
. No course of dealing and no delay on the part of any holder of any Note in exercising any right, power or remedy shall operate as a waiver thereof or otherwise prejudice such holder's rights, powers or remedies. No right, power or remedy conferred by this Agreement or by any Note upon any holder thereof shall be exclusive of any other right, power or remedy referred to herein or therein or now or hereafter available at law, in equity, by statute or otherwise. Without limiting the obligations of the Company under , the Company will pay to the holder of each Note on demand such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover all costs and expenses of such holder incurred in any enforcement or collection under this , including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees, expenses and disbursements.
Section 12.4. No Waivers or Election of Remedies, Expenses, Etc
Section 15
Section 12
S 13. R; E; S N.
ECTION
EGISTRATION
XCHANGE
UBSTITUTION
OF
OTES
. The Company shall keep at its principal executive office a register for the registration and registration of transfers of Notes. The name and address of each holder of one or more Notes, each transfer thereof and the name and address of each transferee of one or more Notes shall be registered in such register. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Person in whose name any Note shall be registered shall be deemed and treated as the owner and holder thereof for all purposes hereof, and the Company shall not be affected by any notice or knowledge to the contrary. The Company shall give to any holder of a Note that is an Institutional Investor promptly upon request therefor, a complete and correct copy of the names and addresses of all registered holders of Notes.
Section 13.1. Registration of Notes
 
. Upon surrender of any Note to the Company at the address and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in for registration of transfer or exchange (and in the case of a surrender for registration of transfer accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed by the registered holder of such Note or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing and accompanied by the relevant name, address and other information for notices of each transferee of such Note or part thereof), within ten Business Days thereafter, the Company shall execute and deliver, at the Company's expense (except as provided below), one or more new Notes (as requested by the holder thereof) in exchange therefor of the same series and in an aggregate principal amount equal to the unpaid principal amount of the surrendered Note. Each such new Note shall be payable to such Person as such holder may request and shall be substantially in the form of or , as applicable. Each such new Note shall be dated and bear interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on the surrendered Note or dated the date of the surrendered Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon. The Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any stamp tax or governmental charge imposed in respect of any such transfer of Notes. Notes shall not be transferred in denominations of less than $100,000; that if necessary to enable the registration of transfer by a holder of its entire holding of Notes, one Note may be in a denomination of less than $100,000. Any transferee, by its acceptance of a Note registered in its name (or the name of its nominee), shall be deemed to have made the representations set forth in andand, in addition, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption.The Company shall not, however, be required to register any transfer of a Note if, acting in its reasonable discretion, it believes such transfer is in violation of applicable law or the representations of the transferee set forth in and are not true and correct.
Section 13.2. Transfer and Exchange of Notes
Section 18(iii))
Exhibit 1-A
Exhibit 1-B
provided
Sections 6.1
 6.2
Sections 6.1
6.2
. Upon receipt by the Company at the address and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in ) of evidence reasonably satisfactory to it of the ownership of and the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any Note (which evidence shall be, in the case of an Institutional Investor, notice from such Institutional Investor of such ownership and such loss, theft, destruction or mutilation), and
Section 13.3. Replacement of Notes
Section 18(iii)
(a) in the case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it ( that if the holder of such Note is, or is a nominee for, an original Purchaser or another holder of a Note with a minimum net worth of at least $50,000,000 or a Qualified Institutional Buyer, such Person's own unsecured agreement of indemnity shall be deemed to be satisfactory), or
provided
(b) in the case of mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation thereof,
 
within ten Business Days thereafter, the Company at its own expense shall execute and deliver, in lieu thereof, a new Note of the same series, dated and bearing interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note or dated the date of such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon.
S 14. P N.
ECTION
AYMENTS
ON
OTES
. Subject to , payments of principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest becoming due and payable on the Notes shall be made in Chicago, Illinois at the principal office of Harris N.A. in such jurisdiction. The Company may at any time, by notice to each holder of a Note, change the place of payment of the Notes so long as such place of payment shall be either the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction or the principal office of a bank or trust company in such jurisdiction.
Section 14.1. Place of Payment
Section 14.2
. So long as any Purchaser or its nominee shall be the holder of any Note, and notwithstanding anything contained in or in such Note to the contrary, the Company will pay all sums becoming due on such Note for principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest by the method and at the address specified for such purpose below such Purchaser's name in , or by such other method or at such other address as such Purchaser shall have from time to time specified to the Company in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of such Note or the making of any notation thereon, except that upon written request of the Company made concurrently with or reasonably promptly after payment or prepayment in full of any Note, such Purchaser shall surrender such Note for cancellation, reasonably promptly after any such request, to the Company at its principal executive office or at the place of payment most recently designated by the Company pursuant to . Prior to any sale or other disposition of any Note held by a Purchaser or its nominee, such Purchaser will, at its election, either endorse thereon the amount of principal paid thereon and the last date to which interest has been paid thereon or surrender such Note to the Company in exchange for a new Note or Notes of the same series pursuant to . The Company will afford the benefits of this to any Institutional Investor that is the direct or indirect transferee of any Note purchased by a Purchaser under this Agreement and that has made the same agreement relating to such Note as the Purchasers have made in this .
Section 14.2. Home Office Payment
Section 14.1
Schedule A
Section 14.1
Section 13.2
Section 14.2
Section 14.2
S 15. E, E.
ECTION
XPENSES
TC
Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby are consummated, the Company will pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees of a special counsel and, if reasonably required by the Required Holders, local or other counsel) incurred by the Purchasers and each other holder of a Note in connection with such transactions and in connection with any amendments, waivers or consents under or in respect of this Agreement, any Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty (whether or not such amendment, waiver or consent becomes effective), including, without limitation: (a) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in enforcing or defending (or determining whether or how to enforce or defend) any rights under this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty or in responding to any subpoena or other legal process or informal investigative
Section 15.1. Transaction Expenses.
 
demand issued in connection with this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty, or by reason of being a holder of any Note, (b) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the insolvency or bankruptcy of the Company or any Subsidiary or in connection with any work-out or restructuring of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the Notes, and (c) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the delivery of any Subsidiary Guaranty or joinder agreement in respect of any Subsidiary Guaranty as contemplated by . The Company will pay, and will save each Purchaser and each other holder of a Note harmless from, all claims in respect of any fees, costs or expenses, if any, of brokers and finders (other than those, if any, retained by a Purchaser or other holder in connection with its purchase of any Notes).
Section 9.7
. The obligations of the Company under this will survive the payment or transfer of any Note, the enforcement, amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any Notes, and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 15.2. Survival
Section 15
S 16. S R W; E A.
ECTION
URVIVAL
OF
EPRESENTATIONS
AND
ARRANTIES
NTIRE
GREEMENT
All representations and warranties contained herein shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Notes, the purchase or transfer by any Purchaser of any Note or portion thereof or interest therein and the payment of any Note, and may be relied upon by any subsequent holder of a Note, regardless of any investigation made at any time by or on behalf of such Purchaser or any other holder of a Note. All statements contained in any certificate or other instrument delivered by or on behalf of the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed representations and warranties of the Company under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement and the Notes embody the entire agreement and understanding between each Purchaser and the Company and supersede all prior agreements and understandings relating to the subject matter hereof.
S 17. A W.
ECTION
MENDMENT
AND
AIVER
. This Agreement and the Notes may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof or of the Notes may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively and for a specified time period or permanently), with (and only with) the written consent of the Company and the Required Holders, except that (a) no amendment or waiver of any of the provisions of or hereof, or any defined term (as it is used therein), will be effective as to any Purchaser unless consented to by such Purchaser in writing, and (b) no such amendment or waiver may, without the written consent of the holder of each Note at the time outstanding affected thereby, (i) subject to the provisions of relating to acceleration or rescission, change the amount or time of any prepayment or payment of principal of, or reduce the rate or change the time of payment or method of computation of interest or of the Make-Whole Amount on, the Notes, (ii) change the percentage of the principal amount of the Notes the holders of which are required to consent to any such amendment or waiver, or (iii) amend any of or .
Section 17.1. Requirements
Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
21
Section 12
Section 8, 11(a), 11(b), 12, 17
20
 
.
Section 17.2. Solicitation of Holders of Notes
(a) . The Company will provide each holder of the Notes (irrespective of the amount or series of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof, of the Notes or of any Subsidiary Guaranty. The Company will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this to each holder of outstanding Notes promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the requisite holders of Notes.
Solicitation
Section 17
(b) . The Company will not directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, or grant any security or provide other credit support, to any holder of Notes as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any holder of Notes of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof or of any Note or of any Subsidiary Guaranty unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted or other credit support concurrently provided, on the same terms, ratably to each holder of each series of Notes then outstanding even if such holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
Payment
(c) Any consent made pursuant to this by the holder of any Note that has transferred or has agreed to transfer such Note to the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate of the Company and has provided or has agreed to provide such written consent as a condition to such transfer, shall be void and of no force except solely as to such holder, and any amendments effected or to be effected or granted that would not have been or would not be so effected or granted but for such consents or waivers granted (and the consents of all other holders of Notes that were acquired under the same or similar conditions) shall be void and of no force except solely as to such transferring holder.
Consent in Contemplation of Transfer.
Section 17.2
. Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all holders of each series of Notes and is binding upon them and upon each future holder of any Note and upon the Company without regard to whether such Note has been marked to indicate such amendment or waiver. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant, agreement, Default or Event of Default not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Company and the holder of any Note nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder, under any Note or under any Subsidiary Guaranty shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any holder of such Note. As used herein, the term "this Agreement" and references thereto shall mean this Agreement as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 17.3. Binding Effect, Etc
Section 17
Solely for the purpose of determining whether the holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty, or have directed the taking of any action provided herein, in the Notes or in any Subsidiary Guaranty to be taken upon the direction of the
Section 17.4. Notes Held by Company, Etc.
 
holders of a specified percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding, Notes directly or indirectly owned by the Company or any of its Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
S 18. N.
ECTION
OTICES
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(i) if to any Purchaser or its nominee, to such Purchaser or nominee at the address specified for such communications in , or at such other address as such Purchaser or nominee shall have specified to the Company in writing,
Schedule A
(ii) if to any other holder of any Note, to such holder at such address as such other holder shall have specified to the Company in writing, or
(iii) if to the Company, to the Company at its address set forth at the beginning hereof to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as the Company shall have specified to the holder of each Note in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 18
S 19. R D.
ECTION
EPRODUCTION
OF
OCUMENTS
This Agreement and all documents relating thereto, including, without limitation, (a) consents, waivers and modifications that may hereafter be executed, (b) documents received by any Purchaser at the Closing (except the Notes themselves), and (c) financial statements, certificates and other information previously or hereafter furnished to any Purchaser, may be reproduced by such Purchaser by any photographic, photostatic, electronic, digital or other similar process and such Purchaser may destroy any original document so reproduced. The Company agrees and stipulates that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, any such reproduction shall be admissible in evidence as the original itself in any judicial or administrative proceeding (whether or not the original is in existence and whether or not such reproduction was made by such Purchaser in the regular course of business) and any enlargement, facsimile or further reproduction of such reproduction shall likewise be admissible in evidence. This shall not prohibit the Company or any other holder of Notes from contesting any such reproduction to the same extent that it could contest the original, or from introducing evidence to demonstrate the inaccuracy of any such reproduction.
Section 19
 
S 20. C I.
ECTION
ONFIDENTIAL
NFORMATION
For the purposes of this , means information delivered to any Purchaser by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in connection with the transactions contemplated by or otherwise pursuant to this Agreement and not previously disclosed in any filings by the Company with the SEC; that such term does not include information that (a) was publicly known or otherwise known to such Purchaser prior to the time of such disclosure, (b) subsequently becomes publicly known through no act or omission by such Purchaser or any Person acting on such Purchaser's behalf, (c) otherwise becomes known to such Purchaser other than through disclosure by the Company or any Subsidiary, or is known by such Purchaser to be under an obligation not to transmit such information to such Purchaser or (d) constitutes financial statements delivered to such Purchaser under that are otherwise publicly available. Each Purchaser will maintain the confidentiality of such Confidential Information in accordance with procedures adopted by such Purchaser in good faith to protect confidential information of third parties delivered to such Purchaser; that such Purchaser may deliver or disclose Confidential Information to (i) its directors, trustees, officers, employees, agents, attorneys and Affiliates (to the extent such disclosure reasonably relates to the administration of the investment represented by its Notes), (ii) its financial advisors and other professional advisors who agree to hold confidential the Confidential Information substantially in accordance with the terms of this , (iii) any other holder of any Note, (iv) any Institutional Investor to which it sells or offers to sell such Note or any part thereof or any participation therein (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (v) any Person from which it offers to purchase any security of the Company (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (vi) any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over such Purchaser, (vii) the NAIC or the SVO or, in each case, any similar organization, or any nationally recognized rating agency that requires access to information about such Purchaser's investment portfolio or (viii) any other Person to which such delivery or disclosure may be necessary or appropriate (w) to effect compliance with any law, rule, regulation or order applicable to such Purchaser, (x) in response to any subpoena or other legal process, (y) in connection with any litigation to which such Purchaser is a party or (z) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, to the extent such Purchaser may reasonably determine such delivery and disclosure to be necessary or appropriate in the enforcement or for the protection of the rights and remedies under such Purchaser's Notes and this Agreement. Each holder of a Note, by its acceptance of a Note, will be deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to be entitled to the benefits of this as though it were a party to this Agreement. On reasonable request by the Company in connection with the delivery to any holder of a Note of information required to be delivered to such holder under this Agreement or requested by such holder (other than a holder that is a party to this Agreement or its nominee), such holder will, as a condition precedent to receiving such information, enter into an agreement with the Company embodying the provisions of this and providing the Company assurances that such holder will enter into further agreements with language no more burdensome on the holder than the language contained in this as reasonably requested by the Company in order to comply with Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC. The Company shall reimburse such holder's reasonable expenses incurred in connection with entering into any such agreement.
Section 20
"Confidential Information"
provided
Section 7.1
provided
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
 
S 21. S P.
ECTION
UBSTITUTION
OF
URCHASER
Each Purchaser shall have the right to substitute any one of its Affiliates as the purchaser of the Notes that it has agreed to purchase hereunder, by written notice to the Company, which notice shall be signed by both such Purchaser and such Affiliate, shall contain such Affiliate's agreement to be bound by this Agreement and shall contain a confirmation by such Affiliate of the accuracy with respect to it of the representations set forth in . Upon receipt of such notice, any reference to such Purchaser in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall be deemed to refer to such Affiliate in lieu of such original Purchaser. In the event that such Affiliate is so substituted as a Purchaser hereunder and such Affiliate thereafter transfers to such original Purchaser all of the Notes then held by such Affiliate, upon receipt by the Company of notice of such transfer, any reference to such Affiliate as a "Purchaser" in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall no longer be deemed to refer to such Affiliate, but shall refer to such original Purchaser, and such original Purchaser shall again have all the rights of an original holder of the Notes under this Agreement.
Section 6
Section 21
Section 21
S 22. M.
ECTION
ISCELLANEOUS
. All covenants and other agreements contained in this Agreement by or on behalf of any of the parties hereto bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns (including, without limitation, any subsequent holder of a Note) whether so expressed or not.
Section 22.1. Successors and Assigns
. Anything in this Agreement or the Notes to the contrary notwithstanding (but without limiting the requirement in that the notice of any optional prepayment specify a Business Day as the date fixed for such prepayment), any payment of principal of or Make-Whole Amount or interest on any Note that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; that if the maturity date of any Note is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
Section 22.2. Payments Due on Non-Business Days
Section 8.4
provided
. All accounting terms used herein which are not expressly defined in this Agreement have the meanings respectively given to them in accordance with GAAP. Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, any calculation required by, or for purposes of determining compliance with, and shall be calculated using Agreement Accounting Principles and each financial or accounting term used in each such Section shall have the meaning given to them in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of the Closing Date applied on a consistent basis with that used in preparation of the most recent audited consolidated financial statements listed in (whether, in the case of capitalized terms defined in this Agreement, the definition expressly refers to Agreement Accounting Principles or not).
Section 22.3. Accounting Terms
Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4
10.6
Schedule 5.5
 
. Any provision of this Agreement that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.4. Severability
. Each covenant contained herein shall be construed (absent express provision to the contrary) as being independent of each other covenant contained herein, so that compliance with any one covenant shall not (absent such an express contrary provision) be deemed to excuse compliance with any other covenant. Where any provision herein refers to action to be taken by any Person, or which such Person is prohibited from taking, such provision shall be applicable whether such action is taken directly or indirectly by such Person.
Section 22.5. Construction, Etc
For the avoidance of doubt, all Schedules and Exhibits attached to this Agreement shall be deemed to be a part hereof.
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
Section 22.6. Counterparts
Section 22.7. Governing Law
. This Agreement shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the parties shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois
,
excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
(a) The Company irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the Notes. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Company irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
Section 22.8. Jurisdiction and Process; Waiver of Jury Trial.
(b) The Company consents to process being served by or on behalf of any holder of Notes in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in by mailing a copy thereof by registered or certified mail (or any substantially similar form of mail), postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to it at its address specified in or at such other address of which such holder shall then have been notified pursuant to said Section. The Company agrees that such service upon receipt (i) shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon it in any such suit, action or proceeding and (ii) shall, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, be taken and held to be valid personal service upon and personal delivery to it. Notices hereunder shall be conclusively presumed received as evidenced by a delivery receipt furnished by the United States Postal Service or any reputable commercial delivery service.
Section 22.8(a)
Section 18
 
(c) Nothing in this shall affect the right of any holder of a Note to serve process in any manner permitted by law, or limit any right that the holders of any of the Notes may have to bring proceedings against the Company in the courts of any appropriate jurisdiction or to enforce in any lawful manner a judgment obtained in one jurisdiction in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.8
(d) T A, N .
HE
PARTIES
HERETO
HEREBY
WAIVE
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
ACTION
BROUGHT
ON
OR
WITH
RESPECT
TO
THIS
GREEMENT
THE
OTES
OR
ANY
OTHER
DOCUMENT
EXECUTED
IN
CONNECTION
HEREWITH
OR
THEREWITH
 
If you are in agreement with the foregoing, please sign the form of agreement on a counterpart of this Agreement and return it to the Company, whereupon this Agreement shall become a binding agreement between you and the Company.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
As used herein, the following terms have the respective meanings set forth below or set forth in the Section hereof following such term:
means, at any time, and with respect to any Person, any other Person that at such time directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries Controls, or is Controlled by, or is under common Control with, such first Person, and with respect to the Company, shall include any Person beneficially owning or holding, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests of the Company or any Subsidiary or any corporation of which the Company and its Subsidiaries beneficially own or hold, in the aggregate, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests. As used in this definition, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise. Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to an is a reference to an Affiliate of the Company.
"Affiliate"
"Control"
"Affiliate"
"" means generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of the date of the Closing applied on a basis consistent with that used in the preparation of the most recent audited consolidated financial statements of the Company listed in .
Agreement Accounting Principles
Schedule 5.5
means Executive Order No. 13,224 of September 24, 2001, Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions with Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit or Support Terrorism, 66 U.S. Fed. Reg. 49,079 (2001), as amended.
"Anti-Terrorism Order"
means the Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of October 5, 2005 among the Company, the guarantors from time to time party thereto, the lenders from time to time party thereto, Harris N.A., as administrative agent, Citibank, N.A., as syndication agent, and Barclays Bank PLC, as documentation agent, as the same may from time to time be amended, modified, supplemented, renewed, extended, refinanced or replaced.
"Bank Credit Agreement"
means (a) for the purposes of only, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed, and (b) for the purposes of any other provision of this Agreement, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in Chicago, Illinois or New York, New York are required or authorized to be closed.
"Business Day"
Section 8.6
means any lease of property which, in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, is required to be capitalized on the balance sheet of the lessee.
"Capital Lease"
means the amount of the liability shown on the balance sheet of any Person in respect of a Capital Lease as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation"
is defined in
"Change in Control"
Section 8.7(f).
"" is defined in .
Change in Control Event
Section 8.7(a)
is defined in .
"Closing"
Section 3
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time.
"Code"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation, or any successor that becomes such in the manner prescribed in .
"Company"
Section 10.5
is defined in .
"Confidential Information"
Section 20
means, without duplication, all Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis eliminating intercompany items.
"Consolidated Indebtedness"
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the total stockholders' equity (including capital stock, additional paid-in capital and retained earnings after deducting treasury stock, but excluding minority interests in Subsidiaries) which would appear on the balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Net Worth"
means, without duplication, all Priority Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis eliminating inter-company items.
"Consolidated Priority Indebtedness"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, total assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Total Assets"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, the sum of (a) Consolidated Indebtedness (b) Consolidated Net Worth.
"Consolidated Total Capitalization"
plus
means an event or condition the occurrence or existence of which would, with the lapse of time or the giving of notice or both, become an Event of Default.
"Default"
means, for each series of Notes, that rate of interest that is 2% per annum above the rate of interest stated in clause (a) of the first paragraph of such series of the Notes.
"Default Rate"
is defined in .
"Disclosure Documents"
Section 5.3
is defined in .
"Disposition"
Section 10.6
means each Subsidiary of the Company which is organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
 
means, for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of:
"EBITDA"
(a) Net Income for such period
plus
(b) to the extent deducted in determining Net Income:
(i) income and franchise taxes;
(ii) Interest Expense;
(iii) amortization;
(iv) depreciation;
(v) non-cash stock option expense; and
(vi) non-cash restructuring charges.
means, for any period, EBITDA , to the extent deducted in determining Net Income, Rental Expense.
"EBITDAR"
plus
is defined in .
"Electronic Delivery"
Section 7.1(a)
means any and all Federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including but not limited to those related to Hazardous Materials.
"Environmental Laws"
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"ERISA"
means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that is treated as a single employer together with the Company under Section 414 of the Code.
"ERISA Affiliate"
is defined in .
"Event of Default"
Section 11
means, as of any date the same is to be determined, all cash on the books of the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries which is maintained in accounts located in the United States of America and which is in excess of $25,000,000, but excluding restricted cash as set forth in the financial statements of the Company delivered pursuant to .
"Excess Cash"
Section 7.1
 
means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Exchange Act"
means for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of Interest Expense paid or payable in cash for such period and Rental Expense for such period.
"Fixed Charges"
is defined in .
"Form 10-K"
Section 7.1(b)
is defined in .
"Form 10-Q"
Section 7.1(a)
means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect from time to time in the United States of America.
"GAAP"
means
"Governmental Authority"
(a) the government of
(i) the United States of America or any State or other political subdivision thereof, or
(ii) any other jurisdiction in which the Company or any Subsidiary conducts all or any part of its business, or which asserts jurisdiction over any properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, or
(b) any entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions of, or pertaining to, any such government.
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any obligation (except the endorsement in the ordinary course of business of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection) of such Person guaranteeing or in effect guaranteeing any Indebtedness, dividend or other obligation of any other Person in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, including (without limitation) obligations incurred through an agreement, contingent or otherwise, by such Person:
"Guaranty"
(a) to purchase such Indebtedness or obligation or any property constituting security therefor;
(b) to advance or supply funds (i) for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation, or (ii) to maintain any working capital or other balance sheet condition or any income statement condition of any other Person or otherwise to advance or make available funds for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation;
 
(c) to lease properties or to purchase properties or services primarily for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation of the ability of any other Person to make payment of the Indebtedness or obligation; or
(d) otherwise to assure the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation against loss in respect thereof.
In any computation of the Indebtedness or other liabilities of the obligor under any Guaranty, the Indebtedness or other obligations that are the subject of such Guaranty shall be assumed to be direct obligations of such obligor.
means any and all pollutants, toxic or hazardous wastes or any other substances, including all substances listed in or regulated in any Environmental Law as posing a hazard to health and safety, the removal of which is required or the generation, manufacture, refining, production, processing, treatment, storage, handling, transportation, transfer, use, disposal, release, discharge, spillage, seepage, or filtration of which is or shall be restricted, regulated, prohibited or penalized by any applicable law including, but not limited to, asbestos, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, petroleum, petroleum products, lead based paint, radon gas or similar restricted, prohibited or penalized substances.
"Hazardous Material"
means, with respect to any Note, the Person in whose name such Note is registered in the register maintained by the Company pursuant to .
"holder"
Section 13.1
means for any Person (without duplication) (i) all indebtedness created, assumed or incurred in any manner by such Person representing money borrowed (including by the issuance of debt securities), (ii) all indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than (a) trade accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which are not more than 90 days past due and (b) obligations to make earn-out payments payable (including at the election of the Company) in capital stock of the Company pursuant to acquisitions by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), (iii) all indebtedness secured by any Lien upon property of such Person, whether or not such Person has assumed or become liable for the payment of such indebtedness, (iv) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person, (v) all obligations of such Person on or with respect to letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and other extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money, excluding, in each case, indebtedness which is non-recourse to such Person and its subsidiaries and (vi) any Guaranty of such Person with respect to liabilities of a type described in any of clauses (i) through (v) hereof.
"Indebtedness"
means (a) any purchaser of a Note, (b) any holder of a Note holding (together with one or more of its Affiliates) more than 5% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding, (c) any bank, trust company, savings and loan association or other financial institution, any pension plan, any investment company, any insurance company, any broker or dealer, or any other similar financial institution or entity, regardless of legal form, and (d) any Related Fund of any holder of any Note.
"Institutional Investor"
 
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to Capitalized Lease Obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period (after eliminating intercompany items) determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Interest Expense"
is defined in .
"Investment Grade Rating"
Section 8.7(f)
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any mortgage, lien, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance, or any interest or title of any vendor, lessor, lender or other secured party to or of such Person under any conditional sale or other title retention agreement or Capital Lease, upon or with respect to any property or asset of such Person (including in the case of stock, stockholder agreements, voting trust agreements and all similar arrangements).
"Lien"
is defined in .
"Make-Whole Amount"
Section 8.6
means material in relation to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
"Material"
means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes, or (c) the ability of any Subsidiary Guarantor to perform its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty, when taken together with the Company's ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes and the other Subsidiary Guarantors' ability to perform their obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty, or (d) the validity or enforceability against the Company of this Agreement or the Notes or (e) the validity or enforceability against the Subsidiary Guarantors, taken as a whole, of the Subsidiary Guaranty.
"Material Adverse Effect"
means a Subsidiary of the Company whose assets represent more than 5% of the Consolidated Total Assets.
"Material Subsidiary"
means a Domestic Subsidiary which is a Wholly-owned Subsidiary and a Material Subsidiary.
"Material Wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary"
is defined in .
"Memorandum"
Section 5.3
means any Plan that is a "multiemployer plan" (as such term is defined in section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA).
"Multiemployer Plan"
means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any successor thereto.
"NAIC"
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the net income (or net loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period as computed on a consolidated basis
"Net Income"
 
in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, and, without limiting the foregoing, after deduction from gross income of all expenses and reserves, including reserves for all taxes on or measured by income.
means, with respect to any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of the assets or property of any Person, an amount equal to the (a) aggregate amount of the value of the consideration received by such Person in respect thereof (the value of any consideration which is not cash to be determined in good faith by a Senior Financial Officer) (b) the sum of (i) all out-of-pocket costs and expenses actually incurred by such Person and its Affiliates in connection with such sale, lease, transfer or other disposition and (ii) all state, federal or foreign taxes incurred or to be incurred by such Person or its Affiliates (assuming the highest marginal rate were applicable thereto) in connection therewith.
"net proceeds"
minus
is defined in .
"Notes"
Section 1
means a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer or of any other officer of the Company whose responsibilities extend to the subject matter of such certificate.
"Officer's Certificate"
means, as to any Person, any lease of property (whether real, personal or mixed) by such Person as lessee that is not a Capital Lease.
"Operating Lease"
means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA or any successor thereto.
"PBGC"
is defined in .
"Permitted Lien"
Section 10.4
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization, business entity or Governmental Authority.
"Person"
means an "employee benefit plan" (as defined in section 3(3) of ERISA) subject to Title I of ERISA that is or, within the preceding five years, has been established or maintained, or to which contributions are or, within the preceding five years, have been made or required to be made, by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate or with respect to which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate may have any liability.
"Plan"
means, without duplication (a) any Indebtedness of the Company or a Subsidiary secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of and (b) any Indebtedness of the Company's Subsidiaries; that there shall be excluded from any calculation of Priority Indebtedness, (i) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor (other than Indebtedness of a Subsidiary Guarantor secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of ), (ii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary of the Company, (iii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary outstanding on the date of the Closing and described on hereto and any extension, renewal or refunding of any such Indebtedness, and (iv) the Indebtedness of any Person which becomes a Subsidiary after the date of the Closing and any extension, renewal or refunding thereof; that such Indebtedness was not incurred in contemplation of such Person becoming a Subsidiary.
"Priority Indebtedness"
Section 10.4(l)
provided
Section 10.4(l)
Schedule 5.15
provided
 
or means any interest in any kind of property or asset, whether real, personal or mixed, or tangible or intangible.
"property"
"properties"
is defined in .
"Proposed Prepayment Date"
Section 8.7(b)
is defined in .
"PTE"
Section 6.2(a)
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Purchaser"
means Prohibited Transaction Class Exemption 84-14 issued by the United States Department of Labor.
"QPAM Exemption"
means any Person who is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of such term as set forth in Rule 144A(a)(1) under the Securities Act.
"Qualified Institutional Buyer"
means, with respect to any holder of any Note, any fund or entity that (a) invests in Securities or bank loans, and (b) is advised or managed by such holder, the same investment advisor as such holder or by an Affiliate of such holder or such investment advisor.
"Related Fund"
means, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries for any period, the aggregate amounts payable with respect to Operating Leases of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Rental Expense"
means, at any time, the holders of at least 51% in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding (exclusive of Notes then owned by the Company or any of its Affiliates).
"Required Holders"
means any Senior Financial Officer and any other officer of the Company with responsibility for the administration of the relevant portion of this Agreement.
"Responsible Officer"
shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, or any successor thereto.
"SEC"
or shall have the same meaning as in Section 2(1) of the Securities Act.
"Securities"
"Security"
means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Securities Act"
means the chief financial officer, chief accounting officer or treasurer of the Company.
"Senior Financial Officer"
 
means all Indebtedness of the Company which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other Indebtedness of the Company.
"Senior Indebtedness"
is defined in of this Agreement.
"Series A Notes"
Section 1
is defined in of this Agreement.
"Series B Notes"
Section 1
means, as to any Person, any other Person in which such first Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries owns sufficient equity or voting interests to enable it or them (as a group) ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, to elect a majority of the directors (or Persons performing similar functions) of such second Person, and any partnership or joint venture if more than a 50% interest in the profits or capital thereof is owned by such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries (unless such partnership can and does ordinarily take major business actions without the prior approval of such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries). Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to a "Subsidiary" is a reference to a Subsidiary of the Company.
"Subsidiary"
is defined in and shall include any Subsidiary Guarantor which is required to comply with the requirements of .
"Subsidiary Guarantor"
Section 2.2(a)
Section 9.7
is defined in and shall include any Subsidiary Guaranty delivered pursuant to .
"Subsidiary Guaranty"
Section 2.2(a)
Section 9.7
is defined in.
"Surviving Person"
Section 10.5(b)
means the Securities Valuation Office of the NAIC or any successor to such Office.
"SVO"
means United States Public Law 107-56, Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism (USA P A) Act of 2001, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"USA Patriot Act"
ATRIOT
CT
means Securities of any class or classes of a Person, the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to elect the corporate directors (or persons performing similar functions) of such Person.
"Voting Stock"
means, at any time, any Subsidiary of which all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (other than directors' qualifying shares as required by law) or other equity interests are owned by any one or more of the Company and the Company's other Wholly-owned Subsidiaries.
"Wholly-owned Subsidiary"
 
 
F V R, the undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (herein called the ), a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware, hereby promises to pay to , or registered assigns, the principal sum of D (or so much thereof as shall not have been prepaid) on August 3, 2014, with interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months) on the unpaid balance hereof at the rate of (a) 6.26% per annum from the date hereof, payable semi-annually on the third day of February and August in each year commencing with the February 3 or August 3 next succeeding the date hereof, until the principal hereof shall have become due and payable, and (b) to the extent permitted by law, on any overdue payment of interest and, during the continuance of an Event of Default, on such unpaid balance and on any overdue payment of any Make-Whole Amount, at a rate per annum from time to time equal to 8.26% payable semiannually as aforesaid (or, at the option of the registered holder hereof, on demand).
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Company"
                            
                    
OLLARS
Payments of principal of, interest on and any Make-Whole Amount with respect to this Note are to be made in lawful money of the United States of America at Chicago, Illinois or at such other place as the Company shall have designated by written notice to the holder of this Note as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement referred to below.
This Note is one of a series of Senior Notes (herein called the ) issued pursuant to the Note Purchase Agreement dated as of August 3, 2007 (as from time to time amended, the ), between the Company and the respective Purchasers named therein and is entitled to the benefits thereof. Each holder of this Note will be deemed, by its acceptance hereof, to have (i) agreed to the confidentiality provisions set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and (ii) made the representation set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and, in addition, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption. Unless otherwise indicated, capitalized terms used in this Note shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Note Purchase Agreement.
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
Section 20
Section 6
This Note is a registered Note and, as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer, duly endorsed, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed, by the registered holder hereof or such holder's attorney
duly authorized in writing, a new Note for a like principal amount will be issued to, and registered in the name of, the transferee. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Company may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment and for all other purposes, and the Company will not be affected by any notice to the contrary.
This Note is subject to optional prepayment, in whole or from time to time in part, at the times and on the terms specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, but not otherwise.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the principal of this Note may be declared or otherwise become due and payable in the manner, at the price (including any applicable Make-Whole Amount) and with the effect provided in the Note Purchase Agreement.
This Note shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the Company and the holder of this Note shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
 
 
F V R, the undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (herein called the ), a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Delaware, hereby promises to pay to , or registered assigns, the principal sum of D (or so much thereof as shall not have been prepaid) on August 3, 2017, with interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months) on the unpaid balance hereof at the rate of (a) 6.44% per annum from the date hereof, payable semi-annually, the third day of February and August in each year commencing with the February 3 or August 3 next succeeding the date hereof, until the principal hereof shall have become due and payable, and (b) to the extent permitted by law, on any overdue payment of interest and, during the continuance of an Event of Default, on such unpaid balance and on any overdue payment of any Make-Whole Amount, at a rate per annum from time to time equal to 8.44% payable semiannually as aforesaid (or, at the option of the registered holder hereof, on demand).
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Company"
                            
                    
OLLARS
Payments of principal of, interest on and any Make-Whole Amount with respect to this Note are to be made in lawful money of the United States of America at Chicago, Illinois or at such other place as the Company shall have designated by written notice to the holder of this Note as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement referred to below.
This Note is one of a series of Senior Notes (herein called the ) issued pursuant to the Note Purchase Agreement dated as of August 3, 2007 (as from time to time amended, the ), between the Company and the respective Purchasers named therein and is entitled to the benefits thereof. Each holder of this Note will be deemed, by its acceptance hereof, to have (i) agreed to the confidentiality provisions set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and (ii) made the representation set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and, in addition, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption. Unless otherwise indicated, capitalized terms used in this Note shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Note Purchase Agreement.
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
Section 20
Section 6
This Note is a registered Note and, as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer, duly endorsed, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed, by the registered holder hereof or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing, a new Note for a like principal amount will be issued to, and
registered in the name of, the transferee. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Company may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment and for all other purposes, and the Company will not be affected by any notice to the contrary.
This Note is subject to optional prepayment, in whole or from time to time in part, at the times and on the terms specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, but not otherwise.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the principal of this Note may be declared or otherwise become due and payable in the manner, at the price (including any applicable Make-Whole Amount) and with the effect provided in the Note Purchase Agreement.
This Note shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the Company and the holder of this Note shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
$300,000,000 6.44% Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017
This G A dated as of August 3, 2007 (the or this ) is entered into on a joint and several basis by each of the undersigned, together with any entity which may become a party hereto by execution and delivery of a Guaranty Supplement in substantially the form set forth as hereto (a ) (which parties are hereinafter referred to individually as a and collectively as the ).
UARANTY
GREEMENT
"Guaranty"
Exhibit A
"Guaranty Supplement"
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
A. Each Guarantor is a Subsidiary (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ).
"Company"
B. For the purpose set forth in the "Description of the Offering and Use of Proceeds" of the Memorandum (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement), the Company has entered into that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of August 3, 2007 (the ) among the Company and each of the purchasers named on Schedule A thereto (the ; the Initial Note Purchasers, together with their successors, assigns or any other future holder of the Notes (as hereinafter defined), the ), providing for, , the issue and sale by the Company to the Initial Note Purchasers of (a) $100,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 6.26% Senior Notes, Series A, due August 3, 2014 (the ) and (b) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 6.44% Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017 (the ; the Series A Notes and the Series B Notes are hereinafter collectively referred to as the ).
"Note Purchase Agreement"
"Initial Note Purchasers"
"Holders"
inter alia
"Series A Notes"
"Series B Notes"
"Notes"
C. The Initial Note Purchasers have required as a condition to their purchase of the Notes that the Company cause each of the undersigned to enter into this Guaranty and to cause each Subsidiary that after the date hereof delivers a guaranty pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement (as defined in the Note Purchase Agreement) to enter into a Guaranty Supplement, in each case as security for the Notes, and the Company has agreed to cause each of the undersigned to execute this Guaranty in order to induce the Initial Note Purchasers to purchase the Notes and thereby benefit the Company and its Subsidiary by providing funds for the purpose set forth in the "Description of the Offering and Use of Proceeds" of the Memorandum. The Company owns 100% of the equity interests of the Guarantors.
D. Each of the Guarantors will derive substantial direct and indirect benefit from the sale of the Notes to the Initial Note Purchasers.
N, , as required by Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement and in consideration of the premises and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency whereof are hereby acknowledged, each Guarantor does hereby covenant and agree, jointly and severally, as follows:
OW
THEREFORE
S 1. D.
ECTION
EFINITIONS
Capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Note Purchase Agreement unless herein defined or the context shall otherwise require.
S 2. G N N P A.
ECTION
UARANTY
OF
OTES
AND
OTE
URCHASE
GREEMENT
(a) Subject to the limitation set forth in hereof, each Guarantor jointly and severally does hereby irrevocably, absolutely and unconditionally guarantee unto the Holders: (1) the full and prompt payment of the principal of, premium (including, without limitation, any Make-Whole Amount), if any, and interest on the Notes and any other amounts from time to time outstanding under the Note Purchase Agreement or the Notes, as and when such payments shall become due and payable whether by lapse of time, upon redemption or prepayment, by extension or by acceleration or declaration or otherwise (including (to the extent legally enforceable) interest due on overdue payments of principal, premium, if any, or interest at the rate set forth in the Notes and interest accruing at the then applicable rate provided in the Notes after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy, or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding, relating to the Company, whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding) in Federal or other immediately available funds of the United States of America which at the time of payment or demand therefor shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, (2) the full and prompt performance and observance by the Company of each and all of the obligations, covenants and agreements required to be performed or owed by the Company under the terms of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and (3) the full and prompt payment, upon demand by any Holder, of all costs and expenses, legal or otherwise (including reasonable attorneys' fees), if any, as shall have been expended or incurred in the protection or enforcement of any rights, privileges or liabilities in favor of the Holders under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or under this Guaranty or in any consultation or action in connection therewith or herewith and in each and every case irrespective of the validity, regularity, or enforcement of any of the Notes or Note Purchase Agreement or any of the terms thereof or any other like circumstance or circumstances.
Section 2(b)
(b) The liability of each Guarantor under this Guaranty shall not exceed an amount equal to a maximum amount as will, after giving effect to such maximum amount and all other liabilities of such Guarantor, contingent or otherwise, result in the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder not constituting a fraudulent transfer, obligation or conveyance.
S 3. G P P.
ECTION
UARANTY
OF
AYMENT
AND
ERFORMANCE
This is a guarantee of payment and performance and each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to require that any action on or in respect of any Note or the Note Purchase Agreement be brought against the Company or any other Person or that resort be had to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. Any Holder may, at its option, proceed hereunder against any Guarantor in the first instance to collect monies when due, the payment of which is guaranteed hereby, without first proceeding against the Company or any other Person and without first resorting to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. The liability of each
 
Guarantor hereunder shall in no way be affected or impaired by any acceptance by any Holder of any direct or indirect security for, or other guaranties of, any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Company or any other Person to any Holder or by any failure, delay, neglect or omission by any Holder to realize upon or protect any such guarantees, Indebtedness, liability or obligation or any notes or other instruments evidencing the same or any direct or indirect security therefor or by any approval, consent, waiver, or other action taken, or omitted to be taken by any such Holder.
The covenants and agreements on the part of the Guarantors herein contained shall take effect as joint and several covenants and agreements, and references to the Guarantors shall take effect as references to each of them and none of them shall be released from liability hereunder by reason of the guarantee ceasing to be binding as a continuing security on any other of them.
S 4. G P R G.
ECTION
ENERAL
ROVISIONS
ELATING
TO
THE
UARANTY
(a) Each Guarantor hereby consents and agrees that any Holder or Holders from time to time, with or without any further notice to or assent from any other Guarantor may, without in any manner affecting the liability of any Guarantor under this Guaranty, and upon such terms and conditions as any such Holder or Holders may deem advisable:
(1) extend in whole or in part (by renewal or otherwise), modify, change, compromise, release or extend the duration of the time for the performance or payment of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Company or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligations of the Company on the Notes, or waive any Default or Event of Default with respect thereto, or waive, modify, amend or change any provision of any other agreement or this Guaranty; or
(2) sell, release, surrender, modify, impair, exchange or substitute any and all property, of any nature and from whomsoever received, held by, or for the benefit of, any such Holder as direct or indirect security for the payment or performance of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Company or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Company on the Notes; or
(3) settle, adjust or compromise any claim of the Company against any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Company on the Notes.
Each Guarantor hereby ratifies and confirms any such extension, renewal, change, sale, release, waiver, surrender, exchange, modification, amendment, impairment, substitution, settlement, adjustment or compromise and that the same shall be binding upon it, and hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any and all defenses, counterclaims or offsets which it might or could have by reason thereof, it being understood that such Guarantor shall at all times be bound by this Guaranty and remain liable hereunder.
 
(b) Each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of acceptance of this Guaranty by the Holders or of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of the Company, present or future, or of the reliance of such Holders upon this Guaranty (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in hereof shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Guaranty);
Section 2
(2) demand of payment by any Holder from the Company or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any Holder or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Guarantor.
The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty and the rights of any Holder to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Company under the Note Purchase Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
(c) The obligations of the Guarantors hereunder shall be binding upon the Guarantors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due pursuant to shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Guarantors:
Section 2
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of the Company, any other Guarantors or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of the Company to issue the Notes or the Company to execute and deliver the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or of any other Guarantors to execute and deliver this Guaranty or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of the Company or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
 
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person or in respect of the property of the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person; or
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of the Company, any other Guarantors or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to the Company, any other Guarantors or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other , whether or not beyond the control of the Company, any other Guarantors or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
force majeure
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against the Company, any Guarantor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by the Company, any Guarantor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or this Guaranty, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by the Company, any Guarantor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Guarantor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Guaranty; or
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Guarantor of failure of the Company, any
 
Guarantor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to the Company, any other Guarantor or to any other Person or to any other guaranty or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other guaranty, the advance of additional money to the Company or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any release of any other Guarantor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) the Company or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) the Company or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Guarantor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Guarantor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Guarantor or other Person under this Guaranty or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Guaranty and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Guarantor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided
provided
 
in the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, the Company shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement and that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by the Company under the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
(d) All rights of any Holder may be transferred or assigned at any time and shall be considered to be transferred or assigned at any time or from time to time upon the transfer of such Note whether with or without the consent of or notice to the Guarantors under this Guaranty or to the Company.
(e) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, the Guarantors shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holder or Holders upon whose Notes such payment was made, but each Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of subrogation shall be junior and subordinate in right of payment to the prior indefeasible final payment in cash in full of all amounts due and owing by the Company with respect to the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and by the Guarantors under this Guaranty, and the Guarantors shall not take any action to enforce such right of subrogation, and the Guarantors shall not accept any payment in respect of such right of subrogation, until all amounts due and owing by the Company under or in respect of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and all amounts due and owing by the Guarantors hereunder have indefeasibly been finally paid in cash in full. If any amount shall be paid to any Guarantor in violation of the preceding sentence at any time prior to the indefeasible payment in cash in full of the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Holders and shall forthwith be paid to the Holders to be credited and applied to the amounts due or to become due with respect to the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, whether matured or unmatured. Each Guarantor acknowledges that it has received direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by the Note Purchase Agreement and that the waiver set forth in this is knowingly made as a result of the receipt of such benefits.
paragraph (e)
(f) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, each Guarantor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Guarantors, but such Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the Holders for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Guarantor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(g) Each Guarantor agrees that to the extent the Company, any other Guarantor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such
 
payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Guarantors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Guarantors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any Holder from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
(h) No Holder shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Guarantors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of the Company under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Guarantors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Guarantors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Guarantors' burden, any right to which each Guarantor hereby expressly waives.
(i) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank in right of payment with all other Indebtedness of such Guarantor which is not secured or which is not expressly subordinated in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of such Guarantor.
pari passu
S 5. R W G.
ECTION
EPRESENTATIONS
AND
ARRANTIES
OF
THE
UARANTORS
Each Guarantor represents and warrants to each Holder that:
(a) Such Guarantor is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (1) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of such Guarantor and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (2) the ability of such Guarantor to perform its obligations under this Guaranty, or (3) the validity or enforceability of this Guaranty (herein in this , a ). Such Guarantor has the power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Guaranty and to perform the provisions hereof.
Section 5
"Material Adverse Effect"
(b) This Guaranty has been duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of such Guarantor, and this Guaranty constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Guarantor enforceable against such Guarantor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (1) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(c) The execution, delivery and performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty will not (1) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries under any
 
material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, charter document or by-law, or any other material agreement or instrument to which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries is bound or by which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective properties may be bound or affected, (2) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or (3) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to the such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries.
(d) No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty.
(e) Such Guarantor is solvent, has capital not unreasonably small in relation to its business or any contemplated or undertaken transaction and has assets having a value both at fair valuation and at present fair salable value greater than the amount required to pay its debts as they become due and greater than the amount that will be required to pay its probable liability on its existing debts as they become absolute and matured. Such Guarantor does not intend to incur, or believe or should have believed that it will incur, debts beyond its ability to pay such debts as they become due. Such Guarantor will not be rendered insolvent by the execution and delivery of, and performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty. Such Guarantor does not intend to hinder, delay or defraud its creditors by or through the execution and delivery of, or performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty.
(f) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Guarantor.
pari passu
S 6. G C.
ECTION
UARANTOR
OVENANTS
From and after the date of issuance of the Notes by the Company and continuing so long as any amount remains unpaid thereon each Guarantor agrees to comply with the terms and provisions of Sections 9.1, 9.2, 9.3, 9.4, 9.5 and 9.8 of the Note Purchase Agreement, insofar as such provisions apply to such Guarantor, as if said Sections were set forth herein in full.
S 7. [R].
ECTION
ESERVED
S 8. G L.
ECTION
OVERNING
AW
(a)
This Guaranty shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the parties shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois
,
excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
(b) Each Guarantor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guaranty. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, such Guarantor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
(c) The parties hereto waive any right to have a jury participate in resolving any dispute, whether sounding in contract, tort, or otherwise, between them arising out of, connected with, related to or incidental to the relationship established between them in connection with this Guaranty, any financing agreement, any loan party document or any other instrument, document or agreement executed or delivered in connection herewith or the transactions related hereto. The parties hereto hereby agree and consent that any such claim, demand, action or cause of action shall be decided by court trial without a jury and that any of them may file an original counterpart or a copy of this Guaranty with any court as written evidence of the consent of the parties hereto to the waiver of their right to trial by jury.
S 9. [R].
ECTION
ESERVED
S 10. A, W C.
ECTION
MENDMENTS
AIVERS
AND
ONSENTS
(a) This Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively), with (and only with) the written consent of each Guarantor and the Required Holders.
(b) The Guarantors will provide each Holder (irrespective of the amount of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such Holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof. The Guarantors will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this to each Holder promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the Required Holders.
Section 10
(c) The Company will not directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of fee or otherwise, or grant any security, to any Holder as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any Holder of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted, on the same terms, ratably to each Holder even if such Holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
 
(d) Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all Holders and is binding upon them and upon each future holder and upon the Guarantors. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant or agreement not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Guarantors and any Holder nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any Holder. As used herein, the term "this Guaranty" and references thereto shall mean this Guaranty as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 10
(e) Solely for the purpose of determining whether the Holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Guaranty, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Guarantor, the Company or any of their respective subsidiaries or Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
S 11. N.
ECTION
OTICES
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(1) if to an Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee, to such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee at the address specified for such communications in Schedule A to the Note Purchase Agreement, or at such other address as such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing,
(2) if to any other Holder, to such Holder at such address as such Holder shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing, or
(3) if to any Guarantor, to such Guarantor c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning of the Note Purchase Agreement to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as such Guarantor shall have specified to the Holders in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 11
S 12. M.
ECTION
ISCELLANEOUS
(a) No remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to any Holder is intended to be exclusive of any other available remedy or remedies, but each and every such remedy shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to every other remedy given under this Guaranty now or hereafter existing at law or in equity. No delay or omission to exercise any right or power accruing upon any default, omission or failure of performance hereunder shall impair any such
 
right or power or shall be construed to be a waiver thereof but any such right or power may be exercised from time to time and as often as may be deemed expedient. In order to entitle any Holder to exercise any remedy reserved to it under the Guaranty, it shall not be necessary for such Holder to physically produce its Note in any proceedings instituted by it or to give any notice, other than such notice as may be herein expressly required.
(b) The Guarantors will pay all sums becoming due under this Guaranty by the method and at the address specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, or by such other method or at such other address as any Holder shall have from time to time specified to the Guarantors in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of this Guaranty or any Note.
(c) Any provision of this Guaranty that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
(d) If the whole or any part of this Guaranty shall be now or hereafter become unenforceable against any one or more of the Guarantors for any reason whatsoever or if it is not executed by any one or more of the Guarantors, this Guaranty shall nevertheless be and remain fully binding upon and enforceable against each other Guarantor as if it had been made and delivered only by such other Guarantors.
(e) This Guaranty shall be binding upon each Guarantor and its successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of each Holder and its successors and assigns so long as its Notes remain outstanding and unpaid.
(f) This Guaranty may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
S 13. I.
ECTION
NDEMNITY
To the fullest extent of applicable law, each Guarantor shall indemnify and save each Holder harmless from and against any losses which may arise by virtue of any of the obligations hereby guaranteed being or becoming for any reason whatsoever in whole or in part void, voidable, contrary to law, invalid, ineffective or otherwise unenforceable by the Holder or any of them in accordance with its terms (all of the foregoing collectively, an ). For greater certainty, these losses shall include without limitation all obligations hereby guaranteed which would have been payable by the Company but for the existence of an Indemnifiable Circumstance, net of any withholding or deduction of or on account of any tax; that the extent of the Guarantor's aggregate liability under this shall not at any time exceed the amount (but for any Indemnifiable Circumstance) otherwise guaranteed pursuant to .
"Indemnifiable Circumstance"
provided, however,
Section 13
Section 2
 
 
I W W, the undersigned has caused this Guaranty to be duly executed by an authorized representative as of this day of August, 2007.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
    
 
 
 
 
To the Holders of the Series A Notes and the
Series B Notes, (as hereinafter defined) of
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the )
"Company"
Ladies and Gentlemen:
W, for the purpose set forth in the "Description of the Offering and Use of Proceeds" of the Memorandum, the Company issued (a) $100,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 6.26% Senior Notes, Series A, due August 3, 2014 (the ) and (b) $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 6.44% Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017 (the ; the Series A Notes and the Series B Notes are hereinafter collectively referred to as the ) pursuant to that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of August 3, 2007 (the ) among the Company and each of the purchasers named on Schedule A thereto (the ).
HEREAS
"Series A Notes"
"Series B Notes"
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
"Initial Note Purchasers"
W, as a condition precedent to their purchase of the Notes, the Initial Note Purchasers required that certain subsidiaries of the Company enter into a Guaranty Agreement as security for the Notes (the ).
HEREAS
"Guaranty"
Pursuant to Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement, the Company has agreed to cause the undersigned, , a organized under the laws of (the ), to join in the Guaranty. In accordance with the requirements of the Guaranty, the Additional Guarantor desires to amend the definition of Guarantor (as the same may have been heretofore amended) set forth in the Guaranty attached hereto so that at all times from and after the date hereof, the Additional Guarantor shall be jointly and severally liable as set forth in the Guaranty for the obligations of the Company under the Note Purchase Agreement and Notes to the extent and in the manner set forth in the Guaranty.
                        
                        
                        
"Additional Guarantor"
The undersigned is the duly elected of the Additional Guarantor, a subsidiary of the Company, and is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Guaranty Supplement to each of you. The execution by the undersigned of this Guaranty Supplement shall evidence its consent to and acknowledgment and approval of the terms set forth herein and in the Guaranty and by such execution the Additional Guarantor shall be deemed to have made in favor of the Holders the representations and warranties set forth in Section 5 of the Guaranty.
                        
Upon execution of this Guaranty Supplement, the Guaranty shall be deemed to be amended as set forth above. Except as amended herein, the terms and provisions of the Guaranty are hereby ratified, confirmed and approved in all respects.
 
Any and all notices, requests, certificates and other instruments (including the Notes) may refer to the Guaranty without making specific reference to this Guaranty Supplement, but nevertheless all such references shall be deemed to include this Guaranty Supplement unless the context shall otherwise require.
Dated: , .
                    
        
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20071023171404.txt.gz
TIME:20071023171404
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
On October 23, 2007, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's third quarter 2007 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
ITASCA, IL, October 23, 2007  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2007. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended September 30
 
Percentages used hereinafter are computed excluding retail contingent commission revenues. See notes to third quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 for information and reconciliations relating to certain non-GAAP information presented herein.
"The softening insurance marketplace continues to impact our Brokerage Segment's organic growth and margins as market pressures continued to accelerate during the third quarter," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer. "Partially offsetting the pricing slide is our acquisition program, where we continue to see substantial opportunities  through September 30, we've closed 13 deals and announced another in October. Our acquisition activity is robust and our pipeline is larger than ever before.
 
 
"Our Risk Management Segment delivered solid performance in the third quarter. Excluding approximately $4.0 million of third quarter 2006 non-recurring service and quality-based performance bonus revenue, organic revenue growth was 9% and margins improved and approached our target margin of 15%.
"Within our Brokerage Segment, domestic retail brokerage grew revenues, but had slightly lower pretax earnings after excluding non-recurring charges; our benefits brokerage had outstanding growth in both revenue and pretax earnings, resulting from strong organic growth and acquisition activity; our wholesale and international brokerage operations both posted flat revenues and flat pretax earnings; and our reinsurance brokerage had decreased revenues and a pretax loss compared to being break-even in the third quarter of 2006."
Brokerage Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights
   Information regarding IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal facilities follows:
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Corporate Debt
 
 
 
 
Effective Tax Rate
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 24, 2007 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in eight countries and does business in 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2007 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20071214161304.txt.gz
TIME:20071214161304
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company gratefully acknowledges Mr. Coughlan's distinguished service as a member of the Company's Board of Directors since 2000.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080128161126.txt.gz
TIME:20080128161126
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Also on January 24, 2008, in accordance with applicable provisions of Gallagher's Restated Certificate of Incorporation and By-laws, the Board elected Norman L. Rosenthal, Ph.D. to serve as a Class III Director, effective immediately, to fill the vacancy created by the increase in the size of the Board and to serve until he stands for re-election at the 2008 Annual Meeting of Stockholders of Gallagher. Concurrently with his election to the Board, Mr. Rosenthal was elected to serve on the Audit Committee of the Board.
There is no arrangement or understanding between Mr. Rosenthal and any other person pursuant to which Mr. Rosenthal was elected as a Director of Gallagher.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080129200540.txt.gz
TIME:20080129200540
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 29, 2008, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's fourth quarter 2007 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, January 29, 2008  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and full year ended December 31, 2007. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended December 31
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 for information and reconciliations relating to certain non-GAAP information presented herein. Percentages used hereinafter are computed excluding 2006 non-recurring charges related to retail contingent commission litigation and changing medical plan administrators. Additionally, current and prior year amounts have been restated to reclassify the revenues and expenses of discontinued operations (as discussed below). The term EBITDA used herein represents pretax earnings from continuing operations before interest, depreciation and amortization expenses.
"In fourth quarter 2007, we undertook a strategic review of our operations and have made a determination to sell our global reinsurance operations," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer. "We are currently working on a potential sale of these operations and expect that the sale will be completed in early 2008. In addition, we intend to sell our small wholesale brokerage operation in Ireland during 2008. While the sale of these operations will reduce our top line revenues, it will have a favorable impact on the Brokerage Segment's earnings and pretax margins.
"Our acquisition program had a record year in 2007. We closed 21 deals, 8 of which were in the fourth quartera strong finish to a great acquisition year that brought us almost $100 million in acquired annualized revenues. We expect our 2008 acquisition activity to be robust.
"Within our Brokerage Segment for the fourth quarter, our retail brokerage operations posted solid performancerevenue growth of 10.5% of which 1% was organic; 14.8% growth in pretax earnings; improved pretax margins by 0.8% and improved EBITDA margins by 1.6%. Unfortunately, this performance was entirely offset by weak results in our global wholesale brokerage operations, which posted 2.5% revenue growth (-4% organic) and pretax and EBITDA margins slid significantly. Results in our wholesale operations were adversely affected by lost business in our UK operations, foreign exchange, burn-in costs for new production teams in the UK and wind-down costs related to a couple of wholesale offices in the US.
"For the year, our retail brokerage operations posted revenue growth of 11.5% of which 3% was organic; 13.6% growth in pretax earnings; 16.7% growth in EBITDA; pretax margins improved 0.3% and EBITDA margins improved 1.0%. Our global wholesale brokerage operations posted 8.5% growth in revenues (0% organic) and pretax and EBITDA margins were down 4.7 % and 4.6%, respectively.
"We believe strict expense controls are necessary in a soft market and all of our operations are working hard to implement actions to control operating costs, to reduce headcount in our back office support functions and to reduce other workforce related costs.
"Our Risk Management Segment delivered excellent growth in the fourth quarter. Pretax and EBITDA margins expanded, even after considering one-time revenues and related costs. For the year, revenue growth was 10.5%, all of which is organic and pretax margins were 14.4%, up 0.4% over prior year. We have implemented margin improvement initiatives that will help us continue progress towards our targeted margin of 15%.
"For the year, our combined brokerage and risk management operations grew revenues 10.6% of which 5% was organic, pretax earnings were up 8.3% and earnings per share grew 13.9%."
Expense Reduction Actions
Over the next 6 to 9 months, Gallagher expects to reduce its existing back office workforce by approximately 400 positions through attrition, and to a lesser extent targeted outplacements. In addition, Gallagher has adopted changes to other workforce related costs such as travel, entertainment, perquisites, compensation adjustments and other compensation elements that are expected to reduce its ongoing annualized costs. Special charges during 2008 for these initiatives are not expected to be significant.
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights  Excluding Discontinued Operations
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights  Excluding Discontinued Operations (continued)
 
 
 
Discontinued Operations
The following shows historical earnings related to discontinued reinsurance brokerage and Irish wholesale operations excluding corporate overhead costs. These overhead costs have been reallocated within the continuing Brokerage Segment operations.
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Corporate Debt
 
 
 
Income Taxes
 
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, January 30, 2008 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in thirteen countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2007 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7.
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2007 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided elsewhere in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080130165537.txt.gz
TIME:20080130165537
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On and effective January 24, 2008, the Board of Directors of Gallagher (the Board) voted to approve and adopt the Amended and Restated Bylaws of Gallagher (the Amended and Restated Bylaws). The following is a summary of the changes effected by the Amended and Restated Bylaws. All section number references are to sections in the Amended and Restated Bylaws.
Sections 2.1, 2.3, 2.5, 2.6, 2.8, 2.9 and 2.11
The Amended and Restated Bylaws provide that the Board may determine that stockholder meetings may be held solely by means of remote communication and not at a physical location.
Sections 2.2 and 3.3
The Amended and Restated Bylaws require that directors be elected only by the affirmative vote of a majority of votes cast. If the number of nominees for director exceeds the number of directors to be elected at the meeting, each of the directors will be elected by a plurality of votes cast.
Sections 6.1 and 6.5
The Amended and Restated Bylaws explicitly provide that shares of Gallagher's stock may be certificated or uncertificated, and that uncertificated shares may be transferred upon receipt of transfer instructions. These revised provisions clarify Gallagher's authority to issue uncertificated shares of stock and thereby ensure Gallagher's compliance with Section 501.00 of the Listed Company Manual of the New York Stock Exchange.
Section 10.1
The Amended and Restated Bylaws conform the latter portion of the provision regarding amendments to the Bylaws to require notice of the alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new Bylaws in the notice of the regular or special meeting, as applicable. This change clarified the existing notice requirement in this provision.
The foregoing description of the Amended and Restated Bylaws is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of Gallagher's Amended and Restated Bylaws, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 3.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference. For a complete understanding, the Amended and Restated Bylaws should be read in their entirety.
 
Exhibit Index
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
The registered office shall be in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle, State of Delaware.
Section 1.1
The corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the board of directors may from time to time determine or the business of the corporation may require.
Section 1.2
All meetings of the stockholders for the election of directors shall be held in the City of Chicago, State of Illinois, at such place as may be fixed from time to time by the board of directors, or at such other place either within or without the State of Delaware as shall be designated from time to time by the board of directors and stated in the notice of the meeting. Meetings of stockholders for any other purpose may be held at such time and place, within or without the State of Delaware, as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting or in a duly executed waiver of notice thereof. The board of directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that a meeting shall not be held at any place, but shall be held solely by means of remote communication, subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, as permitted by applicable law.
Section 2.1
Annual meetings of stockholders, commencing with the year 1996, shall be held on the Tuesday following the third Monday in May if not a legal holiday, and if a legal holiday, then on the next secular day following, at 10:00 a.m., or at such other date and time as shall be designated from time to time by the board of directors and stated in the notice of the meeting, at which they shall elect directors pursuant to Section 3.3 of these by-laws and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting. Unless otherwise restricted by statute, the board of directors shall have power to postpone the annual meeting of stockholders, without notice other than announcement immediately prior to the annual meeting.
Section 2.2
Written notice of the annual meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and the means of remote communications, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting shall be given to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting.
Section 2.3
The officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the corporation shall prepare and make, at least ten days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.
Section 2.4
Special meetings of the stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, unless otherwise prescribed by statute or by the certificate of incorporation, may be called by the Chairman of the board of directors or the president and shall be called by the president or secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the board of directors. Such request shall state the purposes or purposes of the proposed meeting. The board of directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that a special meeting shall not be held at any place, but shall be held solely by means of remote communication, subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, as permitted by applicable law.
Section 2.5
Written notice of a special meeting stating the place, date and hour of the meeting, the means of remote communications, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting and the purpose and purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting, to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting.
Section 2.6
Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice.
Section 2.7
The holders of a majority of the stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote thereat, present in person or deemed to be present or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business except as otherwise provided by statute or by the certificate of incorporation. If, however, such quorum shall not be present, deemed to be present or represented at any meeting of the stockholders, the stockholders entitled to vote thereat, present in person, deemed to be present or represented by proxy, shall have power to adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present, deemed to be present or represented. At such adjourned meeting at which a quorum shall be present, deemed to be present or represented any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally notified. If the adjournment is for more than thirty days, or if after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.
Section 2.8
 
When a quorum is present or deemed to be present at any meeting, the vote of the holders of a majority of the stock having voting power, present in person, deemed to be present or represented by proxy, shall decide any question brought before such meeting, unless the question is one upon which by express provision of the statutes or of the certificate of incorporation, a different vote is required in which case such express provision shall govern and control the decision of such question.
Section 2.9
Unless otherwise provided in the certificate of incorporation, or in the case of any series of the corporation's Preferred Stock in the resolution of the board of directors creating such series, each stockholder shall at every meeting of the stockholders be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy for each share of the capital stock having voting power held by such stockholder, but no proxy shall be voted on after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.
Section 2.10
If authorized by the board of directors in accordance with these by-laws and applicable law, stockholders and proxyholders not physically present at a meeting of stockholders may, by means of remote communication, (1) participate in a meeting of stockholders and (2) be deemed present in person and vote at a meeting of the stockholders, whether such meeting is to be held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, provided that (i) the corporation shall implement reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a stockholder or proxyholder, (ii) the corporation shall implement reasonable measures to provide such stockholders and proxyholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the stockholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with such proceedings, and (iii) if any stockholder or proxyholder votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of remote communication, a record of such vote or other action shall be maintained by the corporation.
Section 2.11
Any action required or permitted to be taken by the stockholders of the corporation must be taken at a duly called annual or special meeting of the stockholders of the corporation and the power of stockholders to consent in writing, without a meeting, to the taking of any action is specifically denied.
Section 2.12
The number of directors which shall constitute the whole board shall be not fewer than three nor more than fifteen. Within the limits above specified, the number of directors shall be determined by resolution of the board of directors. The directors shall be elected for terms of office as provided in the corporation's certificate of incorporation. Directors need not be stockholders.
Section 3.1
Nominations for the election of directors may be made by the board of directors or a committee thereof or by any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of directors generally. However, any stockholder entitled to vote in the election of directors
Section 3.2
 
generally may nominate one or more persons for election as directors at a meeting only if written notice of such stockholder's intent to make such nomination has been given, either by personal delivery or by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the secretary of the corporation (1) with respect to an election to be held at an annual meeting of stockholders, not earlier than the 100th calendar day nor later than the close of business on the 60th calendar day prior to such meeting, and (2) with respect to an election to be held at a special meeting of stockholders for the election of directors, not later than the close of business on the seventh day following the date on which notice of such meeting is first given to stockholders. Each such notice shall set forth:
(a) the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the nomination and of the person or persons to be nominated;
(b) a representation that the stockholder is a holder of record of stock of the corporation entitled to vote at such meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons specified in the notice;
(c) a description of all arrangements or understandings between the stockholder and each nominee and any other person or persons (naming such person or persons) pursuant to which the nomination or nominations are to be made by the stockholder;
(d) such other information regarding each nominee proposed by such stockholder as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed pursuant to the proxy rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission, had the nominee been nominated, or intended to be nominated, by the board of directors; and
(e) the consent of each nominee to serve as a director of the corporation if so elected. The chairman of the meeting may refuse to acknowledge the nomination of any person not made in compliance with the foregoing procedure.
Each director to be elected by stockholders shall be elected by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes cast at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present; , , that if the board of directors determines that the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected at such meeting (a "Contested Election") by the date that is 10 days prior to the date the corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting as initially announced, each of the directors to be elected at such meeting shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present. For purposes of this Section 3.3, a "majority of the votes cast" shall mean that the number of votes cast "for" a director's election exceeds the number of votes cast "against" that director's election. In a Contested Election, stockholders will be entitled to cast votes "for", or to "withhold" votes from, the election of directors but shall not be entitled to cast any other vote with respect to such election of directors.
Section 3.3
provided
however
 
Vacancies on the board of directors resulting from the death, resignation or removal of a director or directors, and newly created directorships resulting from any increases in the authorized number of directors, shall be filled, and any director so chosen shall hold office, in each case as provided in the corporation's certificate of incorporation.
Section 3.4
The business of the corporation shall be managed by its board of directors which may exercise all such powers of the corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by statute or by the certificate of incorporation or by these by-laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.
Section 3.5
The board of directors of the corporation may hold meetings, both regular and special, either within or without the State of Delaware.
Section 3.6
The first meeting of each newly elected board of directors shall be held immediately following the adjournment of the annual meeting of the stockholders at the same place as the annual meeting of stockholders and no notice of such meeting shall be necessary to the newly elected directors in order legally to constitute the meeting, provided a quorum shall be present. In the event such meeting is not held at such time and place, the meeting may be held at such time and place as shall be specified in a notice given as hereinafter provided for special meetings of the board of directors, or as shall be specified in a written waiver signed by all of the directors.
Section 3.7
Regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice at such time and at such place as shall from time to time be determined by the board.
Section 3.8
Special meetings of the board may be called by the chairman of the board of directors or the president on at least one days' notice to each director, either personally or by mail or by telegram. Special meetings shall be called by the president or secretary in like manner and on like notice on the written request of two directors.
Section 3.9
At all meetings of the board a majority of the then duly elected directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the act of a majority of the directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the board of directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the certificate of incorporation. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the board of directors the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Section 3.10
Unless otherwise restricted by the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws, any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the board of directors or of any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting, if all members of the board or committee, as the case may be, consent thereto in writing, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the board or committee.
Section 3.11
 
The board of directors may, by resolution passed by a majority of the whole board, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more of the directors of the corporation. The board may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not he or they constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the board of directors to act at the meeting in the place of any such absent or disqualified member. Any such committee, to the extent provided in the resolution of the board of directors, shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the board of directors in the management of the business and affairs of the corporation, and may authorize the seal of the corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it; but no such committee shall have the power or authority in reference to amending the certificate of incorporation, adopting an agreement of merger or consolidation, recommending to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the corporation's property and assets, recommending to the stockholders a dissolution of the corporation or a revocation of a dissolution, or amending the by-laws of the corporation; and, unless the resolution or the certificate of incorporation expressly so provide, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend or to authorize the issuance of stock. Such committee or committees shall have such name or names as may be determined from time to time by resolution adopted by the board of directors.
Section 3.12
Meetings of the board of directors and meetings of committees of the board of directors may be held by telephonic conference, provided that each participant is able to hear every other participant in such meeting.
Section 3.13
Unless otherwise restricted by the certificate of incorporation, the board of directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors. The directors may be paid their expenses, if any, of attendance at each meeting of the board of directors and may be paid a fixed sum for attendance at each meeting of the board of directors or a stated salary as director. No such payment shall preclude any director from serving the corporation in any other capacity and receiving compensation therefor. Members of special or standing committees may be allowed like compensation for attending committee meetings.
Section 3.14
Whenever, under the provisions of the statutes or of the certificate of incorporation or of these by-laws, notice is required to be given to any director or stockholder, it shall not be construed to mean personal notice, but such notice may be given in writing, by mail, addressed to such director or stockholder, at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage thereon prepaid, and such notice shall be deemed to be given at the time when the same shall be deposited in the United States mail. Notice to directors may also be given by telegram.
Section 4.1
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given under the provisions of the statutes or of the certificate of incorporation or of these by-laws, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent thereto.
Section 4.2
The officers of the corporation shall be chosen by the board of directors and shall be a chairman of the board of directors, a president, a vice-president, a secretary, a general counsel, a controller, and a treasurer. The function of chief executive officer and chief operating officer of the corporation shall be discharged by such officer or officers as the board of directors may from time to time designate. The board of directors may also choose additional vice-presidents, and one or more assistant vice-presidents, assistant secretaries, assistant controllers, and assistant treasurers. Any number of offices may be held by the same person, unless the certificate of incorporation or these by-laws otherwise provide. The chairman of the board of directors shall be chosen from the members of the board of directors. The board of directors may also designate persons as officers of divisions of the corporation, but such persons shall not be officers of the corporation unless so specified.
Section 5.1
The board of directors at its first meeting after each annual meeting of stockholders shall choose a chairman of the board of directors, a president, a secretary, a treasurer and one or more vice-presidents.
Section 5.2
The board of directors may appoint such other officers and agents as it shall deem necessary who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as shall be determined from time to time by the board.
Section 5.3
The officers of the corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify. Any officer elected or appointed by the board of directors may be removed at any time by the affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors. Any vacancy occurring in any office of the corporation shall be filled by the board of directors.
Section 5.4
The chairman of the board of directors shall preside at meetings of this board of directors and shall perform such other duties and hold such other titles as may be prescribed from time to time by the board of directors.
Section 5.5
The board of directors may elect a vice chairman of the board of directors. The vice chairman of the board of directors shall perform the duties of the chairman of the board of directors in his absence and in addition shall perform such other duties as may be given to him from time to time by the board of directors.
Section 5.6
 
The president shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders and, in the absence of the chairman of the board of directors, at all meetings of the board of directors, have the general powers and duties of supervision and management of the business and affairs of the corporation and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the board of directors are carried into effect. He shall exercise such authority and perform such duties as are customarily incident to the office of the president and shall perform such other duties and hold such other titles as may from time to time be prescribed by the board of directors or these by-laws.
Section 5.7
The vice-presidents shall perform such duties and have such powers as the board of directors, the chairman of the board of directors or the president may from time to time prescribe. A vice-president may execute contracts on behalf of the corporation pertaining to the normal course of his duties. In the absence of the president or in the event of his inability to act, the vice-president (or in the event there be more than one vice-president, the vice-presidents in the order designated, or in the absence of any designation, then in the order of their election) shall perform the duties of the president, and when so acting, shall have all the powers of and be subject to all the restrictions upon the president.
Section 5.8
The secretary shall attend all meetings of the board of directors and all meetings of the stockholders and record all the proceedings of the meetings of the corporation and of the board of directors in a book to be kept for that purpose and shall perform like duties for the standing committees when required. He shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and special meetings of the board of directors, and shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the board of directors, the chairman of the board of directors or the president, under whose supervision he shall be. He shall have custody of the corporate seal of the corporation and he, or an assistant secretary, shall have authority to affix the same to any instrument requiring it and when so affixed, it may be attested by his signature or by the signature of such assistant secretary. The board of directors may give general authority to any other officer to affix the seal of the corporation and to attest the affixing by his signature.
Section 5.9
The assistant secretary, or if there be more than one, the assistant secretaries in the order determined by the board of directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the secretary or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the secretary and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the board of directors may from time to time prescribe.
Section 5.10
 
The treasurer shall have the custody of the corporate funds and securities and shall keep full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements in books belonging to the corporation and shall deposit all moneys and other valuable effects in the name and to the credit of the corporation in such depositories as may be designated by the board of directors. He shall disburse the funds of the corporation as may be ordered by the board of directors, taking proper vouchers for such disbursements, and shall render to the chairman of the board of directors, the president and the board of directors, at its regular meetings, or when the board of directors so requires, an account of all his transactions as treasurer and of the financial condition of the corporation. If required by the board of directors, he shall give the corporation a bond (which shall be renewed every six years) in such sum and with such surety or sureties as shall be satisfactory to the board of directors for the faithful performance of the duties of his office and for the restoration to the corporation, in case of his death, resignation, retirement or removal from office, of all books, papers, vouchers, money and other property of whatever kind in his possession or under his control belonging to the corporation.
Section 5.11
The assistant treasurer, or if there shall be more than one, the assistant treasurers in the order determined by the board of directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the treasurer or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the treasurer and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the board of directors may from time to time prescribe.
Section 5.12
The controller shall be the chief accounting officer of the corporation. He shall keep adequate and correct accounts of the corporation's business transactions (except those kept by the treasurer as herein provided), including accounts of its assets, liabilities, gains, losses, stated capital and shares. He shall prepare and lay before the stockholders' meetings the data referred to herein, and shall mail copies of such data as required to any stockholder requesting same. He shall have such other powers and perform such other duties as are assigned to or vested in him by the board of directors and/or the executive committee.
Section 5.13
The assistant controller or, if there shall be more than one, the assistant controllers in the order determined by the board of directors (or if there be no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the controller, or in the event of his inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the controller and shall perform such other duties and have such other powers as the board of directors may from time to time prescribe.
Section 5.14
The general counsel shall be the chief legal officer of the corporation. He shall represent the corporation's interests in all legal proceedings affecting the corporation and shall advise the corporation as to legal matters, including the proper execution of all
Section 5.15
 
contracts and other legal documents to be entered into by the corporation. He shall have such other powers and perform such other duties as are assigned to or vested in him by the board of directors and/or the executive committee.
Shares of the corporation's stock may be certificated or uncertificated. Every holder of stock in the corporation shall be entitled to have a certificate, signed by, or in the name of the corporation by the chairman of the board of directors, or the president or a vice-president, and by the treasurer or an assistant treasurer, or the secretary or an assistant secretary, of the corporation, certifying the number of shares owned by him in the corporation. The powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights shall be set forth in full or summarized on the face or back of any such certificates which the corporation may issue to represent such class or series of stock, provided that, except as otherwise provided in section 202 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware, in lieu of the foregoing requirements, there may be set forth on the face or back of any such certificate which the corporation may issue to represent such class or series of stock, a statement that the corporation will furnish without charge to each stockholder who so requests the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class of stock or series thereof and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights.
Section 6.1
Where a certificate is countersigned (1) by a transfer agent other than the corporation or its employee, or, (2) by a registrar other than the corporation or its employee, any other signatures on the certificate may be facsimile. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
Section 6.2
Subject to the foregoing, certificates for stock of the corporation shall be in such form as the board of directors may from time to time prescribe.
Section 6.3
The board of directors may direct a new certificate or certificates to be issued in place of any certificate or certificates theretofore issued by the corporation alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming the certificate of stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed. When authorizing such issue of a new certificate or certificates, the board of directors may, in its discretion and as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or certificates, or his legal representative, to advertise the same in such manner as it shall require and/or to give the corporation a bond in such sum as it may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the corporation with respect to the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed.
Section 6.4
 
Upon surrender to the corporation or the transfer agent of the corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignment or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books. Uncertificated shares shall be transferred upon the receipt of proper transfer instructions from the registered owner of such uncertificated shares.
Section 6.5
In order that the corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, or to express consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock or for the- purpose of any other lawful action, the board of directors may fix, in advance, a record date, which shall not be more than sixty nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting, nor more than sixty days prior to any other action. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the board of directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
Section 6.6
The corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends and to vote as such owner, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Section 6.7
The corporation shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative (other than action by or in the right of the corporation) by reason of the fact that he is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by him in connection with such action, suit or proceeding if he acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had no
Section 7.1
 
reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful. The termination of any action, suit or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of or its equivalent, shall not, of itself, create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner which he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had reasonable cause to believe that his conduct was unlawful.
nolo contendere
The corporation shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action or suit by or in the right of the corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that he is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by him in connection with the defense or settlement of such action or suit if he acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation-and except that no such indemnification shall be made in respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which such person shall have been adjudged to be liable to the corporation unless and only to the extent that the Court of Chancery of Delaware or the court in which such action or suit was brought shall determine upon application, that despite the adjudication of liability but in view of all the circumstances of the case, such person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for such expenses which such Court of Chancery or such other court shall deem proper.
Section 7.2
To the extent that a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation shall be successful on the merits or otherwise in defense, of any action, suit or proceeding referred to in Sections 7.1 and 7.2 of this Article, or in defense of any claim, issue or matter therein, he shall be indemnified against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incurred by him in connection therewith.
Section 7.3
Any indemnification under Sections 7.1 and 7.2 of this Article (unless ordered by a court) shall be made by the corporation only as authorized in the specific case upon a determination that indemnification of the director, officer, employee or agent is proper in the circumstances because he has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in said Sections 7.1 and 7.2. Such determination shall be made (1) by the board of directors by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who were not parties to such action, suit or proceeding; or (2) if such a quorum is not obtainable, or, even if obtainable a quorum of disinterested directors so directs, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (3) by the stockholders.
Section 7.4
Expenses incurred in defending a civil or criminal action, suit or proceeding may be paid by the corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit or proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the director, officer, employee or agent to repay such amount if it shall ultimately be determined that he is not entitled to be indemnified by the corporation as authorized in this Article.
Section 7.5
 
The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by, or granted pursuant to, the other sections of this Article shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may be entitled under any by-law, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise, both as to action in his official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such office.
Section 7.6
The board of directors may authorize, by a vote of a majority of the full board, the corporation to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted against him and incurred by him in any such capacity, or arising out of his status as such, whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify him against such liability under the provisions of this Article.
Section 7.7
For the purposes of this Article, references to "the corporation" shall include all constituent corporations absorbed in a consolidation or merger as well as the resulting or surviving corporation so that any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of such a constituent corporation or is or was serving at the request of such constituent corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise shall stand in the same position under the provisions of this Article with respect to the resulting or surviving corporation as he would if he had served the resulting or surviving corporation in that capacity.
Section 7.8
For purposes of this Article, references to "other enterprises" shall include employee benefit plans; references to "fines" shall include any excise taxes assessed on a person with respect to an employee benefit plan; and references to "serving at the request of the corporation" shall include any service as a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation which imposes duties on, or involves services by, such director, officer, employee, or agent with respect to an employee benefit plan, its participants or beneficiaries; and a person who acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonable believed to be in the interest of the participants and beneficiaries of an employee benefit plan shall be deemed to have acted in a manner "not opposed to the best interests of the corporation" as referred to in this Article.
Section 7.9
The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by, or granted pursuant to, this Article shall, unless otherwise provided when authorized or ratified, continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such a person.
Section 7.10
No contract or transaction between the corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors
Section 8.1
 
or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for this reason, or solely because the director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the board or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or their votes are counted for such purpose, if:
 
 
 
Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board of directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
Section 8.2
Dividends upon the capital stock of the corporation, subject to the provisions of the certificate of incorporation, if any, may be declared by the board of directors at any regular or special meeting, pursuant to law. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property, or in shares of the capital stock, subject to the provisions of the certificate of incorporation.
Section 9.1
Before payment of any dividend, there may be set aside out of any funds of the corporation available for dividends such sum or sums as the directors from time to time, in their absolute discretion, think proper as a reserve or reserves to meet contingencies, or for equalizing dividends, or for repairing or maintaining any property of the corporation, or for such other purpose as the directors shall think conducive to the interest of the corporation, and the directors may modify or abolish any such reserve in the manner in which it was created.
Section 9.2
 
The board of directors shall present at each annual meeting, and at any special meeting of the stockholders when called for by vote of the stockholders, a full and clear statement of the business and condition of the corporation.
Section 9.3
All checks or demands for money and notes of the corporation shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the board of directors may from time to time designate.
Section 9.4
The fiscal year of the corporation shall commence January 1 and end December 31 unless and until the board of directors shall adopt a different fiscal year by resolution duly adopted by it.
Section 9.5
The corporate seal shall have inscribed thereon the name of the corporation, the year of its organization and the words "Corporate Seal, Delaware." The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise.
Section 9.6
These by-laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new by-laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the board of directors, at any regular meeting of the stockholders or of the board of directors or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the board of directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new by-laws be contained in the notice of such regular or special meeting.
Section 10.1
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080212214017.txt.gz
TIME:20080212214017
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
The January 2008 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at .
www.ajg.com
www.ajg.com
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Exhibit 99.1
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
1
January, 2008
 
2
Safe Harbor Statement
Except for the historical information and discussions, certain statements contained herein relating to future results may constitute "forwardlooking
statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks,
uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, as discussed in Gallagher's filings
with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly
dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned
on invested funds; alternative insurance markets continue to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee
revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period-to-period as a result of the timing
of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great
deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the
general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns
on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing,
foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings will continue to be subject to reduction
due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance
industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable
interpretations of past, current or future tax laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of
IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be
available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly,
actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters
described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2007.
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
3
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 -  This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the
meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not
required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted
accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below
and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
 -  Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2006 and 2005 were adjusted in this presentation to add back
charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations and to eliminate the
impact of medical and pension plan changes. Charges in 2006 related to retail contingent commission related
matters and medical plan changes totaled $9.0 million (or $5.4 million after tax) and $7.5 million (or $4.5 million after
tax), respectively. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations
totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $5.2 million (or $3.6 million after tax), respectively. In addition,
Gallagher recognized a pension curtailment gain of $10.0 million (or $6.0 million after tax) in 2005. There were no
such charges or gains in 2001 to 2004. These adjustments, which Gallagher believes are for non-recurring items,
were made to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2006 and 2005 in order to calculate earnings from
continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations and
medical and pension plan changes. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations
exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this
presentation. The term EBITDA used herein represents pretax earnings from continuing operations (excluding the
impact of the non-recurring items discussed above and retail contingent commissions) before interest, depreciation
and amortization expenses.
 -  Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional
information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance
and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental
information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical
adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP
information.
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
4
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 -  4th Largest Insurance Broker
 Retail & Wholesale  88% US 12% International
 -  5th Largest Domestic Wholesaler
 -  Fastest Growing Lloyds Wholesaler (5 yrs)
 -  Largest P&C Third Party Administrator
 Adjusting WC, Liability & Property Claims
 -  More Background in Investor Profile Handout and
the Gallagher Way Book
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
5
Two Core Businesses
 -  2007 Revenues*  -  2007 Pretax Earnings*
Brokerage 69%
(i.e. Selling Insurance)
Risk Management 27%
(i.e. Adjusting Claims)
Financial
Services
4%
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
Brokerage 74%
Risk Management 26%
Financial
Services
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
6
Organic Revenue Growth
Organic Revenue Growth* 2004 2005 2006 YTD 2007***
AJG** 7.0% 4.0% 6.0% 5.0%
AJG Rank 1 2 2 1
Peer Group Average 3.2% 1.3% 3.9% 1.4%
Range -0.5% to 7.0% -4.3% to 4.3% 0.0% to 8.0% -3.4% to 5.0%
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
** Excludes revenues from the Financial Services Segment.
*** Reflects 12 months of data for AJG, AOC, BRO, and WSH. 9 months of data for HRH and MMC.
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
7
Current Environment
 -  Fighting a Headwind
 Soft P&C Market (i.e. too much supply)
 -  Some predict another 2 to 4 years
 Teetering Economy (i.e. slowing demand)
 -  Business cutbacks?
 -  Slowing employee counts?
 -  Energy and wage inflation?
 -  U.S. and Even Global Recession?
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
8
Brokerage Segment  Business Mix
 -  2007 Revenues
Retail 80%
Mostly North America
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
Wholesale 20%
Mostly U.S. and U.K.
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
9
 -  Rapidly Expand - Domestic
 Geographical
 Expertise
 -  Selectively Expand - International
 Broaden Network Partners
 Targeted Acquisitions
 -  Profitability  Stay in Our Sweet Spot
 Middle to Upper Commercial Market
Brokerage Segment Strategy
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
10
 - Sell
 - Hire
 - Develop
 - Acquire
Domestic Brokerage Expansion
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
11
 - Sell
 - Hire
 - Develop
 - Acquire
Domestic Brokerage Expansion
 -  Brokerage Segment Revenues From Continuing Operations excluding contingent commissions.
 -  See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
(In millions)
$500
$700
$900
$1,100
$1,300
11% CAGR
$753
$830
$917
$1,004
$1,110
2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007
$656
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
12
 - Producers that want to sell
 - Producers that want access to our
network, expertise and niches
 - Producers that want to be
supported by our infrastructure
 - Must fit into our culture!
Domestic Expansion - Hire
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
13
 - Producers that want to sell
 - Producers that want access to our
network, expertise and niches
 - Producers that want to be
supported by our infrastructure
 - Must fit into our culture!
Domestic Expansion - Hire
"I joined Gallagher because I focus on
Colleges and Universities and Gallagher
has the best Higher Education professionals
in the brokerage business"
"Gallagher's benefits team was
innovative and their supporting technology
was exactly what I needed to grow
my book of business."
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
14
 - Internships
 - Career Launch
 - Must fit into our culture!
Domestic Expansion - Develop
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
15
 - Internships
 - Career Launch
 - Must fit into our culture!
Domestic Expansion - Develop
"I was an econ and stats major, but I
thought I could sell too. I did my first
year as an intern after my sophomore
year. I was hooked!"
"Many of Gallagher's senior execs and
field leaders came through the internship.
I like the idea of having customers but
also some day I can run a branch."
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
16
 - Over 20,000 retail and wholesale
brokerages and agencies (P&C
and Benefits)
 - Most owned by baby boomers
 - Small number of consolidators
Domestic Expansion - Acquire
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
17
 - Gallagher has done over 180
deals in the last 20 years
 - Typical deal is $2 to $10 million in
revenues
 - 2 to 5 producers supported by a
professional staff of 10 to 20
 - Must fit into our culture!
Domestic Expansion - Acquire
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
18
 - Gallagher has done over 180
deals in the last 20 years
 - Typical deal is $2 to $10 million in
revenues
 - 2 to 5 producers supported by a
professional staff of 10 to 20
 - Must fit into our culture!
Domestic Expansion - Acquire
"I had the relationships with many
larger prospects, but I didn't have the
resources to get their business. Sold
to Gallagher, brought in the experts
and now they are my client!"
"It was simple  my son and I wanted
to be a part of a global player. My son
wanted to be part of a team and I thought
I was going to slow down. Ha, I'm
rejuvenated and I'm having a blast!"
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
19
Mergers & Acquisitions
 -  AJG Three Year History
 2007 was a record year for acquisitions
 Growth led by retail operations
Annualized Revenue Acquired
(In millions)
$23
$10
$38
$16
$83
$16
$0
$10
$20
$30
$40
$50
$60
$70
$80
$90
Retail Wholesale
2005 2006 2007
Number of Acquisitions Closed
7
3
9
2
18
3
0
2
4
6
8
10
12
14
16
18
20
Retail Wholesale
2005 2006 2007
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
20
Where We Are  Retail Locations
ID
MT
WA
CA
UT
NV
AZ
NM
TX
OK
KS
NE
MN
WI
MO
AR
LA
TN
IL
WV
PA
NY
NH
ME
MA
CT
NJ
DE
MD
IA
CO
WY
SD
ND
OR
OH
MI
KY
MS AL GA
FL
SC
NC
VA
VT
RI
IN
AK
HI
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
21
Growth Opportunities
Source for Acquisition Targets: Hales & Co., Inc. and D&B
Larger Cities Where We Are NOT
ID
67
MT
57
WA
248
CA
1,656
UT
115
NV
97
AZ
218
NM
63
TX
971
OK
175
KS
167
NE
127
MN
290
WI
308
MO
287
AR
103
LA
203
TN
305
IL
689 WV
72
PA
883
NY
1,429
NH
112
ME
113
MA
627
CT
316
NJ
706 DE
43
MD
298
IA
194
CO
187
WY
16
SD
37
ND
41 OR
170
OH
576
MI
506
KY
197
MS
105 AL
188
GA
437
FL
985
SC
169
NC
388
VA
275
VT
57
RI
84
IN
307
AK
27 HI
43
DC
25
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co.
 
22
 - Substantial London operation
 - Attract experienced teams
 - Opportunistic with acquisitions
 - Network of independent brokers in
over 100 countries
International Expansion
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
23
Field
 - Full-time training & career
development teams
 - Full-time M&A teams
 - Full-time niche & product support
teams
Brokerage  Supporting the Growth
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
24
Back Office
 -  Centralized corporate systems
 General Ledger, T&E, HR, Real Estate and
Planning
 -  Created supporting service centers
 However, NOT client facing
 -  Branch manager now can focus on:
 Sell - Develop - Client service
 Hire - Acquire - Strategy
Brokerage  Supporting the Growth
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
25
"Soft Market Play Book"
 -  Existing Plays
 Headcount and Wage Controls (non-production
layers)
 Expense Management
 Experienced Teams Must Quickly Deliver
Brokerage  Profitable Growth
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
26
"Soft Market Play Book"
 -  New Plays
 Leveraging Scale
 Leveraging Technology
 Centralizing and Shifting Work to Lower Cost
Labor Locations
Net Effect - Headcount reduction through
attrition
Brokerage  Profitable Growth
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
27
Brokerage Segment  EBITDA Growth*
$125
$224
$100
$140
$180
$220
$260
2002 2007
(In millions)
12% CAGR
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
28
 -  Domestic & International
 -  Trend Towards Unbundling
 -  Network vs. Dedicated Units
 -  Profitability
Risk Management Segment Strategy
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
29
Risk Mgmt Segment  Revenues
From Continuing Operations*
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
(In millions)
$100
$200
$300
$400
$500 12% CAGR
$292
$346
$371
$401
$444
2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007
$250
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
30
 -  Revenue growth is all organic
 -  Targeting Fortune 1000 but standard
platform enables profitable service to much
smaller accounts as well
 -  Differentiate through client intimacy,
commitment to quality and technology
 -  International presence largely public entity
but leveraging US expertise to penetrate
commercial clients
Risk Mgmt  Domestic & International
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
31
 -  A growing company has needs that
can often best be met in alternative
markets
 -  We can tailor service to clients needs
 -  Include on-site when appropriate
 -  Hard markets accelerate the drive to
alternative markets
 -  Soft market has slowed pace but
opportunities still exist
Risk Mgmt  Unbundling Trend
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
32
 -  Leverage global technology and
standard processes to provide service
anywhere in the country
 -  Broaden market opportunity to smaller
clients where we don't need to be onsite
 -  Move to regional operations and to
lower cost locations where possible
Risk Mgmt  Network Philosophy
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
33
Risk Mgmt Segment  EBITDA Growth *
$37
$76
$30
$40
$50
$60
$70
$80
2002 2007
(In millions)
15% CAGR
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
34
Cash, Cash & Cash
 -  Both Brokerage & Risk Management
Businesses Generate Substantial
Cash Flow
 -  Neither Need Substantial Capital or
Cap Ex
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
35
Short-cut To Understand Cash Flows
(See GAAP cash flows in Statement of Cash Flows*)
Brokerage & Risk Management Combined (In millions) 2004 2005 2006 2007
Pretax earnings from continuing operations before non-recurring
items *$ 242 $ 228 $ 229 $ 248
Non-cash expenses
Amortization expense 16 18 21 29
Stock compenation expense 15 16 25 19
Pretax earnings from continuing operations before nonrecurring
items and non-cash expenses * 273 262 275 296
Income taxes @ 20% (AMT rate) 48 46 46 50
After tax earnings from continuing operations before nonrecurring
items and non-cash expenses *$ 225 $ 216 $ 229 $ 246
Depreciation is excluded from this analysis because such approximates annual Cap Ex.
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
36
Cash, Cash & Cash
 -  Pay Dividend
 Long-cycle Industry
 Shareholders need returns while holding
 -  Buy Brokers
 -  Repurchase Shares
 -  Modest Debt Levels
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
37
Cash Flows from Operations
 -  Cash flow from operations in 2007 exceeded $250M
 -  "Free" cash flows are used for acquisitions and/or stock repurchases
$0
$50
$100
$150
$200
$250
$300
2004 2005 2006 2007
Cash Flow from Operations Summary
(In millions)
Operating Cash Flows Dividends
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
38
Uses of Cash  2002 through 2007
 -  Uses of Cash as Reported (In millions)
$0
$50
$100
$150
$200
$250
$300
2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007
Cash Paid for Acquisitions (net of cash acquired) Dividends Paid Stock Repurchases
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
39
Capital Structure
 -  Debt offering in 2007 changed the capital structure
 However, debt still at a conservative level
 Flexibility remains with $450M line of credit capacity
1.5 NA Debt to EBITDA*
36% 4% Debt to Total Capital (Debt/(Debt + Equity))
92 98 Shares Outstanding
$3,557 $3,420 Total liabilities & stockholders' equity
716 864 Stockholders' equity
400 35 Total Debt
- 35 Debt - Investment
$ 400 $ - Debt - Corporate
2007 2006 (In millions)
December 31,
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
40
Our Goals are Simple
 -  Here's how we all win:
 Target Revenue & EBITDA Growth of 15%/yr
 Push Brokerage & Risk Mgmt margins to 20%
 Control share count growth
 Return cash to shareholders
 -  Result - Stock price growth
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
41
Conclusion
 - Questions & Answers
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
42
Website: www.ajg.com
Email: investor_relations@ajg.com
Marsha_Akin@ajg.com
Phone: 630-773-3800
For Additional Information

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
Exhibit 99.2
NYSE:AJG
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co
INVESTMENT PROFILE
Brokerage Segment Risk Management Segment Financial Services Segment
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J.Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth largest insurance broker and the world's largest third-party property & casualty claims administrator. Gallagher generates approximately 88% of its revenues domestically, with the remaining 12% derived primarily in Canada, the United Kingdom, Australia and Bermuda.
JANUARY 2008
Brokerage Segment 2
Acquisition Strategy 4
Risk Management Segment 4
Financial Services Segment 5
Market Overview 6
Condensed Financial Statements 7
Why Invest? 8
Brokerage & Risk Management EBITDA (in millions)
$325 $203 $244 $237 $271 $300
$275
$225 13% CAGR
$175
$125
03 04 05 06 07
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 8.
As of DECEMBER 31, 2007 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $24.19
52-week high / low $31.83 - $24.01
Trailing 12- mos. revenues $1.6 billion
Market cap $2.2 billion
Indicated annual dividend* $1.28
Yield 5.29 %
Shares outstanding 92.0 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Price/2007 earnings** 15 x
Number of employees from continuing operations 9,102
*On January 24, 2008 Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.32 per share first-quarter dividend
** Earnings from continuing operations.
WWW.ajg.com
 
Industry Niches  
JANUARY 2008 INVESTMENT PROFILE 2
Gallagher operates its Brokerage operations through a network of more than 200 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the U.S. and in twelve countries abroad. In addition, Gallagher does business through a network of correspondent insurance brokers and consultants in more than 100 countries around the world.
RETAIL INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS 80% BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2007 REVENUES
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property & casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance and retirement solutions principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon both percentage of the premium paid by insureds and brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized in 150 geographical profit centers located in the U.S. and Canada and operate within certain key Niche/Practice Groups, which account for approximately 65% of its retail brokerage revenues. These specialized
teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
BROKERAGE SEGMENT - 69% OF 2007 REVENUES
Aviation Commercial Auto Dental Directors &Officers Liability Disability Earthquake
Error & Omissions Fire General Liability Life Marine Medical
Products Liability Professional Liability Property Retirement Solutions Wind Workers Compensation
Agribusiness Aviation & Aerospace Construction Energy Fine Arts Global Risks Habitational
Healthcare Higher Education Hospitality Marine Not-for-Profit Personal Professional Groups
Publlic Entity Real Estate Religious Institutions Restaurant Shopping Centers Transportation
Lines of Coverage
 
JANUARY 2008 INVESTMENT PROFILE 3
Gallagher's specialized focus on these Niche/Practice Groups allows for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these Niche/Practice Groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that its greatest revenue growth over the next several years for its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: (i) its Niche/Practice Groups and middlemarket accounts, (ii) cross-selling other brokerage products to existing customers, (iii) developing and managing alternative market mechanisms such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance and (iv) mergers and acquisitions.
WHOLESALE INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS 20% BROKERAGE SEGMENT 2007 REVENUES
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assists Gallagher's retail brokers and other unaffiliated retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard to place insurance programs. Revenues are generated by sharing the commission paid to the retail broker by the insurer.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized in 60 geographical profit centers located in the U.S. and through its approved Lloyd's of London brokerage in London. In certain cases, Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and, in other cases, Gallagher acts as a managing general agent or managing general underwriter distributing specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
Over 75% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents that are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on revenues, Gallagher's domestic wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the fifth largest domestic wholesaler.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing the number of broker-clients, developing new managing general agency and underwriter programs and through mergers and acquisitions.
Gallagher also continues to strengthen its Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners. These relationships are based on strength, service capabilities and shared business philosophies. The network extends Gallagher's client-service capabilities to more than 100 countries around the world. In 2006, Gallagher introduced a process to brand this network as the Gallagher Optimus Network. Ultimately, this move will give Gallagher's preferred strategic partners a greater tie to the organization, which should further enhance client services to global accounts.
Strategic Alliance Network
 
Expertise
JANUARY 2008 INVESTMENT PROFILE 4
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT - 27% OF 2007 REVENUES
Real-Time Claims Reporting Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management Managed Care Services Loss Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education & Training
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third party P/C claims administrator. Gallagher provides contract claim settlement and administration services for enterprises that choose to self-insure and for insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims handling services.
Brokerage Segment Acquisitions Strategy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components  organic growth through strong new business production, and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed 183 acquisitions from 1985 through December 31, 2007, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or
wholesale brokers possessing a strong middlemarket focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that fall within the $5 million to $10 million in revenues range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
a corporate culture that matches its own aggressive, sales-oriented culture
a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's historical acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by Gallagher's aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
 
JANUARY 2008 INVESTMENT PROFILE 5
The Financial Services Segment manages Gallagher's interests in tax-advantaged and clean-energy investments as well as its equity ownership position in an alternative investment fund manager that has ownership interests in private investment management firms. Gallagher has been winding down its financial services activities since 2003. Management expects to continue to divest most of the remaining investments in this segment in 2008.
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT - 4% OF 2007 REVENUES
Approximately 70% of revenues are from workers compensation related claims, 26% are from general and commercial auto liability related claims and 4% are from property related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with arising claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees generally negotiated in advance on a per-claim or per-service basis depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims adjusting operations through a network of 120 offices located throughout the U.S., the U.K., Australia and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. Over 80% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years will come from Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments.
 
Fluctuations in premiums charged by property & casualty insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factors, including competition for market share among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidations, can result in flat or reduced premium rates (a "soft" market). A soft market tends to put downward
pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as heavier than anticipated loss experience and capital shortages, can result in increasing premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas.
Following a period of market hardening between 2001 and 2003, beginning in 2004 and continuing through 2007, the property & casualty insurance market has been relatively soft in most lines and in most geographic areas, notwithstanding an abnormally high level of hurricane activity and other natural disasters in 2005 and 2006.
Recent market surveys by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers and supporting analysis by Lehman Brothers Equity Research indicated that commercial rates continue to soften and fell sharply throughout 2007, with renewal premiums for over 80% of all account sizes dropping between 1.0% and 30.0%. This data indicated that premium rates fell between 10% and 15% in each quarter 2007 as compared to the same quarter 2006.
JANUARY 2008 INVESTMENT PROFILE 6
MARKET OVERVIEW
Except for the historical information and discussions, statements contained herein may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets, as well developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com.
Safe Harbor Statement
 
JANUARY 2008 INVESTMENT PROFILE
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Financial Information - 2003 through 2007
(Unaudited - in millions except per share data and other information data) All information restated to reflect discontinued operations.
7
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues $ 782.5 $ 863.5 $ 945.8 $ 1,006.8 $ 1,114.2
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 163.2 183.3 90.9 158.7 183.5
Earnings from continuing operations 97.7 108.3 43.4 92.7 112.3
Growth - revenues excluding retail contingent commissions 15% 10% 11% 10% 11%
Pretax profit margin (1) 18% 18% 15% 17% 16%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 1.05 $ 1.15 $ 0.45 $ 0.94 $ 1.15
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues $ 292.0 $ 345.5 $ 370.6 $ 401.3 $ 443.5
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 40.8 58.2 68.4 53.3 64.0
Earnings from continuing operations 24.4 35.5 40.3 32.0 39.6
Growth - revenues 17% 18% 7% 8% 11%
Pretax profit margin (1) 14% 17% 18% 14% 14%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.26 $ 0.37 $ 0.42 $ 0.33 $ 0.41
BROKERAGE & RISK MANAGEMENT COMBINED
Revenues $ 1,074.5 $ 1,209.0 $ 1,316.4 $ 1,408.1 $ 1,557.7
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 204.0 241.5 159.3 212.0 247.5
Earnings from continuing operations 122.1 143.8 83.7 124.7 151.9
Growth - revenues 15% 12% 10% 9% 11%
Pretax profit margin (1) 17% 18% 10% 15% 16%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 1.31 $ 1.52 $ 0.87 $ 1.27 $ 1.56
FINANCIAL SERVICES SEGMENT
Investment income $ 113.1 $ 163.2 $ 108.9 $ 87.1 $ 62.4
Investment gains (losses) (24.5) 8.1 3.6 (25.1) 3.2
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes (20.9) (7.3) (146.4) (57.5) (47.4)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 17.6 44.1 (44.6) 3.7 2.7
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $ 0.19 $ 0.47 $ (0.46) $ 0.04 $ 0.03
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues $ 1,163.1 $ 1,380.3 $ 1,428.9 $ 1,470.1 $ 1,623.3
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 183.1 234.2 12.9 154.5 200.1
Earnings from continuing operations 139.7 187.9 39.1 128.4 154.6
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 1.50 $ 1.99 $ 0.41 $ 1.31 $ 1.59
Dividends declared per share $ 0.72 $ 1.00 $ 1.12 $ 1.20 $ 1.24
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $ 2,900.4 $ 3,233.3 $ 3,389.5 $ 3,420.1 $ 3,556.8
Total liabilities $ 2,281.3 $ 2,472.3 $ 2,620.4 $ 2,556.0 $ 2,841.3
Total stockholders' equity $ 619.1 $ 761.0 $ 769.1 $ 864.1 $ 715.5
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 93,292 94,546 96,051 98,401 97,079
Common shares repurchased (000s) 2,864 1,783 76 1,165 9,235
Book value per share $ 6.88 $ 8.26 $ 8.04 $ 8.78 $ 7.78
Annualized return on beginning stockholders' equity (2) 36% 47% 10% 37% 46%
Number of acquisitions closed 14 19 10 11 21
Workforce from continuing operations 6,613 7,657 7,953 8,533 9,102
Earnings from Continuing Operations,
Before Litigation and Contingent Commission Related Matters,
Claims Handling Obligations, Investment (Gains) Losses,
Medical and Pension Plan Changes, Depreciation, Amortization,
and Stock Compensation Expense (3)
Earnings from continuing operations $ 139.7 $ 187.9 $ 39.1 $ 128.4 $ 154.6
Litigation matters - - 204.6 9.0 -
Claims handling obligations - - 5.2 - -
Investment (gains) losses 24.5 (8.1) (3.6) 25.1 (3.2)
Medical and pension plan changes - - - 7.5 -
Depreciation 28.9 32.2 31.8 30.9 29.3
Amortization 8.4 15.7 17.6 21.2 29.3
Amortization of deferred comp and restricted stock 7.6 10.0 7.2 8.6 6.7
Stock compensation expense 1.8 5.6 8.9 16.0 12.3
Tax effect (28.5) (22.2) (104.6) (47.3) (29.8)
Earnings from continuing operations
before litigation and contingent commission
related matters, claims handling obligations,
investment (gains) losses, medical and pension plan changes,
depreciation, amortization and stock
compensation expense $ 182.4 $ 221.1 $ 206.2 $ 199.4 $ 199.2
On a diluted per share basis $ 1.96 $ 2.34 $ 2.15 $ 2.03 $ 2.05
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007
(1) Represents pretax earnings from continuing operations before the impact of pretax retail contingent commission related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims handling obligations divided by total revenues,
excluding retail contingent commissions.
(2) Represents year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity, less net balance of goodwill and amortizable intangible assets, as of the beginning of the year.
(3) Represents earnings from continuing operations before the after-tax effect of the impact of litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations,investment gains (losses), medical and pension plan changes,
depreciation, amortization, amortization of deferred compensation and restricted stock expense and stock compensation expense.
 
WHY INVEST?
Brokerage & Risk Management Earnings Before Retail
Contingent Commissions Matters, Claims-Handling
Obligations, Medical and Pension Plan Changes,
Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense*
$200 $175 $150 $125 $100 $75
$127 $154 $140 $175 $195
03 04 05 06 07
15% CAGR
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings from Continuing Operations* (in millions)
$325 $275 $225 $175 $125
$175 $208 $199 $226 $243
03 04 05 06 07
12% CAGR
Dividends Per Share
$1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
$0.05 18% Average Annual Increase $1.28**
86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04 05 06 07 08
* All information as originally reported (excluding discontinued operations, litigation related matters, retail contingent commission related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims handling obligations). See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
** Indicated - On January 24, 2008, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.32 per share quarterly dividend.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Marsha J. Akin - Investor Relations | 630.773.3800
INVESTMENT PROFILE
JANUARY 2008


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080228171547.txt.gz
TIME:20080228171547
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
On February 22, 2008, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) entered into two asset purchase agreements providing for the sale of substantially all of Gallagher Re's U.S. and U.K. reinsurance brokerage business to Aon Corporation. Significant terms of the sale transactions were announced in a press release issued by Gallagher on February 22, 2008, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and is hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
Itasca, IL, February 22, 2008  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. announced that today it has signed definitive agreements to sell substantially all of Gallagher Re's U.S. and U.K. reinsurance brokerage business to Aon Corporation. Under the agreements, Gallagher will receive initial payments of approximately $30 million in cash and potentially an additional $15 million in cash based on revenues generated in the 12 months following the close of the transactions.
Gallagher further announced that the U.S. transaction was completed today. The U.K. transaction is subject to certain conditions and is expected to be completed on or before April 30, 2008.
In the first quarter of 2008, and presented as a component of discontinued operations, Gallagher will record its best estimate of the sales proceeds and related charges as follows:
 
Throughout 2008, and presented as a component of discontinued operations, Gallagher will adjust its best estimate of the sales proceeds to be received and will also record approximately $15 million in related lease termination costs in the 3rd or 4th quarter 2008 when it winds down those leased facilities.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 13 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080424162940.txt.gz
TIME:20080424162940
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On April 24, 2008, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's first quarter 2008 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, April 24, 2008  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008. A printer-friendly format is available at
www.ajg.com.
Quarter Ended March 31
 
 
Financial information used herein has been reclassified to reflect discontinued operations as discussed below. In addition, this earnings release contains certain non-GAAP information. EBITDA, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization. A reconciliation of EBITDA to earnings from continuing operations before income taxes (which were $26.9 million and $23.8 million in the first quarter 2008 and 2007, respectively) is included on page 7 of 8 of this earnings release, along with additional information about non-GAAP measures.
"First quarter revenue growth in both our Brokerage and Risk Management segments were close to my expectations given the soft market," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "On a combined basis, these segments grew revenues 10%, of which 3% was organic. Within the Brokerage Segment, our retail and wholesale revenues increased 9% and 18%, respectively. Within the Risk Management Segment, domestic and international revenues increased 6% and 24%, respectively. Unfortunately, both domestically and internationally, we continue to see softening in the P&C pricing environment across all lines, which poses challenges to organic growth and margin expansion.
"On a combined basis, earnings growth fell short of what I anticipated. Solid EBITDA growth in the Brokerage Segment was mostly offset by declines in the Risk Management Segment. Risk Management's earnings suffered principally as a result of excess headcount, which we expect will be rectified as claim counts increase throughout 2008.
 
"Operationally, I am extremely pleased that we completed the sale of our reinsurance operations, that we completed 11 acquisitions and that we are working hard on our previously announced headcount reduction and cost savings initiatives. These activities should help us continue to grow, deliver excellent client service and improve shareholder returns even in a soft market."
Second Quarter Dividend
The company's Board of Directors today declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of thirty two cents ($.32) per share on the Common Stock of the Company, payable on July 15, 2008 to Shareholders of Record as of June 30, 2008.
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights  Excluding Discontinued Operations
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights
The law that provided for IRC Section 29-related tax credits expired on December 31, 2007. However, the amount of revenues, expenses and tax credits recognized in 2007 were subject to estimation pending the IRS' final credit computation factors, which were published on April 1, 2008. Final amounts necessary to adjust previous estimates to actual amounts computed using the published factors have been reflected in Gallagher's first quarter 2008 financial results.
Discontinued Operations
As previously announced, in first quarter 2008 Gallagher signed definitive agreements to sell substantially all of its reinsurance brokerage business. Under the agreements, Gallagher received initial proceeds of $31.8 million in cash and a $1.3 million note receivable to be paid by December 31, 2008 and additional contingent proceeds of $14.6 million that are based on revenues generated in the 12 months subsequent to March 2008. In addition, Gallagher is continuing its efforts to sell the small wholesale brokerage operation in Ireland during 2008.
In first quarter 2008, Gallagher recorded the following related to its discontinued operations:
 
Throughout 2008, Gallagher will adjust its estimate of the sales proceeds to be received and will also record approximately $15 million in related lease termination costs in the third or fourth quarter 2008 when it winds down the leased facilities of the reinsurance brokerage operations.
Corporate Related Borrowings
At March 31, 2008, Gallagher had borrowings of $56.0 million outstanding under its line of credit facility used primarily to fund first quarter 2008 acquisitions. The weighted average interest rate on these borrowings, which is based on a spread over short-term LIBOR, was 3.26%.
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. As a result, the provision for income taxes for the Financial Services & Corporate Segment reflects the entire benefit to Gallagher of the IRC Section 29-related tax credits because that is the segment which produced the credits. Gallagher historically reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments.
Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for first quarter 2008 was 39.4%, which is higher than the first quarter 2007 consolidated effective tax rate of 10.5%. The increase results because Gallagher produced IRC Section 29-related tax credits in first quarter 2007, but not in first quarter 2008. The law that provided for IRC Section 29-related tax credits expired on December 31, 2007. Accordingly, Gallagher anticipates reporting in 2008 and thereafter, an annual consolidated effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41%.
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Friday, April 25, 2008 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to
www.ajg.com.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 13 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 of 8.
 
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 of 8.
Notes to First Quarter 2008 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080513161950.txt.gz
TIME:20080513161950
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The slides containing information presented at the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 2008 Annual Stockholders' Meeting is attached hereto as an exhibit to this report and is incorporated herein in its entirety by this reference. This exhibit may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." This exhibit includes certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080729165014.txt.gz
TIME:20080729165014
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On July 29, 2008, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's second quarter 2008 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, July 29, 2008  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and six-months ended June 30, 2008. A printer-friendly format is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended June 30
 
Six Months Ended June 30
 
 
 
Financial information used herein has been reclassified to reflect discontinued operations as discussed below. In addition, this earnings release contains certain non-GAAP information. EBITDA, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization. A reconciliation of EBITDA to earnings from continuing operations before income taxes (which were $69.3 million and $60.0 million in the second quarter 2008 and 2007, respectively and $96.2 million and $83.8 million in the six-month periods ended June 30, 2008 and 2007, respectively) is included on page 7 of this earnings release, along with additional information about non-GAAP measures.
"Given the current soft market, our Brokerage Segment posted respectable second quarter results," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "I was particularly pleased our Brokerage teams closed another 9 deals in the quarter and improved EBITDA margins by over a point. Any margin improvement in this marketplace is outstanding.
"Our Risk Management Segment is also experiencing the negative effects of a soft market and a slowing economy. We are seeing fewer customers entering the alternative market and existing customer claims frequency was lower than planned. As a result, organic growth of 7% was below our expectations. In addition, we are seeing a slight increase in the average time it is taking to settle claims, which decreases productivity during a period when we are also seeing wage and benefit inflation. All of these factors put substantial pressure on our Risk Management margins."
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights  Excluding Discontinued Operations
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment Second Quarter Highlights
The law that provided for Internal Revenue Code (IRC) Section 29-related tax credits expired on December 31, 2007. However, the amount of revenues, expenses and tax credits recognized in 2007 were subject to estimation pending the IRS' final credit computation factors, which were published on April 1, 2008. Final amounts necessary to adjust previous estimates to actual amounts computed using the published factors have been reflected in Gallagher's first and second quarter 2008 financial results.
 
Discontinued Operations
As previously disclosed, in first quarter 2008 Gallagher signed definitive agreements to sell substantially all of its reinsurance brokerage business. Under the agreements, Gallagher received initial proceeds of $31.8 million in cash and a $1.3 million note receivable to be paid by December 31, 2008 and additional contingent proceeds of up to $14.6 million that are based on revenues generated in the 12 months subsequent to March 2008. In addition, Gallagher is continuing its efforts to sell its small Irish wholesale brokerage operation during 2008.
In the six-month period ended June 30, 2008, Gallagher recorded the following related to its discontinued operations:
 
Throughout 2008, Gallagher will adjust its estimate of the sales proceeds to be received and will also record approximately $15 million in related lease termination costs in third or fourth quarter 2008 when it winds down the leased facilities of the reinsurance brokerage operations.
Corporate Related Borrowings
At June 30, 2008, Gallagher had borrowings of $105.0 million outstanding under its line of credit facility, used primarily to fund 2008 acquisitions. The weighted average interest rate on these borrowings, which is based on a spread over short-term LIBOR, was 3.18%.
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. As a result, the provision for income taxes for the Financial Services and Corporate Segment reflects the entire benefit to Gallagher of the IRC Section 29-related tax credits because that is the segment which produced the credits. Gallagher historically reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an annual effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments.
Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for second quarter 2008 was 39.8%, which is higher than the second quarter 2007 consolidated effective tax rate of 23.7%. This increase resulted from Gallagher being able to produce IRC Section 29-related tax credits in second quarter 2007, but not in second quarter 2008. The law that provided for IRC Section 29-related tax credits expired on December 31, 2007. Accordingly, Gallagher anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an annual consolidated effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41%.
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 30, 2008 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 14 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 of 8.
 
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 of 8.
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2008 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20080903181204.txt.gz
TIME:20080903181204
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The August 2008 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at .
www.ajg.com
www.ajg.com
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
Safe Harbor Statement
Except for the historical information and discussions, certain statements contained herein relating to future results may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, as discussed in Gallagher's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; alternative insurance markets continue to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period-to-period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to a great deal of uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings will continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of past, current or future tax laws or changes in crude oil prices or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2007.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 -  This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
 -  Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2006 and 2005 were adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations and to eliminate the impact of medical and pension plan changes. Charges in 2006 related to retail contingent commission related matters and medical plan changes totaled $9.0 million (or $5.4 million after tax) and $7.5 million (or $4.5 million after tax), respectively. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $5.2 million (or $3.6 million after tax), respectively. In addition, Gallagher recognized a pension curtailment gain of $10.0 million (or $6.0 million after tax) in 2005. There were no such charges or gains in 2001 to 2004. These adjustments, which Gallagher believes are for non-recurring items, were made to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2006 and 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations and medical and pension plan changes. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation. The term EBITDA used herein represents pretax earnings from continuing operations (excluding the impact of the non-recurring items discussed above and retail contingent commissions) before interest, depreciation and amortization expenses.
 -  Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 -  4th Largest Insurance Broker *
 Retail & Wholesale  86% US; 14% International
 -  5th Largest Wholesaler*
 -  Fastest Growing Lloyds Wholesaler (5 yrs)
 -  Largest P&C Third Party Administrator
 Adjusting WC, Liability & Property Claims
 2008 Business Insurance Readers Choice Award
 -  More Background in Investor Profile Handout and the Gallagher Way Book
*According to Business Insurance
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Two Core Businesses
 -  Revenues at 6/30/08  -  EBITDA Earnings at 6/30/08
Brokerage 71% Brokerage 78%
(i.e. Selling Insurance)
Risk Management 29% Risk Management 22%
(i.e. Adjusting Claims)
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Organic Revenue Growth
Organic Growth 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 June YTD
AJG* 7.0% 4.0% 6.0% 5.0% 2.0%
AJG Rank 1 2 2 1 2
Peer Group Avg. 3.2% 1.3% 3.9% 1.1% -0.2%
Range -0.5% to 7.0% -4.3% to 4.3% 0.0% to 8.0% -3.4% to 5.0% -6.0% to 3.0%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3.
*Excludes revenues from Financial Services/Corporate Segment
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Current Environment
 -  Fighting a Headwind
 Soft P&C Market (i.e. too much supply)
 -  Some predict another 2+ years
 Teetering Economy (i.e. slowing demand)
 -  Business cutbacks
 -  Slowing employee counts
 -  Energy and wage inflation
 -  U.S. and Even Global Recession
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage Segment  Business Mix
 -  6/30/08 Revenues
Wholesale 23%
Mostly U.S. and U.K.
Retail 77% Mostly North America
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage Segment Strategy
 -  Rapidly Expand  Domestic
 Geographical
 Expertise
 -  Selectively Expand  International
 Broaden Network Partners
 Targeted Acquisitions
 -  ProfitabilityStay in Our Sweet Spot
 Middle to Upper Commercial Market
9
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic Brokerage Expansion
 - Sell
 - Hire
 - Develop
 - Acquire
10
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic Brokerage Expansion
 - Sell
 - Hire
 - Develop
 - Acquire
(In millions)
$1,300
$1,100
$900
$700
$500
11% CAGR
$656
2002
$753
2003
$830
2004
$917
2005
$1,004
2006
$1,110
2007
 -  Brokerage Segment Revenues From Continuing Operations excluding retail contingent commissions.
 -  See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
11
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic Expansion  Hire
 - Producers that want to sell
 - Producers that want access to our network, expertise and niches
 - Producers that want to be supported by our infrastructure
 - Must fit into our culture!
12
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic ExpansionHire
 - Producers that want to sell
 - Producers that want access to our network, expertise and niches
 - Producers that want to be supported by our infrastructure
 - Must fit into our culture!
"I joined Gallagher because I focus on Colleges and Universities and Gallagher has the best Higher Education professionals in the brokerage business"
"Gallagher's benefits team was innovative and their supporting technology was exactly what I needed to grow my book of business."
13
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic Expansion  Develop
 - Internships
 - Career Launch
 - Must fit into our culture!
14
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic ExpansionDevelop
 - Internships
 - Career Launch
 - Must fit into our culture!
"I was an econ and stats major, but I thought I could sell too. I did my first year as an intern after my sophomore year. I was hooked!"
"Many of Gallagher's senior execs and field leaders came through the internship. I like the idea of having customers but also some day I can run a branch."
15
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic Expansion  Acquire
 - About 18,000 retail and wholesale brokerages and agencies* (P&C and Benefits)
 - Most owned by baby boomers
 - Small number of consolidators
*According to Hales & Co, Inc.
16
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic Expansion  Acquire
 - Gallagher has done over 200 deals in the last 23 years
 - Typical deal is $2 to $10 million in revenues
 - Must fit into our culture!
17
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Domestic Expansion  Acquire
 - Gallagher has done over 180 deals in the last 20 years
 - Typical deal is $2 to $10 million in revenues
 - Must fit into our culture!
"I had the relationships with many larger prospects, but I didn't have the resources to get their business. Sold to Gallagher, brought in the experts and now they are my client!"
"It was simple  my son and I wanted to be a part of a global player. My son wanted to be part of a team and I thought I was going to slow down. Ha, I'm rejuvenated and I'm having a blast!"
18
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Mergers & Acquisitions
 -  2007 was a record year for acquisitions
 -  2008 acquisition pace continues
 Growth led by retail operations
Annualized Revenue Acquired (in millions)
$100
$80
$60
$40
$20
$0
$23
$38
$83
$52
Retail
$10
$16
$16
$6
Wholesale
 -  2005  -  2006  -  2007  -  2008 June YTD
Number of Acquisitions Closed
20
15
10
0
9
18
19
Retail
Wholesale
 -  2005  -  2006  -  2007  -  2008 June YTD
19
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Where We Are  Retail Locations
20
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Where We Are Not
 -  Larger cities where we don't have a presence
Source for Acquisition Targets: Hales & Co., Inc. and D&B
21
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
International Expansion
 -  Substantial London operation
 -  Attract experienced teams
 -  Opportunistic with acquisitions and joint ventures
 -  Network of independent brokers in over 100 countries
22
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage  Supporting the Growth
Field
 - Full-time training & career development teams
 - Full-time M&A teams
 - Full-time niche & product support teams
23
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage  Supporting the Growth
Back Office
 -  Centralized corporate systems
 General Ledger, T&E, HR, Real Estate and Planning
 -  Created supporting service centers
 However, NOT client facing
24
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage  Supporting the Growth
 -  Branch manager now can focus on:
 Selling
 Developing
 Client service
 Hiring
 Acquiring
 Strategy
25
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage  Profitable Growth
"Soft Market Play Book"
 -  Existing Plays
 Headcount and Wage Controls (non-production layers)
 Expense Management
 Experienced Teams Must Quickly Deliver
26
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage  Profitable Growth
"Soft Market Play Book"
 -  New Plays
 Leveraging Scale
 Leveraging Technology
 Centralizing and Shifting Work to Lower Cost Labor Locations
Net EffectHeadcount reduction through attrition
27
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Brokerage Segment  EBITDA Growth*
(In millions)
$260
$220
$180
$140
$100
12% CAGR
$125
2002
$224
2007
28
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Risk Management Segment Strategy
 -  Domestic & International
 -  Trend Towards Unbundling
 -  Network vs. Dedicated Units
 -  Profitability
29
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Risk Mgmt Segment  Revenues From Continuing Operations*
(In millions)
$500
$400
$300
$200
$100
12% CAGR
$250
2002
$292
2003
$346
2004
$371
2005
$401
2006
$444
2007
30
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Risk Mgmt  Domestic & International
 -  Revenue growth is all organic
 -  Targeting Fortune 1000 but standard platform enables profitable service to much smaller accounts as well
 -  Differentiate through client intimacy, commitment to quality and technology
 -  International presence largely public entity but leveraging US expertise to penetrate commercial clients
31
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Risk Mgmt  Unbundling Trend
 -  A growing company has needs that can often best be met in alternative markets
 -  We can tailor service to clients needs
 -  Include on-site when appropriate
 -  Hard markets accelerate the drive to alternative markets
 -  Soft market has slowed pace but opportunities still exist
32
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Risk Mgmt  Network Philosophy
 -  Leverage global technology and standard processes to provide service anywhere in the country
 -  Broaden market opportunity to smaller clients where we don't need to be on-site
 -  Move to regional operations and to lower cost locations where possible
33
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Risk Mgmt Segment  EBITDA Growth *
(In millions)
$80
$70
$60
$50
$40
$30
15% CAGR
$37
2002
$76
2007
34
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Cash, Cash & Cash
 -  Both Brokerage & Risk Management Businesses Generate Substantial Cash Flow
 -  Neither Need Substantial Capital or Cap Ex
35
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Short-cut To Understand Cash Flows
(See GAAP cash flows in Statement of Cash Flows*)
Brokerage & Risk Management Combined (in millions) 2004 2005 2006 2007 June YTD 2008
Pretax earnings from continuing operations before non-recurring items * $ 242 $ 228 $ 229 $ 248 $ 111
Non-cash expenses
Amortization expense 16 18 21 29 19
Stock compensation expense 16 16 25 19 10
Pretax earnings from continuing operations before non- recurring items and non-cash expenses * 274 262 274 296 140
Income Taxes @ 20% (AMT) 48 46 46 50 22
After tax earnings from continuing operations before non- recurring items and non-cash expenses * $ 226 $ 216 $ 229 $ 246 $ 118
Depreciation is excluded from this analysis because such approximates annual Cap Ex.
36
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Cash, Cash & Cash
 -  Pay Dividend
 Long-cycle Industry
 Shareholders need returns while holding
 -  Buy Brokers
 -  Repurchase Shares
 -  Appropriate Debt Levels
37
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Cash Flows from Operations
 -  Cash flow from operations in 2007 exceeded $250M
 -  "Free" cash flows are used for acquisitions and/or stock repurchases
 
$300
$250
$200
$150
$100
$50
$0
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008 June YTD
 
38
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Uses of Cash  2003 through 6/30/08
 -  Uses of Cash as Reported (in millions)
$300
$250
$200
$150
$100
$50
$0
2003
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008 June YTD
 -  Cash Paid for Acquisitions (net of cash acquired)  -  Dividends Paid  - Stock Repurchases
39
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Capital Structure
 -  Debt offering in 2007 changed the capital structure
 However, debt still at a conservative level
 Flexibility remains with $450M line of credit capacity
Dec 31, June 30,
(millions) 2006 2007 2008
DebtCorporate $$ 400 $ 505
DebtInvestment 35 0 0
Total Debt 35 400 505
Stockholders' equity 864 716 726
Total liabilities & stockholders' equity $ 3,420 $ 3,557 $ 3,510
Shares Outstanding 98 92 93
Debt to Total Capital (Debt/(Debt + Equity)) 4% 36% 41%
DebttoEBITDA* (ttm) NA 1.5 1.7
40
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Our Goals are Simple
 -  Here's how we all win:
 Target Revenue & EBITDA Growth of 15%/yr
 Push Brokerage & Risk Mgmt margins to 20%
 Control share count growth
 Return cash to shareholders
 -  ResultStock price growth
41
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Conclusion
 
42
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Website: www.ajg.com
Email: investor_relations@ajg.com Marsha_Akin@ajg.com
Phone: 630-773-3800
43

Exhibit 99.2
 
Exhibit 99.2
 -   -   - 
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management
Financial Services Segment
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is the world's fourth-largest insurance broker and the world's largest third-party property & casualty claims administrator.* Gallagher generates approximately 86% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 14% derived primarily in Canada, the United Kingdom, Australia and Bermuda.
*According to Business Insurance.
Brokerage Segment 2
Acquisition Strategy 4
Risk Management Segment 4
Financial Services/Corporate Segment 5
P/C Market Overview 6
Condensed Financial Statements 7
Why Invest? 8
www.ajg.com
NYSE: AJG
Brokerage & Risk Management EBITDA (in millions)
$325
$275
$225
$175
$125
13% CAGR
$203 $244 $237 $271 $300
03 04 05 06 07
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 8.
As of June 30, 2008 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $24.10
52-week high/low $31.83$22.40
Trailing 12-mos. revenues $1.6 billion
Market cap $2.2 billion
Indicated annual dividend* $1.28*
Yield 5.3 %
Shares outstanding 93.3 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Trailing 12-mos. price/earnings** 15.6 x
Number of employees** 9,534
** Based on continuing operations.
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT  71% OF 6/30/08 REVENUES
Gallagher operates its Brokerage operations through a network of more than 200 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 14 countries abroad. In addition, Gallagher does business through a Strategic Alliance Network of independent insurance brokers and consultants in more than 100 countries around the world.
RETAIL INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
77% OF 6/30/08 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property & casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Lines of Coverage
 -  Aviation  -  Errors & Omissions  -  Products Liability
 -  Commercial Auto  -  Fire  -  Professional Liability
 -  Dental  -  General Liability  -  Property
 -  Directors & Officers Liability  -  Life  -  Retirement Solutions
 -  Disability  -  Marine  -  Wind
 -  Earthquake  -  Medical  -  Workers Compensation
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized in approximately 150 geographical profit centers located throughout North America and operate primarily within certain key Niche/Practice Groups, which account for approximately 65% of its retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
Niche/Practice Groups
 -  Agribusiness  -  Healthcare  -  Real Estate
 -  Aviation & Aerospace  -  Higher Education  -  Religious Institutions
 -  Captives  -  Hospitality  -  Restaurant
 -  Construction  -  Marine  -  Shopping Centers
 -  Energy  -  Not-for-Profit  -  Technology & Telecom
 -  Fine Arts  -  Personal  -  Transportation
 -  Global Risks  -  Professional Groups
 -  Habitational  -  Public Entity
 
Gallagher's specialized focus on these Niche/Practice Groups allows for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these Niche/Practice Groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that its greatest revenue growth over the next several years for its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: (1) its Niche/Practice Groups and middle-market accounts, (2) cross-selling other brokerage products to existing customers, (3) developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance, (4) mergers and acquisitions.
WHOLESALE INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
23% OF 6/30/08 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist Gallagher's retail brokers and other unaffiliated retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Revenues are generated by sharing the commission paid to the retail broker by the insurer.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized in approximately 60 geographical profit centers located in the U.S. and through its approved Lloyd's of London brokerage in London. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent or managing general underwriter, distributing specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
More than 75% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents that are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on revenues, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the fifth-largest wholesaler.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of broker-clients, by developing new managing general agency and underwriter programs, and through mergers and acquisitions.
Strategic Alliance Network
Gallagher has a strong worldwide Strategic Alliance Network of independent broker partners. These relationships are based on strength, service capabilities and shared business philosophies. The network extends Gallagher's client-service capabilities to more than 100 countries around the world. In 2006, Gallagher introduced a process to brand this network as the Gallagher Optimus Network. Ultimately, this move will give Gallagher's preferred strategic partners a greater tie to the organization, which should further enhance client services to global accounts.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2008 3
 
Brokerage Segment Acquisition Strategy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components  organic growth through strong new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed over 200 acquisitions from 1985 through June 30, 2008, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that fall within the $2 million to $10 million in annual revenues range.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher focuses on:
 -  a corporate culture that matches its own
 -  a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
 -  clearly defined financial criteria.
Management anticipates that Gallagher's historical acquisition pace will continue. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by Gallagher's aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT  29% OF 6/30/08 REVENUES
Expertise
 -  Real-time Claims Reporting  -  Managed Care Services
 -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)  -  Loss Control Services
 -  Appraisal Services  -  Safety Programs
 -  Litigation Management  -  Settlement Management
 -  Information Management  -  Education & Training
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator. Gallagher provides contract claim settlement and administration services for enterprises that choose to self-insure and for insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims-handling services.
 
Approximately 70% of Risk Management Segment revenues are from workers compensation-related claims, 26% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims and 4% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims-management operations through a network of approximately 120 offices located throughout the U.S., the U.K., Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 80% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years will come from Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments.
FINANCIAL SERVICES/CORPORATE SEGMENT
This segment manages Gallagher's interests in tax-advantaged and clean-energy investments as well as its equity ownership position in an alternative investment fund manager that has ownership interests in private investment management firms. Gallagher has been winding down its financial services activities since 2003. Management expects to continue to divest most of the remaining investments in this segment throughout 2008 and 2009.
In addition, Gallagher's interest expense and corporate-related administrative expenses are reported in this segment.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2008 5
 
Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factors, including competition for marketshare among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidations, can result in flat or reduced P/C premium rates (a "soft" market). A soft market tends to put downward pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as heavier-than-anticipated loss experience or capital shortages, can result in increasing P/C premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas.
Following a period of market hardening between 2001 and 2003, beginning in 2004 and continuing into 2008, the P/C market has been relatively soft in most lines and in most geographic areas, notwithstanding an abnormally high level of hurricane activity and other natural disasters in 2005 and 2006.
Recent market surveys by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers and supporting analysis by Lehman Brothers Equity Research indicated that commercial rates continued to fall sharply during the first half of 2008, with an average drop in commercial renewal premiums of 13%. The average premium decline for all commercial accounts, regardless of size, was 12.9% for the second quarter 2008, continuing the double-digit decline of the prior five quarters.
Safe Harbor Statement
Except for the historical information and discussions, statements contained herein may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors, such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets, as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation and crude oil prices. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information-2006 through 2008
(Unaudited-in millions, except per share data and other information) All information restated to reflect discontinued operations.
2006 2007 2008
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues $ 208.7 $ 255.2 $ 270.4 $ 272.5 $ 1,006.8 $ 232.8 $ 294.6 $ 290.0 $ 296.8 $1,114.2 $ 258.0 $ 312.2
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 16.5 48.4 58.9 34.9 158.7 17.8 61.8 56.4 47.5 183.5 19.5 65.6
Earnings from continuing operations 9.3 28.8 34.3 20.3 92.7 10.7 37.4 33.8 30.4 112.3 11.9 39.2
Growth  revenues excluding retail contingent commissions 7% 14% 9% 8% 10% 12% 15% 7% 9% 11% 9% 6%
Pretax profit margin (1) 7% 19% 22% 18% 17% 8% 20% 19% 16% 16% 6% 20%
EBITDA margin (2) 12% 22% 25% 21% 21% 12% 25% 23% 20% 21% 12% 26%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.10 $ 0.29 $ 0.36 $ 0.20 $ 0.94 $ 0.10 $ 0.38 $ 0.35 $ 0.32 $ 1.15 $ 0.13 $ 0.42
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues $ 98.0 $ 98.4 $ 105.6 $ 99.3 $ 401.3 $ 106.8 $ 107.8 $ 110.3 $ 118.6 $ 443.5 $ 116.2 $ 115.2
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 15.2 13.5 18.6 6.0 53.3 16.7 13.8 15.5 18.0 64.0 13.8 12.2
Earnings from continuing operations 9.0 8.2 11.3 3.5 32.0 9.9 8.3 9.5 11.9 39.6 8.5 7.4
Growth  revenues 7% 10% 12% 4% 8% 9% 10% 4% 19% 11% 9% 7%
Pretax profit margin (1) 16% 14% 18% 9% 14% 16% 13% 14% 15% 14% 12% 11%
EBITDA margin (2) 18% 16% 20% 12% 17% 18% 16% 17% 18% 17% 15% 14%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ 0.11 $ 0.04 $ 0.33 $ 0.10 $ 0.08 $ 0.10 $ 0.13 $ 0.41 $ 0.09 $ 0.08
BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT. COMBINED
Revenues $ 306.7 $ 353.6 $ 376.0 $ 371.8 $ 1,408.1 $ 339.6 $ 402.4 $ 400.3 $ 415.4 $1,557.7 $ 374.2 $ 427.4
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 31.7 61.9 77.5 40.9 212.0 34.5 75.6 71.9 65.5 247.5 33.3 77.8
Earnings from continuing operations 18.3 37.0 45.6 23.8 124.7 20.6 45.7 43.3 42.3 151.9 20.4 46.6
Growth  revenues 7% 13% 10% 7% 9% 11% 13% 6% 12% 11% 9% 6%
Pretax profit margin (1) 10% 17% 21% 11% 15% 10% 18% 18% 16% 16% 8% 18%
EBITDA margin (2) 14% 20% 24% 19% 19% 14% 22% 21% 20% 20% 13% 22%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.19 $ 0.37 $ 0.47 $ 0.24 $ 1.27 $ 0.20 $ 0.46 $ 0.45 $ 0.45 $ 1.56 $ 0.22 $ 0.50
FINANCIAL SERVICES/CORPORATE SEGMENT
Investment income $ 4.3 $ 5.5 $ 37.9 $ 39.4 $ 87.1 $ 31.3 $ 28.2 $ 8.1 $ (5.2) $ 62.4 $ 1.6 $ 1.7
Investment gains (losses) -(3.4)(9.2)(12.5)(25.1) 4.1(3.0) 2.3(0.2) 3.2 -(0.2)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes ( 4. 1) ( 13. 5) ( 17. 8) ( 22. 1) ( 57. 5) ( 10. 7) ( 15. 6) ( 5. 5) ( 15. 6) ( 47. 4) ( 6. 4) ( 8. 5)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations( 2. 4) ( 0. 2) 3.5 2.8 3.7 0.7 0.1 9.1(7.2) 2.7(4.1)(4.9)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $ (0.03) $$ 0.03 $ 0.03 $ 0.04 $ 0.01 $$ 0.09 $ (0.08) $ 0.03 $ (0.04) $ (0.05)
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues $ 311.0 $ 355.7 $ 404.7 $ 398.7 $ 1,470.1 $ 375.0 $ 427.6 $ 410.7 $ 410.0 $1,623.3 $ 375.8 $ 428.9
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 27.6 48.4 59.7 18.8 154.5 23.8 60.0 66.4 49.9 200.1 26.9 69.3
Earnings from continuing operations 15.9 36.8 49.1 26.6 128.4 21.3 45.8 52.4 35.1 154.6 16.3 41.7
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.16 $ 0.37 $ 0.50 $ 0.27 $ 1.31 $ 0.21 $ 0.46 $ 0.54 $ 0.37 $ 1.59 $ 0.18 $ 0.45
Dividends declared per share $ 0.30 $ 0.30 $ 0.30 $ 0.30 $ 1.20 $ 0.31 $ 0.31 $ 0.31 $ 0.31 $ 1.24 $ 0.32 $ 0.32
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $3,135.1 $3,638.3 $3,415.1 $ 3,420.1 $ 3,391.7 $ 3,701.7 $ 3,570.9 $ 2,556.8 $ 3,340.9 $ 3,509.5
Total liabilities $2,356.2 $2,837.1 $2,569.3 $ 2,556.0 $ 2,312.5 $ 2,918.9 $ 2,801.6 $ 2,841.3 $ 2,642.3 $ 2,783.3
Total stockholders' equity $ 778.9 $ 801.2 $ 845.8 $ 864.1 $ 867.9 $ 782.8 $ 769.3 $ 715.5 $ 698.6 $ 726.2
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 97,779 98,034 98,453 99,382 98,401 100,128 98,652 95,807 93,698 97,079 92,898 93,545
Common shares repurchased (000s) 18 431 10 706 1,165 557 4229 1887 2562 9,235 26 20
Annualized reurn on beginning stockholders' equity (3) 9% 14% 18% 17% 17% 9% 15% 18% 16% 16% NMF 10%
Number of acquisitions closed 1 4 3 3 11 7 4 2 8 21 11 9
Workforce from continuing operations 8,007 8,130 8,235 8,533 8,690 9,047 8,960 9,102 9,329 9,534
TOTAL COMPANY EBITDA (4)
Net earnings (loss) $ 17.1 $ 36.6 $ 50.2 $ 24.6 $ 128.5 $ 19.8 $ 43.8 $ 51.8 $ 23.4 $ 138.8 $ (6.0) $ 40.8
Loss (earnings) on discontinued operations, net of income taxes(1.2) 0.2(1.1) 2.0(0.1) 1.5 2.0 0.6 11.7 15.8 22.3 0.9
Earnings from continuing operations 15.9 36.8 49.1 26.6 128.4 21.3 45.8 52.4 35.1 154.6 16.3 41.7
Provision (benefit) for income taxes 11.7 11.6 10.6(7.8) 26.1 2.5 14.2 14.0 14.8 45.5 10.6 27.6
Interest 2.1 2.1 2.1 2.2 8.5 0.6 3.2 5.6 6.6 16.0 6.5 7.3
Depreciation 7.3 7.3 8.6 7.7 30.9 7.6 7.2 6.8 7.7 29.3 6.9 7.9
Amortization 4.8 4.6 5.2 6.6 21.2 7.1 7.1 7.1 8.0 29.3 8.9 10.3
Medical and pension plan changes - 7.5 7.5 -
Litigation and contingent commission related matters - 9.0 9.0 -
Total company EBITDA $ 41.8 $ 62.4 $ 75.6 $ 51.8 $ 231.6 $ 39.1 $ 77.5 $ 85.9 $ 72.2 $ 274.7 $ 49.2 $ 94.8
(1) Represents pretax earnings from continuing operations before the impact of pretax retail contingent commission-related matters and medical and pension plan changes divided by total revenues, excluding retail contingent commissions.
(2) Represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization expense (EBITDA) divided by total revenues.
(4) EBITDA represents earnings from continuing operations before the impact of litigation and retail contingent commission-related matters, medical and pension plan changes, interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization expense.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2008 7
 
Brokerage & Risk Management Earnings Before Retail Contingent Commission Matters, Claims-Handling Obligations, Medical and Pension Plan Changes, Depreciation, Amortization and Stock Compensation Expense*
$200
$175
$150
$125
$100
$75
$127 $154 $140 $175 $195
15%CAGR
03 04 05 06 07
Brokerage & Risk Management Pretax Earnings from Continuing Operations* (in millions)
$325
$275
$225
$175
$125
$175 $208 $199 $226 $243
12% CAGR
03 04 05 06 07
Dividends Per Share
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
$0.05
18% Average Annual Increase
$1.28**
86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99 00 01 02 03 04 05 06 07 08
* All information as originally reported (excluding discontinued operations, litigation related matters, retail contingent commission-related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims-handling obligations). See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
** Indicated  On January 24, 2008, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.32 per share quarterly dividend.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20081028163933.txt.gz
TIME:20081028163933
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On October 28, 2008, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's third quarter 2008 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, October 28, 2008  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine-months ended September 30, 2008. A printer-friendly format of this release and our supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended September 30
 
 
 
Financial information contained herein has been reclassified to reflect discontinued operations as discussed below. In addition, this earnings release contains certain non-GAAP information. EBITDA, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization. A reconciliation of EBITDA to earnings from continuing operations before income taxes (which were $49.4 million and $66.4 million in third quarter 2008 and 2007, respectively, and $145.6 million and $150.2 million in the nine-month periods ended September 30, 2008 and 2007, respectively) is included on page 7 of this earnings release, along with additional information about non-GAAP measures.
"We are satisfied with our third quarter Brokerage Segment results given the soft market conditions seen in the quarter," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Our Brokerage Segment held EBITDA margins steady compared to last year, and acquired another eight solid brokers that expand our network and client service capabilities. Despite an increase in catastrophes and financial turmoil impacting the banking and insurance sectors, we continued to see pricing decreases throughout the third quarter. It is too early in the fourth quarter for us to see any meaningful change in carrier pricing behavior.
"Excluding adverse foreign currency exchange rates, our Risk Management Segment was slightly below our expectations. A weaker Australian dollar produced a $3.0 million adverse change in foreign currency translation in the quarter, or 2.5 margin points. Revenue growth of 8%, all of which was organic, met our expectations given the soft market."
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights  Excluding Discontinued Operations
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights
Gallagher continues to exit from its Financial Services investments and its remaining investments are listed on page 8 of this earnings release. Many of these assets were tax advantaged investments related to tax laws that expired on December 31, 2007. The following summarizes the financial statement impact of these remaining investments, including the resolution of certain tax related matters during third quarter 2008.
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
Discontinued Operations
As previously disclosed, in first quarter 2008 Gallagher signed definitive agreements to sell substantially all of its reinsurance brokerage business. Under the agreements, Gallagher received initial proceeds of $31.8 million in cash and a $1.3 million note receivable to be paid by December 31, 2008 and additional contingent proceeds of up to $14.6 million that are based on revenues generated in the twelve months subsequent to March 2008. In third quarter 2008, Gallagher abandoned its efforts to sell its small Irish wholesale brokerage operation and ceased those operations.
In the nine-month period ended September 30, 2008, Gallagher recorded the following related to its discontinued operations (in millions):
 
 
Discontinued Operations (continued)
In third quarter 2008, Gallagher recorded $1.0 million in lease termination and other real estate costs related to its reinsurance brokerage operations. Gallagher expects to record approximately $8.0 million in additional lease termination costs in fourth quarter 2008 when it winds down the leased facilities of the reinsurance brokerage operations.
Corporate Related Borrowings
At September 30, 2008, Gallagher had borrowings of $118.0 million outstanding under its line of credit facility, used primarily to fund 2008 acquisitions. The weighted average interest rate on these borrowings, which is based on a spread over short-term LIBOR, was 3.54%. The interest rate at October 27, 2008 for a sixty day borrowing on this line was 3.87%.
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. As a result, the provision for income taxes for the Financial Services and Corporate Segment reflects the entire benefit to Gallagher of the IRC Section 29-related tax credits because that is the segment which produced the credits. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an annual effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments.
Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for third quarter 2008 was 15.6%, which is lower than the third quarter 2007 consolidated effective tax rate of 21.1%. The decrease is primarily related to the resolution of certain Federal and state tax audits and the expiration of statute of limitations related to prior years discussed above. The following provides a reconciliation of third quarter consolidated income taxes (in millions):
 
Gallagher anticipates reporting an annual consolidated effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% for 2009 and later years.
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 29, 2008 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 14 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release is historical in nature and only speaks to the day it is dated. Gallagher has no duty to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 of 8.
 
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 7 of 8.
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2008 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090123152354.txt.gz
TIME:20090123152354
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 22, 2009, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") entered into a definitive agreement to acquire all of the policy renewal rights from Liberty Mutual's middle-market commercial property/casualty business located in their Midwest and Southeast regions. As part of the agreement, Gallagher expects to hire approximately 75 Liberty Mutual producers in these regions.
Gallagher is also acquiring substantially all of the policy renewal rights and hiring the national producer group from Wausau Signature Agency, Liberty Mutual's commercial property/casualty and employee benefits insurance agency headquartered in Wausau, Wisconsin.
When completed, it is expected that the transaction will add approximately 120 new insurance sales professionals to Gallagher's retail commercial property/casualty brokerage operation.
The definitive agreement includes an initial payment in cash and stock of approximately $44 million and additional payments in cash or stock (at Gallagher's election) that is based on revenues generated in the two year period beginning twelve months after closing. The maximum amount of the additional payments is $120 million. This agreement is also subject to customary closing conditions including regulatory approval under the Hart Scott Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976. The transaction is expected to close on or about March 1, 2009.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
Itasca, IL, January 22, 2009  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. announced today that it has signed a definitive agreement to acquire all of the policy renewal rights from Liberty Mutual's middle-market commercial property/casualty business located in their Midwest and Southeast regions. As part of the agreement, Gallagher expects to hire approximately 75 Liberty Mutual producers in these regions.
Gallagher is also acquiring substantially all of the policy renewal rights and hiring the national producer group from Wausau Signature Agency, Liberty Mutual's commercial property/casualty and employee benefits insurance agency headquartered in Wausau, Wisconsin.
When completed, it is expected that the transaction will add approximately 120 new insurance sales professionals to Gallagher's retail commercial property/casualty brokerage operation under the direction of its President, James S. Gault.
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO said, "This was an extraordinary opportunity to hire industry-leading insurance professionals that have a deep commitment to excellent client service and that fit exceptionally well in the Gallagher culture. This strategic combination will give us great growth potential, increase our client service capabilities, and strengthen our middle-market presence. We look forward to working with our newest associates, and we welcome them to our Gallagher family of professionals."
The definitive agreement includes an initial payment in cash and stock of approximately $44 million and additional payments in cash or stock (at Gallagher's election) that is based on revenues generated in the two year period beginning twelve months after closing. The maximum amount of the additional payments is $120 million. This agreement is also subject to customary closing conditions including regulatory approval under the Hart Scott Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976. The transaction is expected to close on or about March 1, 2009.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as the failure to complete or adequately integrate the assets and people acquired under the definitive agreement with Liberty, changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007 and Gallagher's Quarterly Report on 10Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090203171225.txt.gz
TIME:20090203171225
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 3, 2009, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's fourth quarter 2008 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, February 3, 2009  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2008. A printer-friendly format of this release and the supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended December 31
 
 
 
Financial information contained herein has been reclassified to reflect discontinued operations as discussed below. In addition, this earnings release contains certain non-GAAP information. EBITDA, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization. A reconciliation of EBITDA to earnings from continuing operations before income taxes (which were $18.0 million and $49.9 million in fourth quarter 2008 and 2007, respectively, and $163.6 million and $200.1 million for the years ended December 31, 2008 and 2007, respectively) is included on page 9 of this earnings release, along with additional information about non-GAAP measures.
"Gallagher did not escape the negative impact of a rapidly deteriorating economy and continued soft market in the fourth quarter 2008. Fewer new business sales, reduced renewal exposure units, less investment income, declines in claim frequency and a strengthening U.S. dollar, all combined to challenge growth and profitability in both our Brokerage and Risk Management segments," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "However, acquisitions in our Brokerage Segment continue to fuel growth. During the quarter, we closed another 9 deals comprising over $65 million of annualized revenue. Including 2008 and our recently announced deal with Liberty Mutual, we've added over $200 million in annualized revenues as we come into 2009. Operationally, I'm particularly pleased that throughout 2008, the team completed significant proactive measures to right-size our workforce and curtail expenses in anticipation of an uncertain 2009, including:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
"These operational improvement actions resulted in several fourth quarter 2008 charges that mask underlying performance. As a result, we have provided enhanced descriptions and financial information in this release that will help reconcile 2008 results with comparative 2007 results."
"These expense actions are expected to generate approximately $25 to $30 million in annualized cost savings and should better position Gallagher to navigate this economy. However, if the economy and pricing environment continue to decline as they did in the fourth quarter, further actions will be necessary to eliminate additional costs which may include additional workforce reductions and compensation adjustments. Even so, there can be no assurance that those future actions can offset the adverse impact of a rapidly deteriorating economy."
"Our brokers, adjusters and supporting associates continue to deliver our clients excellent value and outstanding customer service throughout this soft market and devastating economy. We will continue to support them so that Gallagher can be successful for the long-term."
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights  Excluding Discontinued Operations
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
Gallagher continues to wind down its Financial Services investments. Many of these assets were tax advantaged investments related to tax laws that expired on December 31, 2007. Net pretax investment losses in fourth quarter 2008 consist primarily of a $5.8 million non-cash impairment charge related to Gallagher's investment in Asset Alliance Corporation.
During fourth quarter 2008, Gallagher recorded an additional $1.9 million of expense to address certain prior year state tax matters.
Corporate Related Borrowings and Cash
 
 
 
Discontinued Operations
As previously disclosed, Gallagher signed definitive agreements to sell substantially all of its reinsurance brokerage business. Under the agreements, Gallagher received initial proceeds of $33.1 million in cash and additional contingent proceeds of up to $14.6 million that are based on revenues generated in the twelve months subsequent to March 2008.
In the year ended December 31, 2008, Gallagher recorded the following related to its discontinued operations (in millions):
 
In fourth quarter 2008, Gallagher recorded $5.6 million in lease termination and other real estate costs related to its reinsurance brokerage operations. In January 2009, Gallagher signed and closed a definitive agreement to sell all of the remaining run-off obligations of the reinsurance brokerage business. Gallagher transferred restricted cash of $10.7 million, receivables of $128.7 million and liabilities of $139.4 million. Gallagher expects to record approximately $4.5 million in additional lease termination costs in first quarter 2009 when it winds down the remaining leased facilities of the reinsurance brokerage operations.
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. As a result, the provision for income taxes for the Financial Services and Corporate Segment reflects the entire benefit to Gallagher of the IRC Section 29-related tax credits because that is the segment which produced the credits. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an annual effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments.
Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for fourth quarter 2008 was 34.8%, which is higher than the fourth quarter 2007 consolidated effective tax rate of 29.7%. This increase resulted from Gallagher being able to produce IRC Section 29-related tax credits in fourth quarter 2007, but not in fourth quarter 2008. The law that provided for IRC Section 29-related tax credits expired on December 31, 2007. Accordingly, Gallagher anticipates reporting an annual consolidated effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% for 2009 and later years.
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, February 4, 2009 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release is historical in nature and only speaks to the day it is dated. Gallagher has no duty to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2007 and Gallagher's quarterly report on Form 10Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 9 of 10.
 
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2008 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 9 of 10.
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2008 Earnings Release and Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures Defined
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090223191826.txt.gz
TIME:20090223191826
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The February 2009 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at .
www.ajg.com
www.ajg.com
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Exhibit 99.1
Investment Presentation February 2009
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements contained herein may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially, as discussed in the company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; the alternative insurance market continues to grow which could unfavorably impact commission and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period to period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rate, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; disruptions in the credit and financial markets could limit access to capital and credit and make it more difficult for Gallagher to obtain financing for its operations or investments or increase its cost of obtaining financing; liquidity or capital problems at one or more of the lenders under Gallagher's revolving credit facility could reduce or eliminate the amount available for Gallagher to draw under such facility; changes in the pension regulatory environment and investment losses in its pension plan could require Gallagher to make significant contributions to its defined benefit pension plan and increase its pension expense in future periods; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings may continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of past, current or future laws or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of historically claimed IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal Credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2008.
2
 
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2006 and 2005 were adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations and to eliminate the impact of medical and pension plan changes. Charges in 2006 related to retail contingent commission related matters and medical plan changes totaled $9.0 million (or $5.4 million after tax) and $7.5 million (or $4.5 million after tax), respectively. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $5.2 million (or $3.6 million after tax), respectively. In addition, Gallagher recognized a pension curtailment gain of $10.0 million (or $6.0 million after tax) in 2005. There were no such charges or gains in 2001 to 2004. These adjustments, which Gallagher believes are for non-recurring items, were made to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2006 and 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations and medical and pension plan changes. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation.
Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
3
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Among the world's top 5 insurance brokers *
Retail & Wholesale  89% US; 11% International
Largest MGA manager*
Fastest growing Lloyd's wholesaler (5 yrs)
Predominate focus on middle market space
Largest P&C third party administrator*
Adjusting WC, liability & property claims/BPO
84% US; 16% International
2008 Business Insurance Readers Choice Award
Simple business model: we sell insurance and adjust claims  - No underwriting risk
*According to Business Insurance
4
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 - GAAP  - EBITDA  - Cash
5
 
Extremely Challenging Environment
Headwinds Continue
Soft P&C Insurance Market
CIAB  12% average pricing decline in 2008
Turbulent Economy - Deteriorated in 4Q 08
Clients reducing payrolls, increasing retentions, claim counts decreasing
Reduced Investment Yields
Moved cash to no-yield, government-protected accounts
6
 
Cost Containment
Anticipate $25 - $30 million of savings in 2009
Expense saving initiatives:
Headcount reduction & wage controls (non-production)
Reduced Temporary Help
Centralizing and shifting work to lower cost labor locations (non-client facing)
Centralized corporate systems
Eliminated most non-client travel
Implemented additional procurement programs
Consolidated several field offices
Adjustors relocated to lower cost states
7
 
Two Core Businesses
2008 Revenues - $1.7b 2008 EBITDA - $291m
Brokerage 72% Brokerage 80%
(Selling Insurance)
Risk Management 28% Risk Management 20%
(Adjusting Claims)
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
8
 
Simple Business  Generates Cash
Operating Cash Flows EBITDA
(In millions)
$300 $250 $200 $150
$100
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
* See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
9
 
Prudent Balance Sheet
Global
Insurance
Gallagher Broker Avg S&P 1000
(millions) 2008 2008 2008
Total Debt $532
Stockholders' equity $739
Debt to Total Capital (Debt/(Debt + Equity)) 42% 42% 46%
Debt to EBITDA* 2.0 2.2 3.5
Including Unfunded Pension Liability
Debt to Total Capital (Debt/(Debt + Equity)) 44% 48% 53%
Debt to EBITDA* 2.2 2.9 3.6
Source for S&P 1000 data: Worldscope and First Call via Thomson Reuters. Pension data using most currently available information and may not reflect YE 2008 amounts in all cases.
*Global Insurance Broker's EBITDA adjusted for restructuring charges & unusual items
Flexibility remains - $305M available line of credit capacity
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
10
 
Uses of Cash
Return cash to shareholders
Pay dividends
Repurchase shares but currently favor dividends Buy brokers
Mix of cash and/or stock
Neither segment needs substantial capital or cap-ex
11
 
Dividends Per Share
$1.28*
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60 18%
Average Annual Increase
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
Year
1986 2009
*Indicated  On January 29, 2009, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.32 per share 1Q 09 quarterly dividend
12
 
Dividends Per Share
$1.28*
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60 18%
As of 2/20/09 Yield is 7.7%
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
Year
1986 2009
*Indicated  On January 29, 2009, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.32 per share 1Q 09 quarterly dividend
13
 
Dividends/Repurchases as % of cash flows
100%
Average Dividends / operating cash flows Repurchases / operating cash flows
90%
80%
70%
51%
60% 30% 1%
15% 0%
50% 1%
56% 59%
40% 50% 50%
45%
39%
30%
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
2007 excludes share repurchases of $262M financed by debt.
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
14
 
Use Cash to Buy Brokers
2008 was a record year for acquisitions
2009 expect to continue at slower pace
Annualized Revenue Acquired (in millions)
$150
$150
$100 $83
$50 $38
$23
$10 $16 $16 $16
$0
Retail Wholesale
2005 2006 2007 2008
15
 
Growth by Acquisition
Over 220 deals since 1985
Typical deal: 8.0
$2 to $10 million in revenues 7.5
7.0
2 to 5 producers/staff of 10 to 20 6.5
EBITDA margins between 25% - 30% 6.0
2008  paid 6.3x EBITDA 5.5
5.0
4.5
2006 2007 2008
Must fit into our sales culture!
Median EBITDA Multiples
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
16
 
Roll-over Impact of 2008 M&A in 2009
Pro-Forma Annual Revenues Acquired in 2008 $166 m Impact to 2009 Revenue $100 m Typical EBITDA margin 25%-30% Rollover impact to 2009 EBITDA $25  $30m
17
 
2009 Expansion Opportunity
Liberty Mutual/Wausau  closes approx 3/1/09
Possible revenues of $70m to $90m
Approx 125 new producers and 140 support/mgmt staff
26 states predominately in Midwest & East/Southeast
Approx 18 new locations with "tuck ins" into 42 existing offices
Break even in 2009 but accretive in 2010 > +$30m EBITDA
Don't pay for business that we don't retain
Maximum purchase price of $164m in cash and/or stock
New Gallagher producers- no longer captive Liberty agents
Access to full suite of new products, markets & niche expertise
Access to new clients
18
 
Brokerage Segment
2008 Revenues - $1.2 b - 2009 EBITDA - $233 m
Retail 80%
Mostly U.S. and
Canada
Wholesale 20%
Mostly U.S. and U.K.
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
19
 
Brokerage Segment Revenues
From Continuing Operations*
$1,300 $1,188
10% CAGR $1,114
$1,100 $1,007
$917
$900 $830
$753
$700
$500
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
*Excluding retail contingent commissions prior to 2006
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
20
 
Brokerage Segment EBITDA*
$250 $233
$228
11% CAGR
$207
$200
$177
$164
$154
$150
$100
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
*Excluding retail contingent commissions prior to 2006
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
21
 
Brokerage Segment Focus
Growth
Domestic
International Cost containment Stay in sweet spot
Middle to upper commercial market
22
 
Growth - Domestic
Organic
Hiring new producers wanting:
Access to our network, expertise and niches
Infrastructure support
Growing our own producers thru:
Two-year internship program
Career Launch program
Acquisitions
18,000 retail and wholesale brokerages and agencies* in the U.S. (P&C and Benefits)
Many owned by baby boomers that need an exit strategy yet still want to be in the business
Smaller number of consolidators
*According to Hales & Co, Inc.
23
 
Current Gallagher U.S. Locations
WA
MT ME ND
OR MN VT NH
ID MA SD WI NY
WY MI RI IA CT
PA
NE NJ NV OH
UT DE IL IN
CO WV MD KS VA
CA MO KY
NC TN
AZ OK
NM AR
SC MS AL GA
TX LA
FL
AK
HI
24
 
Larger Cities where we aren't located
Source for Acquisition Targets: Hales & Co., Inc. and D&B
WA 248
MT ME ND
57 113 41 OR MN VT
170 290 57 NH
ID NY 112 MA SD WI MI
67 1,429 627
37 308 506
CA WY RI 16 IA CT 84 1,656 PA
NE 194 316 IN OH 883 NJ
NV 127
UT 307 576 DE 706
97 IL
115 689 43 CO WV
187 KS 72 VA MD MO 298 167 275 DC
287 KY
25 197 NC
AZ TN 388 OK
218 305 175 AR
NM 103 SC
63 MS 169 AL GA
105
188 437 TX LA
971 203 FL 985
AK 27
HI 43
25
 
Growth - International
Organic
Substantial London operations
Hire experienced sales teams
Opportunistic acquisitions/minority interests
Gallagher Optimus Network
Correspondent brokers and agents in over 100 countries
Stages of partnership to investment
26
 
Gallagher Optimus Network
27
 
Risk Management Segment
 -  2008 Revenues - $465m 2008 EBITDA - $58m
Workers
Domestic 84% Compensation 69%
Liability 27% Property 4%
International 16%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
28
 
Risk Mgmt Segment  Revenues
From Continuing Operations
(In millions)
$550
11% CAGR $465
$444
$450 $401
$371
$346
$350 $292
$250
$150
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
29
 
Risk Mgmt Segment - - EBITDA
$100 8% CAGR
$76
$73
$75 $66 $66
$58
$49
$50
$25
$0
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
30
 
Risk Management Segment - Focus
Growth
Domestic
International
Client service
High quality standards
Technology  - Cost containment
31
 
RM Growth - Domestic
All organic
Over 86% non-Gallagher clients  - Targeting
Mainly Fortune 1000
Standard platform enables profitable service to smaller accounts
Differentiation
Network focused or dedicated - flexibility
Client intimacy
Quality standards
Proprietary technology
32
 
RM Growth - International
Fastest growing
Revenues - 3 year CAGR of 24%
In Australia, Canada, UK & New Zealand
Largely public entity but leveraging US expertise to penetrate commercial clients
Global technology capabilities Standard claims process
33
 
Summary
Top priority  servicing our clients
Helping them navigate troubled economy
Continuing to increase quality service levels
Expanding capabilities and options
34
 
Summary
Well positioned coming into 2009
EBITDA - $291 in 2008
Roll over of 08 M&A into 09 - $25m - $30 EBITDA
Cost containment in 2009 - $25 - $30m EBITDA
Liberty Mutual/Wausau integration
Little EBITDA in 2009 but $30m+ in 2010 Return to shareholders
Strong history of dividends & repurchases
35
 
Questions & Answers
36
 
Exhibit 1
Short-cut To Understand Cash Flows
(See GAAP cash flows in Statement of Cash Flows*)
$ millions 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
Brokerage & Risk Management EBITDA from Continuing Operations
(adjusted for unusual items) 232 277 266 273 304 291
Stock compensation expense 9 16 16 25 19 18
Capital Expenditures(25)(29)(23)(33)(41)(32)
Interest expense on corporate debt & corporate overhead expenses(6)(6)(6)(6)(22)(35)
Taxes Paid(50)(71)(47)(31)(48)(40)
Brokerage & Risk Management EBITDA from Continuing Operations
(adjusted for unusual items) plus stock compensation expense less
capital expenditures, interest expense on corporate debt and
corporate overhead expenses, and taxes paid 160 187 206 228 212 202
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
37
 
For Additional Information
 - Website: www.ajg.com
 -  Email: investor_relations@ajg.com  - Marsha Akin Marsha_Akin@ajg.com Phone: 630-773-3800
38

Exhibit 99.2
NYSE: AJG INVESTMENT PROFILE Arthur J Gallagher & Co Brokerage Risk Financial Segment Management Services Segment Segment GROWING VALUE Arthur J Gallagher & Co is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and the world's largest third-party property and casualty claims administrator * Gallagher generates approximately 87% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 13% derived primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada and the United Kingdom *According to Business Insurance FEBRUARY 2009 Brokerage Segment 2 Acquisition Strategy 4 Risk Management Segment 4 Financial Services/Corporate Segment 5 Insurance Market Overview 6 Condensed Financial Statements 7 Why Invest? 8 www ajg com $325 $275 $225 $175 $125 * EBITDA represents earnings from continuing operations before the impact of litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations, medical and pension plan changes, interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization expense As of DECEMBER 31, 2008 (unless otherwise indicated) Price** $17 53 52-week high/low** $28 39 - $16 99 Trailing 12-mos revenues $1 6 billion Market cap** $1 7 billion Indicated annual dividend* $1 28* Yield** 7 3% Shares outstanding 96 4 million End of fiscal year December 31 Trailing 12-mos price/earnings** 15 x Number of employees** 9,863 * On January 29, 2009 Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0 32 per share first-quarter dividend ** at 2/13/09 $203 03 $244 04 $237 05 $241 06 $300 07 $281 08
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 72% OF 2008 REVENUES Gallagher operates its Brokerage operations through a network of more than 240 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 14 countries abroad. In addition, Gallagher does business through a Strategic Alliance Network of independent insurance brokers and consultants in more than 100 countries around the world. RETAIL INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS 80% OF 2008 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property and casualty insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients. Lines of Coverage  -  Aviation  -  Fire  -  Property  -  Commercial Auto  -  General Liability  -  Retirement Solutions  -  Dental  -  Life  -  Voluntary Benefits  -  Directors & Officers Liability  -  Marine  -  Wind  -  Disability  -  Medical  -  Workers Compensation  -  Earthquake  -  Products Liability  -  Errors & Omissions  -  Professional Liability Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into approximately 180 geographical profit centers located throughout North America and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 60% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. Niche/Practice Groups  -  Agribusiness  -  Habitational  -  Property  -  Aviation & Aerospace  -  Healthcare  -  Private Equity  -  Captive Consulting  -  Higher Education  -  Public Entity  -  Casualty  -  Hospitality  -  Real Estate  -  Construction  -  Institutional Services  -  Religious/Not-for-Profit  -  Energy  -  Marine  -  Restaurant  -  Entertainment  -  Personal  -  Scholastic  -  Global Risks  -  Professional Groups  -  Transportation  2
INVESTMENT PROFI LE FEBRUARY 2009  2
Gallagher's specialized focus on these niche/practice groups allows for highly-concentrated marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or market segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage. Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: (1) its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts, (2) cross-selling new brokerage products to existing customers, (3) developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance, and (4) mergers and acquisitions. WHOLESALE INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS 20% OF 2008 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Revenues are generated by sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurer. Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into approximately 60 geographical profit centers located in the U.S., Bermuda and through its approved Lloyd's of London brokerage in London. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent distributing specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers. More than 80% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents who are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of broker clients, by developing new managing general agency programs, and through mergers and acquisitions. Gallagher Optimus Network The Gallagher Optimus Network is a global alliance of independent broker partners. Optimus Network partners are selected by Gallagher based upon common business philosophies and on the partners' strengths and service capabilities within their respective countries. Through the Gallagher Optimus Network and its own international operations, Gallagher offers client-service capabilities in more than 100 countries around the world.  I NVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2009 3  3
Expertise   FEBRUARY INVESTMENT PROFILE 2009 4 RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 28% 2008 REVENUES  -  Real-time Claims Management  -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)  -  Appraisal Services  -  Litigation Management  -  Information Management  -  Managed Care Services  -  Risk Control Services  -  Safety Programs  -  Settlement Management  -  Education & Training Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party property and casualty claims administrator according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and for insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims-handling services. Brokerage Segment Acquisition Strategy Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components  organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated 220 acquisitions from 1985 through 2008, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that fall within the range of $2 million to $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through joint ventures, where the company begins its relationship with an equity position. Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on:  -  a company culture that matches its own  -  a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources  -  clearly defined financial criteria. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by Gallagher's aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources. 4
FEBRUARY INVESTMENT PROFILE 2009 5   This segment manages Gallagher's interests in tax-advantaged and clean-energy investments, venture capital funds, and Gallagher's equity ownership position in an alternative investment fund manager. Many of these assets were tax-advantaged investments related to tax laws that expired on December 31, 2007. Gallagher has been winding down its financial services activities since 2003 and expects to continue to divest most of the remaining investments in this segment. In addition, Gallagher's interest expense and corporate-related administrative expenses are reported in this segment. FINANCIAL SERVICES/CORPORATE SEGMENT Approximately 69% of its Risk Management Segment revenues are from workers compensation-related claims, 27% are from general and commercial auto liability related claims and 4% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed. Gallagher manages its third-party claims-management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the U.S., the U.K., Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 86% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker. The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments. 5
Fluctuations in premiums charged by insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factors, including competition for marketshare among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidations, can result in flat or reduced premium rates (a "soft" market). A soft market tends to put downward pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as heavier-than anticipated loss experience or capital shortages, can result in increases in premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas. From 2004 through 2008, the property and casualty market has been soft in most lines and geographic areas. Quarterly market surveys by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers in 2008, and supporting analysis by Barclays Capital Equity Research, indicated that the level of rate reductions for commercial business began to moderate in the fourth quarter, declining by an average of 6.4%, compared with declines ranging from 11.0% to 13.5% in the prior three quarters.   FEBRUARY INVESTMENT PROFILE 2009 6 INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW Except for the historical information and discussions, statements contained herein may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors, such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets, as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com. Safe Harbor Statement 6 6
FEBRUARY INVESTMENT PROFILE Y 2009   For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information-2007 and 2008 (Unaudited-in millions, except per share data and other information) All information restated to reflect discontinued operations. 7 2007 2008 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year BROKERAGE SEGMENT Revenues $ 232.8 $ 294.6 $ 290.0 $ 296.8 $ 1,114.2 $ 258.0 $ 312.2 $ 314.4 $ 303.2 $ 1,187.8 Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 17.8 61.8 56.4 47.5 183.5 19.5 65.6 59.5 27.0 171.6 Earnings from continuing operations 10.7 37.4 33.8 30.4 112.3 11.9 39.2 36.1 17.0 104.2 Growthrevenues excluding retail contingent commissions 12% 15% 7% 9% 11% 9% 6% 8% 2% 7% Pretax profit margin (1) 8% 20% 19% 16% 16% 6% 20% 19% 9% 14% EBITDA margin (2) 12% 25% 23% 20% 21% 12% 26% 24% 15% 20% Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.10 $ 0.38 $ 0.35 $ 0.32 $ 1.15 $ 0.13 $ 0.42 $ 0.38 $ 0.18 $ 1.11 RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT Revenues $ 106.8 $ 107.8 $ 110.3 $ 118.6 $ 443.5 $ 116.2 $ 115.2 $ 118.6 $ 114.9 $ 464.9 Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 16.7 13.8 15.5 18.0 64.0 13.8 12.2 11.1 8.8 45.9 Earnings from continuing operations 9.9 8.3 9.5 11.9 39.6 8.5 7.4 7.0 5.3 28.2 Growthrevenues 9% 10% 4% 19% 11% 9% 7% 8% -3% 5% Pretax profit margin (1) 16% 13% 14% 15% 14% 12% 11% 9% 8% 10% EBITDA margin (2) 18% 16% 17% 18% 17% 15% 14% 12% 10% 12% Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.10 $ 0.08 $ 0.10 $ 0.13 $ 0.41 $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ 0.08 $ 0.05 $ 0.30 BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT. COMBINED Revenues $ 339.6 $ 402.4 $ 400.3 $ 415.4 $ 1,557.7 $ 374.2 $ 427.4 $ 433.0 $ 418.1 $ 1,652.7 Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 34.5 75.6 71.9 65.5 247.5 33.3 77.8 70.6 35.8 217.5 Earnings from continuing operations 20.6 45.7 43.3 42.3 151.9 20.4 46.6 43.1 22.3 132.4 Growth - revenues 11% 13% 6% 12% 11% 9% 6% 8% 0% 6% Pretax profit margin (1) 10% 18% 18% 16% 16% 8% 18% 16% 8% 13% EBITDA margin (2) 14% 22% 21% 20% 20% 13% 22% 20% 14% 18% Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.20 $ 0.46 $ 0.45 $ 0.45 $ 1.56 $ 0.22 $ 0.50 $ 0.46 $ 0.23 $ 1.41 FINANCIAL SERVICES/CORPORATE SEGMENT Investment income $ 31.3 $ 28.2 $ 8.1 $ (5.2) $ 62.4 $ 1.6 $ 1.7 $ (2.3) $ 0.2 $ 0.8 Investment gains (losses) 4.1 (3.0) 2.3 (0.2) 3.2(0.2) (2.5) (5.8) (8.5) Earnings (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes (10.7) (15.6) (5.5) (15.6) (47.4) (6.4) (8.5) (21.2) (17.8) (53.9) Earnings (loss) from continuing operations 0.7 0.1 9.1 (7.2) 2.7 (4.1) (4.9) (1.4) (10.6) (21.0) Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $ 0.01 $ -$ 0.09 $ (0.08) $ 0.03 $ (0.04) $ (0.05) $ (0.02) $ (0.11) $ (0.23) TOTAL COMPANY Revenues $ 375.0 $ 427.6 $ 410.7 $ 410.0 $ 1,623.3 $ 375.8 $ 428.9 $ 428.2 $ 412.1 $ 1,645.0 Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 23.8 60.0 66.4 49.9 200.1 26.9 69.3 49.4 18.0 163.6 Earnings from continuing operations 21.3 45.8 52.4 35.1 154.6 16.3 41.7 41.7 11.7 111.4 Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.21 $ 0.46 $ 0.54 $ 0.37 $ 1.59 $ 0.18 $ 0.45 $ 0.44 $ 0.12 $ 1.18 Dividends declared per share $ 0.31 $ 0.31 $ 0.31 $ 0.31 $ 1.24 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 1.28 CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET Total assets $3,391.7 $ 3,701.7 $ 3,570.9 $ 2,556.8 $ 3,340.9 $ 3,509.5 $ 3,197.2 $ 3,271.3 Total liabilities $2,312.5 $ 2,918.9 $ 2,801.6 $ 2,841.3 $ 2,642.3 $ 2,783.3 $ 2,422.2 $ 2,532.8 Total stockholders' equity $ 867.9 $ 782.8 $ 769.3 $ 715.5 $ 698.6 $ 726.2 $ 775.0 $ 738.5 OTHER INFORMATION Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 100,128 98,652 95,807 93,698 97,079 92,898 93,545 94,556 95,900 94,179 Common shares repurchased (000s) 557 4229 1887 2562 9,235 26 20 3 6 55 Annualized return on beginning stockholders' equity (3) 9% 15% 18% 16% 16% NMF 10% 14% 11% 11% Number of acquisitions closed 7 4 2 8 21 11 9 8 9 37 Workforce from continuing operations 8,690 9,047 8,960 9,102 9,329 9,534 9,573 9,863 TOTAL COMPANY EBITDA (4) Net earnings (loss) $ 19.8 $ 43.8 $ 51.8 $ 23.4 $ 138.8 $ (6.0) $ 40.8 $ 37.8 $ $4.7 $ 77.3 Loss on discontinued operations, net of income taxes 1.5 2.0 0.6 11.7 15.8 22.3 0.9 3.9 7.0 34.1 Earnings from continuing operations 21.3 45.8 52.4 35.1 154.6 16.3 41.7 41.7 11.7 111.4 Provision for income taxes 2.5 14.2 14.0 14.8 45.5 10.6 27.6 7.7 6.3 52.2 Interest 0.6 3.2 5.6 6.6 16.0 6.5 7.3 7.1 7.7 28.6 Depreciation 7.6 7.2 6.8 7.7 29.3 6.9 7.9 8.0 7.2 30.0 Amortization 7.1 7.1 7.1 8.0 29.3 8.9 10.3 10.2 14.3 43.7 Total company EBITDA $ 39.1 $ 77.5 $ 85.9 $ 72.2 $ 274.7 $ 49.2 $ 94.8 $ 74.7 $ 47.2 $ 265.9 (1) Represents pretax earnings from continuing operations before the impact of pretax retail contingent commission-related matters divided by total revenues, excluding retail contingent commissions. (2) Represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization expense (EBITDA) divided by total revenues. (3) Represents year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity as of the beginning of the year. (4) EBITDA represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization expense. 7
  FEBRUARY INVESTMENT PROFILE Y 2009 8 WHY INVEST? Dividends Per Share (restated for stock splits) $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00 $1.28** $1.40 $0.05 1986 2009 $700 $900 $1100 $1300 $1500 $1700 $1900 $1,288 $1,554 Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues from Continuing Operations* $1,406 0 3 0 4 0 5 0 6 0 7 0 8 10% CA G R $1,643 $1,175 $1,045 FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Marsha J. Akin  Investor Relations | 630.773.3800 * All information as originally reported (excluding discontinued operations, litigation-related matters, retail contingent commission-related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims-handling obligations). See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures. ** Indicated  On January 29, 2009, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.32 per share quarterly dividend. Dividends Per Share 8


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090428170831.txt.gz
TIME:20090428170831
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On April 28, 2009, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's first quarter 2009 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, April 28, 2009  Gallagher today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2009. A printer-friendly format of this release and the supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended March 31
 
 
This earnings release contains certain non-GAAP information. EBITDA, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization. A reconciliation of EBITDA to earnings from continuing operations before income taxes (which were $43.5 million and $26.9 million in first quarter 2009 and 2008, respectively) is included on page 5 of this earnings release.
"Our first quarter results reflect the strength of the Gallagher organization and its ability to grow through difficult times," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "We are seeing the benefits of our efforts in 2008 to grow through tuck-in acquisitions and we have begun to reap the benefits of our cost savings initiatives as well. Despite a 1.4% decline in organic revenue in the Brokerage Segment and 1.2% organic revenue growth in the Risk Management Segment, we expanded EBITDA margins 7% in the Brokerage Segment and 1% in the Risk Management segment. Underlying this, we are still operating in an extremely difficult environment. Insurance rates continue to soften and the economy continues to adversely impact our clients' buying activities.
"We are also excited about the 250 plus brokerage professionals that joined us in March from Liberty Mutual and Wausau Signature Agency. These new associates are plugging into Gallagher's global resources, delivering great service to their existing customers and beginning to produce new business as well."
 
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights
Gallagher continues to wind down its Financial Services investments. The pretax investment loss in first quarter 2009 represents a $1.0 million non-cash impairment charge related to Gallagher's investment in Asset Alliance Corporation.
In addition to the $400.0 million of long-term borrowing outstanding under the Note Purchase Agreement, at March 31, 2009, Gallagher had borrowings of $222.0 million outstanding under its line of credit facility used primarily to fund 2008 and 2009 acquisitions and short-term cash flow needs. The weighted average interest rate on these borrowings, which is based on a spread over short-term LIBOR, was 1.39%. The interest rate at April 24, 2009 for a sixty day borrowing on this line was 1.46%.
 
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 40% to 42% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for first quarter was 34.9% in 2009 and 39.4% in 2008. The first quarter tax rates in 2009 and 2008 were lower than statutory rates as the result of the resolution of certain income tax examinations and the recognition of refund claims related to prior years.
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, April 29, 2009 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants. Gallagher is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AJG.
This press release is historical in nature and only speaks to the day it is dated. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2009 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6 of 6.
 
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2009 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 6 of 6.
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2009 Earnings Release
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090512155704.txt.gz
TIME:20090512155704
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The slides containing information presented at the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 2009 Annual Stockholders' Meeting is attached hereto as an exhibit to this report and is incorporated herein in its entirety by this reference. This exhibit may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." This exhibit includes certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Exhibit 99.1
Welcome to the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
2009
Annual Stockholders' Meeting
Tuesday, May 12, 2009
 
Please turn off all cell phones and PDAs at this time.
Thank you for your cooperation.
 
Stockholders' Meeting
May 12, 2009
 - 2009 Annual Meeting  - Chairman's Remarks
 2008: Where We Are Now
 Where We Are Going: Our Dominant Priorities
 Questions & Answers  - It's All About The Culture
 
Safe Harbor Statement Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of Gallagher are subject to risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to the following: Gallagher's commission revenues are highly dependent on premiums charged by insurers, which are subject to fluctuation; lower interest rates reduce Gallagher's income earned on invested funds; alternative insurance market continues to grow, which could unfavorably impact commission revenue and favorably impact fee revenue, though not necessarily to the same extent; Gallagher's revenues vary significantly from period-to-period as a result of the timing of policy inception dates and the net effect of new and lost business production; the insurance brokerage industry is subject to uncertainty due to investigations into its business practices by various governmental authorities and related private litigation; the general level of economic activity can have a substantial impact on Gallagher's renewal business; Gallagher's operating results, returns on investments and financial position may be adversely impacted by exposure to various market risks such as interest rates, equity pricing, foreign exchange rates and the competitive environment; disruptions in the credit and financial markets could limit access to capital and credit and make it more difficult for Gallagher to obtain financing for its operations or investments or increase its cost of obtaining financing; liquidity or capital problems at one or more of the lenders under Gallagher's revolving credit facility could reduce or eliminate the amount available for Gallagher to draw under such facility; changes in the pension regulatory environment and investment losses in its pension plan could require Gallagher to make significant contributions to its defined benefit pension plan and increase its pension expense in future periods; Gallagher's revenues and net earnings will continue to be subject to reduction due to the elimination of certain contingent commission arrangements on January 1, 2005 and related developments in the insurance industry; and Gallagher's effective income tax rate and obligations under tax indemnity agreements may be subject to increase as a result of changes in income tax laws, unfavorable interpretations of past, current or future tax laws or developments resulting in the loss or unavailability of historically claimed IRC Section 29-related Syn/Coal tax credits. Gallagher's ability to grow has been enhanced through acquisitions, which may or may not be available on acceptable terms in the future and which, if consummated, may or may not be advantageous to Gallagher. Accordingly, actual results may differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of certain of the matters described above see Item 1A, "Risk Factors" in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008.
 
Certain Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This presentation includes certain information that may be considered "non-GAAP financial measures" within the meaning of SEC regulations because it is derived from Gallagher's consolidated financial information but is not required to be presented in financial statements that are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Consistent with SEC regulations, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to GAAP is provided on our web-site at www.ajg.com.
Pretax earnings from continuing operations for 2006 and 2005 were adjusted in this presentation to add back charges related to litigation and contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations and to eliminate the impact of medical and pension plan changes. Charges in 2006 related to retail contingent commission related matters and medical plan changes totaled $9.0 million (or $5.4 million after tax) and $7.5 million (or $4.5 million after tax), respectively. Charges in 2005 related to retail contingent commission matters and claims handling obligations totaled $73.6 million (or $44.2 million after tax) and $5.2 million (or $3.6 million after tax), respectively. In addition, Gallagher recognized a pension curtailment gain of $10.0 million (or $6.0 million after tax) in 2005. There were no such charges or gains in 2001 to 2004. These adjustments, which Gallagher believes are for non-recurring items, were made to GAAP earnings from continuing operations in 2006 and 2005 in order to calculate earnings from continuing operations before litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations and medical and pension plan changes. In addition, total revenues and pretax earnings from continuing operations exclude retail contingent commissions and are on an as originally reported basis for all periods presented in this presentation.
Gallagher believes the "non-GAAP financial measures" included in this presentation provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
Board of Directors
New in 2009
 - Frank E. English, Jr.
 Senior Advisor, Morgan Stanley, former Vice Chairman, Investment Banking
 
Board of Directors
 -  William L. Bax
 -  T. Kimball Brooker, Ph.D.
 -  Frank E. English, Jr.
 -  Ilene S. Gordon
 -  Elbert O. Hand
 -  David S. Johnson
 -  Kay W. McCurdy
 -  Norman L. Rosenthal, Ph.D.
 -  James R. Wimmer
 -  Past CEO A. James Gallagher, Jr.
 
Stockholders' Meeting
May 12, 2009
 - 2009 Annual Meeting
 
Stockholders' Meeting
May 12, 2009
 - 2009 Annual Meeting  - Chairman's Remarks
 2008: Where We Are Now
 
Challenging Times
Merrill Lynch Lehman Bros
Aon Wachovia
Gallagher
Fannie Mae Morgan Stanley Marsh
Citibank
Bank of
America
Brown AIG Bear Stearns Willis
 
Gallagher 2008 Results
(in millions)
2008 2007 % Change
Total revenues $1,645 $1,623 1% Brokerage/RM revenues $1,653 $1,558 6% Total EBITDA $266 $275 -3% Brokerage/RM EBITDA $291 $304 -4%
See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures
 
But Brokers Held Up in 2008
2008 Total Returns Broker Basket vs. Major Indices
20%
10%
0% Broker Basket -8%
-10%
-20%
-30% S&P 500 -37% -40% S&P 500 Financials Index -50% -55%
-60%
Mar 08 Jun 08 Sep 08 Dec 08
Broker Basket S&P 500 S&P 500 Financials Index
*Total Returns assume re-investment of dividends. Broker Basket includes AJG and four other publicly traded insurance brokers.
 
Gallagher Stood Out in 2008
2008 Total Returns
Gallagher vs. Major Indices
20%
AJG
10% 13%
0%
Broker Basket
-8%
-10%
-20%
-30% S&P 500
-37%
-40% S&P 500
Financials Index
-50% -55%
-60%
Mar 08 Jun 08 Sep 08 Dec 08
AJG Broker Basket S&P 500 S&P 500 Financials Index
*Total Returns assume re-investment of dividends. Broker Basket includes AJG and four other publicly traded insurance brokers.
 
Gallagher Still Holding Up Through 2009
Total Returns January 1, 2008 - May 7, 2009 Gallagher vs. Major Indices
20%
10%
0% AJG
-6%
-10%
-20%
Broker Basket
-30% -19%
-40% S&P 500
-36%
-50% S&P 500
Financials Index
-56%
-60%
-70%
-80%
Mar 08 June 08 Sep 08 Dec 08 Mar 09
AJG Broker Basket S&P 500 S&P 500 Financials Index
*Total Returns assume re-investment of dividends.
 
2008 Gallagher vs. Brokers
2008 Total Returns
Gallagher vs. Peer Group
15%
AJG
13%
10%
5%
0%
-5%
-10% Peer Group
-13%
-15%
Mar 08 Jun 08 Sep 08 Dec 08
AJG Peer Group
*Total Returns assume re-investment of dividends. Peer group includes four publicly traded insurance brokers.
 
Gallagher vs. Brokers Since 1-1-08
Total Returns January 1, 2008 - May 7, 2009
Gallagher vs. Peer Group
15%
10%
5%
0%
AJG
-5% -6%
-10%
-15%
-20%
-25% Peer Group
-22%
-30%
-35%
Mar 08 Jun 08 Sep 08 Dec 08 Mar 09
AJG Peer Group
*Total Returns assume re-investment of dividends. Peer group includes four publicly traded insurance brokers.
 
Why?
 - Business that generates cash  - Prudent balance sheet  - Long history of growth
 - Consistent return of cash to shareholders
 
Business Generates Cash
(In millions) Operating Cash Flows EBITDA
$300
$250
$200
$150
$100
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
 
Business Generates Cash
$291 million of EBITDA in 2008
 
Prudent Balance Sheet
Global
Insurance
Gallagher Broker Avg. S&P 1000
($ in millions) 2008 2008 2008
Total Debt $532
Stockholders' Equity $739
Debt to Total Capital (Debt/[Debt+Equity]) 42% 42% 46%
Debt to EBITDA* 2.0 2.2 3.5
Including Unfunded Pension Liability
Debt to Total Capital (Debt/[Debt+Equity]) 44% 48% 53%
Debt to EBITDA* 2.2 2.9 3.6
Source for S&P 1000 data: Worldscope and First Call via Thomson Reuters. Pension data using most currently available information and may not reflect YE 2008 amounts in all cases.
*Global Insurance Broker's EBITDA adjusted for restructuring charges & unusual items
Flexibility remains  $305m available line of credit capacity at 12/31/08
See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures
 
Brokerage Segment Revenues*
(in millions)
$1,300
$1,188
10% CAGR $1,114
$1,100 $1,007
$917
$900 $830
$753
$700
$500
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
*From continuing operations excluding retail contingent commissions prior to 2006 See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures
 
Brokerage Segment EBITDA*
(in millions)
$250 $233
11% CAGR $229
$207
$200
$177
$164
$154
$150
$100
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
*From continuing operations excluding retail contingent commissions prior to 2006 See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures
 
Brokerage Segment Results* 1st Quarter 2009
(in millions)
Revenues up 12% EBITDA up 74%
$56
$290
$300 $60
$258 $50
$275 $32
$40
$250 $30
$225 $20
1Q 08 1Q 09 1Q 08 1Q 09
*From continuing operations
See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures
 
Risk Mgmt. Segment  Revenues*
(In millions)
$550
11% CAGR $465
$444
$450 $401
$371
$346
$350 $292
$250
$150
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
*From continuing operations
See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures
 
Risk Mgmt. Segment EBITDA* (In millions) $100 8% CAGR $73 $76 $75 $66 $66 $58 $49 $50 $25 $0 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 *From continuing operations See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures G 25
 
Risk Mgmt. Segment Results* 1st Quarter 2009 (In millions) Revenues down 3% $116 $120 $112 $115 $110 $105 $100 1Q 08 1Q 09 EBITDA up 4% $19 $18 $18 $17 $17 $16 $15 1Q 08 1Q 09 *From continuing operations See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures G 26
 
Dividends Per Share $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00 $1.28* 2009 1 8 % Average Annual Increase 1986 Year 2009 *Indicated On April 24, 2009, Gallaghers Board of Directors declared a $.32 per share Q2 09 quarterly dividend. G 27
 
Dividends Per Share $1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00 18% As of 5/7/09 Yield is 6.1% $1.28* 2009 1986 *Indicated  On April 24, 2009, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.32 per share Q2 09 quarterly dividend. G 28
 
Dividends/Repurchases as % of Cash Flows 100% 90% 80% 70% 60% 50% 40% 30% Dividends / operating cash flows Repurchases / operating cash flows 51% 30% 15% 1% 0% 1% 59% 56% 50% 50% 45% 39% 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2007 excludes share repurchases of $262m financed by debt See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures G 29
 
Stockholders' Meeting May 12, 2009  - Formal Annual Meeting  - Chairman's Remarks  2008: Where We Are Now  Where We Are Going: Our Dominant Priorities G 30
 
Extremely Challenging Environment  - Industry Headwinds Continue  Turbulent economy  -  Reduced investment yields  -  Many clients reducing payrolls, increasing retentions, claim counts decreasing  Soft commercial P/C insurance market  -  CIAB  12% average pricing decline in 2008  -  CIAB  5% average pricing decline Q1 2009 G 31
 
Excellent Start to 2009 (in millions, except per share data) Revenues up 7% $425 $402 $400 $374 $375 $350 1Q 08 1Q 09 EBITDA up 50% $74 $75 $65 $49 $55 $45 $35 $25 1Q 08 1Q 09 EPS up 55% $0.34 $0.35 $0.30 $0.22 $0.25 $0.20 $0.15 $0.10 1Q 08 1Q 09 See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures G 32
 
Executing Our Five Dominant Priorities  - Increase our organic growth rate  - Hire and retain the right people  - Continue to acquire the best businesses in our industry  - Align sales and service deliverables with pay  - Increase productivity/increase margins G 33
 
Growth Initiatives  Domestic  - Organic  Selling additional lines to existing clients  -  Cross-selling  Supplemental commissions  Growing our own producers through  -  College Internship Program  Two-year summer internship program  157 participants in 2008  Expect more than 140 in 2009  -  Career Launch  Program launched: October 2004  Current class participants: 40  Graduates to-date: 178 G 34
 
Growth Initiatives  Domestic  - Acquisitions  18,000 retail and wholesale brokerages and agencies in the U.S.* (P/C and Benefits)  Many owned by baby boomers who need an exit strategy, yet still want to be in the business  Smaller number of consolidators *According to Hales & Co., Inc. G 35
 
Growth by Acquisition  -  225 acquisitions since 1985  -  Typical deal:  $2 to $10 million in revenues  2 to 5 producers/staff of 10 to 20  EBITDA margins between 25%-30%  2008: paid 6.3x EBITDA  -  Must fit into our sales culture! 8.0 7.5 7.0 6.5 6.0 5.5 5.0 4.5 2006 2007 2008 Median EBITDA Multiples See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures G 36
 
Current Gallagher U.S. Locations WA MT ME ND OR MN VT NH ID MA SD WI NY WY MI RI IA CT PA NE NJ NV OH UT DE IL IN CO WV VA MD KS MO CA KY NC TN AZ OK NM AR SC MS AL GA TX LA FL AK HI 37
 
Larger Cities Where We Aren't Located WA 248 MT ME ND 57 113 41 OR MN VT 170 290 NH ID 57 WI NY 112 MA SD MI 67 1,429 627 37 308 506 CA WY RI 16 1,656 IA CT 84 PA NE 194 316 IN OH 883 NJ NV 127 UT 307 576 DE 706 97 IL 115 689 43 CO WV 187 KS 72 VA MD MO 298 167 275 DC 287 KY 25 197 NC AZ TN 388 OK 218 305 175 AR NM 103 SC 63 MS 169 AL GA 105 188 437 TX LA 971 203 FL 985 AK 27 HI 43 38
 
Growth  International  - Gallagher Optimus Network  Correspondent brokers in more than 100 countries  Stages of partnership to investment  - Opportunistic acquisitions/minority interests  SBA in Perth, Australia  - Other International locations  Australia, Bermuda, Canada, Caribbean, U.K. G 39
 
Gallagher Optimus Network ARCTIC OCEAN PACIFIC OCEAN ATLANTIC OCEAN INDIAN OCEAN ARCTIC OCEAN PACIFIC OCEAN G 40
 
Growth  International  -  13% of 2008 revenues were from international operations.  -  Gallagher is a global company. G 41
 
Rollover Impact of 2008 M&As in 2009 Pro-forma annual revenues acquired in 2008 $166m Impact to 2009 revenue $100m Typical EBITDA margin 25%-30% Rollover impact to 2009 EBITDA $25-$30m G 42
 
2009 Expansion Opportunity  -  Liberty Mutual/Wausau  closed 2/27/09  Possible revenues of $70m  Approx. 125 new producers and 140 support/mgmt. staff  -  26 states, predominately in Midwest & East/Southeast  -  Approx. 18 new locations, with "tuck-ins" into 42 existing offices  Break even or better in 2009, but accretive in 2010 > +$25-$30m EBITDA  Don't pay for business that we don't retain  Maximum purchase price of $164m in cash and/or stock G 43
 
Cost Containment  -  Anticipate $25-$30 million of savings in 2009  -  Expense saving initiatives:  Headcount reduction and wage controls (non-production)  Reduced temporary help  Centralizing and shifting work to lower-cost labor locations (non-client facing)  Centralized corporate systems  Eliminated most non-client travel  Implemented additional procurement programs  Consolidated several field offices  Adjusters relocated to lower-cost states G 44
 
Well-Positioned for Future  -  Industry and economic headwinds continue  -  Coming into 2009  EBITDA: $291m in 2008  Rollover of 08 M&A into 09: $25-$30m EBITDA  Cost containment in 2009: $25-$30m EBITDA  Liberty Mutual/Wausau integration  -  Little EBITDA in 2009 but $25-30m+ in 2010 G 45
 
Questions & Answers G 46
 
Stockholders' Meeting May 12, 2009  - 2009 Annual Meeting  - Chairman's Remarks  2008: Where We Are Now  Where We Are Going: Our Dominant Priorities  Questions & Answers  - It's All About The Culture G 47
 
The Gallagher Way Shared values at AJGCo. are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are the concepts that the vast majority of movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of AJGCo.'s Shared Values? 1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Management Services to our clients. 2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another. 3. We push for professional excellence. 4. We can all improve and learn from one another. 5. There are no second class citizens everyone is important and everybody's job is important. 6. We're an open society. 7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness. 8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital. 9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader. 10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island. 13. Professional courtesy is expected. 14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself. 15. I consider myself support for our Sales & Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other. We are a team. 16. Loyalty and respect are earned not dictated. 17. Fear is a turnoff. 18. People skills are very important at AJGCo. 20. We run to problems not away from them. 21. We adhere to the highest standards or moral and ethical behavior. 22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned on not turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strength not a weakness. 24. We must continue building a professional Company together as a team. 25. Shared values can be altered with circumstances but carefully and with tact and consideration for one another's needs. When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company. Robert E. GallagherMay, 1984 G 48
 
2009 Annual Stockholders' Meeting Tuesday, May 12, 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090716115152.txt.gz
TIME:20090716115152
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090728201717.txt.gz
TIME:20090728201717
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
On July 23, 2009, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") entered into an amendment to the Assurance of Voluntary Compliance with the Office of the Attorney General of the State of Illinois dated May 18, 2005. Pursuant to the amendment, the Company will be permitted to accept retail contingent commissions, commencing October 1, 2009. The Company and the Attorney General also agreed to a form of disclosure regarding contingent compensation that the Company will provide to clients.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20090910090313.txt.gz
TIME:20090910090313
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The August 2009 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at .
www.ajg.com
www.ajg.com
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


Exhibit 99.2
 
 
NYSE: AJG
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management Segment
Financial Services Segment
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and the world's largest third-party property and casualty (P/C) claims administrator.* Gallagher generates approximately 87% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 13% derived primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada and the United Kingdom.
*According to Business Insurance.
Brokerage & Risk Management
EBITDA* (in millions)
10% CAGR
$325 $275 $225 $175 $125
$203 $244 $237 $271 $300 $281
03 04 05 06 07 08
* EBITDA represents earnings from continuing operations before the impact of litigation and contingent commission related matters, claims handling obligations, medical and pension plan changes, interest, income taxes, depreciation and amortization expense.
AUGUST 2009
Brokerage Segment
2
Acquisition Strategy
4
Risk Management Segment
4
Financial Services/Corporate Segment
5
Insurance Market Overview
6
Condensed Financial Statements
7
Why Invest?
8
As of June 30, 2009 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price**
$23.77
52-week high/low**
$30.00 - $14.82
Trailing 12-mos. revenues
$1.7 billion
Market cap**
$2.4 billion
Indicated annual dividend*
$1.28*
Yield**
5.4%
Shares outstanding
101.2 million
End of fiscal year
December 31
Number of employees
10,145
www.ajg.com
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 72% OF 2008 REVENUES
Gallagher operates its Brokerage operations through a network of more than 240 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 13 countries abroad. In addition, Gallagher does business through the Optimus Network of independent insurance brokers and consultants in more than 100 countries around the world (see page 3).
RETAIL INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
80% OF 2008 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property and casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Lines of Coverage
 -  Aviation
 -  Fire
 -  Property
 -  Commercial Auto
 -  General Liability
 -  Retirement Solutions
 -  Dental
 -  Life
 -  Voluntary Benefits
 -  Directors & Officers Liability
 -  Marine
 -  Wind
 -  Disability
 -  Medical
 -  Workers Compensation
 -  Earthquake
 -  Product Liability
 -  Errors & Omissions
 -  Professional Liability
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into approximately 180 geographical profit centers located primarily throughout North America and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 60% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
Gallagher's specialized focus on these niche/practice groups allows for highly-concentrated marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or market segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: (1) its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts, (2) cross-selling new brokerage products and services to existing customers, (3) developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance, and (4) mergers and acquisitions.
In July 2009, Gallagher announced that, effective October 1, 2009, it will accept retail contingent commissions across all lines of its brokerage business. As a result, Gallagher anticipates generating additional retail contingent commission revenues of approximately $10 million on an annualized basis by 2011.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2009
 
Niche/Practice Groups
 -  Agribusiness
 -  Global Risks
 -  Property
 -  Aviation
 -  Habitational
 -  Private Equity
 -  Captive Consulting
 -  Healthcare
 -  Public Entity
 -  Casualty
 -  Higher Education
 -  Real Estate
 -  Construction
 -  Hospitality
 -  Religious/Not-for-Profit
 -  CyberRisk
 -  Institutional Services
 -  Restaurant
 -  Energy
 -  Marine
 -  Scholastic
 -  Entertainment
 -  Personal Insurance Services
 -  Transportation
 -  Environmental
 -  Professional Groups
WHOLESALE INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
20% OF 2008 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Revenues are generated by sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurer.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into approximately 60 geographical profit centers located primarily in the U.S. and Bermuda, and through its approved Lloyd's of London brokerage in London. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent, distributing specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
More than 80% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents who are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency, according to Business Insurance magazine.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of broker clients, by developing new managing general agency programs, and through mergers and acquisitions.
Gallagher Optimus Network
The Gallagher Optimus Network is a global alliance of independent broker partners. Optimus Network partners are selected by Gallagher based upon common business philosophies and the partners' strengths and service capabilities within their respective countries. Through the Gallagher Optimus Network and its own international operations, Gallagher offers client-service capabilities in more than 100 countries around the world.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2009
 
Brokerage Segment Acquisition Strategy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components  organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated approximately 230 acquisitions from 1985 through June 2009, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that fall within the range of $2 million to $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through joint ventures, where the company begins its relationship with an equity position.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on:
 -  a company culture that matches its own
 -  a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
 -  clearly defined financial criteria.
Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by Gallagher's aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 28% 2008 REVENUES
Expertise
 -  Real-time Claims Management
 -  Managed Care Services
 -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
 -  Risk Control Services
 -  Appraisal Services
 -  Safety Programs
 -  Litigation Management
 -  Settlement Management
 -  Information Management
 -  Education & Training
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims-handling services.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2009
 
Approximately 69% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-related claims, 27% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims and 4% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims-management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the U.S., the U.K., Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 86% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments.
FINANCIAL SERVICES/CORPORATE SEGMENT
The Financial Services Segment used to manage a large assortment of non-core investments. Over the last several years, Gallagher divested most of those investments. Currently, there are a few remaining investments that are being managed by Gallagher's corporate staff, consisting mostly of clean-energy investments, with a book value totaling $10.8 million at June 30, 2009, and third-party venture capital funds, with a book value totaling $7.1 million at June 30, 2009.
In July 2009, Gallagher announced that it committed $4 million and may invest an additional $12 million into one of its clean energy investments to help accelerate commercialization of the investment as well as generate incentive tax credits under IRC Section 45.
Gallagher's interest expense and corporate-related administrative and investment expenses are also reported in this segment.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2009
5
 
INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW
Fluctuations in premiums charged by insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factors - including competition for marketshare among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidations  can result in flat or reduced premium rates (a "soft" market). A soft market tends to put downward pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as heavier-than-anticipated loss experience or capital shortages, can result in increases in premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas.
From 2004 through the first half of 2009, the P/C market has been soft in most lines and geographic areas. A quarterly market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers in the second half of 2009 indicated that the level of rate reductions for commercial business averaged 4.9%, year-over-year, compared with a 5.1% year-over-year decline in the first quarter of 2009.
Safe Harbor Statement
Except for the historical information and discussions, statements contained herein may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors, such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets, as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008 and on Gallagher's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended June 30, 2009, for a more detailed discussion of these factors. This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2009
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information-2007 through 2009
(Unaudited-in millions, except per share data and other information) All information restated to reflect discontinued operations.
2007
2008
2009
1st Q
2nd Q
3rd Q
4th Q
Full Year
1st Q
2nd Q
3rd Q
4th Q
Full Year
1st Q
2nd Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues
$232.8
$294.6
$290.0
$296.8
$1,114.2
$258.0
$312.2
$314.4
$303.2
$1,187.8
$289.5
$340.1
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
17.8
61.8
56.4
47.5
183.5
19.5
65.6
59.5
27.0
171.6
39.2
69.5
Earnings from continuing operations
10.7
37.4
33.8
30.4
112.3
11.9
39.2
36.1
17.0
104.2
24.1
41.5
Growthrevenues excluding retail contingent commissions
12%
15%
7%
9%
11%
11%
6%
8%
2%
7%
12%
9%
Pretax profit margin (1)
8%
21%
19%
16%
16%
8%
21%
19%
9%
14%
14%
20%
EBITDA margin (2)
12%
25%
23%
20%
20%
12%
26%
24%
15%
20%
19%
26%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.10
$0.38
$0.35
$0.32
$1.15
$0.13
$0.42
$0.38
$0.18
$1.11
$0.25
$0.41
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues
$106.8
$107.8
$110.3
$118.6
$443.5
$116.2
$115.2
$118.6
$114.9
$464.9
$112.2
$113.3
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
16.7
13.8
15.5
18.0
64.0
13.8
12.2
11.1
8.8
45.9
14.3
13.4
Earnings from continuing operations
9.9
8.3
9.5
11.9
39.6
8.5
7.4
7.0
5.3
28.2
8.7
7.9
Growth (decline)revenues
9%
10%
4%
19%
11%
9%
7%
8%
-3%
5%
-3%
-2%
Pretax profit margin (1)
16%
13%
14%
15%
14%
12%
11%
9%
8%
10%
13%
12%
EBITDA margin (2)
18%
16%
17%
18%
17%
15%
14%
12%
10%
12%
16%
14%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.10
$0.08
$0.10
$0.13
$0.41
$0.09
$0.08
$0.08
$0.05
$0.30
$0.09
$0.08
BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT. COMBINED
Revenues
$339.6
$402.4
$400.3
$415.4
$1,557.7
$374.2
$427.4
$433.0
$418.1
$1,652.7
$401.7
$453.4
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
34.5
75.6
71.9
65.5
247.5
33.3
77.8
70.6
35.8
217.5
53.5
82.9
Earnings from continuing operations
20.6
45.7
43.3
42.3
151.9
20.4
46.6
43.1
22.3
132.4
32.8
49.4
Growthrevenues
11%
14%
6%
12%
11%
10%
6%
8%
1%
6%
7%
6%
Pretax profit margin (1)
10%
19%
18%
16%
16%
9%
18%
16%
9%
13%
13%
18%
EBITDA margin (2)
14%
22%
21%
20%
20%
13%
22%
20%
14%
18%
18%
23%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.20
$0.46
$0.45
$0.45
$1.56
$0.22
$0.50
$0.46
$0.23
$1.41
$0.34
$0.49
FINANCIAL SERVICES/CORPORATE SEGMENT
Investment income (loss)
$31.3
$28.2
$8.1
$(5.2)
$62.4
$1.6
$1.7
$(2.3)
$(0.2)
$0.8
$0.4
$0.1
Investment gains (losses)
4.1
(3.0)
2.3
(0.2)
3.2
  
(0.2)
$(2.5)
$(5.8)
(8.5)
(1.0)
0.1
Loss from continuing operations before income taxes
(10.7)
(15.6)
(5.5)
(15.6)
(47.4)
(6.4)
(8.5)
(21.2)
(17.8)
(53.9)
(10.0)
(8.8)
Earnings (loss) from continuing operations
0.7
0.1
9.1
(7.2)
2.7
(4.1)
(4.9)
(1.4)
(10.6)
(21.0)
(4.5)
(5.6)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations
$0.01
  
$0.09
$(0.08)
$0.03
$(0.04)
$(0.05)
$(0.02)
$(0.11)
$(0.23)
$(0.05)
$(0.05)
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues
$375.0
$427.6
$410.7
$410.0
$1,623.3
$375.8
$428.9
$428.2
$412.1
$1,645.0
$401.1
$453.6
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
23.8
60.0
66.4
49.9
200.1
26.9
69.3
49.4
18.0
163.6
43.5
74.1
Earnings from continuing operations
21.3
45.8
52.4
35.1
154.6
16.3
41.7
41.7
11.7
111.4
28.3
43.8
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.21
$0.46
$0.54
$0.37
$1.59
$0.18
$0.45
$0.44
$0.12
$1.18
$0.29
$0.44
Dividends declared per share
$0.31
$0.31
$0.31
$0.31
$1.24
$0.32
$0.32
$0.32
$0.32
$1.28
$0.32
$0.32
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets
$3,391.7
$3,701.7
$3,570.9
$3,556.8
$3,340.9
$3,509.5
$3,197.2
$3,271.3
$3,108.6
$3,652.5
Total liabilities
$2,523.8
$2,918.9
$2,801.6
$2,841.3
$2,642.3
$2,783.3
$2,422.2
$2,532.8
$2,310.4
$2,812.7
Total stockholders' equity
$867.9
$782.8
$769.3
$715.5
$698.6
$726.2
$775.0
$738.5
$798.2
$839.8
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s)
100,128
98,652
95,807
93,698
97,079
92,898
93,545
94,556
95,990
94,179
98,084
100,717
Common shares repurchased (000s)
557
4,229
1,887
2,562
9,235
26
20
3
6
55
11
7
Annualized return on beginning stockholders' equity (3)
9%
15%
18%
16%
16%
NMF
10%
14%
11%
11%
14%
19%
Number of acquisitions closed
7
4
2
8
21
11
9
8
9
37
3
6
Workforce from continuing operations
8,690
9,047
8,960
9,102
9,329
9,534
9,573
9,863
9,986
10,145
TOTAL COMPANY EBITDA (4)
Net earnings (loss)
$19.8
$43.8
$51.8
$23.4
$138.8
$(6.0)
$40.8
$37.8
$4.7
$77.3
$26.4
$43.8
Loss on discontinued operations, net of income taxes
1.5
2.0
0.6
11.7
15.8
22.3
0.9
3.9
7.0
34.1
1.9
  
Earnings from continuing operations
21.3
45.8
52.4
35.1
154.6
16.3
41.7
41.7
11.7
111.4
28.3
43.8
Provision for income taxes
2.5
14.2
14.0
14.8
45.5
10.6
27.6
7.7
6.3
52.2
15.2
30.3
Interest
0.6
3.2
5.6
6.6
16.0
6.5
7.3
7.1
7.7
28.6
7.3
7.0
Depreciation
7.6
7.2
6.8
7.7
29.3
6.9
7.9
8.0
7.2
30.0
7.7
7.5
Amortization
7.1
7.1
7.1
8.0
29.3
8.9
10.3
10.2
14.3
43.7
12.4
14.1
Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
1.4
Total company EBITDA
$39.1
$77.5
$85.9
$72.2
$274.7
$49.2
$94.8
$74.7
$47.2
$265.9
$70.9
$104.1
(2) Represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and change in estimated acquisition earnout payables (EBITDA) divided by total revenues.
(3) Represents annualized year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity as of the beginning of the year.
(4) EBITDA represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and change in estimated acquisition earnout payables.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2009
 
WHY INVEST?
Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues from Continuing Operations*
$1900 $1700 $1500 $1300 $1100 $900 $700
10% CAGR
$1,643 $1, 554 $1,406 $1,288 $1,175 $1,045
03 0 4 05 0 6 07 08
Dividends Per Share
$1.40 $1.20 $1.00 $0.80 $0.60 $0.40 $0.20 $0.00
$0.05
1986
18% Average Annual Increase
$1.28**
* All information as originally reported (excluding discontinued operations, litigation-related matters, retail contingent commission-related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims-handling obligations). See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
** Indicated  On July 23, 2009 Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.32 per share quarterly dividend.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Marsha J. Akin  Investor Relations | 630.773.3800
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20091027163404.txt.gz
TIME:20091027163404
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 27, 2009, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's third quarter 2009 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99 and hereby incorporated by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, October 27, 2009  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2009. A printer-friendly format of this release and the supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended September 30
 
 
 
This earnings release contains certain non-GAAP information. EBITDA, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. A reconciliation of EBITDA to earnings from continuing operations before income taxes (which were $63.1 million and $49.4 million in third quarter 2009 and 2008, respectively, and $180.7 million and $145.6 million in the nine-month periods ended September 30, 2009 and 2008, respectively) is included on page 7 of this earnings release.
"The Gallagher team continued to perform well in the third quarter. EBITDA growth of 11% and EBITDA margin expansion of 1.9% in our combined Brokerage and Risk Management Segments is an excellent result in this environment," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "For the first nine months of 2009, our Brokerage and Risk Management operations combined to grow revenues 5%, grow EPS 8%, grow EBITDA 19% and expand EBITDA margins by 2.5% from the same period in 2008. However, I continue to be concerned about the current operating environment as insurance rates remain soft and exposure units continue to decline. I believe Gallagher, and the brokerage industry as a whole, will face continued growth challenges in late 2009 and into next year. Despite this concern, I remain confident that the nearly 10,000 Gallagher world-wide associates will continue working together to help our clients navigate this difficult environment and continue to build shareholder value."
Expense Reduction Actions
Over the next few months, Gallagher expects to reduce its existing middle and back office workforce by approximately 400 positions, or approximately 4% of its global workforce, through a combination of job elimination and attrition. In connection with this action, Gallagher expects to record a nonrecurring, pretax charge in fourth quarter 2009 of approximately $10.0 to $13.0 million for related severance costs. Gallagher estimates annual pretax cost savings associated with this reduction in workforce of approximately $25.0 to $28.0 million.
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
Gallagher has signed definitive agreements with one utility to install three facilities, is negotiating contracts with another utility to install three facilities and is working with several other utilities regarding the remaining two facilities. To build and install these eight facilities, Gallagher expects to make capital investments totaling $30 to $35 million, of which $9.6 million has been made as of September 30, 2009, and expects to recover $10 to $15 million from its partners once the facilities are placed in service. Gallagher expects its net capital investment will total approximately $20 million.
There are significant uncertainties related to these investments, which must be favorably resolved in order for Gallagher to recover its capital investments and generate income from these facilities including: the completion of each facility by December 31, 2009, the timely receipt by the utility of necessary regulatory permits, the issuance of favorable IRS guidance, the subsequent availability of raw materials used in the Chem-Mod technology, and consistent operation of the facilities once they are placed in service. While it is too early to narrow the range of expected future value of these facilities, if these and other uncertainties are resolved favorably, Gallagher could generate up to $40 million of aggregate annual after-tax income from its investment in each of the next ten years from these eight facilities.
 
 
 
 
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for third quarter was 34.1% in 2009 and 15.6% in 2008. The third quarter tax rates in both 2009 and 2008 are lower than the statutory rates due to the recognition and resolution of certain income tax matters in third quarter 2009 and 2008.
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 28, 2009 at 9:00 a.m. ET to further discuss these quarterly results. To listen, please go to .
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
This press release is historical in nature and only speaks to the day it is dated. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to future results. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and changes in securities and fixed income markets as well as developments in the areas of tax legislation. In addition, there are significant uncertainties related to the Section 45 investments, which must be favorably resolved in order for Gallagher to recoup these investments and generate earnings on them. These include the issuance of favorable IRS guidance, the timely receipt by the utility of regulatory permits, completion of each facility by December 31, 2009 and satisfaction of certain emissions reductions. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2009, for a more detailed discussion of these factors.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2009 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 8.
 
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2009 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 8.
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2009 Earnings Release
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20091130214915.txt.gz
TIME:20091130214915
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The information required by this item with respect to the Purchase Agreement (as defined below) is incorporated herein by reference to Item 2.03.
 
On November 30, 2009, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued $150 million aggregate principal amount of Gallagher's 5.85% Series C Senior Notes (the Notes) in a private placement. Principal payments of $50,000,000 are scheduled on each of November 30, 2016, 2018 and 2019. Interest on the Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on May 30 and November 30 of each year, beginning on May 30, 2010. Gallagher issued the Notes pursuant to the terms of a Note Purchase Agreement dated as of November 30, 2009 (the Purchase Agreement) with certain accredited institutional investors (collectively, the Purchasers). The Notes are senior unsecured obligations of Gallagher, rank equal in right of payment with all other senior unsecured indebtedness of Gallagher, and are unconditionally guaranteed by several of Gallagher's wholly-owned domestic subsidiaries.
The Purchase Agreement contains customary provisions for transactions of this type, including representations and warranties regarding Gallagher and its subsidiaries and various covenants, including covenants that require Gallagher to maintain specified financial ratios. The Purchase Agreement provides for customary events of default, generally with corresponding grace periods, including, without limitation, payment defaults with respect to the Notes, covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other agreements evidencing indebtedness of Gallagher or its subsidiaries, certain judgments against Gallagher or its subsidiaries and events of bankruptcy involving Gallagher or its material subsidiaries.
Under the terms of the Purchase Agreement, the Notes are redeemable by Gallagher at any time, in whole or in part, at 100% of the principal amount of such Note being redeemed, together with accrued and unpaid interest and a "make-whole amount" (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) with respect to each Note. If within 90 days after a "change in control" Gallagher (or its successor) does not have an "investment grade rating", Gallagher is obligated to offer to prepay all of the outstanding Notes at the principal amount thereof plus accrued interest (but without any "make-whole amount") (as each term is defined in the Purchase Agreement).
The foregoing summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Purchase Agreement and form of the Notes, filed herewith as Exhibit 4.1 and Exhibit 4.2, respectively.
 
On November 30, 2009, Gallagher issued a press release announcing it had completed the issuance of the Notes. A copy of this press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Dated as of November 30, 2009
T E P L
O
ACH
OF
THE
URCHASERS
ISTED
IN
    S A H:
CHEDULE
ERETO
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally agree with each of the Purchasers whose names appear in attached hereto (each, a and, collectively, the ) as follows:
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
Section 9.7,
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Schedule A
"Purchaser"
"Purchasers"
SECTION 1. Authorization of Notes.
The Obligors will authorize the issue and sale of $150,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 5.85% Senior Notes, Series C, due November 30, 2019 (the "Notes," such term to include any such notes issued in substitution therefor pursuant to ). The Notes shall be substantially in the form set out in . Certain capitalized and other terms used in this Agreement are defined in ; and references to a "" or an are, unless otherwise specified, to a Schedule or an Exhibit attached to this Agreement.
Section 13
Exhibit 1
Schedule B
Schedule
"Exhibit"
SECTION 2. Sale and Purchase of Notes.
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Obligors will issue and sell to each Purchaser and each Purchaser will purchase from the Obligors, at the Closing provided for in , Notes in the principal amount specified opposite such Purchaser's name in at the purchase price of 100% of the principal amount thereof. The Purchasers' obligations hereunder are several and not joint obligations and no Purchaser shall have any liability to any Person for the performance or non-performance of any obligation by any other Purchaser hereunder.
Section 2.1 Purchase and Sale of Notes.
Section 3
Schedule A
 
(a) The holders of the Notes acknowledge and agree that any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor (other than the Company) shall be automatically discharged and released from the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, pursuant to the written request of the Company, that (i) such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, has been released and discharged as a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of all Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement and the Company so certifies to the holders of the Notes in a certificate which accompanies such request for release and discharge, (ii) any such release and discharge shall be expressly conditioned upon receipt by the holders of the Notes of a written agreement executed by the Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, to be released pursuant to which such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, shall agree that if, for any reason whatsoever, it thereafter becomes a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of any Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement, then such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, shall contemporaneously provide written notice thereof to the holders of the Notes accompanied by an executed (A) Subsidiary Guaranty or (B) Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, of such Subsidiary, and (iii) at the time of such release and discharge, the Company shall deliver a certificate of a Responsible Officer to the holders of the Notes to the effect that no Default or Event of Default exists; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
Section 2.2 Release of Subsidiary Guarantors and Obligors.
provided
provided
Section 10.5
(b) The Company agrees that it will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary or Affiliate to, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration or remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, to any creditor of the Company or of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any such creditor of any release or discharge of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, with respect to any liability of such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as a guarantor or obligor under or in respect of Indebtedness of the Company, unless such consideration or remuneration is concurrently paid, on the same terms, ratably to the holders of all of the Notes then outstanding.
(c) Each holder of the Notes further acknowledges and agrees that following the release of an Obligor pursuant to this , if requested in writing by the Obligor Agent, that such holder of the Notes shall, at the cost and expense of the Obligors, within 20 Business Days following the date of such request, surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note and in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the remaining Obligors.
Section 2.2
SECTION 3. Closing.
The sale and purchase of the Notes to be purchased by each Purchaser shall occur at the offices of Schiff Hardin LLP, Suite 6600, 233 S. Wacker Dr., Chicago, Illinois 60606, at 10:00 .. Chicago time, at a closing (the ) on November 30, 2009. At the Closing, the Obligors will deliver to each Purchaser the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser in the form of a single Note (or such greater number of Notes in denominations of at least $100,000 as
A
M
"Closing"
 
such Purchaser may request) dated the date of the Closing and registered in such Purchaser's name (or in the name of its nominee), against delivery by such Purchaser to the Obligors or their order of immediately available funds in the amount of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of immediately available funds for the account of the Company to account number 265-977-9, Account Name: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.  Delaware Dividend Account, at Harris N.A., Chicago, IL (ABA No.: 071-000-288). If at the Closing the Obligors shall fail to tender Notes to any Purchaser as provided above in this , or any of the conditions specified in shall not have been fulfilled to such Purchaser's satisfaction, such Purchaser shall, at its election, be relieved of all further obligations under this Agreement, without thereby waiving any rights such Purchaser may have by reason of such failure or such nonfulfillment.
Section 3
Section 4
SECTION 4. Conditions to Closing.
Each Purchaser's obligation to purchase and pay for the Notes to be sold to such Purchaser at the Closing is subject to the fulfillment to such Purchaser's satisfaction, prior to or at the Closing, of the following conditions:
. The representations and warranties of each Obligor in this Agreement shall be correct when made and at the time of the Closing.
Section 4.1 Representations and Warranties
. Each Obligor shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in this Agreement required to be performed or complied with by it prior to or at the Closing, and after giving effect to the issue and sale of the Notes (and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated by ), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 4.2 Performance; No Default
Section 5.14
.
Section 4.3 Compliance Certificates
(a) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser an Officer's Certificate, dated the date of the Closing, certifying that the conditions specified in , and have been fulfilled.
Officer's Certificate
Sections 4.1
4.2
4.9
(b) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser a certificate of its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, dated the date of Closing, certifying as to the resolutions attached thereto and other corporate proceedings relating to the authorization, execution and delivery of the Notes and this Agreement.
Secretary's Certificate
. Such Purchaser shall have received opinions in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser, dated the date of the Closing (a) from Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Obligors, in the form set forth in (and each Obligor hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) (b) from Walter D. Bay, Esq., General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, in the form set forth in (and the Company hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) and (c) from Schiff Hardin LLP, the Purchasers' special counsel in connection with such transactions, substantially in the form set forth in and covering such other matters incident to such transactions as such Purchaser may reasonably request.
Section 4.4 Opinions of Counsel
Exhibit 4.4(a)
Exhibit 4.4(b)
Exhibit 4.4(c)
 
On the date of the Closing such Purchaser's purchase of Notes shall (a) be permitted by the laws and regulations of each jurisdiction to which such Purchaser is subject, without recourse to provisions (such as section 1405(a)(8) of the New York Insurance Law) permitting limited investments by insurance companies without restriction as to the character of the particular investment, (b) not violate any applicable law or regulation (including, without limitation, Regulation T, U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) and (c) not subject such Purchaser to any tax, penalty or liability under or pursuant to any applicable law or regulation, which law or regulation was not in effect on the date hereof. If requested by such Purchaser, such Purchaser shall have received an Officer's Certificate certifying as to such matters of fact as such Purchaser may reasonably specify to enable such Purchaser to determine whether such purchase is so permitted.
Section 4.5 Purchase Permitted by Applicable Law, Etc.
. Contemporaneously with the Closing, the Obligors shall sell to each other Purchaser, and each other Purchaser shall purchase, the Notes to be purchased by it at the Closing as specified in .
Section 4.6 Sale of Other Notes
Schedule A
. Without limiting the provisions of , the Obligors shall have paid on or before the Closing the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of the Purchasers' special counsel referred to in to the extent reflected in a statement of such counsel rendered to the Company at least one Business Day prior to the Closing.
Section 4.7 Payment of Special Counsel Fees
Section 15.1
Section 4.4
. A Private Placement Number issued by Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau (in cooperation with the Securities Valuation Office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) shall have been obtained for the Notes.
Section 4.8 Private Placement Number
. No Obligor shall have changed its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization, as applicable, or been a party to any merger or consolidation or succeeded to all or any substantial part of the liabilities of any other entity, at any time following the date of the most recent financial statements referred to in .
Section 4.9 Changes in Corporate Structure
Schedule 5.5
At least three Business Days prior to the date of the Closing, each Purchaser shall have received written instructions signed by a Responsible Officer on letterhead of the Company confirming the information specified in including (a) the name and address of the transferee bank, (b) such transferee bank's ABA number and (c) the account name and number into which the purchase price for the Notes is to be deposited.
Section 4.10 Funding Instructions.
Section 3
. All corporate or limited liability company and other proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and all documents and instruments incident to such transactions shall be reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser and its special counsel, and such Purchaser and its special counsel shall have received all such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as such Purchaser or such special counsel may reasonably request.
Section 4.11 Proceedings and Documents
 
SECTION 5. Representations and Warranties of the Obligors.
Each Obligor represents and warrants to each Purchaser that:
. Such Obligor is a corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation or formation, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Such Obligor has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Notes and to perform the provisions hereof and thereof.
Section 5.1 Organization; Power and Authority
. This Agreement and the Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of such Obligor, and this Agreement constitutes, and upon execution and delivery thereof each Note will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Obligor enforceable against such Obligor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (a) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (b) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Section 5.2 Authorization, Etc
. This Agreement and the documents, certificates or other writings delivered to the Purchasers by or on behalf of the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and identified in , and the financial statements listed in (this Agreement, and such documents, certificates or other writings and such financial statements delivered to each Purchaser prior to November 30, 2009 being referred to, collectively, as the ), taken as a whole, do not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in light of the circumstances under which they were made. Since December 31, 2008, there has been no change in the financial condition, operations, business or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, except changes that individually or in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There is no fact known to any Obligor that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect that has not been set forth herein or in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.3 Disclosure
Schedule 5.3
Schedule 5.5
"Disclosure Documents"
. (a)  contains (except as noted therein) complete and correct lists (i) of the Company's Subsidiaries, showing, as to each Subsidiary, the correct name thereof, the jurisdiction of its organization, the percentage of shares of each class of its capital stock or similar equity interests outstanding owned by the Company and each other Subsidiary and designation of whether or not such Subsidiary is an obligor or guarantor under the Bank Credit Agreement, (ii) of the Company's Affiliates, other than Subsidiaries, and (iii) of the Company's directors and senior officers.
Section 5.4 Organization and Ownership of Shares of Subsidiaries; Affiliates
Schedule 5.4
(b) All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of each Subsidiary shown in as being owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries have been validly issued, are (in the case of capital stock) fully paid and nonassessable and are owned
Schedule 5.4
 
by the Company or another Subsidiary free and clear of any Lien (except as otherwise disclosed in ).
Schedule 5.4 or Schedule 5.15(b)
(c) Each Subsidiary identified in is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each such Subsidiary has the corporate or other legal entity power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease and to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact other than that which could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule 5.4
(d) No Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to, any legal, regulatory, contractual or other restriction (other than this Agreement, the agreements listed on and limitations imposed by law) restricting the ability of such Subsidiary to pay dividends out of profits or make any other similar distributions of profits to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that owns outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of such Subsidiary.
Schedule 5.4
. The Company has delivered to each Purchaser copies of the financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries listed on . All of said financial statements (including in each case the related schedules and notes) fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the respective dates specified in such financial statements and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the respective periods so specified and have been prepared in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the periods involved except as set forth in the notes thereto (subject, in the case of any interim financial statements, to normal year-end adjustments). To the knowledge of the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries do not have any Material liabilities that are not disclosed in such financial statements or otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.5 Financial Statements; Material Liabilities
Schedule 5.5
. The execution, delivery and performance by the Obligors of this Agreement and the Notes will not (a) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of any Obligor or any Subsidiary under, any Material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, corporate charter or by-laws, or any other Material agreement or instrument to which such Obligor or any Subsidiary is bound or by which any Obligor or any Subsidiary or any of their respective properties may be bound or affected, (b) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary or (c) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary.
Section 5.6 Compliance with Laws, Other Instruments, Etc
. No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by the Obligors of this Agreement or the Notes.
Section 5.7 Governmental Authorizations, Etc
 
(a) Except as disclosed in the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 or the Company's Forms 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2009, June 30, 2009 and September 30, 2009, there are no actions, suits, investigations or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of each of the Obligors, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary or any property of the Company or any Subsidiary in any court or before any arbitrator of any kind or before or by any Governmental Authority that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.8 Litigation; Observance of Agreements, Statutes and Orders.
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default under any term of any agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it is bound, or any order, judgment, decree or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority or is in violation of any applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation (including without limitation Environmental Laws or the USA Patriot Act) of any Governmental Authority, which default or violation, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have filed all tax returns that are required to have been filed in any jurisdiction, and have paid all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes and assessments levied upon them or their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent such taxes and assessments have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent, except for any taxes and assessments (a) the amount of which is not individually or in the aggregate Material or (b) the amount, applicability or validity of which is currently being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and with respect to which the Company has established adequate reserves on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP. No Obligor knows of any basis for any other tax or assessment that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The charges, accruals and reserves on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries in respect of Federal, state or other taxes for all fiscal periods are, in the judgment of the Company, adequate. The Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries have been finally determined (whether by reason of completed audits or the statute of limitations having run) for all fiscal years up to and including the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005; , , that this sentence shall not apply to any Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries arising from an examination by a Governmental Authority of any of the investment partnerships of the Company.
Section 5.9 Taxes
provided
however
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to their respective properties that individually or in the aggregate are Material, including all such properties reflected in the most recent audited balance sheet referred to in or purported to have been acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary after said date (except as sold or otherwise disposed of in the ordinary course of business), in each case free and clear of Liens prohibited by this Agreement. All leases that individually or in the aggregate are Material are valid and subsisting and are in full force and effect in all material respects.
Section 5.10 Title to Property; Leases
Section 5.5
 
(a) The Company and its Subsidiaries own or possess all licenses, permits, franchises, authorizations, patents, copyrights, proprietary software, service marks, trademarks and trade names, or rights thereto, without known conflict with the rights of others, except those conflicts that, individually and in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.11 Licenses, Permits, Etc.
(b) To the knowledge of each Obligor, no product of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries infringes in any respect with any license, permit, franchise, authorization, patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned by any other Person, except to the extent any such infringement could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) To the knowledge of each Obligor, there is no Material violation by any Person of any right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned or used by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
. (a) The Company and each ERISA Affiliate have operated and administered each Plan in compliance with all applicable laws except for such instances of noncompliance as have not resulted in and could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any ERISA Affiliate has incurred any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans (as defined in section 3 of ERISA), and no event, transaction or condition has occurred or exists that could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any such liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, in either case pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or to such penalty or excise tax provisions or to section 401(a)(29) or 412 of the Code or section 4068 of ERISA, other than such liabilities or Liens as would not be individually or in the aggregate Material.
Section 5.12 Compliance with ERISA
(b) The present value of the aggregate benefit liabilities under each of the Plans (other than Multiemployer Plans), determined as of the end of such Plan's most recently ended plan year on the basis of the actuarial assumptions specified for funding purposes in such Plan's most recent actuarial valuation report, did not exceed the aggregate current value of the assets of such Plan allocable to such benefit liabilities. The term "benefit liabilities" has the meaning specified in Section 4001 of ERISA and the terms "current value" and "present value" have the meaning specified in section 3 of ERISA.
(c) The Company and its ERISA Affiliates have not incurred withdrawal liabilities (and are not subject to contingent withdrawal liabilities) under Section 4201 or 4204 of ERISA in respect of Multiemployer Plans that individually or in the aggregate are Material.
(d) The expected post retirement benefit obligation (determined as of the last day of the Company's most recently ended fiscal year in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 106, without regard to liabilities attributable to continuation coverage mandated by Section 4980B of the Code) of the Company and its Subsidiaries is not Material or has otherwise been disclosed in the financial statements set forth on .
Schedule 5.5
 
(e) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the issuance and sale of the Notes hereunder will not involve any transaction that is subject to the prohibitions of Section 406 of ERISA or in connection with which a tax could be imposed pursuant to Section 4975(c)(1)(A)-(D) of the Code. The representation by the Company in the first sentence of this is made in reliance upon and subject to the accuracy of such Purchaser's representation in as to the sources of the funds used to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser.
Section 5.12(e)
Section 6.2
. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has offered the Notes or any similar securities for sale to, or solicited any offer to buy any of the same from, or otherwise approached or negotiated in respect thereof with, any Person other than the Purchasers and not more than 10 other Institutional Investors, each of which has been offered the Notes at a private sale for investment. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has taken, or will take, any action that would subject the issuance or sale of the Notes to the registration requirements of Section 5 of the Securities Act or to the registration requirements of any securities or blue sky laws of any applicable jurisdiction.
Section 5.13 Private Offering by the Company
. The Obligors will apply the proceeds of the sale of the Notes to repay outstanding borrowings under the Bank Credit Agreement (without reducing the commitments thereunder). No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of buying or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 CFR 221), or for the purpose of buying or carrying or trading in any securities under such circumstances as to involve the Company in a violation of Regulation X of said Board (12 CFR 224) or to involve any broker or dealer in a violation of Regulation T of said Board (12 CFR 220), in each case, in contravention of applicable margin stock regulations. Margin stock does not constitute more than 15% of the value of the consolidated assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries and the Company does not have any present intention that margin stock will constitute more than 15% of the value of such assets. As used in this , the terms "margin stock" and "purpose of buying or carrying" shall have the meanings assigned to them in said Regulation U.
Section 5.14 Use of Proceeds; Margin Regulations
Section 5.14
. (a)  sets forth the outstanding Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of September 30, 2009, which list is complete and correct in all material respects (including a description of the obligors and obligees, principal amount outstanding and collateral therefor, if any, and Guaranty thereof, if any), since which date there has been no Material change in the amounts, interest rates, sinking funds, installment payments or maturities of the Indebtedness of the Company or its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default and no waiver of default is currently in effect, in the payment of any principal or interest on any Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary and no event or condition exists with respect to any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary that would permit (or that with notice or the lapse of time, or both, would permit) one or more Persons to cause such Indebtedness to become due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment.
Section 5.15 Existing Indebtedness; Future Liens
Schedule 5.15(a)
(b) Except as disclosed in , neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has agreed or consented to cause or permit in the future (upon the happening of a contingency or otherwise) any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, to be subject to a Lien not permitted by .
Schedule 5.15(b)
Section 10.4
 
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to any provision contained in, any instrument evidencing Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary, any agreement relating thereto or any other agreement (including, but not limited to, its charter or other organizational document) which limits the amount of, or otherwise imposes restrictions on the incurring of, Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary, except as specifically indicated in .
Schedule 5.15(c)
. (a) Neither the sale of the Notes by the Company hereunder nor its use of the proceeds thereof will violate the Trading with the Enemy Act, as amended, or any of the foreign assets control regulations of the United States Treasury Department (31 CFR, Subtitle B, Chapter V, as amended) or any enabling legislation or executive order relating thereto.
Section 5.16 Foreign Assets Control Regulations, Etc
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) is a Person described or designated in the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List of the Office of Foreign Assets Control or in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism Order or (ii) engages in any dealings or transactions with any such Person. The Company and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with the USA Patriot Act to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such law could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for any payments to any governmental official or employee, political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage, in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, assuming in all cases that such Act applies to the Company.
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is subject to regulation under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, the ICC Termination Act of 1995, as amended, or the Federal Power Act, as amended.
Section 5.17 Status under Certain Statutes
. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement and the Notes rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured Senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of the Company, including, without limitation, all senior unsecured Indebtedness of the Company described in hereto.
Section 5.18 Notes Rank Pari Passu
pari passu
Schedule 5.15(a)
. (a) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any claim or has received any notice of any claim, and no proceeding has been instituted raising any claim against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or other assets, alleging any damage to the environment or violation of any Environmental Laws, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.19 Environmental Matters
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any facts which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any claim, public or private, of violation of Environmental
 
Laws or damage to the environment emanating from, occurring on or in any way related to real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or to other assets or their use, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has stored any Hazardous Materials on real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or has disposed of any Hazardous Materials in a manner contrary to any Environmental Laws, in each case in any manner that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(d) All buildings on all real properties now owned, leased or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary are in compliance with applicable Environmental Laws, except where failure to comply could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 6. Representations of the Purchasers.
. Each Purchaser severally represents that (a) it is purchasing the Notes for its own account or for one or more separate accounts maintained by such Purchaser or for the account of one or more pension or trust funds and not with a view to the distribution thereof; that the disposition of such Purchaser's or their property shall at all times be within such Purchaser's or such pension or trust fund's control and (b) is an "Accredited Investor" as defined in Regulation D of the Securities Act and an experienced and sophisticated investor with such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters as is necessary to evaluate the merits and risks of an investment in the Notes. Each Purchaser understands that the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and may be resold only if registered pursuant to the provisions of the Securities Act or if an exemption from registration is available, except under circumstances where neither such registration nor such an exemption is required by law, and that neither the Company nor any Obligor is required to register the Notes.
Section 6.1 Purchase for Investment
provided
. Each Purchaser severally represents that at least one of the following statements is an accurate representation as to each source of funds (a ) to be used by such Purchaser to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser hereunder:
Section 6.2 Source of Funds
"Source"
(a) the Source is an "insurance company general account" (as the term is defined in the United States Department of Labor's Prohibited Transaction Exemption () 95-60) in respect of which the reserves and liabilities (as defined by the annual statement for life insurance companies approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (the ")) for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any employee benefit plan together with the amount of the reserves and liabilities for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any other employee benefit plans maintained by the same employer (or affiliate thereof as defined in PTE 95-60) or by the same employee organization in the general account do not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total reserves and liabilities of the general account (exclusive of separate account liabilities) plus surplus as set forth in the NAIC Annual Statement filed with such Purchaser's state of domicile; or
"PTE"
NAIC Annual Statement"
 
(b) the Source is a separate account that is maintained solely in connection with such Purchaser's fixed contractual obligations under which the amounts payable, or credited, to any employee benefit plan (or its related trust) that has any interest in such separate account (or to any participant or beneficiary of such plan (including any annuitant)) are not affected in any manner by the investment performance of the separate account; or
(c) the Source is either (i) an insurance company pooled separate account, within the meaning of PTE 90-1, or (ii) a bank collective investment fund, within the meaning of the PTE 91-38 and, except as have been disclosed by such Purchaser to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (c), no employee benefit plan or group of plans maintained by the same employer or employee organization beneficially owns more than 10% of all assets allocated to such pooled separate account or collective investment fund; or
(d) the Source constitutes assets of an "investment fund" (within the meaning of Part V of the QPAM Exemption) managed by a "qualified professional asset manager" or "QPAM" (within the meaning of Part V of the QPAM Exemption), no employee benefit plan's assets that are included in such investment fund, when combined with the assets of all other employee benefit plans established or maintained by the same employer or by an affiliate (within the meaning of Section V(c)(1) of the QPAM Exemption) of such employer or by the same employee organization and managed by such QPAM, exceed 20% of the total client assets managed by such QPAM, the conditions of Part I(c) and (g) of the QPAM Exemption are satisfied, as of the last day of its most recent calendar quarter, the QPAM does not own a 10% or more interest in the Company and no Person controlling or controlled by the QPAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section V(e) of the QPAM Exemption) owns a 20% or more interest in the Company (or less than 20% but greater than 10%, if such person exercises control over the management or policies of the Company by reason of its ownership interest) and (i) the identity of such QPAM and (ii) the names of all employee benefit plans whose assets are included in such investment fund have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (d); or
(e) the Source constitutes assets of a "plan(s)" (within the meaning of Section IV of PTE 96-23 (the )) managed by an "in-house asset manager" or "INHAM" (within the meaning of Part IV of the INHAM Exemption), the conditions of Part I(a), (g) and (h) of the INHAM Exemption are satisfied, neither the INHAM nor a Person controlling or controlled by the INHAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section IV(d) of the INHAM Exemption) owns a 5% or more interest in the Company and (i) the identity of such INHAM and (ii) the name(s) of the employee benefit plan(s) whose assets constitute the Source have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (e); or
"INHAM Exemption"
(f) the Source is a governmental plan; or
 
(g) the Source is one or more employee benefit plans, or a separate account or trust fund comprised of one or more employee benefit plans, each of which has been identified to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (g); or
(h) the Source does not include assets of any employee benefit plan, other than a plan exempt from the coverage of ERISA.
As used in this , the terms "employee benefit plan", "governmental plan", "party in interest" and "separate account" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in section 3 of ERISA.
Section 6.2
SECTION 7. Information as to the Company.
. The Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.1 Financial and Business Information
(a)  within 60 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each quarterly fiscal period in each fiscal year of the Company (other than the last quarterly fiscal period of each such fiscal year), duplicate copies of:
Quarterly Statements
"Form 10-Q"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at the end of such quarter (compared to the previous fiscal year end), and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such quarter and (in the case of the second and third quarters) for the portion of the fiscal year ending with such quarter (compared to the corresponding periods in the previous fiscal year),
all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP applicable to quarterly financial statements generally, and certified by a Senior Financial Officer as fairly presenting, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported on and their results of operations and cash flows, subject to changes resulting from year-end adjustments; that delivery within the time period specified above of copies of the Company's Form 10-Q prepared in compliance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-Q if it shall have timely made such Form 10-Q available on the SEC's "EDGAR" system (or any successor thereto) or any other publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web (at the date of this Agreement located at: http//www.ajg.com) and shall have given each holder of a Note prior notice of such availability on EDGAR (or any such successor thereto) or any other such publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web in connection with each delivery (such availability and notice thereof being referred to as );
provided
Section 7.1(a)
provided, further,
"Electronic Delivery"
 
(b)  within 120 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, duplicate copies of,
Annual Statements
"Form 10-K"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries, as at the end of such year, and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries, for such year,
setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP, and accompanied by an opinion thereon of independent public accountants of recognized national standing, which opinion shall state that such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported upon and their results of operations and cash flows and have been prepared in conformity with GAAP, and that the examination of such accountants in connection with such financial statements has been made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, and that such audit provides a reasonable basis for such opinion in the circumstances, that the delivery within the time period specified above of the Company's Form 10-K for such fiscal year (together with the Company's annual report to stockholders, if any, prepared pursuant to Rule 14a-3 under the Exchange Act) prepared in accordance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC, shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-K if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
provided
Section 7.1(b)
provided, further,
(c)  promptly upon their becoming available, one copy of (i) each financial statement, report, notice or proxy statement sent by the Company or any Subsidiary to its principal lending banks as a whole (excluding information sent to such banks in the ordinary course of administration of a bank facility, such as information relating to pricing and borrowing availability or to its public securities holders generally) and (ii) each regular or periodic report, each registration statement (without exhibits except as expressly requested by such holder and excluding registration statements on Form S-8), and each prospectus and all amendments thereto (excluding those related to plans or plan interests registered on a Form S-8 registration statement) filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC and of all press releases and other statements made available generally by the Company or any Subsidiary to the public concerning developments that are Material; that with respect to any such report, registration statement or prospectus filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC, the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such report, registration statement or prospectus if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
SEC and Other Reports
provided
(d)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of the existence of any
Notice of Default or Event of Default
 
Default or Event of Default or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default hereunder or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default of the type referred to in , a written notice specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
Section 11(f)
(e)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of any of the following, a written notice setting forth the nature thereof and the action, if any, that the Company or an ERISA Affiliate proposes to take with respect thereto:
ERISA Matters
(i) with respect to any Plan, any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA and the regulations thereunder, for which notice thereof has not been waived pursuant to such regulations as in effect on the date hereof; or
(ii) the taking by the PBGC of steps to institute, or the threatening by the PBGC of the institution of, proceedings under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Plan, or the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of a notice from a Multiemployer Plan that such action has been taken by the PBGC with respect to such Multiemployer Plan; or
(iii) any event, transaction or condition that could result in the incurrence of any liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or such penalty or excise tax provisions, if such liability or Lien, taken together with any other such liabilities or Liens then existing, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
(f)  promptly, and in any event within 30 days of receipt thereof, copies of any notice to any Obligor or any Subsidiary from any Federal or state Governmental Authority relating to any order, ruling, statute or other law or regulation that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
Notices from Governmental Authority
(g)  with reasonable promptness, such other data and information relating to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Obligors or any of their Subsidiaries or relating to the ability of the Obligors to perform their respective obligations hereunder and under the Notes as from time to time may be reasonably requested by any such holder of Notes.
Requested Information
 
. Each set of financial statements delivered to a holder of Notes pursuant to or shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer setting forth (which, in the case of Electronic Delivery of such financial statements, shall be by separate concurrent delivery of such certificate to each holder of Notes):
Section 7.2 Officer's Certificate
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
(a) the information (including detailed calculations) required in order to establish whether the Company was in compliance with the requirements of through , inclusive, during the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished (including with respect to each such Section, where applicable, the calculations of the maximum or minimum amount, ratio or percentage, as the case may be, permissible under the terms of such Sections, and the calculation of the amount, ratio or percentage then in existence) and, to the extent that the Agreement Accounting Principles applied in connection with determining compliance with the requirements of through and are not the same as the generally accepted accounting principles used in preparation of the financial statements delivered pursuant to or , a reconciliation of the consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Subsidiaries delivered pursuant to or and the financial information used to determine compliance with the requirements of through and ; and
Covenant Compliance
Sections 10.1
Section 10.3
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
(b)  a statement that such Senior Financial Officer has reviewed the relevant terms hereof and has made, or caused to be made, under his or her supervision, a review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries from the beginning of the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished to the date of the certificate and that such review shall not have disclosed, to the best of such Senior Financial Officer's knowledge and belief, the existence during such period of any condition or event that constitutes a Default or an Event of Default or, if any such condition or event existed or exists (including, without limitation, any such event or condition resulting from the failure of the Company or any Subsidiary to comply with any Environmental Law), specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company shall have taken or proposes to take with respect thereto.
Event of Default
. The Company shall permit the representatives of each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.3 Visitation
(a)  if no Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of such holder and upon reasonable prior notice to the Company, to visit the principal executive office of the Company, to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with the Company's Senior Financial Officers, and (with the consent of the Company, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld) to visit during normal business hours the other offices and properties of the Company and each Subsidiary, all at such reasonable times and as often as may be reasonably requested in writing; and
No Default
(b)  if a Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of the Company, to visit and inspect any of the offices or properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, to examine all their respective books of account, records, reports and other
Default
 
papers, to make copies and extracts therefrom, and to discuss their respective affairs, finances and accounts with their respective Senior Financial Officers and independent public accountants (and by this provision the Company authorizes said accountants to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries), all at such times and as often as may be requested, that prior to disclosure of any material non public information pursuant to this , the holders of the Notes shall, if requested by the Company, provide the Company with reasonable assurance that such disclosure will be held in confidence in accordance with the requirements of Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC, subject to the last sentence of .
provided
Section 7.3
Section 20
SECTION 8. Prepayment of the Notes.
Until the Notes shall be paid in full, the Company shall apply to the prepayment of the Notes, without premium, $50,000,000 on each of November 30, 2016 and November 30, 2018, and such principal amount of the Notes, together with interest thereon to the prepayment dates, shall become due on such prepayment dates (provided that upon any prepayment or purchase of the Notes pursuant to or , the principal amount of each required prepayment of the Notes becoming due under this on and after the date of such prepayment or purchase shall be reduced in the same proportion as the aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Notes is reduced as a result of such prepayment or purchase). The remaining principal amount of the Notes, together with any accrued and unpaid interest thereon, shall become due on November 30, 2019, the maturity date of the Notes.
Section 8.1 Required Prepayments.
Sections 8.2, 8.5, 8.7
10.6
Section 8.1
. The Obligors may, at their option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the Notes in an amount not less than 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding in the case of a partial prepayment, at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, together with interest accrued thereon to the date of such prepayment, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount. The Company will give each holder of Notes the Obligors intend to prepay written notice of each optional prepayment under this not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment. Each such notice shall specify such date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each Note held by such holder to be prepaid (determined in accordance with ), and the interest to be paid on the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such prepayment, the Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes being prepaid a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified prepayment date.
Section 8.2 Optional Prepayments with Make-Whole Amount
Section 8.2
Section 8.3
. In the case of each partial prepayment of Notes pursuant to , the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid shall be allocated pro rata among all holders of the Notes at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof.
Section 8.3 Allocation of Partial Prepayments
Sections 8.1 or 8.2
 
. In the case of each prepayment of Notes pursuant to this , the principal amount of each Note to be prepaid shall mature and become due and payable on the date fixed for such prepayment (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any. From and after such date, unless the Obligors shall fail to pay such principal amount when so due and payable, together with the interest and Make-Whole Amount, if any, as aforesaid, interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. Any Note paid or prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Obligor Agent and cancelled and shall not be reissued, and no Note shall be issued in lieu of any prepaid principal amount of any Note.
Section 8.4 Maturity; Surrender, Etc
Section 8
. The Company will not and will not permit any Affiliate to purchase, redeem, prepay or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, any of the outstanding Notes or any part or portion thereof except (a) upon the payment or prepayment of the Notes in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and the Notes or (b) pursuant to an offer to purchase made by the Company or an Affiliate pro rata to the holders of all Notes at the time outstanding upon the same terms and conditions. Any such offer shall provide each holder with sufficient information to enable it to make an informed decision with respect to such offer, and shall remain open for at least 15 Business Days. If the holders of more than 10% of the principal amount of the Notes then outstanding accept such offer, the Obligor Agent shall promptly notify the remaining holders of Notes of such fact and the expiration date for the acceptance by holders of such Notes of such offer shall be extended by the number of days necessary to give each such remaining holder at least 5 Business Days from its receipt of such notice to accept such offer. The Obligor Agent will promptly cancel all Notes acquired by it or any Affiliate pursuant to any payment, prepayment or purchase of Notes pursuant to any provision of this Agreement and no Notes may be issued in substitution or exchange for any such Notes.
Section 8.5 Purchase of Notes
. The term means, with respect to any Note, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such Note over the amount of such Called Principal; that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Section 8.6 Make-Whole Amount
"Make-Whole Amount"
provided
means, with respect to any Note, the principal of such Note that is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Called Principal"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on such Note is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
"Discounted Value"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, 0.50% (50 basis points) over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of
"Reinvestment Yield"
 
10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as "Page PX1" (or such other display as may replace Page PX1) on Bloomberg Financial Markets for the most recently issued actively traded on the run U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (or any comparable successor publication) for U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. In the case of each determination under clause (i) or clause (ii), as the case may be, of the preceding paragraph, such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond-equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable Note.
means, with respect to any Called Principal, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (a) such Called Principal into (b) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (i) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (ii) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
"Remaining Average Life"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date; that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of such Note, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to or .
"Remaining Scheduled Payments"
provided
Section 8.2
12.1
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Settlement Date"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
(a) . The Company will, within five Business Days after any Responsible Officer has knowledge of the occurrence of any Change in Control, give written notice of such Change in Control to each holder of Notes. If within 90 days after such
Section 8.7 Mandatory Offer to Prepay Upon Change in Control.
Notice of Change in Control and Change in Control Event
 
Change in Control, the Company does not, for any reason, have an Investment Grade Rating, a "" shall be deemed to have occurred. If a Change in Control Event has occurred, the Company shall promptly give written notice thereof to the holders of Notes, and such notice shall contain and constitute an offer to prepay Notes as described in subparagraph (b) of this and shall be accompanied by the certificate described in subparagraph (e) of this .
Change in Control Event
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(b) The offer to prepay the Notes contemplated by subparagraph (a) of this shall be an offer to prepay, in accordance with and subject to this , all, but not less than all, the Notes held by each holder (in this case only, "" in respect of any Note registered in the name of a nominee for a disclosed beneficial owner shall mean such beneficial owner) on a date specified in such offer (the ""). Such date shall be a Business Day not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after the date of such offer.
Offer to Prepay Notes.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
holder
Proposed Prepayment Date
(c) A holder of Notes may accept the offer to prepay made pursuant to this by causing a written notice of such acceptance to be delivered to the Company not later than 15 days prior to the Proposed Prepayment Date. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond to the offer to prepay made pursuant to this within the specified time period shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder.
Acceptance/Rejection.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(d) Prepayment of the Notes to be prepaid pursuant to this shall be at 100% of the principal amount of such Notes, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment, but in no event with a Make-Whole Amount or other premium. The prepayment shall be made on the Proposed Prepayment Date.
Prepayment.
Section 8.7
(e) . Each offer to prepay the Notes pursuant to this shall be accompanied by a certificate, executed by a Senior Financial Officer and dated the date of such offer, specifying: (i) the Proposed Prepayment Date; (ii) that such offer is made pursuant to this ; (iii) the principal amount of each Note offered to be prepaid; (iv) the interest that would be due on each Note offered to be prepaid, accrued to the Proposed Prepayment Date; (v) that the conditions of this have been fulfilled; (vi) in reasonable detail, the nature of the Change in Control Event; and (vii) any written response from the relevant rating agency.
Officer's Certificate
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(f) shall be deemed to have occurred if any person (as such term is used in Section 13(d) and Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) or related persons constituting a group (as such term is used in Rule 13d-5 under the Exchange Act):
Certain Definitions. "Change in Control"
(i) become the "beneficial owners" (as such term is used in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the total voting power of all classes then outstanding of the Voting Stock of the Company; or
(ii) acquire after the date of the Closing (x) the power to elect, appoint or cause the election or appointment of at least a majority of the members of the board of
 
directors of the Company, through beneficial ownership of the capital stock of the Company or otherwise, or (y) all or substantially all of the assets of the Company.
in respect of any Person means, at the time of determination, at least two of the following ratings of its senior, unsecured, non-credit enhanced, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money: (i) by Standard & Poor's Rating Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, or any successor thereof, "BBB-" or better, (ii) by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereof, "Baa3" or better, or (iii) by any other nationally recognized statistical rating agency, an equivalent or better rating.
"Investment Grade Rating"
(g) All calculations contemplated in this involving the capital stock of any Person shall be made with the assumption that all convertible Securities of such Person then outstanding and all convertible Securities issuable upon the exercise of any warrants, options and other rights outstanding at such time were converted at such time and that all options, warrants and similar rights to acquire shares of capital stock of such Person were exercised at such time.
Section 8.7
SECTION 9. Affirmative Covenants.
The Obligors, jointly and severally, covenant that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
. Without limiting , each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations to which each of them is subject, including, without limitation, ERISA, the USA Patriot Act and Environmental Laws, and will obtain and maintain in effect all licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations necessary to the ownership of their respective properties or to the conduct of their respective businesses, in each case to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations or failures to obtain or maintain in effect such licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.1 Compliance with Law
Section 10.9
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurers, insurance with respect to their respective properties and businesses against such casualties and contingencies, of such types, on such terms and in such amounts (including deductibles, co-insurance and self-insurance, if adequate reserves are maintained with respect thereto) as is customary in the case of entities of established reputations engaged in the same or a similar business and similarly situated.
Section 9.2 Insurance
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain and keep, or cause to be maintained and kept, their respective properties in good repair, working order and condition (other than ordinary wear and tear), so that the business carried on in connection therewith may be properly conducted at all times; that this shall not prevent any Obligor or any Subsidiary from discontinuing the operation and the maintenance of any of its properties if such discontinuance is desirable in the conduct of its business and the Company has concluded that such discontinuance could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.3 Maintenance of Properties
provided
Section 9.3
 
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, file all tax returns required to be filed in any jurisdiction and to pay and discharge all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes, assessments, governmental charges, or levies imposed on them or any of their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent the same have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent and all claims for which sums have become due and payable that have or might become a Lien on properties or assets of any Obligor or any Subsidiary; that no Obligor nor any Subsidiary need pay any such tax, assessment, charge, levy or claim if (a) the amount, applicability or validity thereof is contested by such Obligor or such Subsidiary on a timely basis in good faith and in appropriate proceedings, and the Company or such Obligor or Subsidiary, as the case may be, has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Obligor or such Subsidiary or (b) the nonpayment of all such taxes, assessments, charges, levies and claims in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.4 Payment of Taxes and Claims
provided
. Subject to , the Company will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence. Subject to and , each Obligor will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and that of each of its Subsidiaries (unless merged into the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary) and all rights and franchises of such Obligor and its Subsidiaries unless, in the good faith judgment of the Company, the termination of or failure to preserve and keep in full force and effect such legal existence, right or franchise could not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.5 Legal Existence, Etc
Section 10.5
Section 10.5
Section 10.6
The Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement are and at all times shall rank at least in right of payment with all other present and future unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Obligor which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other unsecured Indebtedness of each such Obligor.
Section 9.6 Notes to Rank Pari Passu.
pari passu
. The Company:
Section 9.7 Additional Obligors; Guaranty by Subsidiaries
(a) will cause each Subsidiary which becomes a guarantor or an obligor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement after the date of Closing to concurrently enter into, in the case of a guarantor, a guaranty agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (as the same may be amended, modified, extended or renewed, the "") or, in the case of an additional obligor, a joinder agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (a ""); and
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
Subsidiary Guaranty
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
Joinder Agreement
(b) may cause any other Subsidiary which is not an obligor or guarantor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement to enter into a Joinder Agreement;
 
and in any such case within three Business Days thereafter will deliver to each of the holders of the Notes the following items:
(i) an executed counterpart of, in the case of a guarantor, a Subsidiary Guaranty or, in the case of an additional obligor, a Joinder Agreement in respect of this Agreement and the Notes;
(ii) a certificate signed by the President, a Vice President or another authorized officer of such Subsidiary making representations and warranties to the effect of those contained in and , but with respect to such Subsidiary, and either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be;
Sections 5.1, 5.2, 5.6
5.7
(iii) such documents and evidence with respect to such Subsidiary as the Required Holders may reasonably request in order to establish the existence and good standing of such Subsidiary and the authorization of the transactions contemplated by either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be; and
(iv) an opinion of counsel satisfactory to the Required Holders to the effect that either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, have been duly authorized, executed and delivered and such agreement or agreements, as the case may be, constitute(s) the legal, valid and binding contract(s) and agreement(s) of such Subsidiary enforceable in accordance with its or their respective terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance, fraudulent transfer and other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors generally and by general principles of equity (whether considered in equity or at law) and will rank at all times at least in right of payment with all other unsecured and unsubordinated Indebtedness of such Subsidiary.
pari passu
(c) Promptly after each time an additional Obligor is added in respect of this Agreement and the Notes pursuant to this , the Obligor Agent shall, at its cost and expense, request in writing that each holder of a Note surrender each Note which it then holds and within twenty Business Days following the date of such request, each holder of a Note shall surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the Obligors (including such additional Obligor) reflecting the addition of any Obligor pursuant to this .
Section 9.7
Section 9.7
. The Obligors will, and will cause each of their Subsidiaries to, maintain proper books of record and account and, in the case of the Company, in conformity with GAAP and all applicable requirements of any Governmental Authority having legal or regulatory jurisdiction over the Company, or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Section 9.8 Books and Records
 
SECTION 10. Negative Covenants.
The Company covenants that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of Consolidated Indebtedness as of the last day of the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended Excess Cash, as of the last day of the same such period, to EBITDA for such most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be greater than 3.25 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.1 Cash Flow Leverage Ratio.
minus
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of EBITDAR to Fixed Charges for the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be less than 1.75 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.2 Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit Consolidated Priority Indebtedness to exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.3 Limitations on Consolidated Priority Indebtedness.
The Company will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent (each of the following, a ):
Section 10.4 Limitation on Liens.
provided
"Permitted Lien"
(a) Liens for taxes, assessments, governmental charges or levies; that payment thereof is not at the time required by ;
provided
Section 9.4
(b) Liens arising under statutes or by operation of law, Liens in connection with worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, social security and other similar laws (including, without limitation, pledges or deposits securing liability to insurance carriers under insurance or self-insurance arrangements), Liens to secure the performance of bids, tenders, trade, government or other similar contracts, obligations for utilities, leases, licenses, statutory obligations, completion guarantees, surety, judgment, appeal or performance bonds, or other similar bonds, or other Liens of like general nature, in any such case incurred in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness; that (i) any such Lien secures only amounts not due and payable or the payment of which is being contested in good faith by appropriate actions or proceedings and (ii) any such Lien does not materially impair the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole or the value of the related property for the purposes of such business;
provided
(c) mechanics', workmen's, materialmen's, attorney's, landlords', carriers' or other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness and in each such case with respect to obligations which are not due or that are bonded or that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
 
(d) Liens of or resulting from any court proceeding, judgment or award, (i) the time for the appeal or petition for rehearing of which shall not have expired, or (ii) in respect of which the Company or a Subsidiary shall be prosecuting an appeal or proceeding for a review and in respect of which a stay of execution pending such appeal or proceeding for review shall have been secured; that the Company or such Subsidiary (1) is contesting such proceeding, judgment or award on a timely basis, in good faith and by appropriate proceedings, and (2) has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be;
provided
(e) Liens securing Indebtedness of a Subsidiary to the Company or to another Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(f) Liens existing as of the date of the Closing and described on hereto;
Schedule 5.15(b)
(g) Liens on property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries created solely for the purpose of securing purchase money indebtedness (including in connection with the acquisition, construction or improvement of property) or Capitalized Lease Obligations and, representing or incurred to finance, refinance or refund the purchase price of property; that no such Lien shall extend to or cover other property of the Company or such Subsidiary other than the respective property so acquired, constructed or improved, and the principal amount of indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall at no time exceed the total purchase price (or cost of construction or improvement) of such property;
provided
(h) Liens existing on property of a Person at the time such Person is consolidated with or merged into the Company or a Subsidiary or becomes a Subsidiary, or any Lien existing on any property acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary at the time such property is so acquired (whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby shall have been assumed); that (i) no such Lien shall have been created or assumed in contemplation of such consolidation or merger or such Person's becoming a Subsidiary or such acquisition of property, (ii) each such Lien shall extend solely to the item or items of property so acquired and, if required by the terms of the instrument originally creating such Lien, other property which is an improvement to or is acquired for specific use in connection with such acquired property;
provided
(i) customary rights of set off, revocation, refund or chargeback under deposit agreements or under the Uniform Commercial Code in favor of banks or other financial institutions where the Company or any Subsidiary maintains deposits in the ordinary course of business;
(j) Liens constituting (i) survey restrictions, encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, condemnations, easements, encroachments, covenants, rights of way, defects, irregularities and rights or restrictions of record on the title or use of real property, and (ii) leases, subleases, licenses or sublicenses granted to others in the
 
ordinary course of business and Liens covering property subject to any lease which was not entered into in violation of this Agreement securing the interest of the lessor or other Person under such lease, which in any such case does not materially detract from the value of the subject property or materially impair the use thereof in the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole;
(k) any encumbrance or restriction (including, but not limited to, put and call agreements, rights of first refusal, and voting or equity holder agreements) with respect to equity or ownership interests in any joint venture or similar arrangement pursuant to any joint venture or similar agreement in any such case not entered into in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness;
(l) Liens other than those permitted by any of the foregoing subsections (a) through (k); provided that all Indebtedness secured by any such Liens, in the aggregate with all other Consolidated Priority Indebtedness at such time, does not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles; and
(m) any extension, renewal or replacement of any Lien permitted by the preceding clauses (e), (f), (g) and (h) of this Section 10.4; provided that (i) no additional property (other than improvements thereon) shall be encumbered by such Liens, (ii) the unpaid principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not be increased on or after the date of such extension, renewal or replacement and (iii) at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default would exist, including, without limitation, under Sections 10.1, 10.2 and 10.3, with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the extension, renewal or replacement of such Lien.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Company covenants that it will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary to secure any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary under the Bank Credit Agreement unless the Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and of the Subsidiary Guarantors under any Subsidiary Guaranty, as applicable, are secured on a pari passu basis by a lien on such property pursuant to documentation, including an intercreditor agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders.
The Company will not consolidate with or merge with any other Person or convey, transfer, sell or lease all or substantially all of its assets in a single transaction or series of transactions to any Person unless:
Section 10.5 Mergers, Consolidations, Etc
.
(a) the successor formed by such consolidation or the survivor of such merger or the Person that acquires by conveyance, transfer, sale or lease all or substantially all of the assets of the Company as an entirety, as the case may be, is a solvent corporation or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the United States or
 
any state thereof (including the District of Columbia), and, if the Company is not such successor or survivor, such successor or survivor (i) shall have executed and delivered to each holder of any Notes its assumption of the due and punctual performance and observance of each covenant and condition of this Agreement and the Notes and (ii) shall have caused to be delivered to each holder of any Notes an opinion of nationally recognized independent counsel or other independent counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders, to the effect that all agreements or instruments effecting such assumption are enforceable in accordance with their terms and comply with the terms hereof;
(b) each Subsidiary Guarantor and each Obligor (other than the Company) shall have affirmed in writing its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be (unless and to the extent any such Subsidiary Guaranty or the obligations of any such Obligor, as the case may be, have been discharged or released as expressly permitted by or otherwise in accordance with the terms of this Agreement); and
Section 2.2(a)
(c) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such transaction.
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
Except as permitted by , the Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of, including by way of merger (collectively a ), any assets, including capital stock of Subsidiaries, in one or a series of transactions, to any Person, other than:
Section 10.6 Sale of Assets.
Section 10.5
"Disposition"
(a) Dispositions in the ordinary course of business;
(b) Dispositions by a Subsidiary to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary or by the Company to a Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(c) Dispositions of the Company's interest in Chem-Mod LLC, Chem-Mod International LLC, C-Quest Technologies LLC or C-Quest Technologies International LLC; or
(d) Dispositions not otherwise permitted bythrough, inclusive, provided that:
Sections 10.6(a)
10.6(c)
(i) in the good faith opinion of the Company, the Disposition is in exchange for consideration having a fair market value at least equal to that of the property exchanged and is in the best interest of the Company or such Subsidiary;
(ii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
 
end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such Disposition; and
(iii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, the aggregate net book value of all assets that were the subject of any Disposition occurring in the then current fiscal year would not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Assets as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal year of the Company, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may, or may permit a Subsidiary to, make a Disposition and the assets subject to such Disposition shall not be subject to or included in the foregoing limitation and computation contained in clause (iii) of the preceding sentence if, within 365 days of such Disposition:
(1) the net proceeds from such Disposition are reinvested in productive assets to be used in the existing business of the Company or a Subsidiary; or
(2) the net proceeds from such Disposition are applied to the payment or prepayment of the Notes or any other outstanding Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary ranking with or senior to the Notes (other than Indebtedness of the Company owing to a Subsidiary or an Affiliate or Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or an Affiliate).
pari passu
For purposes of foregoing clause (2), the Obligors shall offer to prepay (on a Business Day not less than 30 or more than 60 days following such offer) the Notes on a pro rata basis with any such other Indebtedness that the Company elects to include in such offer at a price of 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment (but in no event with a Make Whole Amount or other premium); provided that if any holder of the Notes declines or rejects such offer, the net proceeds that would have been paid to such holder may be used by the Company for general corporate purposes. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond in writing not later than fifteen Business Days prior to the proposed prepayment date to an offer to prepay made pursuant to this shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder. To the extent that any holder of the Notes rejects or is deemed to have rejected such offer of prepayment, the Company may use the aggregate amount of such prepayments so rejected for general corporate purposes.
Section 10.6
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to enter into directly or indirectly any Material transaction or Material group of related transactions (including without limitation the purchase, lease, sale or exchange of properties of any kind or the rendering of any service) with any Affiliate (other than the Company or another Subsidiary), except upon terms and conditions which are no less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than would be obtainable in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person not an Affiliate and except for benefit and compensation plans and arrangements approved by the Board of Directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any such Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary.
Section 10.7 Transactions with Affiliates
 
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to engage in any business if, as a result, the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, would then be engaged would be substantially changed from the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, are engaged on the date of this Agreement.
Section 10.8 Line of Business
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to (a) become a Person described or designated in the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List of the Office of Foreign Assets Control or in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism Order or (b) knowingly engage in any dealings or transactions with any such Person.
Section 10.9 Terrorism Sanctions Regulations
SECTION 11. Events of Default.
An shall exist if any of the following conditions or events shall occur and be continuing:
"Event of Default"
(a) the Obligors default in the payment of any principal or Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Note when the same becomes due and payable, whether at maturity or at a date fixed for prepayment or by declaration or otherwise; or
(b) the Obligors default in the payment of any interest on any Note for more than five Business Days after the same becomes due and payable; or
(c) the Company defaults in the performance of or compliance with any term contained in or or; or
Section 7.1(d)
Sections 10.1, 10.2
10.3
(d) the Obligors default in the performance of or compliance with any term contained herein (other than those referred to in , and ) and such default is not remedied within 45 days after the earlier of (i) a Responsible Officer obtaining actual knowledge of such default and (ii) the Company receiving written notice of such default from any holder of a Note (any such written notice to be identified as a "notice of default" and to refer specifically to this ; or
Sections 11(a)
(b) 
(c)
Section 11(d)
)
(e) (i) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of the Company or by any officer of the Company in this Agreement or in any writing furnished by the Company pursuant to this Agreement, proves to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made, (ii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of an Obligor (other than the Company) or by any officer of an Obligor (other than the Company) in this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement or in any writing furnished by an Obligor (other than the Company) pursuant to this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or (iii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of a Subsidiary Guarantor or by any officer of a Subsidiary Guarantor in any Subsidiary Guaranty or in any writing furnished by a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to any Subsidiary Guaranty, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
 
(f) (i) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default (as principal or as guarantor or other surety) in the payment of any principal of or premium or make-whole amount or interest on any Indebtedness that is outstanding in an aggregate principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets beyond any period of grace provided with respect thereto, or (ii) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default in the performance of or compliance with any term of any evidence of any Indebtedness in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets or of any mortgage, indenture or other agreement relating thereto or any other condition exists, and as a consequence of such default or condition such Indebtedness has become, or has been declared, due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment, or (iii) as a consequence of the occurrence or continuation of any event or condition (other than the passage of time or the right of the holder of Indebtedness to convert such Indebtedness into equity interests), the Company or any Subsidiary has become obligated to purchase or repay Indebtedness before its regular maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets; or
(g) any Obligor or any Material Subsidiary (i) is generally not paying, or admits in writing its inability to pay, its debts as they become due, (ii) files, or consents by answer or otherwise to the filing against it of, a petition for relief or reorganization or arrangement or any other petition in bankruptcy, for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar law of any jurisdiction, (iii) makes an assignment of any substantial part of its property for the benefit of its creditors, (iv) consents to the appointment of a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, (v) is finally adjudicated as insolvent or to be liquidated, or (vi) takes corporate action for the purpose of any of the foregoing; or
(h) a court or Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction enters an order appointing, without consent by any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, or constituting an order for relief or approving a petition for relief or reorganization or any other petition in bankruptcy or for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy or insolvency law of any jurisdiction, or ordering the dissolution, winding-up or liquidation of any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, or any such petition shall be filed against any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries and such petition shall not be dismissed within 60 days; or
(i) a final judgment or judgments for the payment of money aggregating in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets (excluding for purposes of such determination such amount of any insurance proceeds paid by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of such judgment or judgments or unconditionally acknowledged in writing to be payable by the insurance
 
carrier that issued the related insurance policy) are rendered against one or more of the Company and its Subsidiaries and which judgments are not, within 60 days after entry thereof, bonded, discharged or stayed pending appeal, or are not discharged within 60 days after the expiration of such stay; or
(j) if (i) any Plan shall fail to satisfy the minimum funding standards of ERISA or the Code for any plan year or part thereof or a waiver of such standards or extension of any amortization period is sought or granted under section 412 of the Code, (ii) a notice of intent to terminate any Plan shall have been or is reasonably expected within the immediately following two-month period, to be filed with the PBGC or the PBGC shall have instituted proceedings under ERISA Section 4042 to terminate or appoint a trustee to administer any Plan or the PBGC shall have notified the Company or any ERISA Affiliate that a Plan may become a subject of any such proceedings, (iii) the aggregate "amount of unfunded benefit liabilities" (within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(18) of ERISA) under all Plans, determined in accordance with Title IV of ERISA, shall exceed the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets, (iv) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate shall have incurred or is reasonably expected to incur any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, (v) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate withdraws from any Multiemployer Plan, or (vi) the Company or any Subsidiary establishes or amends any employee welfare benefit plan that provides post-employment welfare benefits in a manner that would increase the liability of the Company or any Subsidiary thereunder; and any such event or events described in clauses (i) through (vi) above, either individually or together with any other such event or events, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(k) any Subsidiary Guaranty (once in full force and effect) shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such Subsidiary Guaranty is invalid, void or unenforceable or any Subsidiary Guarantor which is a party to such Subsidiary Guaranty shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under such Subsidiary Guaranty, but excluding any Subsidiary Guaranty which ceases to be in full force and effect in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement; or
Section 2.2
(l) the obligations of any Obligor shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such obligations are invalid, void or unenforceable or any Obligor shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under this Agreement or the Notes, but excluding any Obligor which is released in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 2.2
As used in , the terms "employee benefit plan" and "employee welfare benefit plan" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in Section 3 of ERISA.
Section 11(j)
 
SECTION 12. Remedies on Default, Etc.
. (a) If an Event of Default with respect to an Obligor described in or  (other than an Event of Default described in clause (i) of or described in clause (vi) of by virtue of the fact that such clause encompasses clause (i) of ) has occurred, all the Notes then outstanding shall automatically become immediately due and payable.
Section 12.1 Acceleration
Section 11(g)
(h)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
(b) If any other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Required Holders may at any time at their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes then outstanding to be immediately due and payable.
(c) If any Event of Default described in or has occurred and is continuing, any holder or holders of Notes at the time outstanding affected by such Event of Default may at any time, at its or their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes held by it or them to be immediately due and payable.
Section 11(a) 
(b)
Upon any Note becoming due and payable under this , whether automatically or by declaration, such Note will forthwith mature and the entire unpaid principal amount of such Note, plus (i) all accrued and unpaid interest thereon (including, but not limited to, interest accrued thereon at the Default Rate) and (ii) the Make-Whole Amount determined in respect of such principal amount (to the full extent permitted by applicable law), shall all be immediately due and payable, in each and every case without presentment, demand, protest or further notice, all of which are hereby waived. Each Obligor acknowledges, and the parties hereto agree, that each holder of a Note has the right to maintain its investment in the Notes free from repayment by any Obligor or Obligors (except as herein specifically provided for), and that the provision for payment of a Make-Whole Amount by the Obligors in the event that any Notes are prepaid or are accelerated as a result of an Event of Default, is intended to provide compensation for the deprivation of such right under such circumstances.
Section 12.1
. If any Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, and irrespective of whether any Notes have become or have been declared immediately due and payable under , the holder of any Note at the time outstanding may proceed to protect and enforce the rights of such holder by an action at law, suit in equity or other appropriate proceeding, whether for the specific performance of any agreement contained herein or in any Note, or for an injunction against a violation of any of the terms hereof or thereof, or in aid of the exercise of any power granted hereby or thereby or by law or otherwise.
Section 12.2 Other Remedies
Section 12.1
. At any time after any Notes have been declared due and payable pursuant to or , the Required Holders, by written notice to the Company, may rescind and annul any such declaration and its consequences if (a) the Obligors have paid all overdue interest on such Notes, all principal of and Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Notes that are due and payable and are unpaid other than by reason of such declaration, and all interest on such overdue principal and Make-Whole Amount, if any, and (to the extent permitted by applicable law) any overdue interest in respect of such Notes, at the Default Rate, (b) the Obligors shall not have paid any amounts which have become due solely by reason of such declaration, (c) all Events of Default and Defaults, other than non-payment of amounts that
Section 12.3 Rescission
Section 12.1(b)
(c)
 
have become due solely by reason of such declaration, have been cured or have been waived pursuant to , and (d) no judgment or decree has been entered for the payment of any monies due pursuant hereto or to such Notes. No rescission and annulment under this will extend to or affect any subsequent Event of Default or Default or impair any right consequent thereon.
Section 17
Section 12.3
. No course of dealing and no delay on the part of any holder of any Note in exercising any right, power or remedy shall operate as a waiver thereof or otherwise prejudice such holder's rights, powers or remedies. No right, power or remedy conferred by this Agreement or by any Note upon any holder thereof shall be exclusive of any other right, power or remedy referred to herein or therein or now or hereafter available at law, in equity, by statute or otherwise. Without limiting the obligations of the Obligors under , the Obligors will pay to the holder of each Note on demand such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover all costs and expenses of such holder incurred in any enforcement or collection under this , including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees, expenses and disbursements.
Section 12.4 No Waivers or Election of Remedies, Expenses, Etc
Section 15
Section 12
SECTION 13. Registration; Exchange; Substitution of Notes
. The Obligor Agent shall keep at its principal executive office a register for the registration and registration of transfers of Notes. The name and address of each holder of one or more Notes, each transfer thereof and the name and address of each transferee of one or more Notes shall be registered in such register. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Person in whose name any Note shall be registered shall be deemed and treated as the owner and holder thereof for all purposes hereof, and the Obligor Agent shall not be affected by any notice or knowledge to the contrary. The Obligor Agent shall give to any holder of a Note that is an Institutional Investor promptly upon request therefor, a complete and correct copy of the names and addresses of all registered holders of Notes.
Section 13.1 Registration of Notes
. Upon surrender of any Note to the Obligor Agent at the address of the Company and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in for registration of transfer or exchange (and in the case of a surrender for registration of transfer accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed by the registered holder of such Note or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing and accompanied by the relevant name, address and other information for notices of each transferee of such Note or part thereof), within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, execute and deliver, at the Obligors' expense (except as provided below), one or more new Notes (as requested by the holder thereof) in exchange therefor and in an aggregate principal amount equal to the unpaid principal amount of the surrendered Note. Each such new Note shall be payable to such Person as such holder may request and shall be substantially in the form of . Each such new Note shall be dated and bear interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on the surrendered Note or dated the date of the surrendered Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon. The Obligor Agent may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any stamp tax or governmental charge imposed in respect of any such transfer of Notes. Notes shall not be transferred in denominations of less than $100,000; that if necessary to enable the registration of
Section 13.2 Transfer and Exchange of Notes
Section 18(iii))
Exhibit 1
provided
 
transfer by a holder of its entire holding of Notes, one Note may be in a denomination of less than $100,000. Any transferee, by its acceptance of a Note registered in its name (or the name of its nominee), shall be deemed to have made the representations set forth in and with respect to the Notes and, in addition, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption.The Obligors shall not, however, be required to register any transfer of a Note if, acting in its reasonable discretion, the Obligor Agent believes such transfer is in violation of applicable law or the representations of the transferee set forth in and are not true and correct.
Section 6.1
Section 6.2
Sections 6.1
6.2
. Upon receipt by the Obligor Agent at the address and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in ) of evidence reasonably satisfactory to it of the ownership of and the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any Note (which evidence shall be, in the case of an Institutional Investor, notice from such Institutional Investor of such ownership and such loss, theft, destruction or mutilation), and
Section 13.3 Replacement of Notes
Section 18(iii)
(a) in the case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it ( that if the holder of such Note is, or is a nominee for, an original Purchaser or another holder of a Note with a minimum net worth of at least $50,000,000 or a Qualified Institutional Buyer, such Person's own unsecured agreement of indemnity shall be deemed to be satisfactory), or
provided
(b) in the case of mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation thereof,
within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, at their own expense, execute and deliver, in lieu thereof, a new Note, dated and bearing interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note or dated the date of such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon.
SECTION 14. Payments on Notes.
. Subject to , payments of principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest becoming due and payable on the Notes shall be made in Itasca, Illinois at the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction. The Company may at any time, by notice to each holder of a Note, change the place of payment of the Notes so long as such place of payment shall be either the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction or the principal office of a bank or trust company in Chicago, Illinois.
Section 14.1 Place of Payment
Section 14.2
. So long as any Purchaser or its nominee shall be the holder of any Note, and notwithstanding anything contained in or in such Note to the contrary, the Obligors will pay all sums becoming due on such Note for principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest by the method and at the address specified for such
Section 14.2 Home Office Payment
Section 14.1
 
purpose below such Purchaser's name in , or by such other method or at such other address as such Purchaser shall have from time to time specified to the Company in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of such Note or the making of any notation thereon, except that upon written request of the Company made concurrently with or reasonably promptly after payment or prepayment in full of any Note, such Purchaser shall surrender such Note for cancellation, reasonably promptly after any such request, to the Obligor Agent at the Company's principal executive office or at the place of payment most recently designated by the Company pursuant to . Prior to any sale or other disposition of any Note held by a Purchaser or its nominee, such Purchaser will, at its election, either endorse thereon the amount of principal paid thereon and the last date to which interest has been paid thereon or surrender such Note to the Obligor Agent in exchange for a new Note or Notes pursuant to . The Obligors will afford the benefits of this to any Institutional Investor that is the direct or indirect transferee of any Note purchased by a Purchaser under this Agreement and that has made the same agreement relating to such Note as the Purchasers have made in this .
Schedule A
Section 14.1
Section 13.2
Section 14.2
Section 14.2
SECTION 15. Expenses, Etc.
. Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby are consummated, the Obligors will pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees of a special counsel and, if reasonably required by the Required Holders, local or other counsel) incurred by the Purchasers and each other holder of a Note in connection with such transactions and in connection with any amendments, waivers or consents under or in respect of this Agreement, any Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty (whether or not such amendment, waiver or consent becomes effective), including, without limitation: (a) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in enforcing or defending (or determining whether or how to enforce or defend) any rights under this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty or in responding to any subpoena or other legal process or informal investigative demand issued in connection with this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty, or by reason of being a holder of any Note, (b) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the insolvency or bankruptcy of any Obligor or any Subsidiary or in connection with any work-out or restructuring of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the Notes, and (c) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the delivery of any Subsidiary Guaranty or Joinder Agreement as contemplated by . The Obligors will pay, and will save each Purchaser and each other holder of a Note harmless from, all claims in respect of any fees, costs or expenses, if any, of brokers and finders (other than those, if any, retained by a Purchaser or other holder in connection with its purchase of any Notes).
Section 15.1 Transaction Expenses
Section 9.7
. The obligations of the Obligors under this will survive the payment or transfer of any Note, the enforcement, amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any Notes, and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 15.2 Survival
Section 15
SECTION 16. Survival of Representations and Warranties; Entire Agreement.
All representations and warranties contained herein shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Notes, the purchase or transfer by any Purchaser of any Note or portion thereof or interest therein and the payment of any Note, and may be relied upon by
 
any Obligor and any subsequent holder of a Note, regardless of any investigation made at any time by or on behalf of such Purchaser or any other holder of a Note. All statements contained in any certificate or other instrument delivered by or on behalf of any Obligor pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed representations and warranties of the Obligors under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement and the Notes embody the entire agreement and understanding between each Purchaser and the Obligors and supersede all prior agreements and understandings (written or oral) relating to the subject matter hereof.
SECTION 17. Amendment and Waiver.
. This Agreement, the Notes, any Joinder Agreement and any Subsidiary Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof or of any Joinder Agreement, Subsidiary Guaranty or the Notes may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively and for a specified time period or permanently), with (and only with) the written consent of the Obligors and the Required Holders, except that (a) no amendment or waiver of any of the provisions of or hereof, or any defined term (as it is used therein), will be effective as to any Purchaser unless consented to by such Purchaser in writing, and (b) no such amendment or waiver may, without the written consent of the holder of each Note at the time outstanding affected thereby, (i) subject to the provisions of relating to acceleration or rescission, change the amount or time of any prepayment or payment of principal of, or reduce the rate or change the time of payment or method of computation of interest or of the Make-Whole Amount on, the Notes, (ii) change the percentage of the principal amount of the Notes the holders of which are required to consent to any such amendment or waiver, or (iii) amend any of or .
Section 17.1 Requirements
Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
21
Section 12
Section 8, 11(a), 11(b), 12, 17
20
.
Section 17.2 Solicitation of Holders of Notes
(a) . The Company will provide each holder of the Notes (irrespective of the amount of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof, of the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement. The Company will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this to each holder of outstanding Notes promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the requisite holders of Notes as specified in .
Solicitation
Section 17
Section 17.1
(b) . None of the Obligors will directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, or grant any security or provide other credit support, to any holder of Notes as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any holder of Notes of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof or of any Note or any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted or other credit support concurrently provided, on the same terms, ratably to each holder of Notes then outstanding even if such holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
Payment
 
(c) Any consent made pursuant to this by the holder of any Note that has transferred or has agreed to transfer such Note to any of the Obligors, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate of the Obligors and has provided or has agreed to provide such written consent as a condition to such transfer, shall be void and of no force except solely as to such holder, and any amendments effected or to be effected or granted that would not have been or would not be so effected or granted but for such consents or waivers granted (and the consents of all other holders of Notes that were acquired under the same or similar conditions) shall be void and of no force except solely as to such transferring holder.
Consent in Contemplation of Transfer.
Section 17.2
. Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all holders of the Notes and is binding upon them and upon each future holder of any Note and upon the Obligors without regard to whether such Note has been marked to indicate such amendment or waiver. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant, agreement, Default or Event of Default not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Obligors and the holder of any Note nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder, under any Note or under any Subsidiary Guaranty shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any holder of such Note. As used herein, the term "this Agreement" and references thereto shall mean this Agreement as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 17.3 Binding Effect, Etc
Section 17
. Solely for the purpose of determining whether the holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Agreement, the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement, or have directed the taking of any action provided herein, in the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement to be taken upon the direction of the holders of a specified percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Obligor or any of its Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
Section 17.4 Notes Held by the Obligors, Etc
SECTION 18. Notices.
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(i) if to any Purchaser or its nominee, to such Purchaser or nominee at the address specified for such communications in , or at such other address as such Purchaser or nominee shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing,
Schedule A
(ii) if to any other holder of any Note, to such holder at such address as such other holder shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing, or
(iii) if to any of the Obligors, c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning hereof to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as the Company shall have specified to the holder of each Note in writing.
 
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 18
SECTION 19. Reproduction of Documents.
This Agreement or any Subsidiary Guaranty and all documents relating thereto, including, without limitation, (a) consents, waivers and modifications that may hereafter be executed, (b) documents received by any Purchaser at the Closing (except the Notes themselves), and (c) financial statements, certificates and other information previously or hereafter furnished to any Purchaser, may be reproduced by such Purchaser by any photographic, photostatic, electronic, digital or other similar process and such Purchaser may destroy any original document so reproduced. Each Obligor agrees and stipulates that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, any such reproduction shall be admissible in evidence as the original itself in any judicial or administrative proceeding (whether or not the original is in existence and whether or not such reproduction was made by such Purchaser in the regular course of business) and any enlargement, facsimile or further reproduction of such reproduction shall likewise be admissible in evidence. This shall not prohibit the Obligors or any other holder of Notes from contesting any such reproduction to the same extent that it could contest the original, or from introducing evidence to demonstrate the inaccuracy of any such reproduction.
Section 19
SECTION 20. Confidential Information.
For the purposes of this , means information delivered to any Purchaser by or on behalf of any Obligor or any Subsidiary in connection with the transactions contemplated by or otherwise pursuant to this Agreement and not previously disclosed in any filings by the Company with the SEC; that such term does not include information that (a) was publicly known or otherwise known to such Purchaser prior to the time of such disclosure, (b) subsequently becomes publicly known through no act or omission by such Purchaser or any Person acting on such Purchaser's behalf, (c) otherwise becomes known to such Purchaser other than through disclosure by an Obligor or any Subsidiary, or is known by such Purchaser to be under an obligation not to transmit such information to such Purchaser or (d) constitutes financial statements delivered to such Purchaser under that are otherwise publicly available. Each Purchaser will maintain the confidentiality of such Confidential Information in accordance with procedures adopted by such Purchaser in good faith to protect confidential information of third parties delivered to such Purchaser; that such Purchaser may deliver or disclose Confidential Information to (i) its directors, trustees, officers, employees, agents, attorneys and Affiliates (to the extent such disclosure reasonably relates to the administration of the investment represented by its Notes), (ii) its financial advisors and other professional advisors who agree to hold confidential the Confidential Information substantially in accordance with the terms of this , (iii) any other holder of any Note, (iv) any Institutional Investor to which it sells or offers to sell such Note or any part thereof or any participation therein (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (v) any Person from which it offers to purchase any security of an Obligor (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ),
Section 20
"Confidential Information"
provided
Section 7.1
provided
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
 
(vi) any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over such Purchaser, (vii) the NAIC or the SVO or, in each case, any similar organization, or any nationally recognized rating agency that requires access to information about such Purchaser's investment portfolio or (viii) any other Person to which such delivery or disclosure may be necessary or appropriate (w) to effect compliance with any law, rule, regulation or order applicable to such Purchaser, (x) in response to any subpoena or other legal process, (y) in connection with any litigation to which such Purchaser is a party or (z) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, to the extent such Purchaser may reasonably determine such delivery and disclosure to be necessary or appropriate in the enforcement or for the protection of the rights and remedies under such Purchaser's Notes and this Agreement. Each holder of a Note, by its acceptance of a Note, will be deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to be entitled to the benefits of this as though it were a party to this Agreement. On reasonable request by the Company in connection with the delivery to any holder of a Note of information required to be delivered to such holder under this Agreement or requested by such holder (other than a holder that is a party to this Agreement or its nominee), such holder will, as a condition precedent to receiving such information, enter into an agreement with the Company embodying the provisions of this and providing the Company assurances that such holder will enter into further agreements with language no more burdensome on the holder than the language contained in this as reasonably requested by the Company in order to comply with Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC. The Obligors shall reimburse such holder's reasonable expenses incurred in connection with entering into any such agreement.
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
SECTION 21. Substitution of Purchaser.
Each Purchaser shall have the right to substitute any one of its Affiliates as the purchaser of the Notes that it has agreed to purchase hereunder, by written notice to the Obligors, which notice shall be signed by both such Purchaser and such Affiliate, shall contain such Affiliate's agreement to be bound by this Agreement and shall contain a confirmation by such Affiliate of the accuracy with respect to it of the representations set forth in . Upon receipt of such notice, any reference to such Purchaser in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall be deemed to refer to such Affiliate in lieu of such original Purchaser. In the event that such Affiliate is so substituted as a Purchaser hereunder and such Affiliate thereafter transfers to such original Purchaser all of the Notes then held by such Affiliate, upon receipt by the Company of notice of such transfer, any reference to such Affiliate as a "Purchaser" in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall no longer be deemed to refer to such Affiliate, but shall refer to such original Purchaser, and such original Purchaser shall again have all the rights of an original holder of the Notes under this Agreement.
Section 6
Section 21
Section 21
SECTION 22. Miscellaneous.
. All covenants and other agreements contained in this Agreement by or on behalf of any of the parties hereto bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns (including, without limitation, any subsequent holder of a Note) whether so expressed or not.
Section 22.1 Successors and Assigns
. Anything in this Agreement or the Notes to the contrary notwithstanding (but without limiting the requirement in
Section 22.2 Payments Due on Non-Business Days
Section 8.4
 
that the notice of any optional prepayment specify a Business Day as the date fixed for such prepayment), any payment of principal of or Make-Whole Amount or interest on any Note that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; that if the maturity date of any Note is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
provided
. All accounting terms used herein which are not expressly defined in this Agreement have the meanings respectively given to them in accordance with GAAP. Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, any calculation required by, or for purposes of determining compliance with, and shall be calculated using Agreement Accounting Principles and each financial or accounting term used in each such Section shall have the meaning given to them in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of the date of Closing applied on a consistent basis with that used in preparation of the most recent audited consolidated financial statements listed in (whether, in the case of capitalized terms defined in this Agreement, the definition expressly refers to Agreement Accounting Principles or not). For purposes of determining compliance with, and, any election by the Company to measure an item of Indebtedness using fair value (as permitted by Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 159 or any similar accounting standard) shall be disregarded and such determination shall be made as if such election had not been made.
Section 22.3 Accounting Terms
Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4
10.6
Schedule 5.5
Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4
10.6
. Any provision of this Agreement that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.4 Severability
. Each covenant contained herein shall be construed (absent express provision to the contrary) as being independent of each other covenant contained herein, so that compliance with any one covenant shall not (absent such an express contrary provision) be deemed to excuse compliance with any other covenant. Where any provision herein refers to action to be taken by any Person, or which such Person is prohibited from taking, such provision shall be applicable whether such action is taken directly or indirectly by such Person.
Section 22.5 Construction, Etc
For the avoidance of doubt, all Schedules and Exhibits attached to this Agreement shall be deemed to be a part hereof.
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
Section 22.6 Counterparts
 
. This Agreement shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the parties shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinoisexcluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
Section 22.7 Governing Law
,
(a) Each Obligor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the Notes. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Obligor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
Section 22.8 Jurisdiction and Process; Waiver of Jury Trial.
(b) Each Obligor consents to process being served by or on behalf of any holder of Notes in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in by mailing a copy thereof by registered or certified mail (or any substantially similar form of mail), postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to it at its address specified in or at such other address of which such holder shall then have been notified pursuant to said Section. Each Obligor agrees that such service upon receipt (i) shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon it in any such suit, action or proceeding and (ii) shall, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, be taken and held to be valid personal service upon and personal delivery to it. Notices hereunder shall be conclusively presumed received as evidenced by a delivery receipt furnished by the United States Postal Service or any reputable commercial delivery service.
Section 22.8(a)
Section 18
(c) Nothing in this shall affect the right of any holder of a Note to serve process in any manner permitted by law, or limit any right that the holders of any of the Notes may have to bring proceedings against an Obligor in the courts of any appropriate jurisdiction or to enforce in any lawful manner a judgment obtained in one jurisdiction in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.8
(d) T A, N .
HE
PARTIES
HERETO
HEREBY
WAIVE
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
ACTION
BROUGHT
ON
OR
WITH
RESPECT
TO
THIS
GREEMENT
THE
OTES
OR
ANY
OTHER
DOCUMENT
EXECUTED
IN
CONNECTION
HEREWITH
OR
THEREWITH
. (a) The obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and the Notes are joint and several primary obligations of each Obligor regardless of which Obligor actually receives the proceeds of any Notes or the manner in which the Obligors, any Purchaser or any holder thereof accounts for such Notes on its books and records.
Section 22.9 Nature of Obligations
(b) Each Obligor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such holder of Notes upon this Agreement (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in this Agreement
 
or the Notes shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Agreement and the Notes);
(2) demand of payment by any holder of Notes from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any holder of Notes or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Obligor.
The obligations of each Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes and the rights of any holder of Notes to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, the obligations of the Obligors hereunder and under the Notes shall be binding upon the Obligors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due under this Agreement shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Obligors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of any Obligor or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of any Obligor to issue the Notes or any Obligor to execute and deliver this Agreement or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of any Obligor or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of any Obligor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor or any other Person; or
 
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of any Obligor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other , whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
force majeure
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Obligor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement; or
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Obligor of failure of an Obligor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor or to any other Person or to any other Agreement or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other agreement, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
 
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor or any other Person or any release of any Obligor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Obligor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Obligor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Obligor or other Person under this Agreement or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Agreement and the Notes and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Obligor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and this Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or this Agreement and that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
provided
(d) To the extent of any payments made under this Agreement, each Obligor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Obligors, but such Obligor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the holder of Notes for which full payment has not been made or provided for and,
 
to that end, such Obligor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(e) Each Obligor agrees that to the extent an Obligor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Obligors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Obligors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any holder of a Note from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
(f) No holder of a Note shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Obligors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Obligors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Obligors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Obligors' burden, any right to which each Obligor hereby expressly waives.
(g) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, including this , all obligations and liabilities of an Obligor under this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement by reason of the express provisions of of this Agreement or is otherwise released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 22.9
Section 2.2
. (a) Each Obligor (other than the Company) by its execution of this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement irrevocably appoints the Company to act on its behalf as its agent (the ) in relation to this Agreement and the Notes and irrevocably authorizes:
Section 22.10 Obligor Agent
"Obligor Agent"
(i) the Company on its behalf to supply all information concerning itself contemplated by this Agreement to the holders of a Note and to give all notices and instructions, to execute on its behalf any Joinder Agreement, to make such agreements and to effect the relevant amendments, supplements and variations capable of being given, made or effected by any Obligor notwithstanding that they may affect the Obligor, without further reference to or the consent of that Obligor; and
(ii) each holder of a Note to give any notice, demand or other communication to that Obligor pursuant to the this Agreement and the Notes to the Company,
 
and in each case the Obligors shall be bound as though that Obligor itself had given the notices and instructions or executed or made the agreements or effected the amendments, supplements or variations, or received the relevant notice, demand or other communication.
(b) Every act, omission, agreement, undertaking, settlement, waiver, amendment, supplement, variation, notice or other communication given or made by the Obligor Agent or given to the Obligor Agent under this Agreement and the Notes on behalf of another Obligor or in connection with this Agreement and the Notes (whether or not known to any other Obligor and whether occurring before or after such other Obligor became an Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes) shall be binding for all purposes on that Obligor as if that Obligor had expressly made, given or concurred with it. In the event of any conflict between any notices or other communications of the Obligor Agent and any other Obligor, those of the Obligor Agent shall prevail.
 
If you are in agreement with the foregoing, please sign the form of agreement on a counterpart of this Agreement and return it to the Company, whereupon this Agreement shall become a binding agreement between you and the Obligors.
 
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed to as of the date thereof.
 
 
 
As used herein, the following terms have the respective meanings set forth below or set forth in the Section hereof following such term:
means, at any time, and with respect to any Person, any other Person that at such time directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries Controls, or is Controlled by, or is under common Control with, such first Person, and with respect to the Company, shall include any Person beneficially owning or holding, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests of the Company or any Subsidiary or any corporation of which the Company and its Subsidiaries beneficially own or hold, in the aggregate, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests. As used in this definition, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise. Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to an is a reference to an Affiliate of the Company.
"Affiliate"
"Control"
"Affiliate"
"" means this Note Purchase Agreement among the Obligors, Prudential and the Purchasers dated November 30, 2009.
Agreement
means generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of August 3, 2007 applied on a basis consistent with that used in the preparation of the audited consolidated financial statements of the Company for the year ended December 31, 2006.
"Agreement Accounting Principles"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
"AJG Brokerage"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation.
"AJG Illinois"
means Executive Order No. 13,224 of September 24, 2001, Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions with Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit or Support Terrorism, 66 U.S. Fed. Reg. 49,079 (2001), as amended.
"Anti-Terrorism Order"
means Amended and Restated Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of December 19, 2007, among the Obligors, the lenders from time to time party thereto, Harris N.A., as administrative agent, as the same may from time to time be amended, modified, supplemented, renewed, extended, refinanced or replaced.
"Bank Credit Agreement"
means (a) for the purposes of only, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed, and (b) for the purposes of any other provision of this Agreement, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in Chicago, Illinois or New York, New York are required or authorized to be closed.
"Business Day"
Section 8.6
means any lease of property which, in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, is required to be capitalized on the balance sheet of the lessee.
"Capital Lease"
 
means the amount of the liability shown on the balance sheet of any Person in respect of a Capital Lease as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation"
is defined in
"Change in Control"
Section 8.7(f).
is defined in .
"Change in Control Event"
Section 8.7(a)
is defined in .
"Closing"
Section 3
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time.
"Code"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation, or any successor that becomes such in the manner prescribed in .
"Company"
Section 10.5
is defined in .
"Confidential Information"
Section 20
means, without duplication, all Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis eliminating intercompany items.
"Consolidated Indebtedness"
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the total stockholders' equity (including capital stock, additional paid-in capital and retained earnings after deducting treasury stock, but excluding minority interests in Subsidiaries) which would appear on the balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Net Worth"
means, without duplication, all Priority Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis eliminating inter-company items.
"Consolidated Priority Indebtedness"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, total assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Total Assets"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, the sum of (a) Consolidated Indebtedness (b) Consolidated Net Worth.
"Consolidated Total Capitalization"
plus
means an event or condition the occurrence or existence of which would, with the lapse of time or the giving of notice or both, become an Event of Default.
"Default"
means, for each Note, that rate of interest stated in clause (b) of the first paragraph of such Note.
"Default Rate"
is defined in .
"Disclosure Documents"
Section 5.3
 
is defined in .
"Disposition"
Section 10.6
means each Subsidiary of the Company which is organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
means, for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of:
"EBITDA"
(a) Net Income for such period
plus
(b) to the extent deducted in determining Net Income:
(i) income and franchise taxes;
(ii) Interest Expense;
(iii) amortization;
(iv) depreciation;
(v) non-cash stock option expense; and
(vi) non-cash restructuring charges.
means, for any period, EBITDA , to the extent deducted in determining Net Income, Rental Expense.
"EBITDAR"
plus
is defined in .
"Electronic Delivery"
Section 7.1(a)
means any and all Federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including but not limited to those related to Hazardous Materials.
"Environmental Laws"
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"ERISA"
means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that is treated as a single employer together with the Company under Section 414 of the Code.
"ERISA Affiliate"
is defined in .
"Event of Default"
Section 11
means, as of any date the same is to be determined, all cash on the books of the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries which is maintained in accounts located in the United States of America and which is in excess of $25,000,000, but excluding restricted cash as set forth in the financial statements of the Company delivered pursuant to .
"Excess Cash"
Section 7.1
 
means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Exchange Act"
means for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of Interest Expense paid or payable in cash for such period and Rental Expense for such period.
"Fixed Charges"
is defined in .
"Form 10-K"
Section 7.1(b)
is defined in .
"Form 10-Q"
Section 7.1(a)
means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect from time to time in the United States of America.
"GAAP"
means Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Bassett"
means Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Benefit"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"Gallagher Risk"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Service"
means:
"Governmental Authority"
(a) the government of
(i) the United States of America or any State or other political subdivision thereof, or
(ii) any other jurisdiction in which the Company or any Subsidiary conducts all or any part of its business, or which asserts jurisdiction over any properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, or
(b) any entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions of, or pertaining to, any such government.
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any obligation (except the endorsement in the ordinary course of business of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection) of such Person guaranteeing or in effect guaranteeing any Indebtedness, dividend or other obligation of any other Person in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, including (without limitation) obligations incurred through an agreement, contingent or otherwise, by such Person:
"Guaranty"
(a) to purchase such Indebtedness or obligation or any property constituting security therefor;
 
(b) to advance or supply funds (i) for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation, or (ii) to maintain any working capital or other balance sheet condition or any income statement condition of any other Person or otherwise to advance or make available funds for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation;
(c) to lease properties or to purchase properties or services primarily for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation of the ability of any other Person to make payment of the Indebtedness or obligation; or
(d) otherwise to assure the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation against loss in respect thereof.
In any computation of the Indebtedness or other liabilities of the obligor under any Guaranty, the Indebtedness or other obligations that are the subject of such Guaranty shall be assumed to be direct obligations of such obligor.
means any and all pollutants, toxic or hazardous wastes or any other substances, including all substances listed in or regulated in any Environmental Law as posing a hazard to health and safety, the removal of which is required or the generation, manufacture, refining, production, processing, treatment, storage, handling, transportation, transfer, use, disposal, release, discharge, spillage, seepage, or filtration of which is or shall be restricted, regulated, prohibited or penalized by any applicable law including, but not limited to, asbestos, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, petroleum, petroleum products, lead based paint, radon gas or similar restricted, prohibited or penalized substances.
"Hazardous Materials"
means, with respect to any Note, the Person in whose name such Note is registered in the register maintained by the Obligor Agent pursuant to .
"holder"
Section 13.1
means for any Person (without duplication) (a) all indebtedness created, assumed or incurred in any manner by such Person representing money borrowed (including by the issuance of debt securities), (b) all indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than (i) trade accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which are not more than 90 days past due and (ii) obligations to make earn-out payments payable (including at the election of the Company) in capital stock of the Company pursuant to acquisitions by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), (c) all indebtedness secured by any Lien upon property of such Person, whether or not such Person has assumed or become liable for the payment of such indebtedness, (d) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person, (e) all obligations of such Person on or with respect to letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and other extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money, excluding, in each case, indebtedness which is non-recourse to such Person and its subsidiaries and (f) any Guaranty of such Person with respect to liabilities of a type described in any of clauses (a) through (e) hereof.
"Indebtedness"
means (a) any purchaser of a Note, (b) any holder of a Note holding (together with one or more of its Affiliates) more than 5% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding, (c) any bank, trust company, savings and loan association or other financial institution, any pension plan, any investment company, any insurance
"Institutional Investor"
 
company, any broker or dealer, or any other similar financial institution or entity, regardless of legal form, and (d) any Related Fund of any holder of any Note.
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to Capitalized Lease Obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period (after eliminating intercompany items) determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Interest Expense"
is defined in .
"Investment Grade Rating"
Section 8.7(f)
means a joinder agreement substantially in the form of .
"Joinder Agreement"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any mortgage, lien, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance, or any interest or title of any vendor, lessor, lender or other secured party to or of such Person under any conditional sale or other title retention agreement or Capital Lease, upon or with respect to any property or asset of such Person (including in the case of stock, stockholder agreements, voting trust agreements and all similar arrangements).
"Lien"
is defined in .
"Make-Whole Amount"
Section 8.6
means material in relation to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
"Material"
means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes, or (c) the ability of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than the Company) to perform its obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, when taken together with the Company's ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes and the other Subsidiary Guarantors' and the Obligors' (other than the Company) ability to perform their obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, or (d) the validity or enforceability against the Company of this Agreement or the Notes or (e) the validity or enforceability against the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Obligors (other than the Company), taken as a whole, of any Subsidiary Guaranty and this Agreement and the Notes.
"Material Adverse Effect"
means a Subsidiary of the Company whose assets represent more than 5% of the Consolidated Total Assets.
"Material Subsidiary"
means a Domestic Subsidiary which is a Wholly-owned Subsidiary and a Material Subsidiary.
"Material Wholly-owned Domestic Subsidiary"
means any Plan that is a "multiemployer plan" (as such term is defined in section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA).
"Multiemployer Plan"
 
"" means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any successor thereto.
NAIC
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the net income (or net loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period as computed on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, and, without limiting the foregoing, after deduction from gross income of all expenses and reserves, including reserves for all taxes on or measured by income.
"Net Income"
means, with respect to any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of the assets or property of any Person, an amount equal to the (a) aggregate amount of the value of the consideration received by such Person in respect thereof (the value of any consideration which is not cash to be determined in good faith by a Senior Financial Officer) (b) the sum of (i) all out-of-pocket costs and expenses actually incurred by such Person and its Affiliates in connection with such sale, lease, transfer or other disposition and (ii) all state, federal or foreign taxes incurred or to be incurred by such Person or its Affiliates (assuming the highest marginal rate were applicable thereto) in connection therewith.
"net proceeds"
minus
is defined in the Recitals to this Agreement.
"Notes"
and are defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement and shall include any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of ; that the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Section 9.7
provided
Section 10.5
means, the Company, as agent and attorney-in-fact for the other Obligors pursuant to of this Agreement.
"Obligor Agent"
Section 22.10
means a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer or of any other officer of the Company or an Obligor, as the case may be, whose responsibilities extend to the subject matter of such certificate.
"Officer's Certificate"
means, as to any Person, any lease of property (whether real, personal or mixed) by such Person as lessee that is not a Capital Lease.
"Operating Lease"
means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA or any successor thereto.
"PBGC"
"" is defined in .
Permitted Lien
Section 10.4
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization, business entity or Governmental Authority.
"Person"
means an "employee benefit plan" (as defined in section 3(3) of ERISA) subject to Title I of ERISA that is or, within the preceding five years, has been established or maintained, or to which contributions are or, within the preceding five years, have been made or
"Plan"
 
required to be made, by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate or with respect to which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate may have any liability.
means, without duplication (a) any Indebtedness of the Company or a Subsidiary secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of and (b) any Indebtedness of the Company's Subsidiaries; that there shall be excluded from any calculation of Priority Indebtedness: (i) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of ), (ii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary of the Company, (iii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary outstanding on the date of Closing and described on hereto and any extension, renewal or refunding of any such Indebtedness, and (iv) the Indebtedness of any Person which becomes a Subsidiary after the date of Closing and any extension, renewal or refunding thereof; that such Indebtedness was not incurred in contemplation of such Person becoming a Subsidiary.
"Priority Indebtedness"
Section 10.4(l)
provided
Section 10.4(l)
Schedule 5.15(a)
provided
or means any interest in any kind of property or asset, whether real, personal or mixed, or tangible or intangible.
"property"
"properties"
is defined in .
"Proposed Prepayment Date"
Section 8.7(b)
is defined in .
"PTE"
Section 6.2(a)
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Purchaser"
means Prohibited Transaction Class Exemption 84-14 issued by the United States Department of Labor.
"QPAM Exemption"
means any Person who is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of such term as set forth in Rule 144A(a)(1) under the Securities Act.
"Qualified Institutional Buyer"
means, with respect to any holder of any Note, any fund or entity that (a) invests in Securities or bank loans, and (b) is advised or managed by such holder, the same investment advisor as such holder or by an Affiliate of such holder or such investment advisor.
"Related Fund"
means, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries for any period, the aggregate amounts payable with respect to Operating Leases of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Rental Expense"
means, at any time, the holders of at least 51% in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding (exclusive of Notes then owned by an Obligor or any of its Affiliates).
"Required Holders"
means any Senior Financial Officer and any other officer of the Company with responsibility for the administration of the relevant portion of this Agreement.
"Responsible Officer"
means Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"RPS"
 
shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, or any successor thereto.
"SEC"
or shall have the same meaning as in Section 2(1) of the Securities Act.
"Securities"
"Security"
"" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
Securities Act
means the chief financial officer, chief accounting officer or treasurer of the Company.
"Senior Financial Officer"
means all Indebtedness of the Company which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other Indebtedness of the Company.
"Senior Indebtedness"
means, as to any Person, any other Person in which such first Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries owns sufficient equity or voting interests to enable it or them (as a group) ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, to elect a majority of the directors (or Persons performing similar functions) of such second Person, and any partnership or joint venture if more than a 50% interest in the profits or capital thereof is owned by such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries (unless such partnership can and does ordinarily take major business actions without the prior approval of such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries). Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to a "Subsidiary" is a reference to a Subsidiary of the Company.
"Subsidiary"
means any Subsidiary which is required to deliver a Subsidiary Guaranty in compliance with the requirements of .
"Subsidiary Guarantor"
Section 9.7
means a guaranty substantially in the form of (as the same may be amended from time to time).
"Subsidiary Guaranty"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
means the Securities Valuation Office of the NAIC or any successor to such Office.
"SVO"
means United States Public Law 107-56, Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism (USA P A) Act of 2001, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"USA Patriot Act"
ATRIOT
CT
means Securities of any class or classes of a Person, the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to elect the corporate directors (or persons performing similar functions) of such Person.
"Voting Stock"
means, at any time, any Subsidiary of which all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (other than directors' qualifying shares as required by law) or other equity interests are owned by any one or more of the Company and the Company's other Wholly-owned Subsidiaries.
"Wholly-owned Subsidiary"
 
 
F V R, the undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally, hereby promise to pay to                     , or registered assigns, the principal sum of                      D (or so much thereof as shall not have been prepaid) [on November 30, 2019] with interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months) on the unpaid balance hereof at the rate of (a) 5.85% per annum from the date hereof, payable semi-annually on 30
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
OLLARS
th
day of May and November in each year commencing with the May 30 or November 30 next succeeding the date hereof, until the principal hereof shall have become due and payable, and (b) to the extent permitted by law, on any overdue payment of interest and, during the continuance of an Event of Default, on such unpaid balance and on any overdue payment of any Make-Whole Amount, at a rate per annum from time to time equal to 7.85% payable semiannually as aforesaid (or, at the option of the registered holder hereof, on demand).
Payments of principal of, interest on and any Make-Whole Amount with respect to this Note are to be made in lawful money of the United States of America at Chicago, Illinois or at such other place as the Company shall have designated by written notice to the holder of this Note as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement referred to below.
This Note is one of a series of Senior Notes (herein called the ) issued pursuant to the Note Purchase Agreement dated as November 30, 2009 (as from time to time amended, the ), among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein and is entitled to the benefits thereof. Each holder of this Note will be deemed, by its acceptance hereof, to have (i) agreed to the confidentiality provisions set forth in of the Note
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
Section 20
 
Purchase Agreement and (ii) made the representations set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and, in addition, in the case of a transferee, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption. Unless otherwise indicated, capitalized terms used in this Note shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 6
This Note is a registered Note and, as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer, duly endorsed, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed, by the registered holder hereof or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing, a new Note for a like principal amount will be issued to, and registered in the name of, the transferee. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment and for all other purposes, and the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor will not be affected by any notice to the contrary.
The Company will make required prepayments of principal on this Note on the dates and in the amounts specified in the Note Purchase Agreement This Note is also subject to optional prepayment, in whole or from time to time in part, at the times and on the terms specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, but not otherwise.
.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the principal of this Note may be declared or otherwise become due and payable in the manner, at the price (including any applicable Make-Whole Amount) and with the effect provided in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Pursuant to of the Note Purchase Agreement, an Obligor (other than the Company) may from time to time be discharged and released from its obligations under this Note on the terms and with the effect specified in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 2.2
 
This Note shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the Obligors and the holder of this Note shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This G A dated as of                     ,              (the or this ) is entered into on a joint and several basis by each of the undersigned (which parties are hereinafter referred to individually as a and collectively as the ).
UARANTY
GREEMENT
"Guaranty"
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
A. Each Guarantor is a Subsidiary (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ).
"Company"
B. For the purpose set forth in Section 5.14 thereof, the Company has entered into that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of November 30, 2009 (the ) among the Company, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement, hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ) and each of the purchasers named on Schedule A thereto (the ; the Initial Note Purchasers, together with their successors, assigns or any other future holder of the Notes (as hereinafter defined), the ), providing for, inter alia, the issue and sale by the Company to the Initial Note Purchasers of $150,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 5.85% Series C Senior Notes Due November 30, 2019 (the ).
"Note Purchase Agreement"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
"Initial Note Purchasers"
"Holders"
"Notes"
C. The Initial Note Purchasers have required as a condition to their purchase of the Notes that the Company cause each Subsidiary that after the date of Closing delivers a guaranty pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement to enter into this Guaranty, as security for the Notes. The Company owns 100% of the equity interests of the Guarantors.
D. Each of the Guarantors has derived substantial direct and indirect benefit from the sale of the Notes to the Initial Note Purchasers.
 
N, , as required by Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement and in consideration of the premises and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency whereof are hereby acknowledged, each Guarantor does hereby covenant and agree, jointly and severally, as follows:
OW
THEREFORE
SECTION 1. Definitions.
Capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Note Purchase Agreement unless herein defined or the context shall otherwise require.
SECTION 2. Guaranty of Notes and Note Purchase Agreement.
(a) Subject to the limitation set forth in hereof, each Guarantor jointly and severally does hereby irrevocably, absolutely and unconditionally guarantee unto the Holders: (1) the full and prompt payment of the principal of, premium (including, without limitation, any Make-Whole Amount), if any, and interest on the Notes and any other amounts from time to time outstanding under the Note Purchase Agreement or the Notes, as and when such payments shall become due and payable whether by lapse of time, upon redemption or prepayment, by extension or by acceleration or declaration or otherwise (including (to the extent legally enforceable) interest due on overdue payments of principal, premium, if any, or interest at the rate set forth in the Notes and interest accruing at the then applicable rate provided in the Notes after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy, or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding, relating to an Obligor, whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding) in Federal or other immediately available funds of the United States of America which at the time of payment or demand therefor shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, (2) the full and prompt performance and observance by the Obligors of each and all of the obligations, covenants and agreements required to be performed or owed by the Obligors under the terms of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and (3) the full and prompt payment, upon demand by any Holder, of all costs and expenses, legal or otherwise (including reasonable attorneys' fees), if any, as shall have been expended or incurred in the protection or enforcement of any rights, privileges or liabilities in favor of the Holders under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or under this Guaranty or in any consultation or action in connection therewith or herewith and in each and every case irrespective of the validity, regularity, or enforcement of any of the Notes or Note Purchase Agreement or any of the terms thereof or any other like circumstance or circumstances.
Section 2(b)
(b) The liability of each Guarantor under this Guaranty shall not exceed an amount equal to a maximum amount as will, after giving effect to such maximum amount and all other liabilities of such Guarantor, contingent or otherwise, result in the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder not constituting a fraudulent transfer, obligation or conveyance.
SECTION 3. Guaranty of Payment and Performance.
This is a guarantee of payment and performance and each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to require that any action on or in respect of any Note or the Note Purchase Agreement be brought against an Obligor or any other Person or that resort be had to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. Any Holder may, at its option, proceed hereunder against any Guarantor in the first instance to collect monies when due, the payment of which is guaranteed hereby, without first proceeding against an Obligor or any other Person and without first resorting to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. The liability of each Guarantor hereunder shall in no way be affected or impaired by any acceptance by any Holder of
 
any direct or indirect security for, or other guaranties of, any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or any other Person to any Holder or by any failure, delay, neglect or omission by any Holder to realize upon or protect any such guarantees, Indebtedness, liability or obligation or any notes or other instruments evidencing the same or any direct or indirect security therefor or by any approval, consent, waiver, or other action taken, or omitted to be taken by any such Holder.
The covenants and agreements on the part of the Guarantors herein contained shall take effect as joint and several covenants and agreements, and references to the Guarantors shall take effect as references to each of them and none of them shall be released from liability hereunder by reason of the guarantee ceasing to be binding as a continuing security on any other of them.
SECTION 4. General Provisions Relating to the Guaranty.
(a) Each Guarantor hereby consents and agrees that any Holder or Holders from time to time, with or without any further notice to or assent from any other Guarantor may, without in any manner affecting the liability of any Guarantor under this Guaranty, and upon such terms and conditions as any such Holder or Holders may deem advisable:
(1) extend in whole or in part (by renewal or otherwise), modify, change, compromise, release or extend the duration of the time for the performance or payment of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of any Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligations of such Obligor on the Notes, or waive any Default or Event of Default with respect thereto, or waive, modify, amend or change any provision of any other agreement or this Guaranty; or
(2) sell, release, surrender, modify, impair, exchange or substitute any and all property, of any nature and from whomsoever received, held by, or for the benefit of, any such Holder as direct or indirect security for the payment or performance of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes; or
(3) settle, adjust or compromise any claim of an Obligor against any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes.
Each Guarantor hereby ratifies and confirms any such extension, renewal, change, sale, release, waiver, surrender, exchange, modification, amendment, impairment, substitution, settlement, adjustment or compromise and that the same shall be binding upon it, and hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any and all defenses, counterclaims or offsets which it might or could have by reason thereof, it being understood that such Guarantor shall at all times be bound by this Guaranty and remain liable hereunder.
(b) Each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of acceptance of this Guaranty by the Holders or of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such Holders upon this Guaranty (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in hereof shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Guaranty);
Section 2
 
(2) demand of payment by any Holder from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any Holder or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Guarantor.
The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty and the rights of any Holder to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under the Note Purchase Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
(c) The obligations of the Guarantors hereunder shall be binding upon the Guarantors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due pursuant to Section 2 shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Guarantors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of the Obligors, any other Guarantors or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of the Obligors to issue the Notes or the Obligors to execute and deliver the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or of any other Guarantors to execute and deliver this Guaranty or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of the Obligors or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any merger,
 
consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person; or
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other force majeure, whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or this Guaranty, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Guarantor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Guaranty; or
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Guarantor of failure of an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor, any other Guarantor or to any other Person or to any other guaranty or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
 
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other guaranty, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any release of any other Guarantor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Guarantor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Guarantor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Guarantor or other Person under this Guaranty or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Guaranty and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Guarantor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement and
provided
 
that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
(d) All rights of any Holder may be transferred or assigned at any time and shall be considered to be transferred or assigned at any time or from time to time upon the transfer of such Note whether with or without the consent of or notice to the Guarantors under this Guaranty or to the Obligors.
(e) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, the Guarantors shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holder or Holders upon whose Notes such payment was made, but each Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of subrogation shall be junior and subordinate in right of payment to the prior indefeasible final payment in cash in full of all amounts due and owing by the Obligors with respect to the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and by the Guarantors under this Guaranty, and the Guarantors shall not take any action to enforce such right of subrogation, and the Guarantors shall not accept any payment in respect of such right of subrogation, until all amounts due and owing by the Obligors under or in respect of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and all amounts due and owing by the Guarantors hereunder have indefeasibly been finally paid in cash in full. If any amount shall be paid to any Guarantor in violation of the preceding sentence at any time prior to the indefeasible payment in cash in full of the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Holders and shall forthwith be paid to the Holders to be credited and applied to the amounts due or to become due with respect to the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, whether matured or unmatured. Each Guarantor acknowledges that it has received direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by the Note Purchase Agreement and that the waiver set forth in this is knowingly made as a result of the receipt of such benefits.
paragraph (e)
(f) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, each Guarantor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Guarantors, but such Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the Holders for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Guarantor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(g) Each Guarantor agrees that to the extent an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Guarantors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Guarantors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any Holder from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating
 
thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
(h) No Holder shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Guarantors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Guarantors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Guarantors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Guarantors' burden, any right to which each Guarantor hereby expressly waives.
(i) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank in right of payment with all other Indebtedness of such Guarantor which is not secured or which is not expressly subordinated in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of such Guarantor.
pari passu
(j) A Guarantor shall be automatically discharged and released from this Guaranty pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
SECTION 5. Representations and Warranties of the Guarantors.
Each Guarantor represents and warrants to each Holder that:
(a) Such Guarantor is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (1) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of such Guarantor and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (2) the ability of such Guarantor to perform its obligations under this Guaranty, or (3) the validity or enforceability of this Guaranty (herein in this , a ). Such Guarantor has the power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Guaranty and to perform the provisions hereof.
Section 5
"Material Adverse Effect"
(b) This Guaranty has been duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of such Guarantor, and this Guaranty constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Guarantor enforceable against such Guarantor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (1) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(c) The execution, delivery and performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty will not (1) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries under any material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, charter document or by-law, or any other material agreement or instrument to which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries is bound or by which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or any of
 
their respective properties may be bound or affected, (2) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or (3) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to the such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries.
(d) No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty.
(e) Such Guarantor is solvent, has capital not unreasonably small in relation to its business or any contemplated or undertaken transaction and has assets having a value both at fair valuation and at present fair salable value greater than the amount required to pay its debts as they become due and greater than the amount that will be required to pay its probable liability on its existing debts as they become absolute and matured. Such Guarantor does not intend to incur, or believe or should have believed that it will incur, debts beyond its ability to pay such debts as they become due. Such Guarantor will not be rendered insolvent by the execution and delivery of, and performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty. Such Guarantor does not intend to hinder, delay or defraud its creditors by or through the execution and delivery of, or performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty.
(f) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Guarantor.
pari passu
SECTION 6. Guarantor Covenants.
From and after the date of issuance of the Notes by the Obligors and continuing so long as any amount remains unpaid thereon each Guarantor agrees to comply with the terms and provisions of Sections 9.1, 9.2, 9.3, 9.4, 9.5 and 9.8 of the Note Purchase Agreement, insofar as such provisions apply to such Guarantor, as if said Sections were set forth herein in full.
SECTION 7. [Reserved].
SECTION 8. Governing Law.
(a) THIS GUARANTY SHALL BE CONSTRUED AND ENFORCED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, AND THE RIGHTS OF THE PARTIES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS, EXCLUDING CHOICE-OF-LAW PRINCIPLES OF THE LAW OF SUCH STATE THAT WOULD PERMIT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF A JURISDICTION OTHER THAN SUCH STATE.
(b) Each Guarantor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guaranty. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, such Guarantor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that
 
it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
(c) The parties hereto waive any right to have a jury participate in resolving any dispute, whether sounding in contract, tort, or otherwise, between them arising out of, connected with, related to or incidental to the relationship established between them in connection with this Guaranty, any financing agreement, any loan party document or any other instrument, document or agreement executed or delivered in connection herewith or the transactions related hereto. The parties hereto hereby agree and consent that any such claim, demand, action or cause of action shall be decided by court trial without a jury and that any of them may file an original counterpart or a copy of this Guaranty with any court as written evidence of the consent of the parties hereto to the waiver of their right to trial by jury.
SECTION 9. [Reserved].
SECTION 10. Amendments, Waivers and Consents.
(a) This Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively), with (and only with) the written consent of each Guarantor and the Required Holders.
(b) The Guarantors will provide each Holder (irrespective of the amount of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such Holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof. The Guarantors will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this Section 10 to each Holder promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the Required Holders.
(c) The Obligors will not directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of fee or otherwise, or grant any security, to any Holder as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any Holder of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted, on the same terms, ratably to each Holder even if such Holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
(d) Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all Holders and is binding upon them and upon each future holder and upon the Guarantors. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant or agreement not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Guarantors and any Holder nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any Holder. As used herein, the term "this Guaranty" and references thereto shall mean this Guaranty as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 10
 
(e) Solely for the purpose of determining whether the Holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Guaranty, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Guarantor, any Obligor or any of their respective subsidiaries or Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
SECTION 11. Notices.
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(1) if to an Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee, to such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee at the address specified for such communications in Schedule A to the Note Purchase Agreement, or at such other address as such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing,
(2) if to any other Holder, to such Holder at such address as such Holder shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing, or
(3) if to any Guarantor, to such Guarantor c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning of the Note Purchase Agreement to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as such Guarantor shall have specified to the Holders in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 11
SECTION 12. Miscellaneous.
(a) No remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to any Holder is intended to be exclusive of any other available remedy or remedies, but each and every such remedy shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to every other remedy given under this Guaranty now or hereafter existing at law or in equity. No delay or omission to exercise any right or power accruing upon any default, omission or failure of performance hereunder shall impair any such right or power or shall be construed to be a waiver thereof but any such right or power may be exercised from time to time and as often as may be deemed expedient. In order to entitle any Holder to exercise any remedy reserved to it under the Guaranty, it shall not be necessary for such Holder to physically produce its Note in any proceedings instituted by it or to give any notice, other than such notice as may be herein expressly required.
(b) The Guarantors will pay all sums becoming due under this Guaranty by the method and at the address specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, or by such other method or at such other address as any Holder shall have from time to time specified to the Guarantors in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of this Guaranty or any Note.
 
(c) Any provision of this Guaranty that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
(d) If the whole or any part of this Guaranty shall be now or hereafter become unenforceable against any one or more of the Guarantors for any reason whatsoever or if it is not executed by any one or more of the Guarantors, this Guaranty shall nevertheless be and remain fully binding upon and enforceable against each other Guarantor as if it had been made and delivered only by such other Guarantors.
(e) This Guaranty shall be binding upon each Guarantor and its successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of each Holder and its successors and assigns so long as its Notes remain outstanding and unpaid.
(f) This Guaranty may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
SECTION 13. Indemnity.
To the fullest extent of applicable law, each Guarantor shall indemnify and save each Holder harmless from and against any losses which may arise by virtue of any of the obligations hereby guaranteed being or becoming for any reason whatsoever in whole or in part void, voidable, contrary to law, invalid, ineffective or otherwise unenforceable by the Holder or any of them in accordance with its terms (all of the foregoing collectively, an "Indemnifiable Circumstance"). For greater certainty, these losses shall include without limitation all obligations hereby guaranteed which would have been payable by the Obligors but for the existence of an Indemnifiable Circumstance, net of any withholding or deduction of or on account of any tax; provided, however, that the extent of the Guarantor's aggregate liability under this Section 13 shall not at any time exceed the amount (but for any Indemnifiable Circumstance) otherwise guaranteed pursuant to Section 2.
SECTION 14. Termination.
This Guaranty shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to any Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Guaranty by reason of the express provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement or is otherwise released from this Guaranty in accordance with the terms of the Note Purchase Agreement.
 
I W W, the undersigned has caused this Guaranty to be duly executed by an authorized representative as of this      day of                     ,         .
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
 
 
 
 
T J A, dated as of [            ], is made by [            ], a [            ] (the ) in favor of the holders of the Notes (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) under the Note Purchase Agreement (as hereinafter defined).
HIS
OINDER
GREEMENT
"New Obligor"
A. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an , collectively as the ) are parties to that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of November 30, 2009 (as amended, the "") with the Purchasers named therein.
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Existing Obligor"
"Existing Obligors"
Note Purchase Agreement
B. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement, the New Obligor desires to become an obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes.
N T, for and in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement, and other valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, each undersigned hereby consents and agrees as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
1. Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Note Purchase Agreement.
2. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, the New Obligor hereby assumes and agrees to perform all of the terms, restrictions, obligations and conditions of an "Obligor" under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, and, by execution of this Joinder Agreement, is hereby designated an "Obligor" for purposes of, and agrees to be bound by, each and all terms of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes. Without limiting the generality of the forgoing, the New Obligor hereby (a) expressly agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for and assumes all obligations of an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party, and (b) agrees to perform for the holders' benefit and be bound by the terms and covenants applicable to an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party.
 
3. The undersigned is the duly elected                                     of the New Obligor, a Subsidiary of the Company, and is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Joinder Agreement to each of you. The execution by the undersigned of this Joinder Agreement shall evidence its consent to and acknowledgment and approval of the terms set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement and by such execution the New Obligor shall be deemed to have made in favor of the holders the representations and warranties set forth in Section 5 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
4. Upon execution of this Joinder Agreement, the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes shall be deemed to be amended as set forth above. Except as amended herein, the terms and provisions of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes are hereby ratified, confirmed and approved in all respects.
5. Any and all notices, requests, certificates and other instruments (including the Notes) may refer to the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes without making specific reference to this Joinder Agreement, but nevertheless all such references shall be deemed to include this Joinder Agreement unless the context shall otherwise require.
6. This Joinder Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument, and any of the parties hereto may execute this Joinder Agreement by signing any such counterpart.
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Joinder Agreement to be executed as of the date and year first above written.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
Each of the undersigned consents to the terms of this Joinder Agreement and reaffirms, ratifies and confirms in all respects each and every obligation and covenant made by it in the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes executed by each of the undersigned in favor of the holders and that the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes remain the legal, valid and binding obligation of the undersigned enforceable against the undersigned in accordance with their terms.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, Ill., November 30, 2009  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today announced that the company has completed a private placement of $150 million of senior unsecured notes. The notes bear interest at 5.85% and are due in three equal installments in 2016, 2018 and 2019. The company intends to use the net proceeds of the debt transaction to pay down the outstanding balance under its existing line of credit.
The notes have not been registered under the Securities Act or any state securities laws and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements. This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the notes, nor shall it constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale is unlawful.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in fifteen countries and does business in over 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100202170336.txt.gz
TIME:20100202170336
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 2, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's fourth quarter 2010 earnings. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.
 
On January 28, 2010, T. Kimball Brooker notified Gallagher of his decision not to stand for re-election to the Board of Directors at Gallagher's 2010 Annual Meeting of Stockholders expected to be held on May 11, 2010. Mr. Brooker indicated that his decision was for personal reasons and not the result of any disagreement with Gallagher on any matter relating to Gallagher's operations, policies or practices. Mr. Brooker will continue to serve as a director of Gallagher and as Chairman of Gallagher's Compensation Committee until the expiration of his term at the 2010 Annual Meeting.
Gallagher gratefully acknowledges Mr. Brooker's distinguished service as a member of the Board of Directors since 1994.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, February 2, 2010  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2009. A printer-friendly format of this release and the supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended December 31
 
 
This earnings release contains certain information not prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). EBITDAC, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. A reconciliation of EBITDAC to Gallagher's earnings from continuing operations before income taxes (which were $30.4 million and $18.0 million in fourth quarters 2009 and 2008, respectively, and $211.1 million and $163.6 million in the years ended December 31, 2009 and 2008, respectively) is included on page 7 of this earnings release. Gallagher believes the measure it has entitled EBITDAC provides meaningful information which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of its operating performance and financial condition that may not otherwise be apparent from the information Gallagher provides in accordance with GAAP. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided.
"I'm extremely pleased with how well Gallagher executed in 2009 and you can see it in our results. For the year, adjusted EBITDAC was up 25.6% in our Brokerage segment and up 15.3% in our Risk Management segment. For the year, our Brokerage segment expanded its adjusted EBITDAC margins by 2.7 points and our Risk Management segment expanded its adjusted EBITDAC margins by 2.1 points. I believe this represents tremendous progress in an obviously difficult operating environment," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "The accomplishments by our team in 2009 included what we said we would do and more:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
"We accomplished all of this during an environment of continued premium rate cuts and declining exposure units which we believe will continue in 2010. However, I have complete confidence in the Gallagher team as they continue to demonstrate they can execute in even the toughest of times."
Fourth Quarter Workforce Related and Lease Related Charges
During fourth quarter 2009, Gallagher recorded pretax charges totaling approximately $11.8 million as a result of the completion of a previously announced plan to reduce, and the reorganization of, its middle and back office workforce by approximately 400 positions and from the termination of certain office leases. Future annual pretax cost savings associated with these actions are estimated to be approximately $34.0 million. Anticipated to partially offset these future savings, will be increased employee medical costs, salary increases and increased incentive compensation costs totaling $12.0 million to $14.0 million, related to the remaining workforce.
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Services and Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
 
The company will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, February 3, 2010 at 9:00 a.m. EST to further discuss its results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2009. To listen to the call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding estimated cost savings associated with a reduction in workforce and future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy facilities, as well as statements regarding anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking statements are based on Gallagher's current expectations and assumptions regarding its business, the economy and other future conditions. Because forward-looking statements relate to the future, they are subject to inherent uncertainties, risks and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following: changes in worldwide and national economic conditions; changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally; changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape; changes in Gallagher's accounting estimates and assumptions; significant uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits; other regulatory uncertainties such as potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45; uncertainties surrounding utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity; operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 facilities; business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners; intellectual property risks; environmental risks; and the other factors that are described in Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008 and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2009 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 8.
 
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2009 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 8.
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2009 Earnings Release
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This exhibit contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G of the SEC's rules. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information.
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100224090254.txt.gz
TIME:20100224090254
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure
The February 2010 slides and Investment Profile containing information to be presented at investor conferences are attached hereto as exhibits to this report and are incorporated herein in their entirety by this reference. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These exhibits include certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at .
www.ajg.com
www.ajg.com
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


Exhibit 99.2
 
 
Exhibit 99.2
NYSE: AJG
Brokerage Risk Corporate Segment Management Segment Segment
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and the world's largest third-party property/casualty (P/C) claims administrator.* Gallagher generates approximately 89% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 11% generated primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada and the United Kingdom.
*According to Business Insurance.
FEBRUARY 2010
Brokerage Segment 2
Brokerage Acquisition Strategy 4
Risk Management Segment 4
Corporate Segment 5
Insurance Market Overview 6
Condensed Financial Information 7
INVESTMENT PROFILE
$400 $350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
* EBITDAC represents earnings from continuing operations before the impact of litigation and retail contingent commission related
matters, claims handling obligations, medical and pension plan changes, interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization expense and change in estimated acquisition earnout payables.
As of December 31, 2009 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $22.51
52-week high/low $26.02 - $14.82
Trailing 12-mos. revenues $1.7 billion
Market cap $2.3 billion
Indicated annual dividend* $1.28*
Yield 5.7%
Shares outstanding 102.5 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Number of employees 9,840
* On January 28, 2010, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.32 per share first quarter dividend.
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 74% OF 2009 REVENUES
Gallagher operates its Brokerage operations through a network of more than 200 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 14 countries abroad. In addition, Gallagher has developed the Gallagher Optimus Network of independent insurance brokers and consultants that enables it to provide coverage and services to its clients in more than 100 countries around the world.
RETAIL INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
81% OF 2009 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property/casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Lines of Coverage
Aviation Casualty
Commercial Auto Dental
Directors & Officers Liability Disability Earthquake
Errors & Omissions Fire General Liability Life Marine Medical Product Liability
Professional Liability Property Retirement Solutions Voluntary Benefits Wind Workers Compensation
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into approximately 180 geographic profit centers located primarily throughout North America and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 65% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
Gallagher's specialized focus on these niche/practice groups allows for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; cross-selling new brokerage products and services to existing customers; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
As of October 1, 2009, Gallagher is no longer prohibited from accepting retail contingent commissions under an agreement with the Illinois state agencies. As a result, Gallagher anticipates that it could generate additional retail contingent commission revenues of up to $10 million on an annualized basis by 2011.
2
INVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2010
 
Niche/Practice Groups
Agribusiness
Aviation & Aerospace Captive Consulting Construction Energy Entertainment Global Risks Habitational Healthcare
Higher Education Hospitality Institutional Services Marine Manufacturing Personal Professional Groups Private Equity Public Entity
 -  Real Estate
 -  Religious/Not-for-Profit
 -  Restaurant
 -  Scholastic
 -  Technology/Telecom
 -  Transportation
WHOLESALE INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
19% OF 2009 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Wholesale revenues are generated from sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurance carrier.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into more than 60 geographic profit centers located primarily in the United States and Bermuda, and through its approved Lloyd's of London broker. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent, distributing specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
More than 80% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents who are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency, according to Business Insurance magazine.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of broker clients, by developing new managing general agency programs, and through mergers and acquisitions.
Gallagher Optimus Network
The Gallagher Optimus Network is a global alliance of independent broker partners. Optimus Network partners are selected by Gallagher based upon common business philosophies and the partners' strengths and service capabilities within their respective countries. Through the Gallagher Optimus Network and its own international operations, Gallagher offers client-service capabilities in more than 100 countries around the world.
INVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2010
3
 
Brokerage Segment Acquisition Strategy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components: organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated approximately 235 acquisitions from January 1985 through December 2009, almost exclusively within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that generate $2 million to $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through joint ventures, where the company begins its relationship with an equity position.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on:  -  a company culture that matches its own  -  a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources  -  clearly defined financial criteria.
Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by Gallagher's aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 26% OF 2009 REVENUES
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims-handling services.
Expertise
Real-time Claims Management Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management
Managed Care Services Risk Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education & Training
4
INVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2010
 
Approximately 69% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-related claims, 27% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims and 4% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the United States, the United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 84% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments.
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Gallagher's interest expense, corporate-related administrative expense and investment-related activity are reported in this segment.
In addition, Gallagher owns part of eight clean energy facilities that help several coal-fired utilities eliminate large quantities of potentially harmful emissions. Gallagher believes these facilities could generate annual net earnings for Gallagher of $6 million to $10 million in 2010 while operating under temporary regulatory permits, and up to $40 million annually from 2011 through 2019, from a combination of pretax income and tax credits under IRC Section 45. To attain full benefit, the facilities must obtain permanent regulatory permits and satisfy other operating conditions.
INVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2010
 
INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW
Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factors  including competition for market share among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidations  can result in flat or reduced premium rates
(a "soft" market). A soft market tends to put downward pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as heavier-than-anticipated loss experience or capital shortages, can result in increases in premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas.
From 2004 through December 2009, the P/C market has been soft in most lines and geographic areas. A quarterly market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers in the fourth quarter of 2009 indicated that the level of rate reductions for commercial business averaged 5.6%, year-over-year, compared with a 5.8% year-over-year decline in the third quarter of 2009.
Safe Harbor Statement
This investment profile contains forward-looking statements. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements relating to our future results, areas of future revenue growth, anticipated contingent commission revenue, future income and tax credits generated by our clean-energy facilities, impact of expense reductions, future acquisition activity, and the future of the insurance and insurance brokerage industries. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors, such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and significant uncertainties related to our clean-energy investments. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), including Item 1, "Business Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors. This document includes certain non-GAAP financial measures as defined under rules promulgated by the SEC. As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided reconciliations of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures, which are available on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com.
6
INVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2010
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information-2008 through 2009
(Unaudited-in millions, except per share data and other information) All information restated to reflect discontinued operations.
2008 2009
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues $ 258.0 $ 312.2 $ 314.4 $ 303.2 $ 1,187.8 $ 289.5 $ 340.1 $ 325.8 $ 320.8 $ 1,276.2
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 19.5 65.6 59.5 27.0 171.6 39.2 69.5 61.4 32.2 202.3
Earnings from continuing operations 11.9 39.2 36.1 17.0 104.2 24.1 41.5 36.9 21.2 123.7
Growth - revenues excluding retail contingent commissions 11% 6% 8% 2% 7% 12% 9% 4% 6% 7%
Pretax profit margin (1) 8% 21% 19% 9% 14% 14% 20% 19% 10% 16%
EBITDAC margin (2) 12% 26% 24% 15% 20% 19% 26% 25% 16% 22%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.13 $ 0.42 $ 0.38 $ 0.18 $ 1.11 $ 0.25 $ 0.41 $ 0.36 $ 0.21 $ 1.23
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues $ 116.2 $ 115.2 $ 118.6 $ 114.9 $ 464.9 $ 112.2 $ 113.3 $ 113.5 $ 114.2 $ 453.2
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 13.8 12.2 11.1 8.8 45.9 14.3 13.4 14.3 6.6 48.6
Earnings from continuing operations 8.5 7.4 7.0 5.3 28.2 8.7 7.9 8.7 5.4 30.7
Growth (decline) - revenues 9% 7% 8% -3% 5% -3% -2% -4% -1% -3%
Pretax profit margin (1) 12% 11% 9% 8% 10% 13% 12% 13% 6% 11%
EBITDAC margin (2) 15% 14% 12% 10% 12% 16% 14% 15% 8% 13%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $0.09 $0.08 $0.08 $0.05 $0.30 $0.09 $0.08 $0.09 $0.05 $0.30
BROKERAGE & RISK MGT COMBINED
Revenues $ 374.2 $ 427.4 $ 433.0 $ 418.1 $ 1,652.7 $ 401.7 $ 453.4 $ 439.3 $ 435.0 $ 1,729.4
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 33.3 77.8 70.6 35.8 217.5 53.5 82.9 75.7 38.8 250.9
Earnings from continuing operations 20.4 46.6 43.1 22.3 132.4 32.8 49.4 45.6 26.6 154.4
Growth - revenues 10% 6% 8% 1% 6% 7% 6% 1% 4% 5%
Pretax profit margin (1) 9% 18% 16% 9% 13% 13% 18% 17% 9% 15%
EBITDAC margin (2) 13% 22% 20% 14% 18% 18% 23% 22% 14% 20%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.22 $ 0.50 $ 0.46 $ 0.23 $ 1.41 $ 0.34 $ 0.49 $ 0.45 $ 0.26 $ 1.53
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Net operating activity $ 0.1 $ (1.2) $ (14.1) $ (10.1) $(25.3) $ (2.7) $ (1.8) $ (5.8) $ (1.0) $(11.3)
Interest expense 6.5 7.3 7.1 7.7 28.6 7.3 7.0 6.8 7.4 28.5
Loss from continuing operations before income taxes(6.4)(8.5)(21.2)(17.8)(53.9)(10.0)(8.8)(12.6)(8.4)(39.8)
Loss from continuing operations(4.1)(4.9)(1.4)(10.6)(21.0)(4.5)(5.6)(4.0)(7.2)(21.3)
Diluted loss per share from continuing operations $ (0.04) $ (0.05) $ (0.02) $ (0.11) $(0.23) $ (0.05) $ (0.05) $ (0.04) $ (0.07) $(0.21)
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues $ 375.8 $ 428.9 $ 428.2 $ 412.1 $ 1,645.0 $ 401.1 $ 453.6 $ 439.5 $ 435.1 $ 1,729.3
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 26.9 69.3 49.4 18.0 163.6 43.5 74.1 63.1 30.4 211.1
Earnings from continuing operations 16.3 41.7 41.7 11.7 111.4 28.3 43.8 41.6 19.4 133.1
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.18 $ 0.45 $ 0.44 $ 0.12 $ 1.18 $ 0.29 $ 0.44 $ 0.41 $ 0.19 $ 1.32
Dividends declared per share $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 1.28 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 1.28
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $ 3,340.9 $ 3,508.5 $ 3,197.2 $ 3,271.3 $ 3,108.6 $ 3,652.5 $ 3,241.1 $ 3,250.3
Total liabilities $ 2,642.3 $ 2,783.3 $ 2,422.2 $ 2,532.8 $ 2,310.4 $ 2,812.7 $ 2,372.0 $ 2,357.4
Total stockholders' equity $ 698.6 $ 726.2 $ 775.0 $ 738.5 $ 798.2 $ 839.8 $ 869.1 $ 892.9
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 92,898 93,545 94,556 95,990 94,179 98,084 100,717 101,550 102,213 100,625
Common shares repurchased (000s) 26 20 3 6 55 11 7 17 10 45
Annualized return on beginning stockholders' equity (3) NMF 10% 14% 11% 11% 14% 19% 20% 17% 17%
Number of acquisitions closed 11 9 8 9 37 3 6 2 4 15
Workforce from continuing operations 9,329 9,534 9,573 9,863 9,986 10,145 10,015 9,840
TOTAL COMPANY EBITDAC (4)
Net earnings (loss) $ (6.0) $ 40.8 $ 37.8 $ 4.7 $ 77.3 $ 26.4 $ 43.8 $ 41.6 $ 16.8 $ 128.6
Loss on discontinued operations, net of income taxes 22.3 0.9 3.9 7.0 34.1 1.9 - 2.6 4.5
Earnings from continuing operations 16.3 41.7 41.7 11.7 111.4 28.3 43.8 41.6 19.4 133.1
Provision for income taxes 10.6 27.6 7.7 6.3 52.2 15.2 30.3 21.5 11.0 78.0
Interest 6.5 7.3 7.1 7.7 28.6 7.3 7.0 6.8 7.4 28.5
Depreciation 6.9 7.9 8.0 7.2 30.0 7.7 7.5 7.7 7.7 30.6
Amortization 8.9 10.3 10.2 14.3 43.7 12.4 14.1 13.8 14.7 55.0
Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables ------ 1.4 1.2 1.5 4.1
Total company EBITDAC $ 49.2 $ 94.8 $ 74.7 $ 47.2 $ 265.9 $ 70.9 $ 104.1 $ 92.6 $ 61.7 $ 329.3
(1) Represents pretax earnings from continuing operations divided by total revenues.
(2) Represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and change in estimated acquisition earnout payables (EBITDAC) divided by total revenues.
(3) Represents annualized year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity as of the beginning of the year.
(4) EBITDAC represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and change in estimated acquisition earnout payables.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2010 7
 
WHY INVEST?
$2,000 $1,700 $1,400 $1,100 $800 $500 $200
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008
2009
$1,209
$1,316
$1,408
$1,558
$1,653
$1,729
7%cagr
Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues from continuing operations* (in millions)
Dividends Per Share
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
1986 2010
17% Average Annual Increase
$1,28**
* All information as originally reported (excluding discontinued operations, litigation-related matters, retail contingent commission-related matters, medical and pension plan changes and claims-handling obligations). See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
** Indicated  On January 28, 2010, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.32 per share quarterly dividend.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Marsha J. Akin  Investor Relations | 630.773.3800
8
INVESTMENT PROFILE FEBRUARY 2010


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100422163055.txt.gz
TIME:20100422163055
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 22, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's first quarter 2010 financial results. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
ITASCA, IL, April 22, 2010  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2010. A printer-friendly format of this release and the supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended March 31
 
 
This earnings release contains certain information not prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). EBITDAC, a non-GAAP measure, represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. A reconciliation of EBITDAC to Gallagher's earnings from continuing operations (which were $29.2 million and $28.3 million in first quarter 2010 and 2009, respectively) is included on page 7 of this earnings release. Gallagher believes the measure it has entitled EBITDAC provides meaningful information which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of its operating performance and financial condition that may not otherwise be apparent from the information Gallagher provides in accordance with GAAP. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the amounts reported herein related to prior year amounts in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
 
"Despite a continued soft insurance pricing market and the impact of the economic downturn, I am pleased that our operations held our adjusted EBITDAC margins in these trying times," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Our team did an excellent job of pursuing supplemental commissions and continued to hold the expense line - both of which helped offset declining organic revenues. I'm also encouraged by the increased M&A deal flow that we're seeing, which we expect will contribute positively to our results later in the year and into 2011. In these difficult times, the Gallagher team is doing tremendous work to provide highly professional advice to our clients around the world."
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
The components of contingent commissions that have been excluded from organic revenue computations are as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights
The Corporate Segment reports the financial information related to Gallagher's clean-energy ventures, its debt, and certain corporate and acquisition-related activities.
 
For the first two months of 2010, Gallagher was required to consolidate the operating results of these facilities as a result of its majority ownership interest. Effective March 1, 2010, Gallagher sold a portion of its interests in six of these facilities, which thereby eliminated the requirement to consolidate these facilities. These facilities are now accounted for using equity method accounting. The revenues and cost of revenues related to consolidating these partnerships on Gallagher's consolidated statement of earnings is shown on page 6 of this earnings release.
 
 
 
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for first quarter was 31.9% in 2010 and 34.9% in 2009. The decrease in the first quarter 2010 effective tax rate compared to the same period in 2009 was primarily the result of the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits that are expected to be generated throughout 2010. Gallagher's first quarter 2009 tax rate was lower than the statutory rate due to the resolution and/or the expiration of various statutes of limitations related to certain income tax matters in 2009.
 
 
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Friday, April 23, 2010 at 8:00 a.m. ET/7:00 a.m. CT to discuss its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2010. To listen to the call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy facilities, Gallagher's ability to enter into a new credit facility when its current unsecured line of credit expires and statements regarding anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking statements are based on Gallagher's current expectations and assumptions regarding its business, the economy and other future conditions. Because forward-looking statements relate to the future, they are subject to inherent uncertainties, risks and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following: changes in worldwide and national economic conditions; changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally; changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape; Gallagher's inability to enter into a new credit facility when its current unsecured line of credit expires; changes in Gallagher's accounting estimates and assumptions; significant uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits; other regulatory uncertainties such as potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45; uncertainties surrounding utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity; operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 facilities; business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners; intellectual property risks; environmental risks; and the other factors that are described in Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 8.
 
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 8.
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2010 Earnings Release
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This earnings release contains supplemental non-GAAP financial information within the meaning of Regulation G as promulgated by the SEC. Consistent with Regulation G, a description of such information is provided below and a reconciliation of certain of such items to U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) is provided in this press release. Gallagher believes the items described below provide meaningful additional information, which may be helpful to investors in assessing certain aspects of Gallagher's operating performance and financial condition that may not be otherwise apparent from GAAP. Industry peers provide similar supplemental information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the information presented in accordance with GAAP.
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100505142000.txt.gz
TIME:20100505142000
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 5, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) registered for resale 455,554 shares of common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under an automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533) filed by Gallagher on the same date with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Harter Secrest & Emery LLP as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as counsel to Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), in connection with the resale registration of 455,554 shares (the "Shares") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the "Common Stock"), which shares may be sold by certain selling stockholders from time to time, as described in the prospectus supplement dated May 5, 2010 (the "Prospectus Supplement") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "Base Prospectus" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "Prospectus") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the "Registration Statement"). This letter is being delivered pursuant to your request.
In arriving at the opinions expressed below, we have examined originals or copies, certified or otherwise identified to our satisfaction, of such documents, corporate records and other instruments as we have deemed necessary or advisable to enable us to render the opinions here.
As to matters of fact material to this opinion, we have relied upon representations or certificates of officers or directors of the Company and assertions of fact contained in the documents that we have examined. We have not independently verified those facts.
In rendering the opinions set forth below, we have assumed (i) the genuineness of all signatures, (ii) the legal capacity and competency of all natural persons, (iii) the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals or certified to us as duly and validly adopted, (iv) the conformity to original documents of all documents submitted to us as copies, and (v) each certificate from governmental officials reviewed by us is accurate, complete and authentic, and all public records are accurate and complete.
Based upon the foregoing examination and in reliance thereon, and subject to the assumptions, limitations and qualifications stated herein, we are of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and we express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
This opinion has been prepared for use in connection with the filing by the Company of a Current Report on Form 8-K, which Form 8-K will be incorporated by reference in the Prospectus constituting part of the Registration Statement. We consent to the filing of this opinion as Exhibit 5.1 to the above-described Form 8-K and we further consent to the use of our
name under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Registration Statement and the prospectus that forms a part thereof. In giving these consents, we do not thereby admit that we are within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the Rules and Regulations of the Commission.
This opinion is being furnished to the Company solely for submission to the Commission as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and, accordingly, may not be relied upon, quoted in any manner to or delivered to any other person or entity without, in each instance, our prior written consent.
This opinion is rendered as of the date first written above and we disclaim any obligation to advise you of facts, circumstances, events or developments that hereafter may be brought to our attention and that may alter, affect or modify the opinion expressed herein. Our opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and we render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100511155705.txt.gz
TIME:20100511155705
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 11, 2010. At the Annual Meeting, Gallagher's stockholders elected six directors to Gallagher's Board of Directors, ratified the appointment of Ernst & Young LLP as Gallagher's independent registered public accounting firm for fiscal year 2010, and approved Gallagher's Senior Management Incentive Plan, each as more fully described below.
: Election of six directors to serve for one-year terms until Gallagher's 2011 Annual Meeting of Stockholders:
Proposal 1
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
The slides containing information presented at Gallagher's 2010 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are attached to this report as Exhibit 99. This exhibit may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com). This information is being furnished pursuant to Item 7.01, "Regulation FD Disclosure." These slides contain certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100715161834.txt.gz
TIME:20100715161834
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The information required by this item with respect to the New Credit Agreement (as defined below) is incorporated herein by reference to Item 2.03.
 
On July 15, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) entered into the New Credit Agreement described in Item 2.03, replacing Gallagher's $450.0 million revolving credit facility, dated as of October 5, 2005, which was scheduled to expire on October 4, 2010 (the Previous Credit Agreement). For a summary of the material terms of the Previous Credit Agreement, reference is made to the description of such agreement in Note 7 to the financial statements contained in Part I, Item 1 of Gallagher's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010, which description is incorporated herein by reference.
At the time of its termination, all indebtedness, liabilities and obligations outstanding under the Previous Credit Agreement were fully paid and satisfied, except for approximately $15.2 million of letters of credit, which became letters of credit under the New Credit Agreement. Gallagher incurred no early termination penalties or fees in connection with terminating the Previous Credit Agreement.
 
On July 15, 2010, Gallagher entered into an unsecured multicurrency credit agreement (the New Credit Agreement), dated as of July 15, 2010, with Bank of Montreal, as administrative agent (BMO), and the other lenders signatory thereto. The New Credit Agreement, which expires on July 14, 2014, provides for a revolving credit commitment of up to $500 million, of which $75 million may be used for issuances of standby or commercial letters of credit and up to $50 million may be used for the making of swing loans (as defined in the New Credit Agreement). Gallagher may from time to time request, subject to certain conditions, an increase in the revolving credit commitment under the New Credit Agreement up to a maximum aggregate revolving credit commitment of $600 million. As of July 15, 2010, there were no borrowings outstanding under the New Credit Agreement.
The New Credit Agreement provides that Gallagher may elect that each borrowing in U.S. dollars be either base rate loans or eurocurrency loans, each as defined in the New Credit Agreement. However, all loans denominated in currencies other than U.S. dollars will be eurocurrency loans. Interest rates on base rate loans and outstanding drawings on letters of credit in U.S. dollars under the New Credit Agreement will be based on the base rate, as defined in the New Credit Agreement. Interest rates on eurocurrency loans or outstanding drawings on letters of credit in currencies other than U.S. dollars under the New Credit Agreement will be based on adjusted LIBOR, as defined in the New Credit Agreement, plus a margin of 1.45%, 1.65%, 1.85% or 2.00%, depending on the financial leverage ratio maintained by Gallagher. Interest rates on swing loans will be based, at the election of Gallagher, on either the base rate or an alternate rate that may be quoted by BMO. The annual facility fee related to the New Credit Agreement will be either 0.30%, 0.35%, 0.40% or 0.50% of the used and unused portions of the revolving credit commitment, depending on the financial leverage ratio maintained by Gallagher.
The New Credit Agreement includes covenants requiring Gallagher to maintain specified levels of net worth and financial leverage ratios. The New Credit Agreement also includes customary events of default, with corresponding grace periods, including, without limitation, payment defaults, cross-defaults to other agreements evidencing indebtedness and bankruptcy-related defaults. Several of Gallagher's wholly-owned subsidiaries are co-obligors under the New Credit Agreement.
The foregoing summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the New Credit Agreement, filed herewith as Exhibit 4.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 4.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibits
 
 
 
T M C A is entered into as of July 15, 2010, by and among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), the Subsidiaries from time to time party to this Agreement as joint and several obligors (such Subsidiaries together with the Company individually, a and collectively, the ), the several financial institutions from time to time party to this Agreement, as Lenders, and Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent as provided herein. All capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the same meanings herein as such terms are defined in Section 6.1 hereof.
HIS
ULTICURRENCY
REDIT
GREEMENT
"Company"
"Borrower"
"Borrowers"
The Borrowers have requested, and the Lenders have agreed to extend, certain credit facilities on the terms and conditions of this Agreement.
N, T, in consideration of the mutual agreements contained herein, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
S 1. T C.
ECTION
HE
REDITS
. Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, each Lender, by its acceptance hereof, severally agrees to make a loan or loans (individually a and collectively for all the Lenders ) in U.S. Dollars and Alternative Currencies to the Borrowers from time to time on a revolving basis in an aggregate outstanding Original Dollar Amount up to the amount of such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment, subject to any reductions thereof pursuant to the terms hereof on or after the Effective Date and before the Termination Date. The sum of the (i) aggregate Original Dollar Amount of Revolving Loans, (ii) the aggregate Original Dollar Amount of Swing Loans, and (iii) the aggregate U.S. Dollar Equivalent of all L/C Obligations at any time outstanding shall not exceed the Revolving Credit Commitments in effect at such time. Each Borrowing of Revolving Loans shall be made ratably from the Lenders in proportion to their respective Percentages. As provided in Section 1.5(a) hereof, the Company on behalf of the Borrowers, may elect that each Borrowing of Revolving Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars be either Base Rate Loans or Eurocurrency Loans. All Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency shall be Eurocurrency Loans. Revolving Loans may be repaid and the principal amount thereof reborrowed before the Termination Date, subject to all the terms and conditions hereof.
Section 1.1. The Revolving Credit Commitments
"Revolving Loan"
"Revolving Loans"
. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, as part of the Revolving Credit, the L/C Issuer shall issue standby or commercial letters of credit (each a ) for the account of the Borrowers or for the account of the Borrowers and one or more of their Subsidiaries in U.S. Dollars or an Alternative Currency in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of an aggregate undrawn face amount up to the L/C Sublimit.
Section 1.2. Letters of Credit
General Terms.
"Letter of Credit"
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Existing L/Cs (all of which are listed and described on Schedule 1.2(a) hereto) shall each constitute a herein for all purposes of the Agreement to the same extent, and with the same force and effect, as if such Existing L/Cs had been issued at the request of the Company on behalf of the Borrowers under the Revolving Credit. Each Letter of Credit shall be issued by the L/C Issuer in the manner described above, but each Lender shall be obligated to reimburse the L/C Issuer for its Percentage of the amount of each drawing thereunder and, accordingly, each Letter of Credit shall constitute usage of the Revolving Credit Commitment of each Lender in an amount equal to its Percentage of the L/C Obligations then outstanding.
"Letter of Credit"
pro rata
(b) At any time on or after the Effective Date and before the Termination Date, the L/C Issuer shall, at the request of the Company on behalf of the Borrowers, issue one or more Letters of Credit in a form satisfactory to the L/C Issuer, with expiration dates no later than the earlier of (i) 12 months from the date of issuance or (ii) 365 days after the Termination Date, in an aggregate face amount as set forth above, upon the receipt of an application duly executed by the Company on behalf of the Borrowers and, if such Letter of Credit is for the account of one of its Subsidiaries, such Subsidiary for the relevant Letter of Credit in the form customarily prescribed by the L/C Issuer for the type of Letter of Credit, whether standby or commercial, requested (each an ); that with respect to any Letter of Credit with an expiration date that is later than the Termination Date, the Borrowers shall deliver to the Administrative Agent no later than 20 days prior to the Termination Date cash collateral in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of the full amount then available for drawing under such Letter of Credit. Any such cash collateral required by this Section 1.2(b) shall be held by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the terms of Section 10.4 hereof. Notwithstanding anything contained in any Application to the contrary (i) the Borrowers' obligation to pay fees in connection with each Letter of Credit shall be as exclusively set forth in Section 4.1(b) hereof, (ii) except as provided above, at any time when no Event of Default exists the L/C Issuer will not call for the funding by the Borrowers of any amount under a Letter of Credit before being presented with a drawing thereunder, and (iii) if the L/C Issuer is not timely reimbursed for the amount of any drawing under a Letter of Credit on the date such drawing is paid, the Borrowers' obligation to reimburse the L/C Issuer for the amount of such drawing shall bear interest (which the Borrowers hereby promise to pay) from and after the date such drawing is paid until payment in full thereof at a rate per annum (x) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in U.S. Dollars, equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans the Base Rate from time to time in effect and (y) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in an Alternative Currency, equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans the rate established pursuant to Section 3.2(c)(iii) hereof for Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency. The L/C Issuer will promptly notify the Lenders of each issuance by it of a Letter of Credit. If the L/C Issuer issues any Letters of Credit with expiration dates that are automatically extended under the terms set forth in such Letter of Credit, then the L/C Issuer will give notice of non-renewal to the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit with a copy to the Company on behalf of the Borrowers before the time necessary to prevent such automatic extension if before such required notice date (i) the expiration date of such Letter of Credit if so extended would be later than 365 days after the Termination Date, (ii) the Revolving Credit Commitments have been terminated or (iii) an Event of Default exists and the Required Lenders have given the L/C Issuer instructions not to so permit the extension of the expiration date of such Letter of Credit. The
Applications.
"Application"
provided,
plus
plus
 
L/C Issuer agrees to issue amendments to the Letters of Credit increasing the amount, or extending the expiration date, thereof at the request of the Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, subject to the conditions of Section 8.2 and the other terms of this Section 1.2. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the L/C Issuer's obligation to issue, amend or extend the expiration date of a Letter of Credit is subject to the conditions of Section 8.2 and the other terms of this Section 1.2 and the L/C Issuer will not issue, amend or extend the expiration date of any Letter of Credit if any Lender notifies the L/C Issuer of any failure to satisfy or otherwise comply with such conditions and terms and directs the L/C Issuer not to take such action. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, the L/C Issuer shall be under no obligation to issue, extend or amend any Letter of Credit if a default of any Lender's obligations to fund under Section 1.2(e) exists or any Lender is at such time a Defaulting Lender hereunder, unless cash collateral has been delivered to the Administrative Agent in accordance with Section 1.6 or the L/C Issuer has entered into arrangements with Borrowers or such Lender satisfactory to the L/C Issuer to eliminate the L/C Issuer's risk with respect to such Lender.
(c) Subject to Section 1.2(b) hereof, the obligation of the Borrowers to reimburse the L/C Issuer for all drawings under a Letter of Credit (a ) shall be governed by the Application related to such Letter of Credit, except that, if and as long as no Default or Event of Default exists and the other conditions in Section 8.2 hereof are satisfied, any Reimbursement Obligation outstanding on account of a drawing under a Letter of Credit shall automatically convert into a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of such Reimbursement Obligation on the date such drawing occurs and the L/C Issuer shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender thereof, and each Lender shall thereupon fund its Base Rate Loan in such Borrowing in accordance with Sections 1.1 and 1.5 (except for any requirement that a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans be in a certain amount). If the conditions in Section 8.2 cannot be satisfied with respect to any drawing, then reimbursement of such drawing shall be made in the U.S. Dollar Equivalent in immediately available funds at the Administrative Agent's principal office in Chicago, Illinois or such other office as the Administrative Agent may designate in writing to the Company (who shall thereafter cause to be distributed to the L/C Issuer such amount(s) in like funds) by no later than 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the date when such drawing is paid or, if such drawing was paid after 11:30 a.m. (Chicago time), by the end of such day. If the Borrowers do not make any such reimbursement payment on the date due and the Participating Lenders fund their participations therein in the manner set forth in Section 1.2(e) below, then all payments thereafter received by the Administrative Agent in discharge of any of the relevant Reimbursement Obligations shall be distributed in accordance with Section 1.2(e) below.
The Reimbursement Obligations.
"Reimbursement Obligation"
(d) The Borrowers' obligation to reimburse L/C Obligations as provided in subsection (c) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and the relevant Application under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the L/C Issuer under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any
Obligations Absolute.
 
other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrowers' obligations hereunder. None of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, or the L/C Issuer shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the L/C Issuer; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the L/C Issuer from liability to the Borrowers to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrowers that are caused by the L/C Issuer's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the L/C Issuer (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the L/C Issuer shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
provided
(e) Each Lender (other than the Lender then acting as L/C Issuer in issuing Letters of Credit), by its acceptance hereof, severally agrees to purchase from the L/C Issuer, and the L/C Issuer hereby agrees to sell to each such Lender (a ), an undivided percentage participating interest (a ), to the extent of its Percentage, in each Letter of Credit issued by, and each Reimbursement Obligation owed to, the L/C Issuer. Upon any failure by the Borrowers to pay any Reimbursement Obligation at the time required on the date the related drawing is paid, as set forth in Section 1.2(c) above, or if the L/C Issuer is required at any time to return to a Borrower or to a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other Person any portion of any payment of any Reimbursement Obligation, each Participating Lender shall, not later than the Business Day it receives a certificate in the form of Exhibit A hereto from the L/C Issuer to such effect, if such certificate is received before 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time), or not later than the following Business Day, if such certificate is received after such time, pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of the L/C Issuer an amount equal to its Percentage of such unpaid or recaptured Reimbursement Obligation together with interest on such amount accrued from the date the related payment was made by the L/C Issuer to the date of such payment by such Participating Lender at a rate per annum equal to (i) from the date the related payment was made by the L/C Issuer to the date two Business Days after payment by such Participating Lender is due hereunder, (x) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in U.S. Dollars, the Federal Funds Rate for each such day and (y) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in an Alternative Currency, at the cost to the Administrative Agent of funding the amount it advanced to fund such Lender's
The Participating Interests.
"Participating Lender"
"Participating Interest"
 
payment, as determined by the Administrative Agent and (ii) from the date two Business Days after the date such payment is due from such Participating Lender to the date such payment is made by such Participating Lender, (x) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in U.S. Dollars, the Base Rate in effect for each such day and (y) if such Letter of Credit is denominated in an Alternative Currency, the rate established by Section 3.2(c) hereof for Eurocurrency Loans denominated in such currency. Each such Participating Lender shall thereafter be entitled to receive its Percentage of each payment received in respect of the relevant Reimbursement Obligation and of interest paid thereon, with the L/C Issuer retaining its Percentage thereof as a Lender hereunder.
The several obligations of the Participating Lenders to the L/C Issuer under this Section 1.2 shall be absolute, irrevocable and unconditional under any and all circumstances whatsoever (except, without limiting the Borrowers' obligations under each Application, to the extent the Borrowers are relieved from their obligation to reimburse the L/C Issuer for a drawing under a Letter of Credit because of the L/C Issuer's gross negligence or willful misconduct in determining that documents received under the Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof) and shall not be subject to any set-off, counterclaim or defense to payment which any Participating Lender may have or have had against any Borrower, the L/C Issuer, any other Lender or any other Person whatsoever.
(f) The Participating Lenders shall, to the extent of their respective Percentages, indemnify the L/C Issuer (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrowers) against any cost, expense (including reasonable counsel fees and disbursements), claim, demand, action, loss or liability (except such as result from the L/C Issuer's gross negligence or willful misconduct) that the L/C Issuer may suffer or incur in connection with any Letter of Credit. The obligations of the Participating Lenders under this Section 1.2(f) and all other parts of this Section 1.2 shall survive termination of this Agreement and of all other L/C Documents.
Indemnification.
(g) . The L/C Issuer may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Company, the Administrative Agent, the replaced L/C Issuer and the successor L/C Issuer. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the L/C Issuer. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrowers shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced L/C Issuer. From and after the effective date of any such replacement (i) the successor L/C Issuer shall have all the rights and obligations of the L/C Issuer under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "L/C Issuer " shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous L/C Issuer, or to such successor and all previous L/C Issuers, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an L/C Issuer hereunder, the replaced L/C Issuer shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an L/C Issuer under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of the L/C Issuer
(h) The Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, shall provide at least five (5) Business Days' advance written notice to the Administrative Agent of each request for the issuance of a Letter of Credit, such notice in each case to be accompanied by an Application for such Letter of Credit properly completed and
Manner of Requesting a Letter of Credit.
 
executed by the Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, and, in the case of an extension or amendment or an increase in the amount of a Letter of Credit, a written request therefor, in a form acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the L/C Issuer, in each case, together with the fees called for by this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the L/C Issuer of the Administrative Agent's receipt of each such notice (and the L/C Issuer shall be entitled to assume that the conditions precedent to any such issuance, extension, amendment or increase have been satisfied unless notified to the contrary by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders) and the L/C Issuer shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of the issuance of the Letter of Credit so requested.
. (a)  Each Base Rate Loan made or maintained by a Lender shall bear interest during each Interest Period it is outstanding (computed on the basis of a year of 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, and actual days elapsed) on the unpaid principal amount thereof from the date such Loan is advanced, continued or created by conversion from a Eurocurrency Loan until maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise) at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans the Base Rate from time to time in effect, payable on the last day of its Interest Period and at maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise).
Section 1.3. Applicable Interest Rates
Base Rate Loans.
plus
(b) Each Eurocurrency Loan made or maintained by a Lender shall bear interest during each Interest Period it is outstanding (computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and actual days elapsed) on the unpaid principal amount thereof from the date such Loan is advanced, continued, or created by conversion from a Base Rate until maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise) at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans plus the Adjusted LIBOR applicable for such Interest Period, payable on the last day of the Interest Period and at maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise), and, if the applicable Interest Period is longer than three months, on each day occurring every three months after the commencement of such Interest Period. There shall not be more than ten Borrowings of Eurocurrency Loans outstanding at any one time.
Eurocurrency Loans.
(c) . The Administrative Agent shall determine each interest rate applicable to the Loans and the other Obligations, and a reasonable determination thereof by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive and binding except in the case of manifest error or willful misconduct. The Original Dollar Amount of each Eurocurrency Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency shall be determined or redetermined, as applicable, effective as of the first day of each Interest Period applicable to such Loan.
Rate Determinations
. Each Borrowing of Base Rate Loans shall be in an amount not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000, that a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans applied to pay a Reimbursement Obligation pursuant to Section 1.2(c) hereof shall be in an amount equal to such Reimbursement Obligation. Each Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans shall be in an amount not less than an Original Dollar Amount of $3,000,000 and, if greater, in units of the relevant currency as would have an Original Dollar Amount most closely approximating $500,000 or an integral multiple thereof.
Section 1.4. Minimum Borrowing Amounts for Revolving Loans
provided
 
. (a) . The Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, shall give notice to the Administrative Agent by no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) (i) at least four Business Days before the date on which the Borrowers request the Lenders to advance a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency, (ii) at least three Business Days before the date on which the Borrowers request the Lenders to advance a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars and (iii) at least one Business Day before the date on which the Borrowers request the Lenders to advance a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans. The Loans included in each Borrowing shall bear interest initially at the type of rate specified in such notice of a new Borrowing. Thereafter, the Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, may from time to time elect to change or continue the type of interest rate borne by each Borrowing or, subject to the minimum amount requirement for each outstanding Borrowing set forth in Section 1.4 hereof, a portion thereof, as follows: (i) if such Borrowing is of Eurocurrency Loans, on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, the Company may continue all or part of such Borrowing as Eurocurrency Loans for an Interest Period or Interest Periods specified by the Company or, if such Eurocurrency Loan is denominated in U.S. Dollars, convert all or part of such Borrowing into Base Rate Loans and (ii) if such Borrowing is of Base Rate Loans, on any Business Day, the Company may (subject to the notice requirements set forth herein) convert all or part of such Borrowing into Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars or denominated in an Alternative Currency, in each case, for an Interest Period or Interest Periods specified by the Company. The Company shall give all such notices requesting the advance, continuation, or conversion of a Borrowing to the Administrative Agent by telephone, telecopy or other telecommunication device acceptable to the Administrative Agent (which notice shall be irrevocable once given and, if by telephone, shall be promptly confirmed in writing). Notices of the continuation of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans for an additional Interest Period or of the conversion of part or all of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars into Base Rate Loans or of Base Rate Loans into Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars must be given by no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) at least three Business Days before the date of the requested continuation or conversion. Notices of the continuation of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency must be given no later than 12:00 noon (Chicago time) at least four Business Days before the requested continuation. All such notices concerning the advance, continuation, or conversion of a Borrowing shall specify the date of the requested advance, continuation or conversion of a Borrowing (which shall be a Business Day), the amount of the requested Borrowing to be advanced, continued, or converted, the type of Loans to comprise such new, continued or converted Borrowing and, if such Borrowing is to be comprised of Eurocurrency Loans, the currency and the Interest Period applicable thereto and shall be substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit B (Notice of Borrowing) or Exhibit C (Notice of Continuation/Conversion), as applicable, or in such other form acceptable to the Administrative Agent. Upon notice to the Company by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders (or, in the case of an Event of Default under Section 10.1(k) or 10.1(l) hereof with respect to the Company, without notice), no Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans shall be advanced, continued, or created by conversion if any Default or Event of Default then exists. The Borrowers agree that the Administrative Agent may rely on any such telephonic or telecopy notice given by any person it in good faith believes is an Authorized Representative of the Company without the necessity of independent investigation, and in the event any such notice by telephone conflicts with any written confirmation, such telephonic notice shall govern if the Administrative Agent has acted in reliance thereon.
Section 1.5. Manner of Borrowing, and Designating Interest Rates Applicable to, Revolving Loans
Notice to the Administrative Agent
 
(b) . The Administrative Agent shall give prompt telephonic, telecopy or other telecommunication notice to each Lender of any notice from the Company received pursuant to Section 1.5(a) above. The Administrative Agent shall give notice to the Company and each Lender by like means of the interest rate applicable to each Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans and, if such Borrowing is denominated in an Alternative Currency, shall give notice by such means to the Company and each Lender of the Original Dollar Amount thereof.
Notice to the Lenders
(c) . Any outstanding Borrowing of Base Rate Loans shall, subject to Section 8.2 hereof, automatically be continued for an additional Interest Period on the last day of its then current Interest Period unless the Company has notified the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 1.5(a) that it intends to convert such Borrowing into a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans or notifies the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 3.5 that it intends to prepay such Borrowing. If the Company fails to give notice pursuant to Section 1.5(a) above of the continuation or conversion of any outstanding principal amount of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars before the last day of its then current Interest Period within the period required by Section 1.5(a) and has not notified the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 3.5 that it intends to prepay such Borrowing, such Borrowing shall automatically be converted into a Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, subject to Section 8.2 hereof. If the Company fails to give notice pursuant to Section 1.5(a) above of the continuation of any outstanding principal amount of a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency before the last day of its then current Interest Period within the period required by Section 1.5(a) and has not notified the Administrative Agent within the period required by Section 3.5 that it intends to prepay such Borrowing, such Borrowing shall automatically be continued as a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans in the same Alternative Currency with an Interest Period of one month, subject to Section 8.2 hereof, including the application of Section 1.5 and the restrictions contained in the definition of Interest Period.
Company's Failure to Notify
(d) . Not later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) on the date of any requested advance of a new Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, and not later than 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the date of any requested advance of a new Borrowing of Base Rate Loans, subject to Section 8 hereof, each Lender shall make available its Loan comprising part of such Borrowing in funds immediately available at the principal office of the Administrative Agent in Chicago, Illinois, except that if such Borrowing is denominated in an Alternative Currency each Lender shall, subject to Section 8 hereof, make available its Loan comprising part of such Borrowing at such office as the Administrative Agent has previously specified in a notice to each Lender, in such funds as are then customary for the settlement of international transactions in such currency and no later than such local time as is necessary for such funds to be received and transferred to the Company for same day value on the date of the Borrowing. The Administrative Agent shall make the proceeds of each new Borrowing denominated in U.S. Dollars available to the Company at the Administrative Agent's principal office in Chicago, Illinois, by depositing such proceeds to the credit of the Company's operating account
Disbursement of Revolving Loans
 
maintained with the Administrative Agent or as the Company and the Administrative Agent may otherwise agree, and the Administrative Agent shall make the proceeds of each new Borrowing denominated in an Alternative Currency available at such office as the Administrative Agent has previously agreed to with the Company, in each case in the type of funds received by the Administrative Agent from the Lenders.
(e) Unless the Administrative Agent shall have been notified by a Lender before the date on which such Lender is scheduled to make payment to the Administrative Agent of the proceeds of a Revolving Loan (which notice shall be effective upon receipt) that such Lender does not intend to make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such payment when due and the Administrative Agent may in reliance upon such assumption (but shall not be required to) make available to the Company the proceeds of the Loan to be made by such Lender and, if any Lender has not in fact made such payment to the Administrative Agent, such Lender shall, on demand, pay to the Administrative Agent the amount made available to the Company attributable to such Lender together with interest thereon in respect of each day during the period commencing on the date such amount was made available to the Company and ending on (but excluding) the date such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent at a rate per annum equal to (i) from the date the related advance was made by the Administrative Agent to the date two Business Days after payment by such Lender is due hereunder, at a rate per annum equal to the Federal Funds Rate or, in the case of a Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the cost to the Administrative Agent of funding the amount it advanced to fund such Lender's Loan, as reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent and (ii) from the date two Business Days after the date such payment is due from such Lender to the date such payment is made by such Lender, the Base Rate in effect for each such day or, in the case of a Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the rate established by Section 3.2(c) for Eurocurrency Loans denominated in such currency. If such amount is not received from such Lender by the Administrative Agent immediately upon demand, the Borrowers will, on demand, repay to the Administrative Agent the proceeds of the Loan attributable to such Lender with interest thereon at a rate per annum equal to the interest rate applicable to the relevant Loan, but without such payment being considered a payment or prepayment of a Loan under Section 3.6 hereof, so that the Borrowers will have no liability under such Section with respect to such payment; that such repayment by the Borrowers shall not be deemed to release or otherwise limit any claims or rights that the Borrowers may have against any Lender for the failure to fund any Loans hereunder.
Administrative Agent Reliance on Lender Funding.
provided,
. Anything contained herein to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event that any Lender at any time is a Defaulting Lender, then (a) during any Defaulting Lender Period with respect to such Defaulting Lender, such Defaulting Lender shall be deemed not to be a for purposes of voting on any matters (including the granting of any consents or waivers) with respect to any of the Loan Documents and such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment shall be excluded for purposes of determining (provided that the foregoing shall not permit an increase in such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment or an extension of the maturity date of such Lender's Revolving Loans or other Obligations without such Lender's consent); (b) to the extent permitted by applicable law, until such time as the Defaulting Lender Excess with respect to such
Section 1.6. Defaulting Lenders
"Lender"
"Required Lenders"
 
Defaulting Lender shall have been reduced to zero, any voluntary prepayment of the Revolving Loans shall, if the Administrative Agent so directs at the time of making such voluntary prepayment, be applied to the Revolving Loans of other Lenders as if such Defaulting Lender had no Revolving Loans outstanding; (c) such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment and outstanding Revolving Loans shall be excluded for purposes of calculating any facility fee payable to Lenders pursuant to Section 4.1 in respect of any day during any Defaulting Lender Period with respect to such Defaulting Lender, and such Defaulting Lender shall not be entitled to receive any fee pursuant to Section 4.1 with respect to such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment in respect of any Defaulting Lender Period with respect to such Defaulting Lender (and any Letter of Credit fee otherwise payable to a Lender who is a Defaulting Lender shall instead be paid to the L/C Issuer for its use and benefit); (d) the utilization of Revolving Credit Commitment as at any date of determination shall be calculated as if such Defaulting Lender had funded all Revolving Loans of such Defaulting Lender; and (e) if so requested by the L/C Issuer at any time during the Defaulting Lender Period with respect to such Defaulting Lender, the Borrowers shall deliver to the Administrative Agent cash collateral in an amount equal to such Defaulting Lender's Percentage of L/C Obligations then outstanding (to be, held by the Administrative Agent as set forth in Section 10.4 hereof). No Revolving Credit Commitment of any Lender shall be increased or otherwise affected, and, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Section 1.6, performance by the Borrowers of their obligations hereunder and the other Loan Documents shall not be excused or otherwise modified as a result of the operation of this Section 1.6. The rights and remedies against a Defaulting Lender under this Section 1.6 are in addition to other rights and remedies which the Borrowers may have against such Defaulting Lender and which the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have against such Defaulting Lender.
S 2. T S L.
ECTION
HE
WING
INE
. Subject to all of the terms and conditions hereof, as part of the Revolving Credit, the Swing Line Lender may, in its discretion, make loans in U.S. Dollars to the Borrowers under the Swing Line (individually, a and collectively, the ) which shall not in the aggregate at any time outstanding exceed the Swing Line Sublimit. The Swing Line Loans may be availed of by the Borrowers from time to time and borrowings thereunder may be repaid and used again during the period beginning on the Effective Date and ending on the Termination Date; that each Swing Loan must be repaid on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto. Each Swing Loan shall be in an amount not less than $500,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000.
Section 2.1. Swing Loans
"Swing Loan"
"Swing Loans"
provided
. Each Swing Loan shall bear interest until maturity (whether by acceleration or otherwise) at a rate per annum equal to (i) the sum of the Base Rate the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans from time to time in effect (computed on the basis of a year 365 or 366 days, as the case may be, for the actual number of days elapsed) or (ii) the Quoted Rate (computed on the basis of a year of 360 days for the actual number of days elapsed). Interest on each Swing Loan shall be due and payable on the last day of each Interest Period applicable thereto, and interest after maturity (whether by lapse of time, acceleration or otherwise) shall be due and payable upon demand.
Section 2.2. Interest on Swing Loans
plus
 
. The Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, shall give the Administrative Agent prior notice (which may be written or oral) no later than 3:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the date upon which the Company requests that any Swing Loan be made, of the amount and date of such Swing Loan and the Interest Period selected therefor. The Administrative Agent shall promptly advise the Swing Line Lender of any such notice received from the Company. Within 30 minutes after receiving such notice, the Swing Line Lender shall in its discretion quote an interest rate to the Company at which the Swing Line Lender would be willing to make such Swing Loan available to the Borrowers for a given Interest Period (the rate so quoted for a given Interest Period being herein referred to as the ). The Borrowers acknowledge and agree that the interest rate quote is given for immediate and irrevocable acceptance, and if the Company does not so immediately accept the Quoted Rate for the full amount requested by the Borrowers for such Swing Loan, the Quoted Rate shall be deemed immediately withdrawn and such Swing Loan shall bear interest at the rate per annum determined by adding the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans to the Base Rate for the Interest Period selected by the Company. Subject to all of the terms and conditions hereof, the proceeds of such Swing Loan shall be made available to the Company on the date so requested at the offices of the Swing Line Lender in Chicago, Illinois. Anything contained in the foregoing to the contrary notwithstanding the undertaking of the Swing Line Lender to make Swing Loans shall be subject to all of the terms and conditions of this Agreement; that the Swing Line Lender shall be entitled to assume that the conditions precedent to an advance of any Swing Loan have been satisfied unless notified to the contrary by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders. No Lender shall acquire a participation in a Swing Loan pursuant to this Section 2 if an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing at the time such Swing Loan was made and either the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders shall have notified the Swing Line Lender prior to the time such Swing Loan was made that such an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 2.3. Requests for Swing Loans
"Quoted Rate"
provided
. In its sole and absolute discretion, the Swing Line Lender may at any time, on behalf of the Borrowers (and the Borrowers hereby irrevocably authorize the Swing Line Lender to act on their behalf for such purpose) and with notice to the Company, request each Lender to make a Revolving Loan in the form of a Base Rate Loan in an amount equal to such Lender's Percentage of the amount of the Swing Loans outstanding on the date such notice is given. Unless an Event of Default described in Section 10.1(k) or (l) exists with respect to the Company, regardless of the existence of any other Event of Default, each Lender shall make the proceeds of its requested Revolving Loan available to the Swing Line Lender, in immediately available funds, at the Swing Line Lender's principal office in Chicago, Illinois, before 12:00 Noon (Chicago time) on the Business Day following the day such notice is given. The proceeds of such Revolving Loans shall be immediately applied to repay such outstanding Swing Loans.
Section 2.4. Refunding Loans
. If any Lender refuses or otherwise fails to make a Revolving Loan when requested by the Swing Line Lender pursuant to Section 2.4 above (because an Event of Default described in Section 10.1(k) or (l) exists with respect to the Borrower or otherwise), such Lender shall, by the time and in the manner such Revolving Loan was to have been funded to the Swing Line Lender, purchase from the Swing Line Lender an undivided participating interest in the relevant outstanding Swing Loans in an amount equal to its
Section 2.5. Participations
 
Percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Swing Loans that were to have been repaid with such Revolving Loans, no purchase of a participation in a Swing Loan bearing interest at the Quoted Rate need be made until after expiration of the Interest Period applicable thereto. Each Lender that so purchases a participation in a Swing Loan shall thereafter be entitled to receive its Percentage of each payment of principal received on the relevant Swing Loan and of interest received thereon accruing from the date such Lender funded to the Swing Line Lender its participation in such Loan. The several obligations of the Lenders under this Section 2.5 shall be absolute, irrevocable and unconditional under any and all circumstances whatsoever and shall not be subject to any set-off, counterclaim or defense to payment which any Lender may have or have had against any Borrower, any other Lender or any other Person whatsoever. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such obligations shall not be affected by any Default or Event of Default or by any reduction or termination of the Revolving Credit Commitment of any Lender, and each payment made by a Lender under this Section 2.5 shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
provided
S 3. G P A A L; R C C T I
ECTION
ENERAL
ROVISIONS
PPLICABLE
TO
LL
OANS
EVOLVING
REDIT
OMMITMENT
ERMINATIONS
AND
NCREASES
. As provided in Section 1.5(a) hereof in the case of Revolving Loans and in Section 2.3 in the case of Swing Loans, at the time of each request to advance, continue, or create by conversion a Borrowing of Loans (other than Base Rate Loans), the Company shall select an Interest Period applicable to such Loans from among the available options. The term means the period commencing on the date a Borrowing of Loans is advanced, continued, or created by conversion and ending: (a) in the case of Base Rate Loans, on the last day of the calendar quarter in which such Borrowing is advanced, continued, or created by conversion (or on the last day of the following quarter if such Loan is advanced, continued or created by conversion on the last day of a calendar quarter), (b) in the case of Eurocurrency Loans, one, two, three, or six months thereafter and (c) in the case of Swing Loans, on the date one to five days thereafter as mutually agreed by the Swing Line Lender and the Company; that:
Section 3.1. Interest Periods
"Interest Period"
provided, however,
(a) any Interest Period for a Borrowing of Revolving Loans consisting of Base Rate Loans that otherwise would end after the Termination Date shall end on the Termination Date;
(b) for any Borrowing of Revolving Loans consisting of Eurocurrency Loans or for any Swing Loan, the Company may not select an Interest Period that extends beyond the Termination Date;
(c) whenever the last day of any Interest Period would otherwise be a day that is not a Business Day, the last day of such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day; that, if such extension would cause the last day of an Interest Period for a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans to occur in the following calendar month, the last day of such Interest Period shall be the immediately preceding Business Day; and
provided
 
(d) for purposes of determining an Interest Period for a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, a month means a period starting on one day in a calendar month and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the next calendar month; that if there is no numerically corresponding day in the month in which such an Interest Period is to end or if such an Interest Period begins on the last Business Day of a calendar month, then such Interest Period shall end on the last Business Day of the calendar month in which such Interest Period is to end.
provided, however,
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, while any Event of Default exists or after acceleration, (x) the Borrowers shall pay interest (after as well as before entry of judgment thereon to the extent permitted by law) on the principal amount of all Loans and Reimbursement Obligations at a rate per annum equal to, and (y) with respect to any outstanding Letter of Credit, the Borrowers shall pay Letter of Credit fees at a rate per annum equal to:
Section 3.2. Default Rate
(a) for any Base Rate Loan or any Swing Loan bearing interest based on the Base Rate, the sum of two percent (2.0%)  the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans the Base Rate from time to time in effect;
plus
plus
(b) for any Swing Loan bearing interest at the Quoted Rate or any Eurocurrency Loan denominated in U.S. Dollars, the sum of two percent (2.0%)  the rate of interest in effect thereon at the time of such default until the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto and, thereafter, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of two percent (2%)  the Applicable Margin for Base Rate Loans the Base Rate from time to time in effect;
plus
plus
plus
(c) for any Eurocurrency Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the sum of two percent (2.0%)  the rate of interest in effect thereon at the time of such default until the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto and, thereafter, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of (i) the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans (ii) two percent (2.0%)  (iii) the rate of interest per annum as determined in good faith by the Administrative Agent (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100,000 of 1%) at which overnight or weekend deposits (or, if such amount due remains unpaid more than three Business Days, then for such other period of time not longer than one month as the Administrative Agent may elect in good faith) of the relevant Alternative Currency for delivery in immediately available and freely transferable funds would be offered by the Administrative Agent to major banks in the interbank market upon request of such major banks for the applicable period as determined above and in an amount comparable to the unpaid principal amount of any such Eurocurrency Loan (or, if the Administrative Agent is not placing deposits in such currency in the interbank market, then the Administrative Agent's cost of funds in such currency for such period); and
plus
plus
plus
(d) for any Reimbursement Obligation, the sum of two percent (2.0%)  the amounts due under Section 1.2 with respect to such Reimbursement Obligation; and
plus
 
(e) for any Letter of Credit, the sum of two percent (2.0%)  the letter of credit fee due under Section 4.1 with respect to such Letter of Credit;
plus
that in the absence of acceleration, any adjustments pursuant to this Section shall be made at the election of the Administrative Agent, acting at the request or with the consent of the Required Lenders, with written notice to the Company (which notice may be revoked at the direction of the Required Lenders notwithstanding any provision of Section 14.13 requiring the unanimous consent of the Lenders to reduce interest rates). While any Event of Default exists or after acceleration, interest shall be paid on demand of the Administrative Agent at the request or with the consent of the Required Lenders.
provided, however,
. (a) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrowers to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender from time to time, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
Section 3.3. Evidence of Indebtedness
(b) The Administrative Agent shall also maintain accounts in which it will record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the type thereof and the Interest Period with respect thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrowers to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder from the Borrowers and each Lender's share thereof.
(c) The entries maintained in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) above shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the Obligations therein recorded; that the failure of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrowers to repay the Obligations in accordance with their terms. The Administrative Agent and each Lender agree to promptly provide to the Company copies of such accounts upon the reasonable request of the Company.
prima facie
provided, however,
(d) Any Lender may request that its Loans be evidenced by a promissory note or notes in the forms of Exhibit D (in the case of its Revolving Loans and referred to herein as a ), or Exhibit E (in the case of its Swing Loans and referred to herein as a ), as applicable (the Revolving Credit Notes, and Swing Line Note being hereinafter referred to collectively as the and individually as a ). In such event, the Borrowers shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a Note payable to such Lender or its registered assigns. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such Note or Notes and interest thereon shall at all times (including after any assignment pursuant to Section 14.12) be represented by one or more Notes payable to the order of the payee named therein or any assignee pursuant to Section 14.12, except to the extent that any such Lender or assignee subsequently returns any such Note for cancellation and requests that such Loans once again be evidenced as described in subsections (a) and (b) above.
"Revolving Credit Note"
"Swing Line Note"
"Notes"
"Note"
. Each Revolving Loan shall mature and become due and payable by the Borrowers on the Termination Date. Each Swing Loan shall mature and become due and payable by the Borrowers on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto or, if earlier, the Termination Date.
Section 3.4. Maturity of Loans
 
(a) . The Borrowers may prepay without premium or penalty and in whole or in part (but, if in part, then: (i) if such Borrowing is of Base Rate Loans, in an amount not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000 (except in the case of repayments of Base Rate Loans made under Section 1.2(c) which may be repaid in the full amount of such Base Rate Loans), (ii) if such Borrowing is of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars, in an amount not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples of $100,000, (iii) if such Borrowing is denominated in an Alternative Currency, an amount for which the U.S. Dollar Equivalent is not less than $1,000,000 and in integral multiples most closely approximating $100,000 and (iv) in an amount such that the minimum amount required for a Borrowing pursuant to Section 1.4 hereof remains outstanding) any Borrowing of (x) Eurocurrency Loans denominated in U.S. Dollars upon three Business Days' prior notice to the Administrative Agent, (y) Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency at any time upon four Business Days prior notice by the Company to the Administrative Agent, or (z) Base Rate Loans, at any time with notice delivered to the Administrative Agent no later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) on the date of prepayment, such prepayment to be made by the payment of the principal amount to be prepaid and accrued interest thereon to the date fixed for prepayment and, in the case of Eurocurrency Loans, any compensation required by Section 3.6 hereof. Swing Loans bearing interest at the Quoted Rate may only be paid on the last day of the Interest Period then applicable to such Loans. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise each Lender of any such prepayment notice it receives from the Company. Any amount of Loans paid or prepaid before the Termination Date may, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, be borrowed, repaid and borrowed again.
Section 3.5. Prepayments.
Optional
(b) . If at any time the sum of the (i) aggregate U.S. Dollar Equivalent of Revolving Loans, (ii) the aggregate Original Dollar Amount of Swing Loans, and (iii) the aggregate U.S. Dollar Equivalent of all L/C Obligations at any time outstanding shall exceed 100% of the Revolving Credit Commitments in effect at such time, the Borrowers shall immediately and without notice or demand pay over to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders as and for a mandatory prepayment on such Obligations an aggregate amount sufficient to reduce such outstanding Obligations to an amount not to exceed 100% of the Revolving Credit Commitments then in effect, with each such prepayment first to be applied to the Revolving Loans and Swing Loans until paid in full with any remaining balance to be held by the Administrative Agent in the Collateral Account as security for the Obligations owing with respect to the Letters of Credit.
Mandatory
. If any Lender shall incur any loss, cost or expense (including, without limitation, any loss (including loss of profit), cost or expense incurred by reason of the liquidation or re-employment of deposits or other funds acquired by such Lender to fund or maintain any Fixed Rate Loan or the relending or reinvesting of such deposits or amounts paid or prepaid to such Lender as a result of:
Section 3.6. Funding Indemnity for Fixed Rate Loans
(a) any payment, prepayment or conversion of a Fixed Rate Loan on a date prior to the last day of its Interest Period,
 
(b) any failure (because of a failure to meet the conditions of Section 8 or otherwise) by the Borrowers to borrow or continue a Fixed Rate Loan, or to convert a Base Rate Loan into a Fixed Rate Loan, on the date specified in a notice given pursuant to Section 1.5(a) or 2.3 or established pursuant to Section 1.5(c) hereof, or
(c) any acceleration of the maturity of a Fixed Rate Loan as a result of the occurrence of any Event of Default hereunder,
then, upon the demand of such Lender, the Borrowers shall pay to such Lender such amount as will reimburse such Lender for such loss, cost or expense. If any Lender makes such a claim for compensation, it shall provide to the Company, with a copy to the Administrative Agent, a certificate executed by an officer of such Lender setting forth the amount of such loss, cost or expense in reasonable detail and such certificate shall be conclusive if reasonably determined.
. The Borrowers shall have the right at any time and from time to time, upon five (5) Business Days' prior written notice from the Company to the Administrative Agent (or such shorter period of time agreed to by the Administrative Agent), to terminate the Revolving Credit Commitments without premium or penalty, in whole or in part, any partial termination to be (i) in an amount not less than $5,000,000, and (ii) allocated ratably among the Lenders in proportion to their respective Percentages, that the Revolving Credit Commitments may not be reduced to an amount less than the sum of the Original Dollar Amount of all Revolving Loans and Swing Loans and the U.S. Dollar Equivalent of all L/C Obligations then outstanding. Any termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments below the L/C Sublimit or Swing Line Sublimit then in effect shall reduce the L/C Sublimit and Swing Line Sublimit, as applicable, to an amount equal to the reduced aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments. The Administrative Agent shall give prompt notice to each Lender of any such termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments. Any termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments pursuant to this Section 3.7 may not be reinstated.
Section 3.7. Commitment Terminations
provided
. The Borrowers may from time to time, on any Business Day after the Effective Date and prior to the Termination Date so long as no Default or Event of Default exists, increase the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments by the Company delivering a Commitment Amount Increase Request at least five (5) Business Days prior to the desired effective date of such increase (the ) identifying an additional Lender (or additional Revolving Credit Commitments for existing Lender(s)) and the amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment (or additional amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment(s)); that (i) the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments shall not at any time exceed $600,000,000, and (ii) any increase of the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments shall be in an amount not less than $25,000,000. The effective date of any Commitment Amount Increase shall be agreed upon by the Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, and the Administrative Agent. Upon the effectiveness thereof, the new Lender(s) (or, if applicable, existing Lender(s)) shall advance Revolving Loans, or the existing Lenders shall make such assignments (which assignments shall not be subject to the requirements set forth in Section 14.12) of the outstanding Loans and L/C Obligations to the Lenders providing the Commitment Amount Increase so that, after giving effect to such assignments, each Lender (including the Lenders providing the Commitment
Section 3.8. Increase in Commitments
"Commitment Amount Increase"
provided, however,
 
Amount Increase) will hold Loans and L/C Obligations equal to its Percentage of all outstanding Loans and L/C Obligations. It shall be a condition to such effectiveness that (i) either no Eurocurrency Loans be outstanding on the date of such effectiveness or the Borrowers pay any applicable breakage cost under Section 3.6 incurred by any Lender resulting from the repayment of its Loans and (ii) the Borrowers shall not have terminated any portion of the Revolving Credit Commitments pursuant to Section 3.7 hereof. The Borrowers agree to pay any reasonable expenses of the Administrative Agent relating to any Commitment Amount Increase. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, no Lender shall have any obligation to increase its Revolving Credit Commitment and no Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment shall be increased without its consent thereto, and each Lender may at its option, unconditionally and without cause, decline to increase its Revolving Credit Commitment.
Each Borrower irrevocably appoints the Company as its agent hereunder to make requests on such Borrower's behalf for Borrowings, to select the interest rate to be applicable to such Borrowings, and to take any other action contemplated by the Loan Documents with respect to credit extended hereunder to the Borrowers. The Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall be entitled to conclusively presume that any action by the Company under the Loan Documents is taken on behalf of any one or more of the Borrowers whether or not the Company so indicates.
Section 3.9. Appointment of Company as Agent for Borrowers.
S 4. F; P A P.
ECTION
EES
LACE
AND
PPLICATION
OF
AYMENTS
. (a)  For the period from the Effective Date to but not including the Termination Date, the Borrowers shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Lenders in accordance with their Percentages, a facility fee accruing at the rate per annum equal to the Applicable Margin for Facility Fee on the average daily amount of the Revolving Credit Commitments whether or not in use. Such facility fee shall be payable quarterly in arrears on the last day of each calendar quarter in each year (commencing September 30, 2010) and on the Termination Date, unless the Revolving Credit Commitments are terminated in whole on an earlier date, in which event the fee for the period to but not including the date of such termination shall be paid in whole on the date of such termination.
Section 4.1. Fees
Facility Fee.
(b) On the date of issuance or extension, or increase in the amount, of any Letter of Credit pursuant to Section 1.2 hereof, the Borrowers shall pay to the L/C Issuer for its own account a fronting fee equal to
Letter of Credit Fees.
 1
/
4
of 1% (0.25%) of the face amount of (or of the increase in the face amount of) such Letter of Credit. Quarterly in arrears, on the last day of each calendar quarter (commencing September 30, 2010) the Borrowers shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Lenders in accordance with their Percentages, a letter of credit fee at a rate per annum equal to the Applicable Margin for Eurocurrency Loans in effect during each day of such quarter applied to the daily average face amount of Letters of Credit outstanding during such quarter. In addition, the Borrowers shall pay to the L/C Issuer for its own account the L/C Issuer's standard issuance, drawing, negotiation, amendment, and other administrative fees for each Letter of Credit (whether a Commercial Letter of Credit or Standby Letter of Credit) as established by the L/C Issuer from time to time. All the standard fees set forth in the preceding sentence shall be retained by the L/C Issuer for its own account (such standard fees referred to in the clauses (i) and (ii) of the preceding sentence may be established by the L/C Issuer from time to time).
 
(c) On the Effective Date, the Borrowers shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, the upfront fees due to the Lenders as heretofore agreed.
Closing Fees.
(d) . The Borrowers shall pay to the Administrative Agent the fees agreed to between the Administrative Agent and the Company pursuant to a separate written letter agreement dated as of May 28, 2010.
Administrative Agent Fees
(e) . All fees payable under this Section 4.1 shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days for the actual number of days elapsed.
Fee Calculations
. All payments of principal of and interest on the Loans and the Reimbursement Obligations, and of all other Obligations payable by the Borrowers under this Agreement, shall be made to the Administrative Agent by no later than 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the due date thereof at the principal office of the Administrative Agent in Chicago, Illinois (or such other location in the State of Illinois as the Administrative Agent may designate to the Company) or, if such payment is on a Reimbursement Obligation, no later than provided by Section 1.2(c) hereof or, if such payment is to be made in an Alternative Currency, no later than 12:00 noon local time at the place of payment to such office as the Administrative Agent has previously specified in a notice to the Company for the benefit of the Lender or Lenders entitled thereto. Any payments received after such time shall be deemed to have been received by the Administrative Agent on the next Business Day. All such payments shall be made (i) in U.S. Dollars, in immediately available funds at the place of payment, or (ii) in the case of amounts payable hereunder in an Alternative Currency, in such Alternative Currency in such funds then customary for the settlement of international transactions in such currency, in each case without set-off or counterclaim. The Administrative Agent will promptly thereafter cause to be distributed like funds relating to the payment of principal or interest on Loans and on Reimbursement Obligations in which the Lenders have purchased Participating Interests ratably to the Lenders and like funds relating to the payment of any other amount payable to any Lender to such Lender, in each case to be applied in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. If the Administrative Agent causes amounts to be distributed to the Lenders in reliance upon the assumption that the Borrowers will make a scheduled payment and such scheduled payment is not so made, each Lender shall, on demand, repay to the Administrative Agent the amount distributed to such Lender together with interest thereon in respect of each day during the period commencing on the date such amount was distributed to such Lender and ending on (but excluding) the date such Lender repays such amount to the Administrative Agent, at a rate per annum equal to: (i) from the date the distribution was made to the date two (2) Business Days after payment by such Lender is due hereunder, the Federal Funds Rate for each such day or, in the case of a Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the cost to the Administrative Agent of funding the amount it advanced to fund such Lender's Loan, as reasonably determined by the Administrative Agent and (ii) from the date two (2) Business Days after the date such payment is due from such Lender to the date such payment is made by such Lender, the Base Rate in effect for each such day or, in the case of a Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the rate established by Section 3.2(c) for Eurocurrency Loans denominated in such currency.
Section 4.2. Place and Application of Payments
 
Anything contained herein to the contrary notwithstanding, all payments and collections received in respect of the Obligations by the Administrative Agent or any of the Lenders after acceleration or the final maturity of the Obligations or termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments as a result of an Event of Default shall be remitted to the Administrative Agent and distributed as follows:
(a) first, to the payment of any outstanding costs and expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, in protecting, preserving or enforcing rights under the Loan Documents;
(b) second, to the payment of the Swing Loans, both for principal and accrued but unpaid interest;
(c) third, to the payment of any outstanding interest and fees due under the Loan Documents to be allocated in accordance with the aggregate unpaid amounts owing to each holder thereof;
pro rata
(d) fourth, to the payment of principal on the Loans (other than Swing Loans), unpaid Reimbursement Obligations, together with amounts to be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral security for any outstanding L/C Obligations pursuant to Section 10.4 hereof (until the Administrative Agent is holding an amount of cash equal to the then outstanding amount of all such L/C Obligations), the aggregate amount paid to, or held as collateral security for, the Lenders and L/C Issuer to be allocated in accordance with the aggregate unpaid amounts owing to each holder thereof;
pro rata
(e) fifth, to the payment of all other unpaid Obligations to be allocated in accordance with the aggregate unpaid amounts owing to each holder thereof; and
pro rata
(f) finally, to the Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, or whoever else may be lawfully entitled thereto.
S 5. J S O F A.
ECTION
OINT
AND
EVERAL
BLIGORS
AND
URTHER
SSURANCES
. The payment and performance of the Obligations shall at all times be a joint and several obligation of the Company and each other Borrower pursuant to Section 13.A hereof or pursuant to one or more Additional Obligor Supplements delivered to the Administrative Agent, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time.
Section 5.1 Joint and Several Obligors
. The payment and performance of the Obligations shall at all times be guaranteed by each Subsidiary of the Borrower which is not itself a Borrower and is a guarantor under the Note Purchase Agreement (each, a ) pursuant to Section 13.B hereof or pursuant to one or more Additional Guarantor Supplements delivered to the Administrative Agent, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time (individually, a and, collectively, the ).
Section 5.2 Guaranties
"Guarantor"
"Guaranty"
"Guaranties"
 
The Company agrees that it shall, and shall cause each Domestic Subsidiary to, from time to time at the request of the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, execute and deliver such documents and do such acts and things as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders may reasonably request in order to provide for the joint and several obligation or guaranties, as applicable, contemplated by this Section 5. In the event the Company or any Subsidiary forms or acquires any direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary after the date hereof or any Subsidiary becomes a direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary after the date hereof or any Subsidiary becomes an obligor or guarantor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Company shall cause such direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary or other Subsidiary to execute an Additional Obligor Supplement or Additional Guarantor Supplement, as applicable, within 50 days after the end of the fiscal quarter of the Company in which such Subsidiary became a Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary or within 3 days after the Subsidiary became an obligor or guarantor under the Note Purchase Agreement, as applicable, and the Company shall also deliver to the Administrative Agent, or cause such direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary or other Subsidiary, as applicable, to deliver to the Administrative Agent, at the Company's cost and expense, such other instruments, documents, notes, certificates, and opinions reasonably required by the Administrative Agent in connection therewith.
Section 5.3. Further Assurances.
. If any Borrower (other than the Company) ceases to be a direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary as a result of a disposition, dissolution or other transaction not prohibited by the terms hereof, then such Borrower shall automatically cease to be a Borrower hereunder and shall be released from any of its obligations as a Borrower hereunder. If any Guarantor (a) ceases to be a Subsidiary as a result of a disposition, dissolution or other transaction not prohibited by the terms hereof, or (b) otherwise ceases to be a Guarantor under the Note Purchase Agreement, then such Guarantor shall automatically cease to be a Guarantor hereunder and shall be released from any of its obligations as a Guarantor hereunder. The Administrative Agent shall execute and deliver to such departing Borrower or Guarantor or its designee, at the Company's sole cost and expense, any document or instrument that such departing Borrower or Guarantor or the Company shall reasonably request to evidence such release, and the Lenders hereby authorize the Administrative Agent to execute and deliver any such document or instrument.
Section 5.4. Release of Borrower or Guarantor
S 6. D; I.
ECTION
EFINITIONS
NTERPRETATION
. The following terms when used herein have the following meanings:
Section 6.1. Definitions
is defined in Section 10.4(b) hereof.
"Account"
means an agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit J or such other form acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
"Additional Guarantor Supplement"
 
means an agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit I or such other form acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
"Additional Obligor Supplement"
means a rate per annum determined in accordance with the following formula:
"Adjusted LIBOR"
 
means, for any Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, the daily average for the applicable Interest Period of the maximum rate, expressed as a decimal, at which reserves (including, without limitation, any supplemental, marginal and emergency reserves) are imposed during such Interest Period by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor) on , as defined in such Board's Regulation D (or in respect of any other category of liabilities that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Eurocurrency Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets that include loans by non-United States offices of any Lender to United States residents), subject to any amendments of such reserve requirement by such Board or its successor, taking into account any transitional adjustments thereto. For purposes of this definition, the Eurocurrency Loans shall be deemed to be as defined in Regulation D without benefit or credit for any prorations, exemptions or offsets under Regulation D. means, for an Interest Period for a Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans, (a) the LIBOR Index Rate for such Interest Period, if such rate is available, and (b) if the LIBOR Index Rate cannot be determined, the average rate of interest per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest
"Eurocurrency Reserve Percentage"
"eurocurrency liabilities"
"eurocurrency liabilities"
"LIBOR"
 1
/
100
of 1%) at which deposits in U.S. Dollars or the relevant Alternative Currency, as appropriate, in immediately available funds are offered to the Administrative Agent at 11:00 a.m. (London, England time) two Business Days before the beginning of such Interest Period by major banks in the interbank eurocurrency market for delivery on the first day of and for a period equal to such Interest Period in an amount equal or comparable to the principal amount of the Eurocurrency Loan scheduled to be made as part of such Borrowing. means, for any Interest Period, the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher one hundred-thousandth of a percentage point) for deposits in U.S. Dollars or the relevant Alternative Currency, as appropriate, for a period equal to such Interest Period, which appears on the appropriate Reuters Page as of 11:00 a.m. (London, England time) on the day two Business Days before the commencement of such Interest Period. means the display designated on the Reuters Service (or such other service as may be nominated by the British Bankers' Association as the information vendor for the purpose of displaying British Bankers' Association Interest Settlement Rates for deposits of U.S. Dollar (currently displayed on LIBOR01 Page) or of the relevant Alternative Currency.
"LIBOR Index Rate"
"Reuters Page"
means Bank of Montreal in its capacity as administrative agent hereunder for the Lenders and any successor pursuant to Section 12.7 hereof.
"Administrative Agent"
means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
"Administrative Questionnaire"
 
means any Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by, or under direct or indirect common control with, another Person. A Person shall be deemed to control another Person for purposes of this definition if such Person possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct, or cause the direction of, the management and policies of the other Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, common directors, trustees or officers, by contract or otherwise; that, in any event for purposes of this definition, any Person that owns, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of the securities having the ordinary voting power for the election of directors or governing body of a corporation or 10% or more of the partnership or other ownership interests of any other Person (other than as a limited partner of such other Person) will be deemed to control such corporation or other Person.
"Affiliate"
provided
means this Credit Agreement, as the same may be amended, modified, restated or supplemented from time to time pursuant to the terms hereof.
"Agreement"
means any of euros, pounds sterling, and Japanese yen, and any other currency approved by the Administrative Agent, in each case for so long as such currency is readily available to all the Lenders and is freely transferable and freely convertible to U.S. Dollars and the Reuters Monitor Money Rates Service (or any successor) reports a LIBOR for such currency for interest periods of one, two, three and six calendar months; that if any Lender provides written notice to the Company (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) that any currency control or other exchange regulations are imposed in the country in which any such Alternative Currency is issued and that in the reasonable opinion of such Lender funding a Loan in such currency is impractical, then such currency shall cease to be an Alternative Currency hereunder until such time as all the Lenders reinstate such country's currency as an Alternative Currency.
"Alternative Currency"
provided
means, with respect to Loans, Reimbursement Obligations, and the facility fees and letter of credit fees payable under Section 4.1 hereof until the first Pricing Date, the rates per annum shown opposite Level III below, and thereafter from one Pricing Date to the next, the Applicable Margin means the rates per annum determined in accordance with the following schedule:
"Applicable Margin"
 
 
For purposes hereof, the term means, for any fiscal quarter of the Company ending on or after the Effective Date, the date on which the Administrative Agent is in receipt of the Company's most recent financial statements (and, in the case of the year-end financial statements, audit report) for the fiscal quarter then ended, pursuant to Section 9.4 hereof. The Applicable Margin shall be established based on the Cash Flow Leverage Ratio for the most recently completed fiscal quarter and the Applicable Margin established on a Pricing Date shall remain in effect until the next Pricing Date. If the Company has not delivered its financial statements by the date such financial statements (and, in the case of the year-end financial statements, audit report) are required to be delivered under Section 9.4 hereof, until such financial statements and audit report are delivered, the Applicable Margin shall be the highest Applicable Margin ( the Cash Flow Leverage Ratio shall be deemed to be greater than 2.0 to 1.0). If the Company subsequently delivers such financial statements before the next Pricing Date, the Applicable Margin established by such late delivered financial statements shall take effect from the date of delivery until the next Pricing Date. In all other circumstances, the Applicable Margin established by such financial statements shall be in effect from the Pricing Date that occurs immediately after the end of the fiscal quarter covered by such financial statements until the next Pricing Date. Each determination of the Applicable Margin made by the Administrative Agent in accordance with the foregoing shall be conclusive and binding on the Borrowers and the Lenders if reasonably determined.
"Pricing Date"
i.e.,
is defined in Section 1.2(b) hereof.
"Application"
means any Fund that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
"Approved Fund"
means an assignment and acceptance entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 14.12 hereof), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in substantially the form of Exhibit H or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
"Assignment and Acceptance"
means those persons shown on the list of officers provided by the Company pursuant to Section 8.1(f) hereof, or on any update of such list provided by the Company to the Administrative Agent, or any further or different officer of the Company so named by any Authorized Representative of the Company in a written notice to the Administrative Agent.
"Authorized Representative"
means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the greatest of: (a) the rate of interest announced or otherwise established by the Administrative Agent from time to time as its prime commercial rate, or its equivalent, for U.S. Dollar loans to borrowers located in the United States as in effect on such day, with any change in the Base Rate resulting from a change in said prime commercial rate to be effective as of the date of the relevant change in said prime commercial rate (it being acknowledged and agreed that such rate may not be the Administrative Agent's best or lowest rate), (b) the sum of (i) the rate determined by the Administrative Agent to be the average (rounded upward, if necessary, to the next higher
"Base Rate"
 1
/
100
of 1%) of the rates per annum quoted to the Administrative Agent at approximately 10:00 a.m. (Chicago time) (or as
 
soon thereafter as is practicable) on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, on the immediately preceding Business Day) by two or more Federal funds brokers selected by the Administrative Agent for sale to the Administrative Agent at face value of Federal funds in the secondary market in an amount equal or comparable to the principal amount for which such rate is being determined, (ii) 
plus
 1
/
2
of 1%, and (c) the LIBOR Quoted Rate for such day 1.00%. As used herein, the term means, for any day, the rate per annum equal to the quotient of (i) the rate per annum (rounded upward, if necessary, to the next higher one hundred-thousandth of a percentage point) for deposits in U.S. Dollars for a one-month interest period which appears on the LIBOR01 Page as of 11:00 a.m. (London, England time) on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, on the immediately preceding Business Day) divided by (ii) one (1)  the Eurocurrency Reserve Percentage.
plus
"LIBOR Quoted Rate"
minus
means a Revolving Loan bearing interest prior to maturity at a rate specified in Section 1.3(a) hereof.
"Base Rate Loan"
and are defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Borrower"
"Borrowers"
means the total of Loans of a single type advanced, continued for an additional Interest Period, or converted from a different type into such type by the Lenders on a single date and for a single Interest Period. Borrowings of Revolving Loans are made and maintained ratably from each of the Lenders according to their Percentages. A Borrowing is: on the day Lenders advance funds comprising such Borrowing to the Borrowers; on the date a new Interest Period for the same type of Loans commences for such Borrowing; and when such Borrowing is changed from one type of Loan to another, all as requested by the Company pursuant to Section 1.5(a) hereof. Borrowings of Swing Loans are made by the Swing Line Lender in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2 hereof.
"Borrowing"
"advanced"
"continued"
"converted"
means any day other than a Saturday or Sunday on which Lenders are not authorized or required to close in Chicago, Illinois and, if the applicable Business Day relates to the borrowing or payment of a Eurocurrency Loan, on which banks are dealing in deposits in U.S. Dollars in the interbank market in London, England and Nassau, Bahamas and, if the applicable Business Day relates to the borrowing or payment of a Eurocurrency Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, on which banks and foreign exchange markets are open for business in the city where disbursements of or payments on such Loan are to be made and, if such Alternative Currency is the euro or any national currency of a nation that is a member of the European Economic and Monetary Union, which is a TARGET Settlement Day.
"Business Day"
means any lease of Property which, in accordance with GAAP, would be required to be capitalized on the balance sheet of the lessee.
"Capital Lease"
means the amount of the liability shown on the balance sheet of any Person in respect of a Capital Lease as determined in accordance with GAAP.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation"
means, as of any time the same is to be determined, the ratio of (a) Funded Debt as of the last day of the most recent four fiscal quarters then ended Excess Cash as of the last day of the same such period to (b) EBITDA for the same most recent four fiscal quarters then ended.
"Cash Flow Leverage Ratio"
minus
 
means and includes any of the following:
"Change in Control"
(a) any person or group (within the meaning of Sections 13(d)(2) and 14(d)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) is or becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of 50% or more of the Voting Stock of the Company; or
(b) during any period of twelve consecutive calendar months, individuals who at the beginning of such period constituted the Board of Directors of the Company, together with any new directors whose election by the Board of Directors of the Company or nomination for election by the Company's stockholders was approved by at least two-thirds of the directors then still in office who either were directors at the beginning of the period or whose election was previously so approved, cease for any reason other than death or disability to constitute at least a majority of the directors then in office; or
(c) the stockholders of the Company shall approve the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or any merger, consolidation, issuance of securities or purchase of assets, the result of which would be the occurrence of any event described in clause (a) or (b) above.
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any successor statute thereto.
"Code"
means a Letter of Credit that finances a commercial transaction by paying part or all of the purchase price for goods against delivery of a document of title covering such goods and any other required documentation.
"Commercial Letter of Credit"
is defined in Section 3.8 hereof.
"Commitment Amount Increase"
means a Commitment Amount Increase Request in the form of Exhibit F hereto.
"Commitment Amount Increase Request"
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Company"
means a written certificate in the form of Exhibit G hereto.
"Compliance Certificate"
means, with respect to the Company, all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades and businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control which, together with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
"Controlled Group"
 
means the advancing of any Loan, the continuation of or conversion into a Eurocurrency Loan, or the issuance of, or extension of the expiration date or increase in the amount of, any Letter of Credit.
"Credit Event"
means any event or condition the occurrence of which would, with the passage of time or the giving of notice, or both, constitute an Event of Default.
"Default"
means any Lender that (a) has failed to fund any portion of the Loans, participations in L/C Obligations or participations in Swing Line Loans required to be funded by it hereunder (herein, a ) within two (2) Business Days of the date required to be funded by it hereunder unless such failure has been cured or is the subject of a good faith dispute, (b) has otherwise failed to pay over to the Administrative Agent or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder within two (2) Business Days of the date when due, unless the subject of a good faith dispute or unless such failure has been cured, or (c) has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding or a receiver or conservator has been appointed for such Lender.
Defaulting Lender"
"Defaulted Loan"
means, with respect to any Defaulting Lender, the excess, if any, of such Defaulting Lender's Percentage of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of Loans of all Lenders (calculated as if all Lenders had funded all of their respective Loans) over the aggregate outstanding principal amount of all Loans funded by such Defaulting Lender.
"Defaulting Lender Excess"
means, with respect to any Defaulting Lender, the period commencing on the date upon which such Lender first became a Defaulting Lender and ending on the earliest of the following dates: (i) the date on which all Revolving Credit Commitments are cancelled or terminated and/or the Obligations are declared or become immediately due and payable and (ii) the date on which (a) such Defaulting Lender is no longer insolvent, the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding or, if applicable, under the direction of a receiver or conservator, (b) the Defaulting Lender Excess with respect to such Defaulting Lender shall have been reduced to zero, and (c) such Defaulting Lender shall have delivered to the Company and the Administrative Agent a written reaffirmation of its intention to honor its obligations hereunder with respect to its Revolving Credit Commitment.
"Defaulting Lender Period"
means each Subsidiary which is organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, Net Income for such period all amounts deducted in arriving at such Net Income amount in respect of (a) Interest Expense for such period, (b) federal, state, and local income taxes for such period and (c) to the extent also included in the corresponding calculation under the Note Purchase Agreement, the expense resulting from any change in estimated acquisition earnout payables, to the extent also included in the corresponding calculation under the Note Purchase Agreement, all amounts included in arriving at such Net Income amount in respect of the income resulting from any change in estimated acquisition earnout payables; that there shall be included in such determination for such period all such amounts attributable to any Person acquired during such period to the extent not subsequently sold or otherwise disposed of during such period but only to the extent also included in the corresponding calculation under the Note Purchase Agreement.
"EBIT"
plus
minus
provided
 
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, EBIT for such period all amounts properly charged for depreciation of fixed assets and amortization of intangible assets during such period on the books of such Person and its subsidiaries; that there shall be included in such determination for such period all amounts properly charged for depreciation of fixed assets and amortization of intangible assets during such period attributable to any Person acquired during such period to the extent not subsequently sold or otherwise disposed of during such period but only to the extent also included in the corresponding calculation under the Note Purchase Agreement.
"EBITDA"
plus
provided
means the date on which the Administrative Agent has received signed counterpart signature pages of this Agreement from each of the signatories (or, in the case of a Lender, confirmation that such Lender has executed such a counterpart and dispatched it for delivery to the Administrative Agent) and the documents required by Section 8.1 hereof.
"Effective Date"
means (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender, (c) an Approved Fund, and (d) any other Person (other than a natural person) approved by (i) the Administrative Agent, (ii) the L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender, and (iii) unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Company (each such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); that notwithstanding the foregoing, "Eligible Assignee" shall not include any Borrower or any of the Company's Affiliates or Subsidiaries.
"Eligible Assignee"
provided
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, or any successor statute thereto.
"ERISA"
means a Revolving Loan bearing interest prior to maturity at the rate specified in Section 1.3(b) hereof.
"Eurocurrency Loan"
means any of the events or circumstances specified in Section 10.1 hereof.
"Event of Default"
means, as of any date the same is to be determined, all cash on the books of the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries which is maintained in accounts located in the United States of America and which is in excess of $25,000,000 excluding restricted cash.
"Excess Cash"
means the Amended and Restated Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of December 19, 2007 among the Company, the other Borrowers party thereto, the Lenders party thereto and Harris N.A., as Administrative Agent.
"Existing Credit Agreement"
means the outstanding letters of credit issued by Harris N.A. pursuant to the Existing Credit Agreement prior to the date hereof, all of which are listed and described on Schedule 1.2(a) hereof.
"Existing L/Cs"
 
means the fluctuating interest rate per annum described in part (x) of clause (b)(i) of the definition of Base Rate.
"Federal Funds Rate"
means Swing Loans bearing interest at the Quoted Rate and Eurocurrency Loans, unless the context in which such term is used shall otherwise require.
"Fixed Rate Loans"
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the aggregate of all Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis at such time all Indebtedness for Borrowed Money of any other Person which is directly or indirectly guaranteed by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has agreed (contingently or otherwise) to purchase or otherwise acquire or in respect of which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has otherwise assured a creditor against loss.
"Funded Debt"
plus
means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect from time to time in the United States of America applied by the Company and its Subsidiaries on a basis consistent with the preparation of the Company's most recent financial statements furnished to the Lenders pursuant to Section 7.5 hereof.
"GAAP"
is defined in Section 5.2 hereof.
"Guarantor"
is defined in Section 5.2 hereof.
"Guaranty"
means for any Person (without duplication) (i) all indebtedness created, assumed or incurred in any manner by such Person representing money borrowed (including by the issuance of debt securities), (ii) all indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than (a) trade accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which are not more than 90 days past due and (b) obligations to make earn-out payments in cash, debt instruments or preferred stock, pursuant to acquisitions occurring prior to the date of this Agreement or permitted under this Agreement), (iii) all indebtedness secured by any Lien upon Property of such Person, whether or not such Person has assumed or become liable for the payment of such indebtedness, (iv) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person and (v) all obligations of such Person on or with respect to letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and other extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money, excluding, in each case, indebtedness which is non-recourse to such Person and its subsidiaries.
"Indebtedness for Borrowed Money"
means, as of any time the same is to be determined, the ratio of (a) EBIT for the four fiscal quarter period most recently ended to (b) Interest Expense during the same such four fiscal quarter period.
"Interest Coverage Ratio"
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to Capitalized Lease Obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP excluding incremental interest charges resulting from consolidation under FIN 46.
"Interest Expense"
 
is defined in Section 3.1 hereof.
"Interest Period"
means the Letters of Credit, any draft or other document presented in connection with a drawing thereunder, the Applications and this Agreement.
"L/C Documents"
means Bank of Montreal or any of its Affiliates and, with respect to the existing L/Cs, Harris N.A. and any Lender or Lenders selected by the Company and reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
"L/C Issuer"
means the U.S. Dollars Equivalent of the aggregate undrawn face amounts of all outstanding Letters of Credit and all unpaid Reimbursement Obligations.
"L/C Obligations"
means $75,000,000, as such amount may be reduced pursuant to the terms hereof.
"L/C Sublimit"
means and includes each financial institution party hereto and the other financial institutions from time to time party to this Agreement, including each assignee Lender pursuant to Section 14.12 hereof and, unless the context otherwise requires, the Swing Line Lender.
"Lender"
is defined in Section 11.4 hereof.
"Lending Office"
is defined in Section 1.2(a) hereof.
"Letter of Credit"
means any mortgage, lien, security interest, pledge, charge or encumbrance of any kind in respect of any Property, including the interests of a vendor or lessor under any conditional sale, Capital Lease or other title retention arrangement.
"Lien"
means and includes each Revolving Loan and Swing Loan; and the term of Loan refers to its status as a Revolving Loan or a Swing Loan, or, if a Revolving Loan, to its status as a Base Rate Loan or Eurocurrency Loan.
"Loan"
"type"
means this Agreement, the Notes, the Applications, the Letters of Credit, the Additional Guarantor Supplements, the Additional Obligor Supplements and each other instrument or document to be delivered hereunder or thereunder or otherwise in connection therewith and, in each case, as the same may be amended, modified restated or supplemented from time to time.
"Loan Documents"
means, with respect to any Subsidiary, a Subsidiary whose assets represent more than 5% of the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis.
"Material"
means (a) a material adverse change in, or material adverse effect upon, the operations, business, Property, condition (financial or otherwise) or prospects of the Company or of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) a material impairment of the ability of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, to perform their obligations under this Agreement, the Notes, the Applications, or the Letters of Credit, as applicable, or (c) a
"Material Adverse Effect"
 
material adverse effect upon the legality, validity, binding effect or enforceability against the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, of this Agreement, the Notes, the Applications, or the Letters of Credit, as applicable, or the rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or the Lenders thereunder.
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the net income (or net loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period as computed on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, and, without limiting the foregoing, after deduction from gross income of all expenses and reserves, including reserves for all taxes on or measured by income.
"Net Income"
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the total shareholders' equity (including capital stock, additional paid-in capital and retained earnings after deducting treasury stock, but excluding minority interests in Subsidiaries) which would appear on the balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that in computing Net Worth, the Company may exclude the effect of stock repurchases aggregating not more than $300,000,000 after the Effective Date so long as such stock repurchases are approved by the Company's board of directors.
"Net Worth"
provided, however,
means any Subsidiary that is not a Borrower.
"Non-Borrower Subsidiary"
means that certain Amended and Restated Note Purchase Agreement dated December 19, 2007 among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. and certain of its Subsidiaries party thereto, as obligors, and the Noteholders party thereto, as amended, restated, supplemented or modified from time to time.
"Note Purchase Agreement"
is defined in Section 3.3(d) hereof.
"Notes"
means all obligations of the Borrowers to pay principal and interest on the Loans and the L/C Obligations, all fees and charges payable hereunder, and all other payment obligations of the Borrowers, and any of them, arising under or in relation to any Loan Document, in each case whether now existing or hereafter arising, due or to become due, direct or indirect, absolute or contingent, and howsoever evidenced, held or acquired.
"Obligations"
" means the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control.
OFAC
"
" means the event specified in Section 9.18 hereof.
OFAC Event
"
" means all laws, regulations, and Executive Orders administered by OFAC, including without limitation, the Bank Secrecy Act, anti-money laundering laws (including, without limitation, the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, Pub. L. 107-56 (a/k/a the USA Patriot Act)), and all economic and trade sanction programs administered by OFAC, any and all similar United States federal laws, regulations or Executive Orders, and any similar laws, regulators or orders adopted by any State within the United States.
OFAC Sanctions Programs
"
 
" means the list of the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons maintained by OFAC.
OFAC SDN List
"
means the amount of any Obligations denominated in U.S. Dollars and, in relation to any Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, the U.S. Dollars Equivalent of such Loan on the day it is advanced or continued for an Interest Period.
"Original Dollar Amount"
is defined in Section 1.2(e) hereof.
"Participating Interest"
is defined in Section 1.2(e) hereof.
"Participating Lender"
means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any Person succeeding to any or all of its functions under ERISA.
"PBGC"
means, for each Lender, the percentage of the Revolving Credit Commitments represented by such Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment or, if the Revolving Credit Commitments have been terminated, the percentage held by such Lender (including through participation interests in L/C Obligations outstanding under the Revolving Credit and Swing Loans) of the aggregate principal amount of all Revolving Loans, Swing Loans and L/C Obligations then outstanding.
"Percentage"
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization or any other entity or organization, including a government or any agency or political subdivision thereof.
"Person"
means any employee pension benefit plan covered by Title IV of ERISA or subject to the minimum funding standards under Section 412 of the Code that either (i) is maintained by a member of the Controlled Group for employees of a member of the Controlled Group or (ii) is maintained pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or any other arrangement under which more than one employer makes contributions and to which a member of the Controlled Group is then making or accruing an obligation to make contributions or has within the preceding five plan years made contributions.
"Plan"
means any interest in any kind of property or asset, whether real, personal or mixed, or tangible or intangible.
"Property"
is defined in Section 2.3 hereof.
"Quoted Rate"
is defined in Section 1.2(c) hereof.
"Reimbursement Obligation"
is defined in Section 11.6 hereof.
"Replaced Lender"
is defined in Section 11.6 hereof.
"Replacement Lender"
means, as of the date of determination thereof, Lenders holding greater than 50% of the Percentages.
"Required Lenders"
 
means, with respect to any Borrower, each or any of its president, chief financial officer, treasurer, chief accounting officer or general counsel.
"Responsible Officer"
means, (i) with respect to any Revolving Loan denominated in an Alternative Currency, each date as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders shall specify and (ii) with respect to any Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency, (a) the date of issuance thereof, (b) the date of each amendment thereto having the effect of increasing the amount thereof, (c) the last day of each calendar month, and (d) each additional date as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders shall specify.
"Revaluation Date"
means the credit facility for making Revolving Loans and issuing Letter of Credit described in Sections 1.1 and 1.2 hereof.
"Revolving Credit"
means, as to any Lender, the obligation of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to participate in Swing Loans and Letters of Credit issued for the account of the Borrowers hereunder in an aggregate principal or face amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed the amount set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule I attached hereto, as the same may be reduced or modified at any time or from time to time pursuant to the terms hereof. The Borrowers and the Lenders acknowledge and agree that the Revolving Credit Commitments of the Lenders aggregate $500,000,000 on the date hereof.
"Revolving Credit Commitment"
is defined in Section 3.3(d) hereof.
"Revolving Credit Note"
is defined in Section 1.1 hereof.
"Revolving Loan"
means the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission or any successor thereto.
"SEC"
is defined in Section 14.7 hereof.
"Set-Off"
means a Letter of Credit that is not a Commercial Letter of Credit.
"Standby Letter of Credit"
means any corporation or other Person more than 50% of the Voting Stock of which is at the time directly or indirectly owned by the Company and/or one or more Persons which are themselves Subsidiaries of the Company.
"Subsidiary"
means the credit facility for making one or more Swing Loans described in Section 2.1 hereof.
"Swing Line"
means Bank of Montreal, acting in its capacity as the Lender of Swing Loans hereunder, or any successor Lender acting in such capacity appointed pursuant to Section 14.12 hereof.
"Swing Line Lender"
is defined in Section 3.3(d) hereof.
"Swing Line Note"
 
means $50,000,000, as such amount may be reduced pursuant to the terms hereof.
"Swing Line Sublimit"
is defined in Section 2.1 hereof.
"Swing Loans"
means any day on which the Trans-European Automated Real-Time Gross Settlement Express Transfer (TARGET) System is open.
"TARGET Settlement Day"
means July 15, 2014.
"Termination Date"
means, for any Plan at any time, the amount (if any) by which the present value of all vested nonforfeitable accrued benefits under such Plan exceeds the fair market value of all Plan assets allocable to such benefits, all determined as of the then most recent valuation date for such Plan, but only to the extent that such excess represents a potential liability of a member of the Controlled Group to the PBGC or the Plan under Title IV of ERISA.
"Unfunded Vested Liabilities"
means (a) the amount of any Obligation or Letter of Credit denominated in U.S. Dollars, (b) in relation to any Obligation or Letter of Credit denominated in an Alternative Currency, the amount of U.S. Dollars which would be realized by converting such Alternative Currency into U.S. Dollars at the exchange rate quoted to the Administrative Agent, at approximately 11:00 a.m. (London time) three Business Days prior (i) to the date on which a computation thereof is required to be made, and (ii) on any Revaluation Date, in each case, by major banks in the interbank foreign exchange market for the purchase of U.S. Dollars for such Alternative Currency.
"U.S. Dollar Equivalent"
and each means the lawful currency of the United States of America.
"U.S. Dollars"
"$"
means, with respect to any Person, the capital stock of any class or classes or other equity interests (however designated) having ordinary voting power for the election of directors or similar governing body of such Person, other than stock or other equity interests having such power only by reason of the happening of a contingency.
"Voting Stock"
means a , as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA.
"Welfare Plan"
"welfare plan"
means, with respect to any Subsidiary, a Subsidiary of which all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (other than directors' qualifying shares as required by law) or other equity interests are owned by the Company and/or one or more Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries of the Company within the meaning of this definition.
"Wholly-Owned"
. The foregoing definitions are equally applicable to both the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. The words , , and and words of like import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement. All references to time of day herein are references to Chicago, Illinois time unless otherwise specifically provided.
Section 6.2. Interpretation
"hereof"
"herein"
"hereunder"
 
. If, after the date of this Agreement, there shall occur any change in GAAP from those used in the preparation of the financial statements referred to in Section 7.5 hereof and such change shall result in a change in the method of calculation of any financial covenant, standard or term found in this Agreement, either the Company or the Required Lenders may by notice to the Lenders and the Company, respectively, require that the Lenders and the Borrowers negotiate in good faith to amend such covenants, standards, and terms so as equitably to reflect such change in accounting principles, with the desired result being that the criteria for evaluating the financial condition of the Company and its Subsidiaries shall be the same as if such change had not been made. No delay by the Company or the Required Lenders in requiring such negotiation shall limit their right to so require such a negotiation at any time after such a change in accounting principles. Until any such covenant, standard, or term is amended in accordance with this Section 6.3, financial covenants shall be computed and determined in accordance with GAAP in effect prior to such change in accounting principles. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Company shall neither be deemed to be in compliance with any financial covenant hereunder nor out of compliance with any financial covenant hereunder if such state of compliance or noncompliance, as the case may be, would not exist but for the occurrence of a change in accounting principles after the date hereof.
Section 6.3. Change in Accounting Principles
S 7. R W.
ECTION
EPRESENTATIONS
AND
ARRANTIES
The Borrowers hereby represent and warrant to the Administrative Agent and each Lender as follows:
. The Company is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing as a corporation under the laws of the State of Delaware, has full corporate power to own its Property and conduct its business as now conducted, and is duly licensed or qualified and in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the nature of the business conducted by it or the nature of the Property owned or leased by it requires such licensing or qualifying, except where the failure to be so licensed or qualified could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.1. Organization and Qualification
. Each Subsidiary is duly organized, validly existing and, to the extent applicable, in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is incorporated or organized, as the case may be, has full corporate or limited liability company power to own its Property and conduct its business as now conducted, and is duly licensed or qualified and in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the nature of the business conducted by it or the nature of the Property owned or leased by it requires such licensing or qualifying, except where the failure to be so licensed or qualified could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Schedule 7.2 hereto identifies as of the Effective Date (i) each Subsidiary, the jurisdiction of its incorporation or organization, as the case may be, the percentage of issued and outstanding shares of each class of its capital stock or other equity interests owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries and, if such percentage is not 100% (excluding directors' qualifying shares as required by law), a description of each class of its authorized capital stock and other equity interests and the number of shares of each class issued and outstanding and (ii) each direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary. All of the outstanding shares of
Section 7.2. Subsidiaries
 
capital stock and other equity interests of each Subsidiary are validly issued and outstanding and, in the case of capital stock, fully paid and nonassessable and all such shares and other equity interests indicated on Schedule 7.2 as owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries are owned, beneficially and of record, by the Company or such Subsidiary free and clear of all Liens. There are no outstanding commitments or other obligations of any Subsidiary to issue, and no options, warrants or other rights of any Person to acquire, any shares of any class of capital stock or other equity interests of any Subsidiary.
. Each Borrower has full corporate or limited liability company power and authority to enter into this Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which it is a party, to make the borrowings herein provided for, to issue the Notes in evidence thereof, and to perform all of its obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents to which it is a party. Each Guarantor has full corporate or limited liability company power and authority to enter into this Agreement pursuant to an Additional Guarantor Supplement and perform all of its Obligations hereunder. Each Loan Document to which any Borrower or any Guarantor is a party has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by such Borrower or such Guarantor, as the case may be, and constitutes the valid and binding obligation of such Borrower or such Guarantor enforceable in accordance with its terms except as enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and general principles of equity (regardless of whether the application of such principles is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law). No Loan Document, nor the performance or observance by any Borrower or any Guarantor of any of the matters and things herein or therein provided for, contravenes or constitutes a default under any provision of law or any judgment, injunction, order or decree binding upon any Borrower or any Guarantor or any provision of the charter, articles of incorporation or by-laws (or equivalent organizational document) of any Borrower or any Guarantor or any covenant, indenture or agreement of or affecting any Borrower or any Guarantor or any of their respective Properties, in each case where such contravention or default, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any Property of any Borrower or any Guarantor.
Section 7.3. Corporate Authority and Validity of Obligations
. The Borrowers shall use the proceeds of the Loans and other extensions of credit made available hereunder to fund their general corporate and working capital purposes, to refinance existing indebtedness and for such other purposes as are consistent with all applicable laws and the terms hereof. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is engaged in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System), and no part of the proceeds of any Loan or any other extension of credit hereunder will be used to purchase or carry margin stock or used in a manner that violates any provision of Regulation U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
Section 7.4. Use of Proceeds; Margin Stock
. The consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at December 31, 2009, and the related consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal year then ended, and accompanying notes thereto, which financial statements are accompanied by the audit report of Ernst & Young LLP, independent public accountants, and the unaudited interim
Section 7.5. Financial Reports
 
consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at March 31, 2010, and the related consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the three months then ended, heretofore furnished to the Lenders, fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial condition of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at said dates and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the periods then ended in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis (except, in the case of such unaudited statements, for normal year-end audit adjustments). Except as previously disclosed in writing to the Administrative Agent, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has contingent liabilities which are material to it other than as indicated on such financial statements or, with respect to future periods, on the financial statements furnished pursuant to Section 9.4 hereof.
Since December 31, 2009, except as previously disclosed in the Company's Form 10-K filed with the SEC for the year ended December 31, 2009, or the Company's Form 10-Q filed with the SEC for the quarter ended March 31, 2010, there has been no change in the condition (financial or otherwise) or business prospects of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.6. No Material Adverse Change.
. The written statements and information furnished to the Lenders in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and the commitments by the Lenders to provide all or part of the financing contemplated hereby do not contain any untrue statements of a material fact or omit a material fact necessary to make the material statements contained herein or therein not misleading, the Lenders acknowledging that as to any projections furnished to the Lenders, the Borrowers only represent that the same were prepared on the basis of information and estimates the Borrowers believed to be reasonable.
Section 7.7. Full Disclosure
. The Company and its Subsidiaries each have good and defensible title to their assets as reflected on the most recent consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries furnished to the Lenders (except for sales of assets in the ordinary course of business), subject to no Liens other than such thereof as are permitted by Section 9.9 hereof.
Section 7.8. Good Title
Except as otherwise disclosed in the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, or the Company's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010, there is no litigation, arbitration or governmental proceeding or labor controversy pending, nor to the knowledge of any Borrower threatened, against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.9. Litigation and Other Controversies.
. All federal, state and other material tax returns required to be filed by the Company and its Subsidiaries in any jurisdiction have, in fact, been filed, and all taxes, assessments, fees and other governmental charges upon the Company and its Subsidiaries or upon any of their respective Properties, income or franchises, which are shown to be due and payable in such returns, have been paid, except for any taxes, assessments, fees or charges being contested in good faith by appropriate proceeding which prevent or stay enforcement of the
Section 7.10. Taxes
 
matter under contest and as to which adequate reserves established in accordance with GAAP have been provided. The Company does not know of any proposed additional tax assessment against it or its Subsidiaries for which adequate provision in accordance with GAAP has not been made on its accounts. Adequate provisions in accordance with GAAP for taxes on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries have been made for all open years, and for its current fiscal period.
. No authorization, consent, license, or exemption from, or filing or registration with, any court or governmental department, agency or instrumentality, nor any approval or consent of the stockholders of the Company or any other Person, is or will be necessary to the valid execution, delivery or performance by any Borrower of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, except for such approvals which have been obtained prior to the date of this Agreement and remain in full force and effect.
Section 7.11. Approvals
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to any contracts or agreements with any of its Affiliates (other than transactions between the Company and a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary or between Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries) on terms and conditions which are less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than would be usual and customary in similar contracts or agreements between Persons not affiliated with each other.
Section 7.12. Affiliate Transactions
Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is an "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
Section 7.13. Investment Company.
. In respect of each Plan, the Company and each other member of its Controlled Group has fulfilled its obligations under the minimum funding standards of and is in compliance in all material respects with ERISA and the Code to the extent applicable to it and has not incurred any material liability to the PBGC or a Plan under Title IV of ERISA other than a liability to the PBGC for premiums under Section 4007 of ERISA. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has any material contingent liabilities with respect to any post-retirement benefits under a Welfare Plan, other than liability for continuation coverage described in article 6 of Title I of ERISA.
Section 7.14. ERISA
. The Company and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with the requirements of all federal, state and local laws, rules and regulations applicable to or pertaining to their Properties or business operations (including, without limitation, the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, and laws and regulations establishing quality criteria and standards for air, water, land and toxic or hazardous wastes and substances), non-compliance with which, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has received notice to the effect that its operations are not in compliance with any of the requirements of applicable federal, state or local environmental, health and safety statutes and regulations or are the subject of any governmental investigation evaluating whether any remedial action is needed to respond to a release of any toxic or hazardous waste or substance into the environment, which non-compliance or remedial action, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.15. Compliance with Laws
 
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default under the terms of any covenant, indenture or agreement of or affecting the Company, any Subsidiary or any of their Properties, which default if uncured could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.16. Other Agreements
. There are no labor controversies pending or threatened against the Company or any Subsidiary which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 7.17. Labor Controversies
. After giving effect to the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the extensions of credit under this Agreement: (a) neither any Borrower nor any Guarantor will (i) be "insolvent," within the meaning of such term as used in 101 of the "Bankruptcy Code", or Section 2 of either the "UFTA" or the "UFCA", or as defined or used in any "Other Applicable Law" (as those terms are defined below), or (ii) be unable to pay its debts generally as such debts become due within the meaning of Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code, Section 4 of the UFTA or Section 6 of the UFCA, or (iii) have an unreasonably small capital to engage in any business or transaction, whether current or contemplated, within the meaning of Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code, Section 4 of the UFTA or Section 5 of the UFCA; and (b) the obligations of the Borrowers and the Guarantors under the Loan Documents and with respect to the Loans and Letters of Credit will not be rendered avoidable under any Other Applicable Law. For purposes of this Section, means Title 11 of the United States Code, means the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, means the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, and means any other applicable law pertaining to fraudulent transfers or obligations voidable by creditors, in each case as such law may be amended from time to time.
Section 7.18. Insolvency
"Bankruptcy Code"
"UFTA"
"UFCA"
"Other Applicable Law"
No Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
Section 7.19. No Default.
. (a) The Company is in compliance with the requirements of all OFAC Sanctions Programs applicable to it, non-compliance with which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, (b) each Subsidiary of the Company is in compliance with the requirements of all OFAC Sanctions Programs applicable to such Subsidiary, (c) the Company has provided to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, and the Lenders all information regarding the Company and its Affiliates and Subsidiaries requested by the Administrative Agent and necessary for the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, and the Lenders to comply with all applicable OFAC Sanctions Programs, and (d) to the best of the Company's knowledge, neither the Company nor any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries is, as of the date hereof, named on the current OFAC SDN List.
Section 7.20. OFAC
 
S 8. C P.
ECTION
ONDITIONS
RECEDENT
The obligation of each Lender to advance, continue, or convert any Loan (other than the continuation of, or conversion into, a Base Rate Loan), or of the L/C Issuer to issue, extend the expiration date of or increase the amount of any Letter of Credit, shall be subject to the following conditions precedent:
. The effectiveness of this Agreement shall be subject to the satisfaction prior to or on the date of this Agreement, of the following conditions:
Section 8.1. Initial Credit Event
(a) The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement;
(b) If requested by any Lender, the Administrative Agent shall have received (i) for each Lender, such Lender's duly executed Note and (ii) the Swing Line Lender's duly executed Swing Line Note dated the date hereof;
(c) The Administrative Agent shall have received for each Lender the favorable written opinion of counsel to the Borrowers in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel;
(d) The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) an original certificate of good standing for each Borrower (to the extent applicable), certified as of a date not earlier than 30 days prior to the date hereof by the Secretary of State of such party's jurisdiction of organization and (ii) certificate or articles of incorporation or formation, together with all amendments thereto, and bylaws and any amendments thereto, for each Borrower, certified by such party's Secretary or an Assistant Secretary;
(e) The Administrative Agent shall have received copies of resolutions of each Borrower's Board of Directors authorizing the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents to which it is a party and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, together with specimen signatures of the persons authorized to execute such documents on behalf of such Borrower, all certified in each instance by its Secretary or Assistant Secretary;
(f) The Administrative Agent shall have received a list of the Company's Authorized Representatives;
(g) The Administrative Agent shall have received the fees required by Section 4.1(c) and 4.1(d) hereof;
(h) The Existing Credit Agreement shall have been terminated and all amounts payable thereunder shall have been paid or shall be paid with the proceeds of the initial Credit Event;
(i) Each of the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 hereof shall be true and correct in all material respects; and
(j) All legal matters incident to the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Lenders.
 
Each Lender that is also a under the Existing Credit Agreement referenced in clause (h) above, by its execution hereof, hereby waives any requirement under Section 3.7 of the Existing Credit Agreement that the Borrowers give prior notice of the termination of the thereunder, and agrees that such notice may be given on the same day as such termination is to be effective. In addition, such Lenders and the Borrowers agree that the Existing Credit Agreement shall terminate and all amounts payable thereunder shall be due and payable on the date hereof.
"Lender"
"Revolving Credit Commitments"
. As of the time of each Credit Event hereunder:
Section 8.2. All Credit Events
(a) In the case of a Borrowing of a Revolving Loan, the Administrative Agent shall have received the notice required by Section 1.5 hereof (including any deemed notice under Section 1.5(c)); in the case of a Swing Loan, the Swing Line Lender shall have received the notice required in Section 2.3 hereof; in the case of the issuance of any Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall have received a duly completed Application for such Letter of Credit (along with the fees required by Section 4.1(b) hereof); in the case of an extension or increase in the amount of a Letter of Credit, the L/C Issuer shall have received a written request therefor (along with the fees required by Section 4.1(b) hereof) in a form acceptable to the L/C Issuer;
(b) Each of the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 hereof (other than Section 7.6) shall be true and correct in all material respects as of said time, taking into account any amendments to such Section made after the date of this Agreement in accordance with its provisions, except that if any such representation or warranty relates solely to an earlier date it need only remain true as of such date;
(c) No Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a result of such Credit Event;
(d) After giving effect to such Credit Event, the aggregate U.S. Dollar Equivalent of Revolving Loans, Original Dollar Amount of Swing Loans and U.S. Dollar Equivalent of L/C Obligations then outstanding shall not exceed the Revolving Credit Commitments then in effect; and
(e) Such Credit Event shall not violate any order, judgment or decree of any court or other authority or any provision of law or regulation applicable to the Administrative Agent or any Lender (including, without limitation, Regulation U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System).
Each request for a Borrowing hereunder and each request for the issuance of, increase in the amount of, or extension of the expiration date of, a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date of such Credit Event as to the facts specified in paragraphs (a) through (d), both inclusive, of this Section 8.2.
 
S 9. C.
ECTION
OVENANTS
The Borrowers covenant and agree that, so long as any credit is available to or in use by the Borrowers hereunder, except to the extent compliance in any case is waived in writing pursuant to the terms of Section 14.13 hereof:
The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, preserve and maintain its existence, and preserve and keep in force and effect all licenses, permits and franchises necessary to the proper conduct of its business; that nothing in this Section 9.1 shall prohibit the dissolution, sale, transfer or other disposition of any Subsidiary which is otherwise permitted under Section 9.11 hereof.
Section 9.1. Maintenance of Business.
provided, however,
. The Company shall duly pay and discharge, and shall cause each Subsidiary to duly pay and discharge, all material taxes, rates, assessments, fees and governmental charges upon or against it or its Properties, in each case before the same become delinquent and before penalties accrue thereon, unless and to the extent that the same are being contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings which prevent enforcement of the matter under contest and adequate reserves are provided therefor.
Section 9.2. Taxes and Assessment
s
The Company shall insure and keep insured, and shall cause each Subsidiary to insure and keep insured, with responsible insurance companies, all insurable Property owned by it which is of a character usually insured by Persons similarly situated and operating like Properties against loss or damage from such hazards and risks, and in such amounts, as are insured by Persons similarly situated and operating like Properties; and the Company shall insure, and shall cause each Subsidiary to insure, such other hazards and risks (including employers' and public liability risks) with responsible insurance companies as and to the extent usually insured by Persons similarly situated and conducting similar businesses. The Company shall upon written request furnish to the Administrative Agent and any Lender a certificate setting forth in summary form the nature and extent of the insurance maintained pursuant to this Section.
Section 9.3. Insurance.
The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, maintain a standard system of accounting in accordance with GAAP and shall furnish to the Administrative Agent, each Lender and their duly authorized representatives such information respecting the business and financial condition of the Company and its Subsidiaries as the Administrative Agent may reasonably request (each Lender to have the right to require the Administrative Agent make such request); and without any request, the Company will furnish each of the following to the Administrative Agent, with sufficient copies for each Lender (which the Administrative Agent shall promptly distribute to each Lender) or, in lieu of furnishing any such item to the Administrative Agent, may at such time notify the Administrative Agent that such item has been posted to a website maintained by or on behalf of the Company and accessible to all of the Lenders, such notification to inform the Administrative Agent of any information necessary to allow the Lenders to access such item:
Section 9.4. Financial Reports.
(a) as soon as available, and in any event within 45 days after the close of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, a copy of the
 
consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the last day of such period and the consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the fiscal quarter and for the fiscal year-to-date period then ended, each in reasonable detail showing in comparative form the figures for the corresponding date and period in the previous fiscal year, prepared by the Company in accordance with GAAP (subject to normal year-end adjustments) and certified to by its President, Chief Financial Officer, Vice President and Treasurer, or Chief Accounting Officer;
(b) as soon as available, and in any event within 90 days after the close of each annual accounting period of the Company, a copy of the consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the last day of the period then ended and the consolidated statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the period then ended, and accompanying notes thereto, each in reasonable detail showing in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, accompanied by an opinion thereon, unqualified as to scope and going-concern status, of Ernst & Young LLP or another firm of independent public accountants of recognized national standing, selected by the Company and satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, to the effect that the financial statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP and present fairly in accordance with GAAP the consolidated financial condition of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the close of such fiscal year and the results of their operations and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended and that an examination of such accounts in connection with such financial statements has been made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and, accordingly, such examination included such tests of the accounting records and such other auditing procedures as were considered necessary in the circumstances;
(c) within the period provided in subsection (b) above, the written statement of the accountants who certified the audit report thereby required that in the course of their audit they have obtained no knowledge of any Default or Event of Default with respect to Sections 9.6, 9.7 and 9.8, or, if such accountants have obtained knowledge of any such Default or Event of Default, they shall disclose in such statement the nature and period of the existence thereof;
(d) promptly after receipt thereof, any additional written reports, management letters or other detailed information contained in writing given to it by its independent public accountants and having a material impact on the consolidated financial condition of the Company and its Subsidiaries;
(e) promptly after the sending or filing thereof, a copies of all proxy statements, financial statements and reports which the Company sends to its shareholders, and copies of all regular, periodic and special reports and all registration statements which the Company files with the SEC or with any national securities exchange;
(f) promptly after knowledge thereof shall have come to the attention of any Responsible Officer of the Company, written notice of (i) any threatened or pending
 
litigation or governmental or arbitration proceeding or labor controversy against the Company or any Subsidiary which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or (ii) of the occurrence of any Default or Event of Default hereunder;
(g) notice of any Change in Control; and
(h) promptly after the effectiveness thereof (i) true and complete copies of any amendments to the Note Purchase Agreement and (ii) notice of the addition of any guarantor under the Note Purchase Agreement.
Each of the financial statements furnished to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be accompanied by a Compliance Certificate signed by the President, the Chief Financial Officer or the Vice President and Treasurer of the Company to the effect that to the best of such officer's knowledge and belief no Default or Event of Default has occurred during the period covered by such statements or, if any such Default or Event of Default has occurred during such period, setting forth a description of such Default or Event of Default and specifying the action, if any, taken by the Borrowers to remedy the same. Such Compliance Certificate shall also (i) set forth the calculations supporting such statements in respect of Sections 9.6, 9.7 and 9.8 of this Agreement and (ii) contain a calculation of the Cash Flow Leverage Ratio for purposes of determining adjustments (if any) to the Applicable Margins.
. The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, permit the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each of their duly authorized representatives and agents during normal business hours to visit and inspect any of the Properties, corporate books and financial records of the Company and each Subsidiary, to examine and make copies of the books of accounts and other financial records of the Company and each Subsidiary, and to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and each Subsidiary with, and to be advised as to the same by, its officers, employees and independent public accountants (and by this provision the Company hereby authorizes such accountants to discuss with the Administrative Agent and such Lender the finances and affairs of the Company and of each Subsidiary) at such reasonable times and reasonable intervals as the Administrative Agent or any such Lender may designate.
Section 9.5. Inspection
. The Company shall not at any time permit its Net Worth to be less than $650,000,000 40% of Net Income for each calendar quarter (if positive for such quarter) completed as of the date of determination, commencing with the calendar quarter ending September 30, 2010.
Section 9.6. Net Worth
plus
. The Company shall not at any time permit its Cash Flow Leverage Ratio to be more than 2.75 to 1.0.
Section 9.7. Cash Flow Leverage Ratio
The Company shall not at any time permit its Interest Coverage Ratio to be less than 4.00 to 1.0.
Section 9.8. Interest Coverage Ratio.
 
The Company shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any Property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent:
Section 9.9. Liens.
provided, however,
(a) Liens arising by statute in connection with worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, old age benefits, social security obligations, taxes, assessments, statutory obligations or other similar charges, good faith cash deposits in connection with tenders, contracts or leases to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or other cash deposits required to be made in the ordinary course of business, in each case that the obligation is not for borrowed money and that the obligation secured is not overdue or, if overdue, is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings which prevent enforcement of the matter under contest and adequate reserves have been established therefor;
provided
(b) mechanics', workmen's, materialmen's, landlords', carriers', or other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business with respect to obligations which are not due or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings which prevent enforcement of the matter under contest;
(c) judgment liens and judicial attachment liens not constituting an Event of Default under Section 10.1(h) hereof and the pledge of assets for the purpose of securing an appeal, stay or discharge in the course of any legal proceeding, that the aggregate amount of liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries secured by a pledge of assets permitted under this subsection, including interest and penalties thereon, if any, shall not be in excess of $50,000,000 at any one time outstanding;
provided
(d) Liens on Property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries created solely for the purpose of securing purchase money indebtedness or Capitalized Lease Obligations and, representing or incurred to finance, refinance or refund the purchase price of Property, that no such Lien shall extend to or cover other Property of the Company or such Subsidiary other than the respective Property so acquired, and the principal amount of indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall at no time exceed the original purchase price of such Property as reduced by repayments of principal thereon;
provided
(e) leases or subleases granted to others in the ordinary course of business and any interest or title of a lessor under any lease permitted by this Agreement;
(f) customary rights of set off, revocation, refund or chargeback under deposit agreements or under the Uniform Commercial Code in favor of banks or other financial institution where the Company or any Subsidiary maintains deposits in the ordinary course of business;
(g) Liens constituting encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, condemnations, easements, encroachments, covenants, rights of way, minor defects, irregularities and rights or restrictions of record on the title or use of real property, which do not materially detract from the value of such property or materially impair the use thereof in the business of the Company or any Subsidiary; and
 
(h) Liens other than those permitted by any of the foregoing subsections (a) through (g)  such Liens do not at any time secure obligations exceeding 10% of Net Worth as then determined and computed.
provided
. The Company shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, acquire all or any substantial part of the assets or business of any other Person or division thereof; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent acquisitions of all or substantially all of the assets or business of any other Person or division thereof, or all or any part of the Voting Stock of or other equity interest in any Person (including as such an acquisition, any action to participate as a joint venturer in any joint venture or as a partner in any partnership), in each case if and so long as (i) no Default or Event of Default exists or would exist after giving effect to such acquisition, (ii) after giving effect to such acquisition, the Borrowers would have unused Revolving Credit Commitments in excess of $75,000,000, (iii) the Board of Directors or other governing body of such Person whose Property or Voting Stock or other equity interest is being so acquired has not opposed the terms of such acquisition and (iv) such acquisition involves a line of business which is complementary to the lines of business in which the Company or the Subsidiary, as the case may be, making such acquisition is engaged on the Effective Date.
Section 9.10. Acquisitions
provided, however,
The Company shall not be a party to any merger or consolidation unless the Company is the surviving entity and no Default or Event of Default exists or would exist after giving effect to such merger or consolidation. The Company shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of all or any part of its Property, including any disposition of Property as part of a sale and leaseback transaction, or in any event sell or discount (with or without recourse) any of its notes or accounts receivable; that so long as no Default or Event of Default exists this Section shall not apply to nor operate to prevent:
Section 9.11. Mergers, Consolidations and Sales.
provided, however,
(a) the sale or lease of inventory in the ordinary course of business;
(b) the sale, transfer, lease or other disposition of Property of the Company and its Subsidiaries to one another in the ordinary course of business;
(c) the merger of any Subsidiary with or into the Company (with the Company being the surviving entity) or another existing or newly-formed Subsidiary;
(d) the dissolution of any Subsidiary pursuant to a plan of dissolution requiring the conveyance or distribution of all or substantially all of the assets of such Subsidiary to the Company or to another existing or newly-formed Subsidiary;
(e) the dissolution, sale or transfer of any Non-Borrower Subsidiary;
(f) the sale of delinquent notes or accounts receivable in the ordinary course of business for purposes of collection only (and not for the purpose of any bulk sale or securitization transaction);
 
(g) the sale, transfer or other disposition of any tangible personal property that, in the reasonable business judgment of the Company or its Subsidiary, has become obsolete or worn out, and which is disposed of in the ordinary course of business;
(h) sales by the Company or its Subsidiaries of assets categorized in the "Corporate" segment (or any successor thereto) as identified in the Company's consolidated financial statements filed with the SEC; and
(i) any other sale, transfer, lease or disposition of Property of the Company or any Subsidiary not described in the foregoing clauses (a) through (h) (including any disposition of Property as part of a sale and leaseback transaction) aggregating for the Company and its Subsidiaries not more than $320,000,000 during the term of this Agreement.
The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, promptly pay and discharge all obligations and liabilities arising under ERISA of a character which if unpaid or unperformed could reasonably be expected to result in the imposition of a Lien against any of its Properties. The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, promptly notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender of (i) the occurrence of any reportable event (as defined in ERISA) with respect to a Plan (other than a reportable event with respect to which the 30 day notice requirement is waived), (ii) receipt of any notice from the PBGC of its intention to seek termination of any Plan or appointment of a trustee therefor, (iii) its intention to terminate or withdraw from any Plan, and (iv) the occurrence of any event with respect to any Plan which would result in the incurrence by the Company or any Subsidiary of any material liability, fine or penalty, or any material increase in the contingent liability of the Company or any Subsidiary with respect to any post-retirement Welfare Plan benefit.
Section 9.12. ERISA.
The Company shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary to, comply in all respects with the requirements of all federal, state and local laws, rules, regulations, ordinances and orders applicable to or pertaining to their Properties or business operations, non-compliance with which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.13. Compliance with Laws.
The Company shall not, nor shall it permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any contract, agreement or business arrangement with any of its Affiliates (other than transactions between the Company and a Wholly-Owned Subsidiary or between Wholly-Owned Subsidiaries) on terms and conditions which are less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than would be usual and customary in similar contracts, agreements or business arrangements between Persons not affiliated with each other.
Section 9.14. Burdensome Contracts with Affiliates.
Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary shall change its fiscal year from its present basis without the prior written consent of the Required Lenders, such consent not to be unreasonably withheld.
Section 9.15. No Changes in Fiscal Year.
The Company shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to, engage in any business or activity if as a result the general nature of the
Section 9.16. Change in the Nature of Business.
 
business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole would be changed in any material respect from the general nature of the business engaged in by the Company and its Subsidiaries on the date of this Agreement.
. The Borrowers (other than the Company) shall at all times maintain an aggregate asset value equal to or greater than the lesser of (a) 80% of the consolidated total assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries or (b) $2,000,000,000.
Section 9.17. Assets of Borrowers
. (a) The Company shall at all times comply with the requirements of all OFAC Sanctions Programs applicable to the Company and shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to comply with the requirements of all OFAC Sanctions Programs applicable to such Subsidiary non-compliance with which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.18. Compliance with OFAC Sanctions Programs
(b) The Company shall provide the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, and the Lenders promptly after request therefor any information regarding the Company, its Affiliates, and its Subsidiaries necessary for the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, and the Lenders to comply with all applicable OFAC Sanctions Programs and other similar laws, regulations and orders applicable to any of them; subject however, in the case of Affiliates, to the Company's ability to provide information applicable to them.
(c) If the Company obtains actual knowledge or receives any written notice that the Company, any Affiliate or any Subsidiary is named on the then current OFAC SDN List (such occurrence, an ), the Company shall promptly (i) give written notice to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, and the Lenders of such OFAC Event, and (ii) comply with all applicable laws with respect to such OFAC Event (regardless of whether the party included on the OFAC SDN List is located within the jurisdiction of the United States of America), including the OFAC Sanctions Programs, and the Company hereby authorizes and consents to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, and the Lenders taking any and all steps the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, or the Lenders deem necessary, in their sole but reasonable discretion, to avoid violation of all applicable laws with respect to any such OFAC Event, including the requirements of the OFAC Sanctions Programs (including the freezing and/or blocking of assets and reporting such action to OFAC).
"OFAC Event"
S 10. E D R.
ECTION
VENTS
OF
EFAULT
AND
EMEDIES
. Any one or more of the following shall constitute an Event of Default:
Section 10.1. Events of Default
(a) default (i) in the payment when due of the principal amount of any Loan or Reimbursement Obligation or (ii) for a period of three (3) Business Days in the payment when due of interest or fees or any part of any other Obligation payable by the Borrowers hereunder or under any other Loan Document; or
(b) default in the observance or performance of the Borrowers' obligation to deliver cash collateral for Letters of Credit as required by Section 1.2(b) hereof; or
 
(c) default for a period of one (1) Business Day in the observance or performance of the Company's obligations under Section 9.4 hereof; or
(d) default in the observance or performance of any covenant set forth in Sections 9.6, 9.7, 9.8, 9.10, 9.11, 9.12 or 9.16 hereof; or
(e) default in the observance or performance of any other provision hereof or of any other Loan Document which is not remedied within 30 days after the earlier of (i) the date on which such failure shall first become known to any Responsible Officer of the Company or (ii) written notice thereof is given to the Company by the Administrative Agent or any Lender; or
(f) (i) any representation or warranty made by the Company herein or in any other Loan Document, or in any statement or certificate furnished by it pursuant hereto or thereto, or in connection with any Loan or other extension of credit made hereunder, proves untrue in any material respect as of the date of the issuance or making thereof, or (ii) any representation or warranty made by any Borrower (other than the Company) or Guarantor herein or in any other Loan Document, or in any statement or certificate furnished by it pursuant hereto or thereto, or in connection with any Loan or other extension of credit made hereunder, proves untrue in any material respect as of the date of the issuance or making thereof and such untruthfulness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(g) default shall occur under any evidence of Indebtedness for Borrowed Money issued, assumed or guaranteed by the Company or any Subsidiary aggregating in excess of $35,000,000, or under any indenture, agreement or other instrument under which the same may be issued, and such default shall continue for a period of time sufficient to permit the acceleration of the maturity of any such Indebtedness for Borrowed Money (whether or not such maturity is in fact accelerated), or any such Indebtedness for Borrowed Money shall not be paid when due (whether by lapse of time, acceleration or otherwise); or
(h) any judgment or judgments, writ or writs, or warrant or warrants of attachment, or any similar process or processes in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 shall be entered or filed against the Company or any Subsidiary or against any of their Property which remains unvacated, unbonded, unstayed or unsatisfied for a period of 30 days; or
(i) the Company or any member of its Controlled Group shall fail to pay when due an amount or amounts aggregating in excess of $2,000,000 which it shall have become liable to pay to the PBGC or to a Plan under Title IV of ERISA; or notice of intent to terminate a Plan or Plans having aggregate Unfunded Vested Liabilities in excess of $15,000,000 (collectively, a ) shall be filed under Title IV of ERISA by the Company or any other member of its Controlled Group, any plan administrator or any combination of the foregoing; or the PBGC shall institute proceedings under Title IV of ERISA to terminate or to cause a trustee to be appointed to
"Material Plan"
 
administer any Material Plan or a proceeding shall be instituted by a fiduciary of any Material Plan against the Company or any member of its Controlled Group to enforce Section 515 or 4219(c)(5) of ERISA and such proceeding shall not have been dismissed within 30 days thereafter; or a condition shall exist by reason of which the PBGC would be entitled to obtain a decree adjudicating that any Material Plan must be terminated; or
(j) the occurrence of a Change in Control; or
(k) any Borrower or any Material Subsidiary shall (i) have entered involuntarily against it an order for relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code, as amended, (ii) not pay, or admit in writing its inability to pay, its debts generally as they become due, (iii) make an assignment for the benefit of creditors, (iv) apply for, seek, consent to, or acquiesce in, the appointment of a receiver, custodian, trustee, examiner, liquidator or similar official for it or any substantial part of its Property, (v) institute any proceeding seeking to have entered against it an order for relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code, as amended, to adjudicate it insolvent, or seeking dissolution, winding up, liquidation, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment or composition of it or its debts under any law relating to bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization or relief of debtors or fail to file an answer or other pleading denying the material allegations of any such proceeding filed against it, (vi) take any action in furtherance of any matter described in parts (ii) through (v) above, or (vii) fail to contest in good faith any appointment or proceeding described in Section 10.1(l) hereof; or
(l) a custodian, receiver, trustee, examiner, liquidator or similar official shall be appointed for any Borrower or any Material Subsidiary or any substantial part of any of its Property, or a proceeding described in Section 10.1(k)(v) shall be instituted against any Borrower or any Material Subsidiary, and such appointment continues undischarged or such proceeding continues undismissed or unstayed for a period of 60 days; or
(m) any Loan Document or any material provision thereof, at any time after its execution and delivery and for any reason other than as expressly permitted hereunder or thereunder or satisfaction in full of all the Obligations, ceases to be in full force and effect; or any Borrower or Guarantor contests in writing the validity or enforceability of any Loan Document or any material provision thereof; or any Borrower or Guarantor denies in writing that it has any or further liability or obligation under any Loan Document, or purports in writing to revoke, terminate or rescind any Loan Document or any material provision thereof.
. When any Event of Default other than those described in subsections (k) or (l) of Section 10.1 hereof has occurred and is continuing, the Administrative Agent shall, if so directed by the Required Lenders, by written notice to the Company: (a) terminate the remaining Revolving Credit Commitments and all other obligations of the Lenders hereunder on the date stated in such notice (which may be the date thereof); (b) declare the principal of and the accrued interest on all outstanding Loans to be forthwith due and payable and thereupon all outstanding Loans, including both principal and interest thereon, shall be and become immediately due and payable together with all other amounts payable under
Section 10.2. Non-Bankruptcy Defaults
 
the Loan Documents without further demand, presentment, protest or notice of any kind; and (c) demand that the Borrowers immediately pay to the Administrative Agent, subject to Section 10.4, the full amount then available for drawing under each or any Letter of Credit, and the Borrowers agree to immediately make such payment and acknowledges and agrees that the Lenders would not have an adequate remedy at law for failure by the Borrowers to honor any such demand and that the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, shall have the right to require the Borrowers to specifically perform such undertaking whether or not any drawings or other demands for payment have been made under any Letter of Credit.
. When any Event of Default described in subsections (k) or (l) of Section 10.1 hereof has occurred and is continuing, then all outstanding Loans shall immediately become due and payable together with all other amounts payable under the Loan Documents without presentment, demand, protest or notice of any kind, the obligation of the Lenders to extend further credit pursuant to any of the terms hereof shall immediately terminate and the Borrowers shall immediately pay to the Administrative Agent, subject to Section 10.4, the full amount then available for drawing under all outstanding Letters of Credit, the Borrowers acknowledging that the Lenders would not have an adequate remedy at law for failure by the Borrowers to honor any such demand and that the Lenders, and the Administrative Agent on their behalf, shall have the right to require the Borrowers to specifically perform such undertaking whether or not any draws or other demands for payment have been made under any of the Letters of Credit.
Section 10.3. Bankruptcy Defaults
. (a) If the payment or prepayment of the amount available for drawing under any or all outstanding Letters of Credit is required under Section 1.2(b), Section 10.2 or Section 10.3 above, the Borrowers shall forthwith pay the amount required to be so prepaid, to be held by the Administrative Agent as provided in subsection (b) below.
Section 10.4. Collateral for Undrawn Letters of Credit
(b) All amounts prepaid pursuant to subsection (a) above shall be held by the Administrative Agent in a separate collateral account (such account, and the credit balances, properties and any investments from time to time held therein, and any substitutions for such account, any certificate of deposit or other instrument evidencing any of the foregoing and all proceeds of and earnings on any of the foregoing being collectively called the ) as security for, and for application by the Administrative Agent (to the extent available) to, the reimbursement of any payment under any Letter of Credit then or thereafter made by the Administrative Agent. The Account shall be held in the name of and subject to the exclusive dominion and control of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Lenders. If and when requested by the Company, the Administrative Agent shall invest funds held in the Account from time to time in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America with a remaining maturity of one year or less, that the Administrative Agent is irrevocably authorized to sell investments held in the Account when and as required to make payments out of the Account for application to amounts due and owing from any Borrower to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or Lenders; that if (i) the Borrowers shall have made payment of all such obligations referred to in subsection (a) above and (ii) no Letters of Credit remain outstanding hereunder, then the Administrative Agent shall repay to the Company for the benefit of the Borrowers any remaining amounts held in the Account.
"Account"
provided
provided, however,
 
. The Administrative Agent shall give notice to the Company under Section 10.1(c) hereof promptly upon being requested to do so by any Lender and shall thereupon notify all the Lenders thereof.
Section 10.5. Notice of Default
. The Borrowers agree to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Administrative Agent and each Lender, and any other holder of any Obligation outstanding hereunder, all out-of-pocket expenses incurred or paid by the Administrative Agent and such Lender or any such holder, including attorneys' fees and court costs, in connection with any Default or Event of Default by any Borrower hereunder or in connection with the enforcement of any of the Loan Documents (including all such costs and expenses incurred in connection with any proceeding under the United States Bankruptcy Code involving any Borrower as a debtor thereunder).
Section 10.6. Expenses
S 11. C C.
ECTION
HANGE
IN
IRCUMSTANCES
. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, if at any time after the date hereof any Lender shall determine in good faith that any change in applicable laws, treaties or regulations or in the interpretation thereof makes it unlawful for such Lender to make or continue to maintain Eurocurrency Loans, such Lender shall promptly give notice thereof to the Administrative Agent (which shall in turn promptly notify the Company and the other Lenders) and such Lender's obligations to make or maintain Eurocurrency Loans under this Agreement shall terminate until it is no longer unlawful for such Lender to make or maintain Eurocurrency Loans. The Borrowers shall prepay on the last day of the Interest Period for any such affected Eurocurrency Loan, or within such earlier period as required by law upon demand from the affected Lender, the outstanding principal amount of any such affected Eurocurrency Loans, together with all interest accrued thereon and all other amounts payable to the affected Lender with respect thereto; subject to all of the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company may then elect on behalf of the Borrowers to borrow the principal amount of the affected Eurocurrency Loans from such Lender by means of Base Rate Loans from such Lender, which Base Rate Loans shall not be made ratably by the Lenders but only from such affected Lender.
Section 11.1. Change of Law
provided, however,
. If on or prior to the first day of any Interest Period for any Borrowing of Eurocurrency Loans:
Section 11.2. Unavailability of Deposits or Inability to Ascertain, or Inadequacy of, Adjusted LIBOR
(a) the Administrative Agent determines that deposits in U.S. Dollars or the applicable Alternative Currency (in the applicable amounts) are not being offered to it in the eurocurrency interbank market for such Interest Period, or that by reason of circumstances affecting the interbank eurocurrency market adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the applicable Adjusted LIBOR, or
 
(b) the Required Lenders determine and so advise the Administrative Agent that (i) Adjusted LIBOR as determined by the Administrative Agent will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of funding their Eurocurrency Loans or Loan for such Interest Period or (ii) that the making or funding of Eurocurrency Loans becomes impracticable,
then the Administrative Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders, whereupon until the Administrative Agent notifies the Company that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, the obligations of the Lenders to make Eurocurrency Loans in the currency so affected shall be suspended.
. (a) If, after the date hereof, the adoption of any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change therein, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Lending Office) with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law but, if not having the force of law, compliance with which is customary in the relevant jurisdiction) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency issued after the date hereof:
Section 11.3. Increased Cost and Reduced Return
(i) shall subject any Lender (or its Lending Office) or the L/C Issuer to any tax, duty or other charge with respect to its Eurocurrency Loans, its Notes, its Letters of Credit, or its participation in any thereof, any Reimbursement Obligations owed to it or its obligation to make Eurocurrency Loans, issue Letters of Credit, or to participate therein, or shall change the basis of taxation of payments to any Lender (or its Lending Office) or the L/C Issuer of the principal of or interest on its Eurocurrency Loans, Letters of Credit, or participations therein or any other amounts due under this Agreement in respect of its Eurocurrency Loans, Letters of Credit, or participations therein, any Reimbursement Obligations owed to it, or its obligation to make Eurocurrency Loans, issue a Letter of Credit, or acquire participations therein (except for changes in the rate of tax on the overall net income or profits of such Lender or its Lending Office or the L/C Issuer imposed by the jurisdiction in which such Lender or its lending office is incorporated, or in which such Lender's principal executive office or Lending Office is located); or
(ii) shall impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement (including, without limitation, any such requirement imposed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, but excluding with respect to any Eurocurrency Loans any such requirement included in an applicable Eurocurrency Reserve Percentage) against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (or its Lending Office) or the L/C Issuer or shall impose on any Lender (or its Lending Office) or the L/C Issuer or on the interbank market any other condition affecting its Eurocurrency Loans, its Notes, its Letters of Credit, or its participation in any thereof, any Reimbursement Obligation owed to it, or its obligation to make Eurocurrency Loans, to issue a Letter of Credit, or to participate therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing is to increase the cost to such Lender (or its Lending Office) or the L/C Issuer of making or maintaining any Eurocurrency Loan, issuing or maintaining a Letter of Credit, or participating therein, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender (or its Lending Office) or the L/C Issuer under this Agreement or under any other Loan Document with respect thereto, by an amount deemed by such Lender or the L/C Issuer to be material, then, within 15 days after demand by such Lender or the L/C Issuer (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), the Borrowers shall be obligated to pay to such Lender or the L/C Issuer such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer for such increased cost or reduction. In the event any law, rule, regulation or interpretation described above is revoked, declared invalid or inapplicable or is otherwise rescinded, and as a result thereof a Lender or the L/C Issuer is determined to be entitled to a refund from the applicable authority for any amount or amounts which were paid or reimbursed by the Borrowers to such Lender or the L/C Issuer hereunder, such Lender or the L/C Issuer shall refund such amount or amounts actually received by such Lender or the L/C Issuer to the Company on behalf of the Borrowers without interest.
(b) If any Lender or the Administrative Agent shall have determined that the adoption, after the date hereof, of any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy, or any change therein, or in any other applicable capital rules heretofore adopted and issued by any governmental authority), or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof after the date hereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Lending Office) or the L/C Issuer or any corporation controlling such Lender or L/C Issuer with any request or directive issued after the date hereof regarding capital adequacy (whether or not having the force of law but, if not having the force of law, compliance with which is customary in the applicable jurisdiction) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency, has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or L/C Issuer's capital, or on the capital of any corporation controlling such Lender or the L/C Issuer, as a consequence of its obligations hereunder to a level below that which such Lender or the L/C Issuer could have achieved but for such adoption, change or compliance (taking into consideration such Lender's or L/C Issuer's policies with respect to capital adequacy) by an amount deemed by such Lender or the L/C Issuer to be material, then from time to time, within 15 days after demand by such Lender or the L/C Issuer (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), the Borrowers shall pay to such Lender or the L/C Issuer such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the L/C Issuer for such reduction.
(c) Each Lender or the L/C Issuer that determines to seek compensation under this Section 11.3 shall notify the Company and the Administrative Agent of the circumstances that entitle the Lender or the L/C Issuer to such compensation pursuant to this Section 11.3 and will designate a different Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such compensation and will not, in the judgment of such Lender or the L/C Issuer, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender or the L/C Issuer. A certificate of any Lender claiming compensation under this Section 11.3 and setting forth the additional amount or amounts to be paid to it hereunder shall be conclusive if reasonably determined. The Borrowers shall not be obligated to reimburse, compensate or indemnify any Lender or the L/C Issuer with respect to a claim or any portion thereof to the extent such claim or portion thereof arose more than 120 days prior to the notice of such claim delivered pursuant to this Section 11.3(c).
 
. Each Lender may, at its option, elect to make its Loans hereunder at the branch, office or affiliate specified on the appropriate signature page hereof (each a ) for each type of Loan available hereunder or at such other of its branches, offices or affiliates as it may from time to time elect and designate in a written notice to the Company and the Administrative Agent.
Section 11.4. Lending Offices
"Lending Office"
. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, each Lender shall be entitled to fund and maintain its funding of all or any part of its Loans in any manner it sees fit, it being understood, however, that for the purposes of this Agreement all determinations hereunder shall be made as if each Lender had actually funded and maintained each Eurocurrency Loan through the purchase of deposits of U.S. Dollars in the eurocurrency interbank market having a maturity corresponding to such Loan's Interest Period and bearing an interest rate equal to Adjusted LIBOR for such Interest Period.
Section 11.5. Discretion of Lender as to Manner of Funding
. If the Borrowers are required pursuant to Section 11.3 or Section 14.1 hereof to make any additional payment to any Lender or if any Lender's obligation to make or continue, or to convert Base Rate Loans into, Eurocurrency Loans shall be suspended pursuant to Section 11.1 or Section 11.2 hereof, or if any Lender does not timely agree or consent, in writing, to any amendment or consent hereto or waiver of any provision hereof which is timely agreed or consented to by the Required Lenders or any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender (any such Lender being hereinafter referred to as a ), then in such case, the Company may, upon at least five (5) Business Days' notice to the Administrative Agent and to such Replaced Lender, designate a replacement lender (a ) acceptable to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender in their reasonable discretion, to which such Replaced Lender shall, subject to its receipt (unless a later date for the remittance thereof shall be agreed upon by the Company and the Replaced Lender) of all amounts owed to such Replaced Lender under Section 11.3 or Section 14.1, assign all (but not less than all) of its rights, obligations, Loans and Revolving Credit Commitment hereunder; that all amounts (including amounts owed pursuant to Section 3.6 hereof) owed by the Borrowers to such Replaced Lender hereunder (except liabilities which by the terms hereof survive the payment in full of the Loans and termination of this Agreement) shall be paid in full as of the date of such assignment.
Section 11.6. Replacement of Lenders
"Replaced Lender"
"Replacement Lender"
provided,
S 12. T A A.
ECTION
HE
DMINISTRATIVE
GENT
. Each Lender hereby appoints Bank of Montreal as the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents and hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such action as the Administrative Agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
Section 12.1. Appointment and Authorization of Administrative Agent
 
. The Administrative Agent shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as any other Lender and may exercise or refrain from exercising the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and the Administrative Agent and its affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of business with any Borrower or any Affiliate of any Borrower as if it were not the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents. The term as used herein and in all other Loan Documents, unless the context otherwise clearly requires, includes the Administrative Agent in its individual capacity as a Lender. References in Section 1 hereof to the Administrative Agent's Loans, or to the amount owing to the Administrative Agent for which an interest rate is being determined, refer to the Administrative Agent in its individual capacity as a Lender.
Section 12.2. Administrative Agent and its Affiliates
"Lender"
. If the Administrative Agent receives from the Company a written notice of an Event of Default pursuant to Section 9.4(f) hereof, the Administrative Agent shall promptly give each of the Lenders written notice thereof. The Lenders and the L/C Issuer expressly agree that the Administrative Agent is not acting as a fiduciary of the Lenders or the L/C Issuer in respect of the Loan Documents, the Borrowers or otherwise, and nothing herein or in any of the other Loan Documents shall result in any duties or obligations on the Administrative Agent or any of the Lenders except as expressly set forth herein. The obligations of the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents are only those expressly set forth therein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action hereunder with respect to any Default or Event of Default, except as expressly provided in Sections 10.2 and 10.5 hereof. In no event, however, shall the Administrative Agent be required to take any action in violation of applicable law or of any provision of any Loan Document, and the Administrative Agent shall in all cases be fully justified in failing or refusing to act hereunder or under any other Loan Document unless it shall be first indemnified to its reasonable satisfaction by the Lenders against any and all costs, expense, and liability which may be incurred by it by reason of taking or continuing to take any such action. The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to assume that no Default or Event of Default exists unless notified in writing to the contrary by a Lender or the Company. In all cases in which this Agreement and the other Loan Documents do not require the Administrative Agent to take certain actions, the Administrative Agent shall be fully justified in using its discretion in failing to take or in taking any action hereunder and thereunder. Any instructions of the Required Lenders, or of any other group of Lenders called for under the specific provisions of the Loan Documents, shall be binding on all the Lenders and the holders of the Obligations.
Section 12.3. Action by Administrative Agent
. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel, independent public accountants and other experts selected by it and shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the advice of such counsel, accountants or experts.
Section 12.4. Consultation with Experts
. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, or employees shall be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in connection with the Loan Documents (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents or
Section 12.5. Liability of Administrative Agent; Credit Decision
 
employees shall be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain, inquire into or verify (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in connection with this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any Credit Event; (ii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants or agreements of any Borrower or any Subsidiary contained herein or in any other Loan Document; (iii) the satisfaction of any condition specified in Section 8 hereof, except receipt of items required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent; or (iv) the validity, effectiveness, genuineness, enforceability, perfection, value, worth or collectibility hereof or of any other Loan Document or of any other documents or writing furnished in connection with any Loan Document; and the Administrative Agent makes no representation of any kind or character with respect to any such matter mentioned in this sentence. The Administrative Agent may execute any of its duties under any of the Loan Documents by or through employees, agents, and attorneys-in-fact and shall not be answerable to the Lenders, the L/C Issuer, the Borrowers, or any other Person for the default or misconduct of any such agents or attorneys-in-fact selected with reasonable care. The Administrative Agent shall not incur any liability by acting in reliance upon any notice, consent, certificate, other document or statement (whether written or oral) believed by it to be genuine or to be sent by the proper party or parties. In particular and without limiting any of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent shall have no responsibility for confirming the accuracy of any Compliance Certificate or other document or instrument received by it under the Loan Documents. The Administrative Agent may treat the payee of any Obligation as the holder thereof until written notice of transfer shall have been filed with the Administrative Agent signed by such payee in form satisfactory to the Administrative Agent. Each Lender and the L/C Issuer acknowledges that it has independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender or the L/C Issuer, and based upon such information, investigations and inquiries as it deems appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to extend credit to the Borrowers in the manner set forth in the Loan Documents. It shall be the responsibility of each Lender and the L/C Issuer to keep itself informed as to the creditworthiness of the Borrowers and the Administrative Agent shall have no liability to any Lender or the L/C Issuer with respect thereto.
. The Lenders shall ratably, in accordance with their respective Percentages, indemnify and hold the Administrative Agent, and its directors, officers, employees, agents and representatives harmless from and against any liabilities, losses, costs or expenses suffered or incurred by it under any Loan Document or in connection with the transactions contemplated thereby, regardless of when asserted or arising, except to the extent they are promptly reimbursed for the same by the Borrowers and except to the extent that any event giving rise to a claim was caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party seeking to be indemnified. The obligations of the Lenders under this Section 12.6 shall survive termination of this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to offset amounts received for the account of a Lender under this Agreement against unpaid amounts due from such Lender to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, or Swing Line Lender hereunder (whether as fundings of participations, indemnities or otherwise, and with any amounts offset for the benefit of the Administrative Agent to be held by it for its own account and with any amounts offset for the benefit of the L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender to be remitted by the Administrative Agent to of for the account of such L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender, as applicable), but shall not be entitled to offset against amounts owed to the Administrative Agent, any L/C Issuer or Swing Line Lender by any Lender arising outside of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Section 12.6. Indemnity
 
. The Administrative Agent may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Lenders and the Company. Upon any such notice of resignation of the Administrative Agent, the Required Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor Administrative Agent subject, so long as no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, to the consent of the Company. If no successor Administrative Agent shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders, and shall have accepted such appointment, within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent's giving of notice of resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders, appoint a successor Administrative Agent, which shall be any Lender hereunder or any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or of any State thereof and having a combined capital and surplus of at least $200,000,000. The retiring Administrative Agent shall continue as Administrative Agent hereunder until a successor Administrative Agent has accepted appointment as Administrative Agent. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as the Administrative Agent hereunder, such successor Administrative Agent shall thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights and duties of the retiring or removed Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations thereunder. After any retiring Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder as Administrative Agent, the provisions of this Section 12 and all protective provisions of the other Loan Documents shall inure to its benefit as to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Administrative Agent.
Section 12.7. Resignation of Administrative Agent and Successor Administrative Agent
The L/C Issuer shall act on behalf of the Lenders with respect to any Letters of Credit issued by it and the documents associated therewith, and the Swing Line Lender shall act on behalf of the Lenders with respect to the Swing Loans made hereunder. The L/C Issuer and the Swing Line Lender shall each have all of the benefits and immunities (i) provided to the Administrative Agent in this Section 12 with respect to any acts taken or omissions suffered by the L/C Issuer in connection with Letters of Credit issued by it or proposed to be issued by it and the Applications pertaining to such Letters of Credit or by the Swing Line Lender in connection with Swing Loans made or to be made hereunder as fully as if the term "Administrative Agent", as used in this Section 12, included the L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender with respect to such acts or omissions and (ii) as additionally provided in this Agreement with respect to such L/C Issuer.
Section 12.8. L/C Issuer and Swing Line Lender.
. The Administrative Agent shall have the continuing right, for purposes hereof, at any time and from time to time to designate one or more of the Lenders (and/or its or their Affiliates) as "syndication agents," "documentation agents," "arrangers," or other designations for purposes hereto, but such designation shall have no substantive effect, and such Lenders and their Affiliates shall have no additional powers, duties or responsibilities as a result thereof.
Section 12.9. Designation of Additional Agents
 
S 13.A. J S O.
ECTION
OINT
AND
EVERAL
BLIGORS
. To induce the Lenders and the L/C Issuer to provide the credits described herein and in consideration of benefits expected to accrue to the Borrowers by reason of the Revolving Credit Commitments and for other good and valuable consideration, receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, each Borrower hereby unconditionally and irrevocably confirms jointly and severally to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, the due and punctual payment of all present and future Obligations, including, but not limited to, the due and punctual payment of principal of and interest on the Loans, Notes, the Reimbursement Obligations, and the due and punctual payment of all other Obligations now or hereafter owed by any Borrower under the Loan Documents as and when the same shall become due and payable, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration, or otherwise, according to the terms hereof and thereof (including all interest, costs, fees, and charges after the entry of an order for relief against any Borrower or such other obligor in a case under the United States Bankruptcy Code or any similar proceeding, whether or not such interest, costs, fees and charges would be an allowed claim against such Borrower or any such obligor in any such proceeding). In case of failure by any Borrower punctually to pay any Obligations, each other Borrower hereby unconditionally agrees to make such payment or to cause such payment to be made punctually as and when the same shall become due and payable, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration, or otherwise.
Section 13.1.A. Joint and Several Obligors
. The obligations of each Borrower under this Section 13.A shall be unconditional and absolute and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall not be released, discharged, or otherwise affected by:
Section 13.2.A. Unconditional
(a) any extension, renewal, settlement, compromise, waiver, or release in respect of any obligation of any Borrower or of any other guarantor under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or by operation of law or otherwise;
(b) any modification or amendment of or supplement to this Agreement or any other Loan Document;
(c) any change in the corporate existence, structure, or ownership of, or any insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization, or other similar proceeding affecting, any Borrower or any of their respective assets, or any resulting release or discharge of any obligation of any Borrower contained in any Loan Document;
(d) the existence of any claim, set-off, or other rights which any Borrower may have at any time against the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person, whether or not arising in connection herewith;
(e) any failure to assert, or any assertion of, any claim or demand or any exercise of, or failure to exercise, any rights or remedies against any Borrower or any other Person or Property;
 
(f) any application of any sums by whomsoever paid or howsoever realized to any obligation of any Borrower, regardless of what obligations of the Borrowers remain unpaid;
(g) any invalidity or unenforceability relating to or against any Borrower for any reason of this Agreement or of any other Loan Document or any provision of applicable law or regulation purporting to prohibit the payment by any Borrower of the principal of or interest on any Loan or any Reimbursement Obligation or any other amount payable under the Loan Documents; or
(h) any other act or omission to act or delay of any kind by the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person or any other circumstance whatsoever that might, but for the provisions of this paragraph, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of the obligations of any Borrower under this Section 13.A.
. Except as provided in Section 5.3, each Borrower's obligations under this Section 13.A. shall remain in full force and effect until the Revolving Credit Commitments are terminated, all Letters of Credit have expired, and the principal of and interest on the Loans, Notes and all other amounts payable by the Borrowers under this Agreement and all other Loan Documents shall have been paid in full. If at any time any payment of the principal of or interest on any Note or any Reimbursement Obligation or any other amount payable by any Borrower under the Loan Documents is rescinded or must be otherwise restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy, or reorganization of any Borrower, or otherwise, each Borrower's obligations under this Section 13.A with respect to such payment shall be reinstated at such time as though such payment had become due but had not been made at such time.
Section 13.3.A. Discharge Only upon Payment in Full; Reinstatement in Certain Circumstances
. Each Borrower agrees it will not exercise any rights which it may acquire by way of subrogation by any payment made hereunder, or otherwise, until all the Obligations shall have been paid in full subsequent to the termination of all the Revolving Credit Commitments and expiration of all Letters of Credit. If any amount shall be paid to a Borrower on account of such subrogation rights at any time prior to the later of (x) the payment in full of the Obligations and all other amounts payable by any Borrower hereunder and the other Loan Documents and (y) the termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments and expiration of all Letters of Credit, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and shall forthwith be paid to the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders or be credited and applied upon the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 13.4.A. Subrogation
. Each Borrower irrevocably waives acceptance hereof, presentment, demand, protest, and any notice not provided for herein, as well as any requirement that at any time any action be taken by the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person against any Borrower, any guarantor, or any other Person.
Section 13.5.A. Waivers
. Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the right of recovery against each Borrower under this Section 13.A. shall not exceed $1.00 less than the lowest amount which would render such Borrower's obligations under this Section 13.A. void or voidable under applicable law, including, without limitation, fraudulent conveyance law.
Section 13.6.A. Limit on Recovery
 
. If acceleration of the time for payment of any amount payable by any Borrower under this Agreement or any other Loan Document is stayed upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of such Borrower, all such amounts otherwise subject to acceleration under the terms of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents shall nonetheless be payable by the other Borrowers hereunder forthwith on demand by the Administrative Agent made at the request of the Required Lenders.
Section 13.7.A. Stay of Acceleration
. All of the Borrowers are engaged in related businesses and integrated to such an extent that the financial strength and flexibility of each Borrower has a direct impact on the success of each other Borrower. Each Borrower will derive substantial direct and indirect benefit from the extension of credit hereunder.
Section 13.8.A. Benefit to each Borrower
Each Borrower shall take such action as the Company is required by this Agreement to cause such Borrower to take, and shall refrain from taking such action as the Company is required by this Agreement to prohibit such Borrower from taking.
Section 13.9.A. Borrower Covenants.
S 13.B. T G.
ECTION
HE
UARANTIES
. To induce the Lenders and the L/C Issuer to provide the credits described herein and in consideration of benefits expected to accrue to the Borrowers by reason of the Revolving Credit Commitments and for other good and valuable consideration, receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, each Guarantor hereby unconditionally and irrevocably guarantees jointly and severally to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the L/C Issuer, the due and punctual payment of all present and future Obligations, including, but not limited to, the due and punctual payment of principal of and interest on the Loans, Notes, the Reimbursement Obligations, and the due and punctual payment of all other Obligations now or hereafter owed by any Borrower under the Loan Documents as and when the same shall become due and payable, without set-off or counterclaim, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration, or otherwise, according to the terms hereof and thereof (including all interest, costs, fees, and charges after the entry of an order for relief against any Borrower or such other obligor in a case under the United States Bankruptcy Code or any similar proceeding, whether or not such interest, costs, fees and charges would be an allowed claim against such Borrower or any such obligor in any such proceeding). In case of failure by any Borrower punctually to pay any Obligations guaranteed hereby, each Guarantor hereby unconditionally agrees to make such payment or to cause such payment to be made punctually as and when the same shall become due and payable, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration, or otherwise, and as if such payment were made by the Borrower.
Section 13.1.B. The Guaranties
. The obligations of each Guarantor under this Section 13.B shall be unconditional and absolute and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall not be released, discharged, or otherwise affected by:
Section 13.2.B. Guarantee Unconditional
(a) any extension, renewal, settlement, compromise, waiver, or release in respect of any obligation of any Borrower or of any other guarantor under this Agreement or any other Loan Document or by operation of law or otherwise;
 
(b) any modification or amendment of or supplement to this Agreement or any other Loan Document;
(c) any change in the corporate existence, structure, or ownership of, or any insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization, or other similar proceeding affecting, any Borrower, any other guarantor, or any of their respective assets, or any resulting release or discharge of any obligation of any Borrower or of any other guarantor contained in any Loan Document;
(d) the existence of any claim, set-off, or other rights which any Borrower or any other guarantor may have at any time against the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person, whether or not arising in connection herewith;
(e) any failure to assert, or any assertion of, any claim or demand or any exercise of, or failure to exercise, any rights or remedies against any Borrower, any other guarantor, or any other Person or Property;
(f) any application of any sums by whomsoever paid or howsoever realized to any obligation of any Borrower, regardless of what obligations of the Borrowers remain unpaid;
(g) any invalidity or unenforceability relating to or against any Borrower or any other guarantor for any reason of this Agreement or of any other Loan Document or any provision of applicable law or regulation purporting to prohibit the payment by any Borrower or any other guarantor of the principal of or interest on any Loan or any Reimbursement Obligation or any other amount payable under the Loan Documents; or
(h) any other act or omission to act or delay of any kind by the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person or any other circumstance whatsoever that might, but for the provisions of this paragraph, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of the obligations of any Guarantor under this Section 13.B.
. Except as provided in Section 5.3, each Guarantor's obligations under this Section 13.B. shall remain in full force and effect until the Revolving Credit Commitments are terminated, all Letters of Credit have expired, and the principal of and interest on the Loans, Notes and all other amounts payable by the Borrowers and the Guarantors under this Agreement and all other Loan Documents shall have been paid in full. If at any time any payment of the principal of or interest on any Note or any Reimbursement Obligation or any other amount payable by any Borrower or any Guarantor under the Loan Documents is rescinded or must be otherwise restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy, or reorganization of any Borrower or of any guarantor, or otherwise, each Guarantor's obligations under this Section 13.B with respect to such payment shall be reinstated at such time as though such payment had become due but had not been made at such time.
Section 13.3.B. Discharge Only upon Payment in Full; Reinstatement in Certain Circumstances
 
. Each Guarantor agrees it will not exercise any rights which it may acquire by way of subrogation by any payment made hereunder, or otherwise, until all the Obligations shall have been paid in full subsequent to the termination of all the Revolving Credit Commitments and expiration of all Letters of Credit. If any amount shall be paid to a Guarantor on account of such subrogation rights at any time prior to the later of (x) the payment in full of the Obligations and all other amounts payable by any Borrower hereunder and the other Loan Documents and (y) the termination of the Revolving Credit Commitments and expiration of all Letters of Credit, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and shall forthwith be paid to the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders or be credited and applied upon the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 13.4.B. Subrogation
. Each Guarantor irrevocably waives acceptance hereof, presentment, demand, protest, and any notice not provided for herein, as well as any requirement that at any time any action be taken by the Administrative Agent, any Lender, or any other Person against any Borrower, another guarantor, or any other Person.
Section 13.5.B. Waivers
. Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the right of recovery against each Guarantor under this Section 13.B. shall not exceed $1.00 less than the lowest amount which would render such Guarantor's obligations under this Section 13.B. void or voidable under applicable law, including, without limitation, fraudulent conveyance law.
Section 13.6.B. Limit on Recovery
. If acceleration of the time for payment of any amount payable by any Borrower under this Agreement or any other Loan Document is stayed upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of such Borrower, all such amounts otherwise subject to acceleration under the terms of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents shall nonetheless be payable by the Guarantors hereunder forthwith on demand by the Administrative Agent made at the request of the Required Lenders.
Section 13.7.B Stay of Acceleration
. All of the Guarantors are engaged in related businesses and integrated to such an extent that the financial strength and flexibility of each Guarantor has a direct impact on the success of each other Guarantor. Each Guarantor will derive substantial direct and indirect benefit from the extension of credit hereunder.
Section 13.8.B Benefit to Guarantors
Each Guarantor shall take such action as the Company is required by this Agreement to cause such Guarantor to take, and shall refrain from taking such action as the Company is required by this Agreement to prohibit such Guarantor from taking
Section 13.9.B Guarantor Covenants.
S 14. M.
ECTION
ISCELLANEOUS
. (a) . Except as otherwise required by law and subject to Section 14.1(b) hereof, each payment by a Borrower
Section 14.1. Withholding Taxes
Payments Free of Withholding
 
under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents shall be made without withholding for or on account of any present or future taxes (other than overall net income taxes on the recipient) imposed by or within the jurisdiction in which such Borrower is domiciled, any jurisdiction from which such Borrower makes any payment, or (in each case) any political subdivision or taxing authority thereof or therein. If any such withholding is so required, such Borrower shall make the withholding, pay the amount withheld to the appropriate governmental authority before penalties attach thereto or interest accrues thereon and forthwith pay such additional amount as may be necessary to ensure that the net amount actually received by each Lender, the L/C Issuer and the Administrative Agent free and clear of such taxes (including such taxes on such additional amount) is equal to the amount which that Lender, the L/C Issuer or the Administrative Agent (as the case may be) would have received had such withholding not been made. If the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender pays any amount in respect of any such taxes, penalties or interest, the Borrowers shall reimburse the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or that Lender for that payment on demand in the currency in which such payment was made. If a Borrower pays any such taxes, penalties or interest, it shall deliver official tax receipts evidencing that payment or certified copies thereof to the Lender, the L/C Issuer or Administrative Agent on whose account such withholding was made (with a copy to the Administrative Agent if not the recipient of the original) on or before the thirtieth day after payment.
(b) . Each Lender or the L/C Issuer that is not a United States person (as such term is defined in Section 7701(a)(30) of the Code) shall submit to the Company and the Administrative Agent on or before the earlier of the initial Credit Event and 30 days after the date hereof, two duly completed and signed copies of either Form W-8BEN (or substantially similar substitute forms) or Form W-8ECI (or substantially similar substitute forms) of the United States Internal Revenue Service certifying such Lender's or the L/C Issuer's entitlement to a complete exemption from United States withholding tax with respect to payments to be made under this Agreement. Thereafter and from time to time, each Lender and the L/C Issuer shall submit to the Company and the Administrative Agent such additional duly completed and signed copies of one or the other of such Forms (or such successor forms as shall be adopted from time to time by the relevant United States taxing authorities) as may be (i) requested by the Company in a written notice, directly or through the Administrative Agent, to such Lender and (ii) required under then-current United States law or regulations to avoid or reduce United States withholding taxes on payments in respect of all amounts to be received by such Lender, including fees, pursuant to the Loan Documents or the Loans. All forms or amendments described in the preceding sentence shall certify that such Lender is entitled to receive payments under this Agreement without deduction or withholding of any United States federal income taxes, unless an event (including without limitation any change in treaty, law or regulation) has occurred prior to the date on which any such delivery would otherwise be required which renders all such forms inapplicable or which would prevent such Lender from duly completing and delivering any such form or amendment with respect to it and such Lender advises the Company and the Administrative Agent that it is not capable of receiving payments without any deduction or withholding of United States federal income tax. For any period during which a Lender that is not a United States Person has failed to provide the Company with an appropriate form pursuant to this Section 14.1(b) (unless such failure is due to a change in treaty, law or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any
U.S. Withholding Tax Exemptions
 
governmental authority, occurring subsequent to the date on which a form originally was required to be provided), such Lender shall not be entitled to indemnification under this Section 14.1 with respect to taxes imposed by the United States.
(c) . If any Lender or the L/C Issuer determines, as a result of any change in applicable law, regulation or treaty, or in any official application or interpretation thereof, that it is unable to submit to the Company or Administrative Agent any form or certificate that such Lender or the L/C Issuer is obligated to submit pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section 14.1 or that such Lender or the L/C Issuer is required to withdraw or cancel any such form or certificate previously submitted or any such form or certificate otherwise becomes ineffective or inaccurate, such Lender shall promptly notify the Company and Administrative Agent of such fact and the Lender or the L/C Issuer shall to that extent not be obligated to provide any such form or certificate and will be entitled to withdraw or cancel any affected form or certificate, as applicable.
Inability of Lender to Submit Forms
(d) If the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or a Lender determines that it has received a refund of any taxes as to which it has been indemnified by a Borrower or with respect to which a Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 14.1, it shall pay over such refund to such Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by such Borrower under this Section 14.1 with respect to the taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant governmental authority with respect to such refund); that such Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to such Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant governmental authority) to the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or such Lender is required to pay such refund to such governmental authority.
Tax Refunds.
provided
. No delay or failure on the part of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or any Lender or on the part of any holder or holders of any of the Obligations in the exercise of any power or right under any Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor as an acquiescence in any default, nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise of any other power or right. The rights and remedies hereunder of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer, the Lenders and any holder or holders of any of the Obligations are cumulative to, and not exclusive of, any rights or remedies which any of them would otherwise have.
Section 14.2. No Waiver of Rights
. If any payment hereunder becomes due and payable on a day which is not a Business Day, the due date of such payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day on which date such payment shall be due and payable. In the case of any payment of principal falling due on a day which is not a Business Day, interest on such principal amount shall continue to accrue during such extension at the rate per annum then in effect, which accrued amount shall be due and payable on the next scheduled date for the payment of interest.
Section 14.3. Non-Business Day
 
. The Borrowers agree that they will pay any documentary, stamp or similar taxes payable in respect of any Loan Document, including interest and penalties, in the event any such taxes are assessed, irrespective of when such assessment is made and whether or not any credit is then in use or available hereunder.
Section 14.4. Documentary Taxes
. All representations and warranties made herein or in any other Loan Documents or in certificates given pursuant hereto or thereto shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, and shall continue in full force and effect with respect to the date as of which they were made as long as any credit is in use or available hereunder.
Section 14.5. Survival of Representations
. All indemnities and all other provisions relative to reimbursement to the Lenders and the L/C Issuer of amounts sufficient to protect the yield of the Lenders and the L/C Issuer with respect to the Loans and Letters of Credit, including, but not limited to, Section 3.6, Section 11.3 and Section 14.15 hereof, shall survive the termination of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and the payment of the Loans and all other Obligations.
Section 14.6. Survival of Indemnities
. Each Lender agrees with each other Lender which is a party hereto that if such Lender shall receive and retain any payment, whether by set-off or application of deposit balances or otherwise (), on any of the Loans or Reimbursement Obligations in excess of its ratable share of payments on all such Obligations then outstanding to the Lenders, then such Lender shall purchase for cash at face value, but without recourse, ratably from each of the other Lenders such amount of the Loans or Reimbursement Obligations, or participations therein, held by each such other Lenders (or interest therein) as shall be necessary to cause such Lender to share such excess payment ratably with all the other Lenders; that if any such purchase is made by any Lender, and if such excess payment or part thereof is thereafter recovered from such purchasing Lender, the related purchases from the other Lenders shall be rescinded ratably and the purchase price restored as to the portion of such excess payment so recovered, but without interest. For purposes of this Section 14.7, amounts owed to or recovered by, the L/C Issuer in connection with Reimbursement Obligations in which Lenders have been required to fund their participation shall be treated as amounts owed to or recovered by the L/C Issuer as a Lender hereunder.
Section 14.7. Sharing of Set-Off
"Set-off"
provided, however,
 
. Except as otherwise specified herein, all notices under the Loan Documents shall be in writing (including telecopy or other electronic communication) and shall be given to a party hereunder at its address or telecopier number set forth below or such other address or telecopier number as such party may hereafter specify by notice to the Administrative Agent and the Borrowers, given by courier, or by other telecommunication device capable of creating a written record of such notice and its receipt. Notices under the Loan Documents to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent shall be addressed to their respective addresses, telecopier or telephone numbers set forth in their Administrative Questionnaire, and to any Borrower shall be addressed as follows:
Section 14.8. Notices
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Attention: General Counsel
Telephone: (630) 285-3457
Telecopy: (630) 285-3483
with a copy to:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Attention: Treasurer
Telephone: (630) 285-3536
Telecopy: (630) 285-4272
Each such notice, request or other communication shall be effective (i) if given by telecopier, when such telecopy is transmitted to the telecopier number specified in this Section 14.8 or in the relevant Administrative Questionnaire and a confirmation of receipt of such telecopy has been received by the sender, (ii) if given by courier, when delivered or (iii) if given by any other means, when delivered at the addresses specified in this Section 14.8 or in the relevant Administrative Questionnaire; that any notice given pursuant to Section 1 hereof shall be effective only upon receipt.
provided
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterpart signature pages, and by the different parties on different counterparts, each of which when executed shall be deemed an original but all such counterparts taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement will be deemed executed by the parties hereto when each has signed it and delivered its executed signature page to the Administrative Agent by facsimile transmission, electronic transmission or physical delivery.
Section 14.9. Counterparts
. This Agreement shall be binding upon the Borrowers and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of each of the Administrative Agent, L/C Issuer and the Lenders and the benefit of their respective successors and assigns, including any subsequent holder of any Obligation. Except as otherwise
Section 14.10. Successors and Assigns
 
provided herein in connection with any transaction not prohibited by Section 9.11 hereof, neither any Borrower nor any Guarantor may assign any of its rights or obligations under any Loan Document without the written consent of all of the Lenders.
Each Lender shall have the right at its own cost to grant participations (to be evidenced by one or more agreements or certificates of participation) in the Loans made and Reimbursement Obligations and/or Revolving Credit Commitment and/or participations in Swing Loans held by such Lender at any time and from time to time to one or more Persons; that no such participation shall relieve any Lender of any of its obligations under this Agreement, and that no such participant shall have any rights under this Agreement except as provided in this Section 14.11, and the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation or responsibility to such participant. Any party to which such a participation has been granted shall have the benefits of Section 3.6 and Section 11.3 hereof but shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under either such Section than the Lender granting such participation would have been entitled to receive with respect to the rights transferred. Any agreement pursuant to which any Lender may grant such a participating interest shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right and responsibility to enforce the obligations of the Borrowers hereunder including, without limitation, the right to approve any amendment or modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such participation agreement may provide that such Lender will not agree to any modification, amendment or waiver of this Agreement that would (A) increase the Revolving Credit Commitment of such Lender if such increase would also increase the participant's obligations, (B) forgive any amount of or postpone the date for payment of any principal of or interest on any Loan or Reimbursement Obligation or of any fee payable hereunder in which such participant has an interest or (C) reduce the stated rate at which interest or fees accrue or other amounts payable hereunder in which such participant has an interest. The Borrowers authorize each Lender to disclose to any participant or prospective participant under this Section 14.11 any financial or other information pertaining to the Borrowers, subject to Section 14.21 hereof.
Section 14.11. Participants.
provided
provided further
provided
. (a) Any Lender may at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Credit Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it); that any such assignment shall be subject to the following conditions:
Section 14.12. Assignments
provided
(i) . (A) In the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Revolving Credit Commitment and the Loans and participation interest in L/C Obligations at the time owing to it or in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, no minimum amount need be assigned; and (B) in any case not described in subsection (a)(i)(A) of this Section, the aggregate amount of the Revolving Credit Commitment (which for this purpose includes Loans and participation interest in L/C Obligations outstanding thereunder) or, if the Revolving Credit Commitment is not then in effect, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans and participation interest in L/C Obligations of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Acceptance with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if "Effective Date" is specified in the Assignment and
Minimum Amounts
 
Acceptance, as of the Effective Date) shall not be less than $5,000,000 in the case of any assignment in respect of the Revolving Credit, unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Company otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed);
(ii) . Each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement with respect to the Loan or the Revolving Credit Commitment assigned.
Proportionate Amounts
(iii) . No consent shall be required for any assignment except to the extent required by Section 14.12(a)(i)(B) and, in addition:
Required Consents
(a) the consent of the Company (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) shall be required unless (x) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such assignment or (y) such assignment is to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund; that the Company shall be deemed to have consented to any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within five (5) Business Days after having received notice thereof;
provided
(b) the consent of the Administrative Agent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for assignments if such assignment is to a Person that is not a Lender with a Commitment in respect of such facility, an Affiliate of such Lender or an Approved Fund with respect to such Lender;
(c) the consent of the L/C Issuer (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for any assignment that increases the obligation of the assignee to participate in exposure under one or more Letters of Credit (whether or not then outstanding); and
(d) the consent of the Swing Line Lender (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for any assignment that increases the obligation of the assignee to participate in exposure under one or more Swing Loans (whether or not then outstanding).
(iv) The parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Acceptance, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500, and the assignee, if it is not a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
Assignment and Acceptance.
(v) . No such assignment shall be made to the Company or any of its Affiliates or Subsidiaries.
No Assignment to Company or Affiliates
 
(vi) . No such assignment shall be made to a natural person.
No Assignment to Natural Persons
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 14.12(b) hereof, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Acceptance, the assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Acceptance, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Acceptance, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Acceptance covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto) but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 14.6 and 14.15 with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment. Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with Section 14.11 hereof.
(b) . The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at one of its offices in Chicago, Illinois, a copy of each Assignment and Acceptance delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrowers and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
"Register"
(c) Any Lender may at any time pledge or grant a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any such pledge or grant to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or grant of a security interest; that no such pledge or grant of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or secured party for such Lender as a party hereto; the right of any such pledgee or grantee (other than any Federal Reserve Bank) to further transfer all or any portion of the rights pledged or granted to it, whether by means of foreclosure or otherwise, shall be at all times subject to the terms of this Agreement.
provided
provided further, however,
(d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, if at any time the Swing Line Lender assigns all of its Revolving Credit Commitments and Loans pursuant to subsection (a) above, the Swing Line Lender may terminate the Swing Line. In the event of such termination of the Swing Line, the Company shall be entitled to appoint another Lender to act as the successor Swing Line Lender hereunder (with such Lender's consent); that the failure of the Company to appoint a successor shall not affect the resignation of the Swing Line Lender. If the Swing Line Lender terminates the Swing Line, it shall retain all of the rights of the Swing Line Lender provided hereunder with respect to Swing Loans made by it and
provided, however,
 
outstanding as of the effective date of such termination, including the right to require Lenders to make Revolving Loans or fund participations in outstanding Swing Loans pursuant to Section 2.5 hereof.
. Any provision of the Loan Documents may be amended or waived if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed by (a) the Borrowers, (b) the Required Lenders, and (c) if the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender are affected thereby, the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or the Swing Line Lender, as applicable; that:
Section 14.13. Amendments
provided
(i) no amendment or waiver pursuant to this Section 14.13 shall (A) increase the Revolving Credit Commitment of any Lender without the consent of such Lender or (B) forgive, or reduce the amount of, or postpone any fixed date for payment of, any principal of or interest on any Loan or Reimbursement Obligation or any fee payable hereunder without the consent of the Lender to which such payment is owing or which has committed to make such Loan or Letter of Credit (or participate therein) hereunder; and
(ii) no amendment or waiver pursuant to this Section 14.13 shall, unless signed by each Lender, extend the Termination Date, change any provision of Section 8, Section 10.1(a), Section 11, this Section 14.13, or the definition of Required Lenders, or release any Borrower or any Guarantor (except as set forth in Section 5.4 hereof), or affect the number of Lenders required to take any action under the Loan Documents.
. Section headings used in this Agreement are for reference only and shall not affect the construction of this Agreement.
Section 14.14. Headings
. The Borrowers agree to pay all reasonable costs and expenses of the Administrative Agent in connection with the preparation and negotiation of the Loan Documents, including without limitation, the reasonable fees and disbursements of Chapman and Cutler LLP, counsel to the Administrative Agent, in connection with the preparation and execution of the Loan Documents, and any amendment, waiver or consent related hereto, whether or not the transactions contemplated herein are consummated. The Borrowers further agree to indemnify each Lender, the L/C Issuer, the Administrative Agent, and their respective directors, officers and employees (each such Person an ) against all losses, claims, damages, penalties, judgments, liabilities and related expenses (including, without limitation, all expenses of litigation or preparation therefor, whether or not the indemnified Person is a party thereto) which any of them may incur or reasonably pay arising out of or relating to any Loan Document or any of the transactions contemplated thereby or the direct or indirect application or proposed application of the proceeds of any Loan or Letter of Credit, other than those which arise from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party claiming indemnification. The Borrowers, upon demand by the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or a Lender at any time, shall reimburse the Administrative Agent, the L/C Issuer or Lender for any reasonable legal or other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending against any of the foregoing except if the same is directly due to the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party to be indemnified. To the extent permitted by applicable law,
Section 14.15. Legal Fees, Other Costs and Indemnification
"Indemnitee"
 
no party to this Agreement shall assert, and each such Person hereby waives, any claim against any other party to this Agreement or any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or the other Loan Documents or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof. The obligations of the parties under this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
. In addition to any rights now or hereafter granted under the Loan Documents or applicable law and not by way of limitation of any such rights, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default, each Lender, the L/C Issuer and each subsequent holder of any Obligation and each of their respective Affiliates is hereby authorized by each Borrower and each Guarantor at any time or from time to time, without notice to such Borrower, such Guarantor or to any other Person, any such notice being hereby expressly waived, to set off and to appropriate and to apply any and all deposits (general or special, including, but not limited to, indebtedness evidenced by certificates of deposit, whether matured or unmatured, but not including trust accounts or premium trust accounts, and in whatever currency denominated) and any other indebtedness at any time held or owing by that Lender, the L/C Issuer or that subsequent holder or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of such Borrower or such Guarantor, whether or not matured, against and on account of the Obligations of such Borrower or such Guarantor to that Lender, the L/C Issuer or that subsequent holder or Affiliate under the Loan Documents, including, but not limited to, all claims of any nature or description arising out of or connected with the Loan Documents, irrespective of whether or not (a) that Lender, the L/C Issuer or that subsequent holder or Affiliate shall have made any demand hereunder or (b) the principal of or the interest on the Loans or Notes and other amounts due hereunder shall have become due and payable pursuant to Section 8 and although said obligations and liabilities, or any of them, may be contingent or unmatured.
Section 14.16. Set Off
. The Loan Documents constitute the entire understanding of the parties thereto with respect to the subject matter thereof and any prior or contemporaneous agreements, whether written or oral, with respect thereto are superseded thereby.
Section 14.17. Entire Agreement
. This Agreement and the other Loan Documents, and the rights and duties of the parties hereto, shall be construed and determined in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Illinois.
Section 14.18. Governing Law
. To the fullest extent permitted by law, the obligation of each Borrower and each Guarantor in respect of any amount due in U.S. Dollars or an Alternative Currency (the ) under this Agreement shall, notwithstanding any payment in any other currency (whether pursuant to a judgment or otherwise), be discharged only to the extent of the amount in the relevant currency that the Person entitled to received such payment may, in accordance with normal banking procedures, purchase with the sum paid in such other currency (after any premium and costs of exchange) on the Business Day immediately following the day on which such Person receives such payment. If the amount of the relevant currency so purchased is less than the sum originally due to such Person in the relevant currency, the relevant Borrower or Guarantor, as applicable, agrees, as a separate obligation and notwithstanding any
Section 14.19. Currency
"relevant currency"
 
such judgment, to indemnify such Person against such loss, and if the amount of the specified currency so purchased exceeds the sum of (a) the amount originally due to the relevant Person in the specified currency plus (b) any amounts shared with other Lenders as a result of allocations of such excess as a disproportionate payment to such Person under Section 14.7 hereof, such Person agrees to remit such excess to the relevant Borrower or Guarantor, as applicable.
. Each Borrower hereby submits to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the United States District Court for the Northern District of Illinois and of any Illinois State court sitting in the City of Chicago for purposes of all legal proceedings arising out of or relating to this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby. Each Borrower irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such proceeding brought in such a court and any claim that any such proceeding brought in such a court has been brought in an inconvenient forum. E B, A A, L/C I L L D .
Section 14.20. Submission to Jurisdiction; Waiver of Jury Trial
ACH
ORROWER
THE
DMINISTRATIVE
GENT
THE
SSUER
AND
EACH
ENDER
HEREBY
IRREVOCABLY
WAIVES
ANY
AND
ALL
RIGHT
TO
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
LEGAL
PROCEEDING
ARISING
OUT
OF
OR
RELATING
TO
ANY
OAN
OCUMENT
OR
THE
TRANSACTIONS
CONTEMPLATED
THEREBY
. Each Lender and the L/C Issuer that is subject to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ) hereby notifies the Borrowers that pursuant to the requirements of the Act, it is required to obtain, verify, and record information that identifies each Borrower, which information includes the name and address of each Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender or the L/C Issuer to identify each Borrower in accordance with the Act.
Section 14.21. USA Patriot Act
"Act"
. Each Lender agrees to maintain in confidence and not to disclose without the Company's consent (other than to its employees, affiliates, auditors, counsel or other professional advisors, or to another Lender, each of which shall also be bound by this Section 14.22) any information concerning the Company or any Subsidiaries furnished pursuant to this Agreement and not previously disclosed in any filing made by the Company with the SEC; that any Lender may disclose any such information (a) that has become generally available to the public, (b) if required or appropriate in any report, statement or testimony submitted to any regulatory body having or claiming to have jurisdiction over such Lender or any stock exchange on which the equity of such Lender is registered, (c) if required or appropriate in response to any summons or subpoena or in connection with any litigation, (d) in order to comply with any law, order, regulation or ruling applicable to such Lender, or (e) to any prospective or actual participant under Section 14.11 or 14.12 hereof in connection with any contemplated or actual transfer of a participating or other interest in such Lender's rights or obligations hereunder; , that (i) such actual or prospective transferee executes an agreement with such Lender containing provisions substantially identical to those contained in this Section 14.22 and (ii) in the case of any disclosure under subsection (c) above, such Lender shall (to the extent permitted by applicable law) notify the Company of such disclosure so that the Company may seek an appropriate protective order or waive such Lender's compliance with the provisions of this Section, it being understood that if the Company has no right to obtain such a protective order or if the Company does not commence procedures to obtain such a protective order within ten Business Days of the receipt of such notice, such Lender's compliance with this Section shall be deemed to have been waived with respect to such disclosure.
Section 14.22. Confidentiality
provided
provided
 
.Any provision of any Loan Document which is unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof or affecting the validity or enforceability of such provision in any other jurisdiction. All rights, remedies and powers provided in this Agreement and the other Loan Documents may be exercised only to the extent that the exercise thereof does not violate any applicable mandatory provisions of law, and all the provisions of this Agreement and other Loan Documents are intended to be subject to all applicable mandatory provisions of law which may be controlling and to be limited to the extent necessary so that they will not render this Agreement or the other Loan Documents invalid or unenforceable.
Section 14.23. Severability of Provisions
. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained herein or in any other Loan Document, no such provision shall require the payment or permit the collection of any amount of interest in excess of the maximum amount of interest permitted by applicable law to be charged for the use or detention, or the forbearance in the collection, of all or any portion of the Loans or other obligations outstanding under this Agreement or any other Loan Document (). If any Excess Interest is provided for, or is adjudicated to be provided for, herein or in any other Loan Document, then in such event (a) the provisions of this Section shall govern and control, (b) neither the Borrowers nor any guarantor or endorser shall be obligated to pay any Excess Interest, (c) any Excess Interest that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have received hereunder shall, at the option of the Administrative Agent, be (i) applied as a credit against the then outstanding principal amount of Obligations hereunder and accrued and unpaid interest thereon (not to exceed the maximum amount permitted by applicable law), (ii) refunded to the Borrowers, or (iii) any combination of the foregoing, (d) the interest rate payable hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be automatically subject to reduction to the maximum lawful contract rate allowed under applicable usury laws (the ), and this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall be deemed to have been, and shall be, reformed and modified to reflect such reduction in the relevant interest rate, and (e) neither the Borrowers nor any guarantor or endorser shall have any action against the Administrative Agent or any Lender for any damages whatsoever arising out of the payment or collection of any Excess Interest. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if for any period of time interest on any of Obligations is calculated at the Maximum Rate rather than the applicable rate under this Agreement, and thereafter such applicable rate becomes less than the Maximum Rate, the rate of interest payable on the Obligations shall remain at the Maximum Rate until the Lenders have received the amount of interest which such Lenders would have received during such period on the Obligations had the rate of interest not been limited to the Maximum Rate during such period.
Section 14.24. Excess Interest
"Excess Interest"
"Maximum Rate"
. The parties acknowledge and agree that the Loan Documents shall not be construed more favorably in favor of any party hereto based upon which party drafted the same, it being acknowledged that all parties hereto contributed substantially to the negotiation of the Loan Documents.
Section 14.25. Construction
 
. The obligations of the Lenders and L/C Issuer hereunder are several and not joint. Nothing contained in this Agreement and no action taken by the Lenders or L/C Issuer pursuant hereto shall be deemed to constitute the Lenders and L/C Issuer a partnership, association, joint venture or other entity.
Section 14.26. Lender's and L/C Issuer's Obligations Several
 
This Multicurrency Credit Agreement is entered into between us for the uses and purposes hereinabove set forth as of the date first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Attention:
Reference is made to the Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010 among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. and the other Borrowers party thereto, the Lenders named therein, and Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent (the ). Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Credit Agreement. or
"Credit Agreement"
[The Borrowers have failed to pay their Reimbursement Obligation in the amount of $. Your Lender's Percentage of the unpaid Reimbursement Obligation is $]
            
            
[The L/C Issuer has been required to return a payment by the Borrowers of a Reimbursement Obligation in the amount of $. Your Lender's Percentage of the returned Reimbursement Obligations is $.]
            
            
 
Date: ,
                    
        
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
The undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., refers to the Credit Agreement, the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined, and hereby gives you notice irrevocably, pursuant to Section 1.5 of the Credit Agreement, of the Borrowing specified below:
1. The Business Day of the proposed Borrowing is , .
                    
        
2. The aggregate amount and currency of the proposed Borrowing is .
                    
3. The Borrowing is to be comprised of of Loans.
            
[Base Rate] [Eurocurrency]
[4. The duration of the Interest Period for the Eurocurrency Loans included in the Borrowing shall be months.]
            
The undersigned hereby certifies that the following statements are true on the date hereof, and will be true on the date of the proposed Borrowing, before and after giving effect thereto and to the application of the proceeds therefrom:
(a) the representations and warranties of the Borrower contained in Section 6 of the Credit Agreement are true and correct as though made on and as of such date (except to the extent such representations and warranties relate to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such date); and
(b) no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or would result from such proposed Borrowing.
 
Date: ,
                    
        
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
The undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., refers to the Credit Agreement, the terms defined therein being used herein as therein defined, and hereby gives you notice irrevocably, pursuant to Section 1.5 of the Credit Agreement, of the of the Loans specified herein, that:
[conversion] [continuation]
1. The conversion/continuation Date is , .
                    
        
2. The aggregate amount and currency of the Loans to be is .
[converted] [continued]
                    
3. The Loans are to be Loans.
[converted into] [continued as] [Eurocurrency] [Base Rate]
4. The duration of the Interest Period for the Loans included in the shall be months.
[If applicable:]
[conversion] [continuation]
            
The undersigned hereby certifies that the following statements are true on the date hereof, and will be true on the proposed conversion/continuation date, before and after giving effect thereto and to the application of the proceeds therefrom:
(a) the representations and warranties of the Borrower contained in Section 6 of the Credit Agreement are true and correct as though made on and as of such date (except to the extent such representations and warranties relate to an earlier date, in which case they are true and correct as of such date); that this condition shall not apply to the conversion of an outstanding Eurodollar Loan to a Base Rate Loan; and
provided, however,
(b) no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, or would result from such proposed .
[conversion] [continuation]
 
,
                    
        
F V R, each of the undersigned (collectively, the ), promises to pay to the order of (the ) on the Termination Date of the hereinafter defined Credit Agreement, at the principal office of Bank of Montreal, in Chicago, Illinois, (or in the case of Eurocurrency Loans denominated in an Alternative Currency, at such office as the Administrative Agent has previously notified the Company) in the currency of such Loan in accordance with Section 4.2 of the Credit Agreement, the aggregate unpaid principal amount of all Revolving Loans made by the Lender to the Borrower pursuant to the Credit Agreement, together with interest on the principal amount of each Revolving Loan from time to time outstanding hereunder at the rates, and payable in the manner and on the dates, specified in the Credit Agreement.
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Borrowers"
                    
"Lender"
The Lender shall record on its books or records or on a schedule attached to this Note, which is a part hereof, each Revolving Loan made by it pursuant to the Credit Agreement, together with all payments of principal and interest and the principal balances from time to time outstanding hereon, whether the Revolving Loan is a Base Rate Loan or a Eurocurrency Loan, the currency thereof and the interest rate and Interest Period applicable thereto, that prior to the transfer of this Note all such amounts shall be recorded on a schedule attached to this Note. The record thereof, whether shown on such books or records or on a schedule to this Note, shall be evidence of the same, that the failure of the Lender to record any of the foregoing or any error in any such record shall not limit or otherwise affect the obligation of the Borrowers to repay all Revolving Loans made to it pursuant to the Credit Agreement together with accrued interest thereon.
provided
prima facie
provided, however,
This Note is one of the Notes referred to in the Amended and Restated Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of July 15, 2010, among the Borrowers, Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent, and the lenders from time to time party thereto (said Multicurrency Credit Agreement, as amended, modified or restated from time to time, being referred to herein as the ), and this Note and the holder hereof are entitled to all the benefits provided for thereby or referred to therein, to which Credit Agreement reference is hereby made for a statement thereof. All defined terms used in this Note, except terms otherwise defined herein, shall have the same meaning as in the Credit Agreement.
"Credit Agreement"
Prepayments may be made hereon and this Note may be declared due prior to the expressed maturity hereof, all in the events, on the terms and in the manner as provided for in the Credit Agreement.
This Note shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of Illinois.
The Borrowers hereby jointly and severally promise to pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees) suffered or incurred by the holder hereof in collecting this Note or enforcing any rights in any collateral therefor, all as more particularly provided in the Credit Agreement. The Borrowers hereby waive demand, presentment, protest or notice of any kind hereunder except as expressly provided in the Credit Agreement.
 
 
 
On the Termination Date, for value received, each of the undersigned (collectively, the ), promises to pay to the order of (the ), at the principal office of Bank of Montreal in Chicago, Illinois, the principal sum of (i)  and 00/100 Dollars ($), or (ii) such lesser amount as may at the time of the maturity hereof, whether by acceleration or otherwise, be the aggregate unpaid principal amount of all Swing Loans owing from the Borrowers to the Lender pursuant to the Credit Agreement hereinafter mentioned.
"Borrowers"
                    
"Lender"
            
            
This Note evidences Swing Loans made and to be made to the Borrowers by the Lender pursuant to that certain Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of July 15, 2010 among the Borrowers, Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent, and the lenders from time to time party thereto (said Amended and Restated Multicurrency Credit Agreement, as amended, modified or restated from time to time, being referred to herein as the ), and the Borrowers hereby jointly and severally promise to pay interest at the office specified above on each Swing Loan evidenced hereby at the rates and times specified therefor in the Credit Agreement.
"Credit Agreement"
Each Swing Loan made by the Lender to the Borrowers against this Note, any repayment of principal hereon and the interest rates applicable thereto shall be endorsed by the holder hereof on the reverse side of this Note or recorded on the books and records of the holder hereof (that such entries shall be endorsed on the reverse side hereof prior to any negotiation hereof) and the Borrowers agree that in any action or proceeding instituted to collect or enforce collection of this Note, the entries so endorsed on the reverse side hereof or recorded on the books and records of the Lender shall be evidence of the unpaid balance of this Note and the interest rates applicable thereto.
provided
prima facie
This Note is issued by the Borrowers under the terms and provisions of the Credit Agreement, and this Note and the holder hereof are entitled to all of the benefits and security provided for thereby or referred to therein, to which reference is hereby made for a statement thereof. This Note may be declared to be, or be and become, due prior to its expressed maturity as specified in the Credit Agreement, and certain prepayments are required to be made hereon, all in the events, on the terms and with the effects provided in the Credit Agreement. All capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the same meaning herein as such terms have in the Credit Agreement.
This Note shall be construed in accordance with, and governed by, the internal laws of the State of Illinois without regard to principles of conflict of law.
The Borrowers hereby jointly and severally promise to pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees) suffered or incurred by the holder hereof in collecting this Note or enforcing any rights in any collateral therefor, all as more particularly provided in the Credit Agreement. The Borrowers hereby waive demand, presentment, protest or notice of any kind hereunder except as expressly provided in the Credit Agreement.
 
 
Bank of Montreal,
as Administrative Agent (the )
"Administrative Agent"
for the Lenders referred to below
115 South LaSalle Street
Chicago, Illinois 60603
Attention: Agency Services
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In accordance with the Credit Agreement, the Company, on behalf of the Borrowers, hereby requests that the Administrative Agent consent to an increase in the aggregate Revolving Credit Commitments (the ), in accordance with Section 3.8 of the Credit Agreement, to be effected by . Capitalized terms used herein without definition shall have the same meanings herein as such terms have in the Credit Agreement.
"Commitment Amount Increase"
[an increase in the Revolving Credit Commitment of [name of existing Lender(s)] [and] [the addition of [each of] [name of each new Lender] (the [each a]
"New Lender"
) as a Lender under the terms of the Credit Agreement]
After giving effect to such Commitment Amount Increase, the Revolving Credit Commitment of the shall be
[Lender(s)] [New Lenders]
[$.] [as follows:
            
 
1. The New Lender hereby confirms that it has received a copy of the Loan Documents and the exhibits related thereto, together with copies of the documents which were required to be delivered under the Credit Agreement as a condition to the making of the Loans and other extensions of credit thereunder. The New Lender acknowledges and agrees that it has made and will continue to make, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, its own credit analysis and decisions relating to the Credit Agreement. The New Lender further acknowledges and agrees that the Administrative Agent has not made any representations or warranties about the creditworthiness of the Borrowers or any other party to the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or with respect to the legality, validity, sufficiency or enforceability of the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or the value of any security therefor.
[Each]
[Each]
2. Except as otherwise provided in the Credit Agreement, effective as of the date of acceptance hereof by the Administrative Agent, the New Lender (i) shall be deemed automatically to have become a party to the Credit Agreement and have all the rights and obligations of a under the Credit Agreement as if it were an original signatory thereto and (ii) agrees to be bound by the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement as if it were an original signatory thereto.
[each]
"Lender"
3. The New Lender hereby advises you that administrative details with respect to its Loans and Revolving Credit Commitments are set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
[Each]
[4. The [Each] New Lender has delivered, if appropriate, to the Company and the Administrative Agent (or is delivering to the Company and the Administrative Agent concurrently herewith) the tax forms referred to in Section 4.1 of the Credit Agreement.]*
T A , , S I.
HIS
GREEMENT
SHALL
BE
DEEMED
TO
BE
A
CONTRACTUAL
OBLIGATION
UNDER
AND
SHALL
BE
GOVERNED
BY
AND
CONSTRUED
IN
ACCORDANCE
WITH
THE
LAWS
OF
THE
TATE
OF
LLINOIS
The Commitment Amount Increase shall be effective when the executed consent of the Administrative Agent is received or otherwise in accordance with Section 3.8, of the Credit Agreement, but not in any case prior to , . It shall be a condition to the effectiveness of the Commitment Amount Increase that all expenses referred to in Section 3.8 of the Credit Agreement shall have been paid.
                    
        
The Company hereby certifies that no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
 
 
Please indicate the Administrative Agent's consent to such Commitment Amount Increase by signing the enclosed copy of this letter in the space provided below.
 
The undersigned hereby consents
on this day of ,
    
                    
to the above-requested Commitment
        
Amount Increase.
 
 
This Compliance Certificate is furnished to Bank of Montreal as Administrative Agent pursuant to the Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010 among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the ) and the other Borrowers party thereto (collectively with the Company, the ), the Lenders signatory thereto and Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent (the ). Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
"Company"
"Borrowers"
"Credit Agreement"
T :
HE
UNDERSIGNED
HEREBY
CERTIFIES
THAT
1. I am the duly elected of the Company;
                                        
2. I have reviewed the terms of the Credit Agreement and I have made, or have caused to be made under my supervision, a detailed review of the financial condition of the Company and its Subsidiaries during the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements;
3. The examinations described in paragraph 2 did not disclose, and I have no knowledge of, the existence of any condition or the occurrence of any event which constitutes a Default or Event of Default during or at the end of the accounting period covered by the attached financial statements or as of the date of this Certificate, except as set forth below;
4. The financial statements required by Section 9.4 of the Credit Agreement and being furnished to you concurrently with this certificate are, to the best of my knowledge, fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the dates and for the periods covered thereby; and
5. The Attachment hereto sets forth financial data and computations evidencing the Borrowers' compliance with certain covenants of the Credit Agreement, all of which data and computations are, to the best of my knowledge, true, complete and correct and have been made in accordance with the relevant Sections of the Credit Agreement.
6. During the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Company, no Subsidiary became a direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiary .
[except for ]
                    
Described below are the exceptions, if any, to paragraph 3 by listing, in detail, the nature of the condition or event, the period during which it has existed and the action which the Borrowers have taken, are taking, or proposes to take with respect to each such condition or event:
 
The foregoing certifications, together with the computations set forth in the Attachment hereto and the financial statements delivered with this Certificate in support hereof, are made and delivered this day of 20.
            
            
    
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Reference is made to the Multicurrency Credit Agreement dated as of July 15, 2010 (as extended, renewed, amended or restated from time to time, the ) among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the ) and the other Borrowers party thereto (collectively with the Company, the ), the Lenders and Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent for the Lenders. Terms defined in the Credit Agreement are used herein with the same meaning.
"Credit Agreement"
"Company"
"Borrowers"
(the ) and (the ) agree as follows:
                                         
"Assignor"
                                        
"Assignee"
1. The Assignor hereby sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby purchases and assumes from the Assignor, the amount and specified percentage interest as shown on Schedule I hereto of the Assignor's rights and obligations under the Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date (as defined below), including, without limitation, the Assignor's Revolving Credit Commitment as in effect on the Effective Date and the Revolving Loans, if any, owing to the Assignor on the Effective Date and the Assignor's Percentage of any outstanding L/C Obligations and Swing Loans, if any.
2. The Assignor (i) represents and warrants that it is the legal and beneficial owner of the interest being assigned by it hereunder and that such interest is free and clear of any adverse claim, lien, or encumbrance of any kind; (ii) makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Credit Agreement or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto; and (iii) makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to the financial condition of the Borrowers or any Subsidiary or the performance or observance by the Borrowers or any Subsidiary of any of their respective obligations under the Credit Agreement or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto.
3. The Assignee (i) confirms that it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered to the Lenders pursuant to Section 9.4(a) and Section 9.4(b) thereof and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Acceptance; (ii) agrees that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Credit Agreement; (iii) appoints and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such action as Administrative Agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents as are delegated to the
Administrative Agent by the terms thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto; (iv) agrees that it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Credit Agreement are required to be performed by it as a Lender; and (v) specifies as its lending offices (and address for notices) the offices set forth on its Administrative Questionnaire.
4. As consideration for the assignment and sale contemplated in Section 1 hereof, the Assignee shall pay to the Assignor on the Effective Date in Federal funds the amount agreed upon between them. It is understood that commitment and/or Letter of Credit fees accrued to the date hereof with respect to the interest assigned hereby are for the account of the Assignor and such fees accruing from and including the date hereof are for the account of the Assignee. Each of the Assignor and the Assignee hereby agrees that if it receives any amount under the Credit Agreement which is for the account of the other party hereto, it shall receive the same for the account of such other party to the extent of such other party's interest therein and shall promptly pay the same to such other party.
5. The effective date for this Assignment and Acceptance shall be , 20 (the ). Following the execution of this Assignment and Acceptance, it will be delivered to the Company for its acceptance, to the extent required by the Credit Agreement, and to the Administrative Agent for acceptance and recording by the Administrative Agent.
                    
        
"Effective Date"
6. Upon such acceptance and recording, as of the Effective Date, (i) the Assignee shall be a party to the Credit Agreement and, to the extent provided in this Assignment and Acceptance, have the rights and obligations of a Lender thereunder and (ii) the Assignor shall, to the extent provided in this Assignment and Acceptance, relinquish its rights and be released from its obligations under the Credit Agreement.
7. Upon such acceptance and recording, from and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments under the Credit Agreement in respect of the interest assigned hereby (including, without limitation, all payments of principal, interest and commitment fees with respect thereto) to the Assignee. The Assignor and Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments under the Credit Agreement for periods prior to the Effective Date directly between themselves.
8. In accordance with Section 14.12 of the Credit Agreement, the Assignor and the Assignee request and direct that the Administrative Agent prepare and cause the Borrowers to execute and deliver to the Assignee a Revolving Credit Note payable to the Assignee in the amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment and to the Assignor a new Revolving Credit Note in the amount of its Revolving Credit Commitment, in each case, after giving effect to this assignment.
9. This Assignment and Acceptance shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of Illinois.
 
Accepted and consented this
day of , 
        
                    
        
 
Accepted and consented to this
day of , 
        
                    
        
 
 
The Assignee hereby purchases and assumes from the Assignor the following interest in and to all of the Assignor's rights and obligations under the Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date:
 
, 20
                    
    
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement described above. Terms not defined herein which are defined in the Credit Agreement shall have for the purposes hereof the meaning provided therein.
The undersigned, , a hereby elects to be a for all purposes of the Credit Agreement, effective from the date hereof. The undersigned confirms that the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 of the Credit Agreement are true and correct in all material respects as and to the extent that they apply to the undersigned as of the date hereof and the undersigned shall comply with each of the covenants set forth in Section 9 of the Credit Agreement applicable to it.
[name of new Borrower]
[jurisdiction of incorporation or organization]
"Borrower"
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the undersigned hereby agrees to perform all the obligations of a Borrower under, and to be bound in all respects by the terms of, the Credit Agreement, including without limitation Section 13.A. thereof, to the same extent and with the same force and effect as if the undersigned were a signatory party thereto.
The undersigned acknowledges that this Agreement shall be effective upon its execution and delivery to the Administrative Agent, and it shall not be necessary for the Administrative Agent or any Lender to execute this Agreement or any other acceptance hereof. This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the internal laws of the State of Illinois.
 
, 20
                    
    
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement described above. Terms not defined herein which are defined in the Credit Agreement shall have for the purposes hereof the meaning provided therein.
The undersigned, , a hereby elects to be a for all purposes of the Credit Agreement, effective from the date hereof. The undersigned confirms that the representations and warranties set forth in Section 7 of the Credit Agreement are true and correct in all material respects as and to the extent that they apply to the undersigned as of the date hereof and the undersigned shall comply with each of the covenants set forth in Section 9 of the Credit Agreement applicable to it.
[name of Subsidiary Guarantor]
[jurisdiction of incorporation or organization]
"Guarantor"
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the undersigned hereby agrees to perform all the obligations of a Guarantor under, and to be bound in all respects by the terms of, the Credit Agreement, including without limitation Section 13.B thereof, to the same extent and with the same force and effect as if the undersigned were a signatory party thereto.
The undersigned acknowledges that this Agreement shall be effective upon its execution and delivery to the Administrative Agent, and it shall not be necessary for the Administrative Agent or any Lender to execute this Agreement or any other acceptance hereof. This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the internal laws of the State of Illinois.
Very truly yours,
 
 
 
Those companies which are indented represent Subsidiaries of the entity under which they are indented. Except for directors' qualifying shares, 100% of the Voting Stock of each of the Subsidiaries listed below, other than those indicated by footnote, is owned of record or beneficially by its indicated parent. Direct Material Wholly-Owned Domestic Subsidiaries appear in bold face type.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100727170937.txt.gz
TIME:20100727170937
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 27, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's financial results for the three-month and six-month periods ended June 30, 2010. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, July 27, 2010  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2010. A printer-friendly format of this release and the supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended June 30
 
Six Months Ended June 30
 
"We continue to operate in one of the most difficult economic environments in Gallagher's history," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Client exposures are declining in this economy and the insurance marketplace softened even further in the quarter. Even in this environment, we are providing great guidance and service to our clients around the world and we remain focused on growing our company."
 
This press release contains certain information not prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), including the financial measures entitled EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues. Definitions and purposes of such non-GAAP measures are included on page 6 of this press release. Reconciliations to the most directly comparable GAAP measure are also included in this press release for EBITDAC (on page 8) and Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
Corporate Segment Second Quarter Highlights
The Corporate Segment reports the financial information related to Gallagher's debt, clean-energy ventures, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs:
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Second Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were preparing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for second quarter was 34.4% in 2010 and 40.9% in 2009. The decrease in the second quarter 2010 effective tax rate compared to the same period in 2009 was primarily the result of the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits that are expected to be generated throughout 2010.
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 28, 2010 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT to discuss its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2010. To listen to the call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy facilities and statements regarding anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking statements are based on Gallagher's current expectations and assumptions regarding its business, the economy and other future conditions. Because forward-looking statements relate to the future, they are subject to inherent uncertainties, risks and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance.
Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following: changes in worldwide and national economic conditions; changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally; changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape; changes in Gallagher's accounting estimates and assumptions; uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits; Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating facilities; other regulatory uncertainties such as potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45; uncertainties surrounding utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity; operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 facilities; business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners; intellectual property risks; environmental risks; and the other factors that are described in Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.
 
Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the amounts reported in the press release related to prior year amounts in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
. Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin are meant to reflect the true operating performance of Gallagher's business; consequently, they exclude items that could be considered "non-operating" or "non-core" in nature.
EBITDAC Measures
 
 
 
. Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and foreign currency translation.
Organic Revenues
This press release includes a tabular reconciliation of EBITDAC (on page 8) and Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments) to GAAP earnings from continuing operations, which Gallagher believes to be the most directly comparable GAAP financial measure.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 9 of 10.
 
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 9 of 10.
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2010 Earnings Release
Non-GAAP Financial Measures (See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 6 of 10 above)
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
To assist in comparing 2010 to 2009, the supplemental commission timing line in the tables on pages 2 of 10 and 3 of 10 of this earnings release adjusts the 2009 revenue and EBITDAC amounts as if Gallagher had been receiving the information from the carriers and recognizing the quarterly supplemental commissions in 2009 on the same basis as it is in 2010. In order to estimate the quarterly information for 2009 and 2008 as if it would have been reported by the carriers, Gallagher allocated the annual amounts received from the carriers after the contract period to each quarter in the annual period on a straight-line pro rata basis. The adjusted supplemental commission amounts for 2009 and 2008 would change if different allocation methods were used.
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2010 Earnings Release (continued)
 
 
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
Investor Relations - 630-285-3501
marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20100908101909.txt.gz
TIME:20100908101909
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
Certain materials about Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) to be presented at investor conferences, consisting of presentation slides and an investment profile, are attached to this report as Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2. Gallagher is furnishing these exhibits pursuant to Regulation FD under Item 7.01. These exhibits may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com).
These exhibits contain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of these measures to the most comparable GAAP measures is also available on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
Investment Presentation
August 2010
Presented by:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
Chairman, President and CEO
Douglas K. Howell CFO
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This investment presentation contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment presentation, the words "anticipates," "expects," "believes," "should," could," "estimates," "intends," "plans" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this investment presentation include, but are not limited to, statements related to anticipated opportunities for revenue growth within the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments, expected uses of cash (including expected annual dividend payouts), Gallagher's acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, the success of growth initiatives including cross-selling, technology and offshoring initiatives, cost containment efforts, expected levels of contingent commissions, future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy facilities, and future trends in the insurance and insurance brokerage industries. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, and changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape could impact Gallagher's future revenue growth, the amount of contingent commission received, its acquisition program, its dividend program, the success of growth and cost containment initiatives and trends in the insurance and insurance brokerage industries; and
uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including uncertainties related to (i) receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits, (ii) Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating facilities, (iii) potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45, (iv) utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity, (v) operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 facilities, (vi) business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners, (vii) intellectual property risks and (viii) environmental risks, could impact Gallagher's future income and tax credits generated by its clean-energy facilities.
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
This presentation contains information regarding EBITDAC, a non-GAAP measure. Gallagher defines this measure as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. Gallagher's management believes that EBITDAC provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance on an ongoing basis. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. This non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided.
As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided a reconciliation of EBITDAC to the most comparable GAAP measure on its Web site at www.ajg.com and in its quarterly earnings releases.
 
Who is Arthur J. Gallagher & Co?
 - Among the world's 5 largest insurance brokers* Retail & Wholesale  88% U.S., 12% International
 - Predominate focus on middle-market space
 - Global capabilities
 - Largest Managing General Agent*
 - Benefits Division received Reader's Choice Silver Circle Award*
 - One of the fastest growing Lloyd's brokers
 - Largest property/casualty third-party administrator*
Adjusting WC, liability & property claims/BPO
83% U.S., 17% International
2009  Business Insurance Readers Choice Award for 2nd yr
 - Simple business model: we sell insurance and adjust claims
 - No underwriting risk
*According to Business Insurance magazine
 
Who We Are  Two Core Businesses
2009 Revenues  $1.7 billion
Brokerage Segment 74%
Risk Management Segment 26%
2009 EBITDAC  $341 million
Brokerage 82%
Risk Management 18%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
 
Brokerage Segment
2009 Revenues  $1.3 billion
Wholesale 19% Mostly U.S. and U.K.
Retail-P/C 55% Mostly U.S. and Canada
Retail-Benefits 26% U.S. and U.K.
 
Brokerage Segment Revenues From Continuing Operations
$1,500 $1,250 $1,000 $750 $500 $250
8% CAGR
$1,276 $1,188 $1,114 $1,007 $946
1st Half $651
2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010
 
Brokerage Segment EBITDAC
$325 $275 $225 $175 $125 $75
6% CAGR
$280
$228 $233 $207 $193
1st Half $143
2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
 
Brokerage Segment Focus
 - Drive top-line growth
Domestic International
 - Cost containment
 - Stay in sweet spot
Middle to upper commercial market Over 85% is niche-driven
9
 
Brokerage Segment Differentiators
 - Primarily middle-market focused Main competitors are regional brokers Greater capabilities
 - Expertise
 - Wider scope of coverages  - International  - Claims
Access to markets
 - Team-oriented sales culture
10
 
Growth  Domestic
 - Internal revenue drivers
Cross-selling and new sales initiatives
 - Retail P/C, Benefits, Wholesale, Intl  - SalesForce.com  - Single agency system  - Cross-selling 2010retail  - Sales goal 2010
Niche expertise
Recruiting new producers and sales teams Growing our own producers through  - Two-year college internship program  - Mentoring/training program for new producers Carrier compensation
11
 
Growth  International
 - Strong growth
 - Organic
Substantial London and Australia operations
Hire experienced sales teams
We can now handle about any type of business
 - Opportunistic acquisitions/minority interests
FirstCity  London
Securitas  Brazil
SBA  Australia  now own 100%
CGM Gallagher  Caribbean  own 38.5%
 - Gallagher Optimus Network
Correspondent brokers and agents in more than 100 countries
Stages of partnership to investment
12
 
Growth  Acquisitions
 - Acquisitions
18,000 retail and wholesale brokerages and agencies* just in the U.S. (P&C, Benefits and Wholesale)
 - Owned by baby boomers who need an exit strategy yet still want to be in the business  - Need depth of capabilities to grow to the next level
Small number of consolidators
*According to Hales & Co, Inc.
13
 
Growth by Acquisition
 - Approx. 245 deals since 1985
 - Typical deal:
$2 to $10 million in revenues
EBITDAC margins between 25%30%
2008  paid 6.3x EBITDAC
2009  paid 5.8x EBITDAC 1H
2010  paid 6.0x EBITDAC
 - Must fit into our sales culture!
8.0
7.5
7.0
6.5
6.0
5.5
5.0
4.5
2006 2007 2008 2009 1H 2010
Median EBITDAC Multiples
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
EBITDAC multiples are based on the initial recorded purchase price, which includes the estimated fair value of earnout payable starting in 2009
14
 
Current Gallagher U.S. Locations
WA
MT ME ND
OR MN
VT NH
ID MA SD WI NY
WY MI RI IA CT
PA
NE NJ NV OH
UT DE CO IL
IN WV MD KS VA
CA MO KY
NC OK TN
AR AZ NM
SC MS
AL GA
TX LA
FL
AK
HI
15
 
Larger cities where we aren't located
Source for Acquisition Targets: Hales & Co., Inc. and D&B
WA 188
MT ME ND
27 42 24 OR MN
124 208 VT NH
ID 15 62 MA SD NY
39 WI MI 352 WY 35 882
9 228 364
CA RI IA CT 56 1,214 PA
NE 152 188 IN 517 NJ
NV 92 OH
UT 222 DE 446
67 IL 461
72 524 32 CO WV
137 KS 52 VA MD MO 211 122 187 DC
209 KY
20 AZ 137 NC
155 TN 282 OK AR
216 118 77
NM SC
52 MS 123 GA
88
AL 306 140 TX LA
724 145
FL 713
AK 19
HI Puerto Rico 31 27 Virgin Islands 2
16
 
Gallagher Optimus Network
17
 
Risk Management Segment
2009 Revenues  $453 million
2009 EBITDAC  $61 million
Workers
Compensation 69%
Property 4% Liability 27%
Domestic 85%
International 15%
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
18
 
Risk Management Segment Revenues From Continuing Operations
$525 $450 $375 $300 $225 $150 $75
6% CAGR
$465 $453 $444 $401 $371
1st Half $222
2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010
19
 
Risk Management Segment EBITDAC
$120 $100 $80 $60 $40 $20 $0
2006 2007 2008 2009 2010
$76 $66
$58 $61
1st Half $35
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
20
 
Risk Management Segment  Focus
 - New leadership  Scott Hudson
 - Growth
Domestic
International
 - Client service
Highest quality standards
Technology
 - Cost containment
21
 
RM Growth  Domestic
 - All organic
 - Over 84% non-Gallagher clients
 - Targeting
Mainly Fortune 1000 companies
Standard platform enables profitable service to smaller accounts
 - Differentiation
Network focused or dedicated  flexibility
Client intimacy
Quality standards
Proprietary technology
National workers compensation capability
22
 
RM Growth  International
 - Strong growth
Revenues  5-year CAGR of 12.4%
 - Australia, Canada, U.K. & New Zealand
 - Largely public entity but leveraging U.S. expertise to access commercial clients
 - Global technology capabilities
 - Standard claims process
23
 
Risk Management Locations
AK SCOTLAND
ONTARIO
ENGLAND WA
MT ME ND
OR MN VT NH
ID MA SD WI NY
W MI
Y CT RI NE IA PA NJ
NV D UT OH
IL E IN W M
CO
HI KS M V VA D CA O
KY
NC TN
AZ OK
N AR
M SC MS AL GA
AUSTRALIA
TX LA
FL
NEW ZEALAND
24
 
Corporate Segment
 - Interest expense on debt  $8.9m/qrtr
 - Corporate operating expense  $1m/qrtr
 - Clean-Energy Facilities  potential of $6m to $10m net earnings in 2010 while operating under temporary regulatory permits and up to $40m/yr net earnings from 2011 through 2019
Combination of pretax income and tax credits under IRC Section 45
Full benefits require permanent regulatory permits and satisfying other operating conditions
25
 
Business Generates Cash
(In millions)
Cash Generation* EBITDAC
$350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010
1st Half
- Dividend
*See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3 and see Exhibit 1
26
 
Uses of Cash
 - Return cash to stockholders
Pay dividends  $1.28/share and 5.2%* yield
Repurchase shares but currently favor dividends
 - Buy brokers
Mix of cash and/or stock
Currently 75% stock/25% cash
 - Neither segment needs substantial capital or cap-ex
*At August 31, 2010
27
 
Prudent Balance Sheet
Global
Insurance
Gallagher Broker Avg. S&P 1000
($ millions) 2009 2009 2009
Total Debt $550
Stockholders' Equity $893
Debt to Total Capital (Debt/(Debt + Equity)) 38% 39% 41%
Debt to EBITDAC* 1.6x 2.0x 3.6x
Including Unfunded Pension Liability
Debt to Total Capital 39% 45% 42%
Debt to EBITDAC* 1.7x 2.6x 3.8x
Source for S&P 1000: Thomson Reuters Spreadsheet Link. Unfunded pension liabilities available on an annual basis only and may not reflect 2009 amounts in all cases.
*Global Insurance Brokers' EBITDAC adjusted for restructuring charges & unusual items
Flexibility Remains  $500m available line of credit capacity that expires July 14, 2014
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
28
 
COMPANY RECAP
29
 
Continue to Grow Revenues*
$2,000 $1,700 $1,400 $1,100 $800 $500
7% CAGR
$1,729 $1,653 $1,558 $1,408 $1,316
1st Half $873
2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010
*Brokerage & Risk Management Revenues
30
 
Continue to Grow EBITDAC*
$450 $400 $350 $300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50 $0
4% CAGR
$341 $304 $291 $266 $273
1st Half $178
2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010
*Brokerage & Risk Management EBITDAC
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3
31
 
Mid-2010 Update
 - M&A
Slow start 1st half 2010 domestically, but activity increasing
Good 1st half internationally
 - Announced FirstCity acquisition in London  $30m revenues
 - Strong presence in Fin/Pro coverage
 - Acquired remaining 60% of SBA in Australia
 - New energy team  London/Brazil/Houston
 - Replace expiring line of credit with new $500m LOC
 - Started generating cash with clean-energy ventures
Sold portion of six facilities
Looking for partners in remaining two facilities
32
 
Environmental Challenges Continue
 - Global economic weakness
Reduced payrolls, exposure units and claim counts
Lag effect of brokerage renewals
 - P/C market pricing issues
2nd Q average price declines of 6% to 7%
Carrier competition continues especially on new business
 - Lower investment yields
33
 
Looking Forward
 - Organic revenue
Cross-selling
Clients need added capabilities  - Complexity of business risks  - Healthcare reform
Carrier compensation
 - M&A revenue
Full pipeline
 - Improve productivity
Technology
Offshoring initiatives
 - Control costs
 - Harvest cash from clean energy efforts
 - Maintain culture
34
 
Questions & Answers
35
 
Exhibit 1
Short-cut To Understanding Cash Generation
(See GAAP cash flows in Statement of Cash Flows)
$ millions 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 1H 2010
Brokerage & Risk Management EBITDAC $ 213 $ 273 $ 304 $ 291 $ 340 $ 178
Stock compensation expense 16 25 19 18 16 7
Capital expenditures (23) (33) (41) (32) (24) (13)
Interest expense on corporate debt & corporate overhead expenses (6) (6) (22) (35) (35) (20)
Taxes paid (47) (31) (48) (40) (28) (13)
Cash Generation $ 153 $ 228 $ 212 $ 202 $ 268 $ 139
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on page 3
36
 
For Additional Information
 - Website: www.ajg.com
 - Email: investor_relations@ajg.com
 - Marsha Akin Marsha_Akin@ajg.com
 - Phone: 630-285-3501
37

Exhibit 99.2
Brokerage Segment
Risk Management Segment
Corporate Segment
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and the world's largest third-party property/casualty (P/C) claims administrator.
* Gallagher generates approximately 88% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 12% derived primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada, New Zealand and the United Kingdom.
* According to Business Insurance.
AUGUST 2010
Brokerage Segment 2
Brokerage Acquisition Strategy 4
Risk Management Segment 4 Corporate Segment 5
Insurance Market Overview 6 Condensed Financial Information 7
Why Invest? 8
www.ajg.com
NYSE: AJG
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
GALLAGHER STOCK PERFORMANCE
TOTAL RETURNS JANUARY 1, 2008 - AUGUST 31, 2010
20%
10%
0%
-10%
-20%
-30%
-40%
-50%
AJG
17.7%
S&P 500
-24.0%
Mar.-08 Jun.-08 Sept.-08 Dec.-08 Mar.-08 Jun.-09 Sept.-09 Dec.-09 Mar.-10 Jun-10
Source for data: Bloomberg
AJG
S&P 500
Total Returns assume dividend reinvestment
As of June 30, 2010 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price
52-week high/low
Trailing 12-mos. revenues
Market cap
Indicated annual dividend*
Yield
Shares outstanding
End of fiscal year
Number of employees
$24.38
$27.00 - $20.20
$1.8 billion
$2.6 billion
$1.28*
5.3%
105.2 million
December 31
10,034
* On July 22, 2010, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.32 per share third quarter dividend.
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 74% OF 2009 REVENUES
Gallagher operates its Brokerage operations through a network of more than 200 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 14 countries abroad. In addition, Gallagher has developed the Gallagher Optimus Network of independent insurance brokers and consultants that enables it to provide coverage and services to its clients in more than 100 countries around the world.
RETAIL INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
81% OF 2009 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property/casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Lines of Coverage
Aviation
Casualty
Commercial Auto
Dental
Directors & Officers Liability
Disability
Earthquake
Errors & Omissions
Fire
General Liability
Life
Marine
Medical
Product Liability
Professional Liability
Property
Retirement Solutions
Voluntary Benefits
Wind
Workers Compensation
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into approximately 180 geographic profit centers located primarily throughout United States, Canada, United Kingdom, Bermuda and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 65% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
Gallagher's specialized focus on these niche/practice groups allows for highly-focused marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; cross-selling new brokerage products and services to existing customers; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
2 INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2010
Niche/Practice Groups
Agribusiness
Aviation & Aerospace
Captive Consulting
Construction
Cyber Risk
Energy
Entertainment
Global Risks
Habitational
Healthcare
Higher Education
Hospitality
Institutional Services
Marine
Manufacturing
Personal
Professional Groups
Private Equity
Public Entity
Real Estate
Religious/Not-for-Profit
Restaurant
Scholastic
Technology/Telecom
Transportation
WHOLESALE INSURANCE BROKERAGE OPERATIONS
19% OF 2009 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Wholesale revenues are generated from sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurance carrier.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into more than 60 geographic profit centers located primarily in the United States and Bermuda, and through its approved Lloyd's of London broker. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent, distributing specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
More than 80% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents who are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency, according to Business Insurance magazine.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of broker clients, by developing new managing general agency programs, and through mergers and acquisitions.
Gallagher Optimus Network
The Gallagher Optimus Network is a global alliance of independent broker partners. Optimus Network partners are selected by Gallagher based upon common business philosophies and the partners' strengths and service capabilities within their respective countries. Through the Gallagher Optimus Network and its own international operations, Gallagher offers client-service capabilities in more than 100 countries around the world.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2010 3
Brokerage Segment Acquisition Strategy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components: organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated approximately 245 acquisitions from 1985 through June 2010, substantially all within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that generate between $2 million and $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through acquisitions and joint ventures, where the company begins its relationship with an equity position.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on:
a company culture that matches its own
a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources
clearly defined financial criteria.
Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Gallagher believes that growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 26% OF 2009 REVENUES
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims-handling services.
Expertise
Real-time Claims Management
Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)
Appraisal Services
Litigation Management
Information Management
Managed Care Services
Risk Control Services
Safety Programs
Settlement Management
Education & Training
4 INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2010
Approximately 69% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-related claims, 27% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims, and 4% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance, on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the United States, the United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 84% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments.
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Gallagher's debt, clean-energy ventures, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs are reported in this segment.
With respect to the clean-energy ventures, Gallagher owns positions in various commercial facilities that help several coal-fired utilities eliminate large quantities of potentially harmful emissions.
Gallagher owns minority positions in six of these facilities, which are currently operating under temporary regulatory operating permits. Related to these ventures, Gallagher recognizes earnings from a combination of its minority share of the ventures' operating earnings and income tax credits under Section 45 of the Internal Revenue Code (IRC Section 45). Throughout 2010, these ventures will seek to optimize the facilities' operations and meet the requirements to obtain necessary permanent regulatory operating permits. These six facilities currently in operation could generate net earnings for Gallagher of $5 million to $7 million for the remainder of 2010.
Gallagher also owns majority positions in two similar facilities, which as planned, did not operate in second quarter while Gallagher seeks operating sites and co-investors for these facilities.
If all eight facilities are operating, Gallagher's clean-energy ventures could potentially earn up to $10 million of quarterly net earnings from 2011 through 2019, from a combination of pretax income and tax credits under IRC Section 45. Gallagher can make no assurances regarding the number of such facilities that will be in operation in a particular period.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2010 5
INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW
Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factors  including competition for market share among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidations  can result in flat or reduced premium rates (a "soft" market). A soft market tends to put downward pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as heavier-than-anticipated loss experience or capital shortages, can result in increases in premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas.
From 2004 through June 2010, the P/C market has been soft in most lines and geographic areas. A quarterly market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers in the second quarter of 2010 indicated that the level of rate reductions for commercial business averaged 6.4%, year-over-year, compared with a 5.3% year-over-year decline in the first quarter of 2010.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This investment profile contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment profile, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this investment profile include, but are not limited to, statements related to anticipated areas of revenue growth within the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments, Gallagher's acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy facilities, and future trends in the insurance and insurance brokerage industries. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, and changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape could impact Gallagher's future revenue growth, its acquisition program, and trends in the insurance and insurance brokerage industries; and
uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including uncertainties related to (i) receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits, (ii) Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating facilities, (iii) potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45, (iv) utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity, (v) operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 facilities, (vi) business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners, (vii) intellectual property risks and (viii) environmental risks, could impact Gallagher's future income and tax credits generated by its clean-energy facilities.
Refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
This investment profile includes references to non-GAAP measures as defined under SEC rules, including EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin. As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided a reconciliation of each such measure to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, on its Web site at www.ajg.com under "Investor Relations."
6 INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2010
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information2008 through June 30, 2010
(Unauditedin millions, except per share data and other information)
2008 2009 2010
1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q 3rd Q 4th Q Full Year 1st Q 2nd Q
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues $ 258.0 $ 312.2 $ 314.4 $ 303.2 $1,187.8 $ 289.5 $ 340.1 $ 325.8 $ 320.8 $1,276.2 $ 304.4 $ 347.0
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 19.5 65.6 59.5 27.0 171.6 39.2 69.5 61.4 32.2 202.3 39.4 62.8
Earnings from continuing operations 11.9 39.2 36.1 17.0 104.2 24.1 41.5 36.9 21.2 123.7 23.5 37.4
Growth-revenues excluding retail contingent commissions 11% 6% 8% 2% 7% 12% 9% 4% 6% 7% 5% 2%
Pretax profit margin (1) 8% 21% 19% 9% 14% 14% 20% 19% 10% 16% 13% 18%
EBITDAC margin (2) 12% 26% 24% 15% 20% 19% 26% 25% 16% 22% 20% 24%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.13 $ 0.42 $ 0.38 $ 0.18 $ 1.11 $ 0.25 $ 0.41 $ 0.36 $ 0.21 $ 1.23 $ 0.23 $ 0.36
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues $ 116.2 $ 115.2 $ 118.6 $ 114.9 $ 464.9 $ 112.2 $ 113.3 $ 113.5 $ 114.2 $ 453.2 $ 110.5 $ 111.4
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 13.8 12.2 11.1 8.8 45.9 14.3 13.4 14.3 6.6 48.6 15.4 13.4
Earnings from continuing operations 8.5 7.4 7.0 5.3 28.2 8.7 7.9 8.7 5.4 30.7 9.2 8.1
Growth (decline)-revenues 9% 7% 8% -3% 5% -3% -2% -4% -1% -3% -2% -2%
Pretax profit margin (1) 12% 11% 9% 8% 10% 13% 12% 13% 6% 11% 14% 12%
EBITDAC margin (2) 15% 14% 12% 10% 12% 16% 14% 15% 8% 13% 17% 15%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ 0.08 $ 0.05 $ 0.30 $ 0.09 $ 0.08 $ 0.09 $ 0.05 $ 0.30 $ 0.09 $ 0.08
BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT. COMBINED
Revenues $ 374.2 $ 427.4 $ 433.0 $ 418.1 $1,652.7 $ 401.7 $ 453.4 $ 439.3 $ 435.0 $1,729.4 $ 414.9 $ 458.4
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 33.3 77.8 70.6 35.8 217.5 53.5 82.9 75.7 38.8 250.9 54.8 76.2
Earnings from continuing operations 20.4 46.6 43.1 22.3 132.4 32.8 49.4 45.6 26.6 154.4 32.7 45.5
Growth-revenues 10% 6% 8% 1% 6% 7% 6% 1% 4% 5% 3% 1%
Pretax profit margin (1) 9% 18% 16% 9% 13% 13% 18% 17% 9% 15% 13% 17%
EBITDAC margin (2) 13% 22% 20% 14% 18% 18% 23% 22% 14% 20% 19% 22%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.22 $ 0.50 $ 0.46 $ 0.23 $ 1.41 $ 0.34 $ 0.49 $ 0.45 $ 0.26 $ 1.53 $ 0.32 $ 0.44
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Net operating activity $ 0.1 $ (1.2) $ (14.1) $ (10.1) $ (25.3) $ (2.7) $ (1.8) $ (5.8) $ (1.0) $ (11.3) $ (3.3) $ (3.6)
Interest expense 6.5 7.3 7.1 7.7 28.6 7.3 7.0 6.8 7.4 28.5 8.6 8.7
Loss from continuing operations before income taxes (6.4) (8.5) (21.2) (17.8) (53.9) (10.0) (8.8) (12.6) (8.4) (39.8) (11.9) (12.3)
Loss from continuing operations (4.1) (4.9) (1.4) (10.6) (21.0) (4.5) (5.6) (4.0) (7.2) (21.3) (3.5) (3.6)
Diluted loss per share from continuing operations $ (0.04) $ (0.05) $ (0.02) $ (0.11) $ (0.23) $ (0.05) $ (0.05) $ (0.04) $ (0.07) $ (0.21) $ (0.04) $ (0.04)
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues $ 375.8 $ 428.9 $ 428.2 $ 412.1 $1,645.0 $ 401.1 $ 453.6 $ 439.5 $ 435.1 $1,729.3 $ 482.4 $ 459.5
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes 26.9 69.3 49.4 18.0 163.6 43.5 74.1 63.1 30.4 211.1 42.9 63.9
Earnings from continuing operations 16.3 41.7 41.7 11.7 111.4 28.3 43.8 41.6 19.4 133.1 29.2 41.9
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations $ 0.18 $ 0.45 $ 0.44 $ 0.12 $ 1.18 $ 0.29 $ 0.44 $ 0.41 $ 0.19 $ 1.32 $ 0.28 $ 0.40
Dividends declared per share $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 1.28 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 0.32 $ 1.28 $ 0.32 $ 0.32
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets $3,340.9 $3,508.5 $3,197.2 $3,271.3 $3,108.6 $ 3,652.5 $3,241.1 $3,250.3 $3,232.1 $ 3,555.8
Total liabilities $2,642.3 $2,783.3 $2,422.2 $2,532.8 $2,310.4 $ 2,812.7 $2,372.0 $2,357.4 $2,315.4 $ 2,590.4
Total stockholders' equity $ 698.6 $ 726.2 $ 775.0 $ 738.5 $ 798.2 $ 839.8 $ 869.1 $ 892.9 $ 916.7 $ 965.4
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s) 92,898 93,545 94,556 95,990 94,179 98,084 100,717 101,550 102,213 100,625 102,936 104,648
Common shares repurchased (000s) 26 20 3 6 55 11 7 17 10 45 9 6
Annualized return on beginning stockholders' equity (3) NMF 10% 14% 11% 11% 14% 19% 20% 17% 17% 13% 16%
Number of acquisitions closed 11 9 8 9 37 3 6 2 4 15 3 5
Workforce from continuing operations 9,329 9,534 9,573 9,863 9,986 10,145 10,015 9,840 9,840 9,734 10,034
TOTAL COMPANY EBITDAC (4)
Net earnings (loss) $ (6.0) $ 40.8 $ 37.8 $ 4.7 $ 77.3 $ 26.4 $ 43.8 $ 41.6 $ 16.8 $ 128.6 $ 29.2 $ 44.0
(Earnings) loss on discontinued operations, net of income taxes 22.3 0.9 3.9 7.0 34.1 1.9 -- 2.6 4.5 - (2.1)
Earnings from continuing operations 16.3 41.7 41.7 11.7 111.4 28.3 43.8 41.6 19.4 133.1 29.2 41.9
Provision for income taxes 10.6 27.6 7.7 6.3 52.2 15.2 30.3 21.5 11.0 78.0 13.7 22.0
Interest 6.5 7.3 7.1 7.7 28.6 7.3 7.0 6.8 7.4 28.5 8.6 8.7
Depreciation 6.9 7.9 8.0 7.2 30.0 7.7 7.5 7.7 7.7 30.6 7.7 8.0
Amortization 8.9 10.3 10.2 14.3 43.7 12.4 14.1 13.8 14.7 55.0 13.9 16.6
Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables ------ 1.4 1.2 1.5 4.1 1.9 (0.9)
Total company EBITDAC $ 49.2 $ 94.8 $ 74.7 $ 47.2 $ 265.9 $ 70.9 $ 104.1 $ 92.6 $ 61.7 $ 329.3 $ 75.0 $ 96.3
(1) Represents pretax earnings from continuing operations divided by total revenues.
(2) Represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and change in estimated acquisition earnout payables (EBITDAC) divided by total revenues.
(3) Represents annualized year-to-date net earnings divided by total stockholders' equity as of the beginning of the year.
(4) Represents earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and change in estimated acquisition earnout payables.
For a more detailed and printer-friendly version, including complete SEC filings, see www.ajg.com.
INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2010 7
WHY INVEST?
BROKERAGE & RISK MANAGEMENT REVENUES
FROM CONTINUING OPERATIONS* (in millions)
7% CAGR
$2,000
$1,700
$1,400
$1,100
$800
$500
$200
$1,209
$1,316
$1,408
$1,558
$1,653
$1,729
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008
2009
Dividends Per Share
$0.00
$0.20
$0.40
$0.60
$0.80
$1.00
$1.20
$1.40
17% Average Annual Increase
$0.05
$1.28**
1986
2010
* All information as originally reported (excluding discontinued operations and retail contingent commissions). See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
** Indicated  On July 22, 2010, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.32 per share quarterly dividend.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Marsha J. Akin  Investor Relations | 630.773.3800
8 INVESTMENT PROFILE AUGUST 2010


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20101026164636.txt.gz
TIME:20101026164636
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 26, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) issued a press release setting forth Gallagher's financial results for the three-month and nine-month periods ended September 30, 2010. A copy of Gallagher's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, October 26, 2010  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine-month period ended September 30, 2010. A printer-friendly format of this release and supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended September 30
 
 
 
"We are encouraged by our results and accomplishments this quarter," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Posting slightly positive organic growth in our Brokerage Segment in this rate and economic environment is a testament to our sales culture. In Risk Management, the team did an excellent job of closing the GAB Robins transaction and we are actively welcoming over 400 employees and over 200 clients to Gallagher Bassett. Throughout the company, we continue to build tremendous resources that provide great service to our clients."
This press release contains certain information not prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), including the financial measures entitled EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues. Definitions and purposes of such non-GAAP measures are included on page 6 of this press release. Reconciliations to the most directly comparable GAAP measure are also included in this press release for EBITDAC (on page 8); for Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments); for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on page 1); and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights
The Corporate Segment reports the financial information related to Gallagher's debt, investments in clean-energy ventures, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs:
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
Consolidated Company Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for third quarter was 34.4% and 34.1% in 2010 and 2009, respectively. Gallagher's tax rate for third quarter 2010 was lower than the statutory rate due to the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits. Gallagher's tax rate for third quarter 2009 was lower than the statutory rate due to the resolution and/or the expiration of various statutes of limitations related to certain income tax matters in 2009.
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 27, 2010 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT to discuss its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2010. To listen to the call, please go to www.ajg.com. The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 15 countries and does business in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations, statements regarding the future revenue and earnings impact of acquisitions and statements regarding anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking statements are based on Gallagher's current expectations and assumptions regarding its business, the economy and other future conditions. Because forward-looking statements relate to the future, they are subject to inherent uncertainties, risks and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance.
Important factors that could cause actual results to differ from those in the forward-looking statements include: changes in worldwide and national economic conditions; changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally; changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape; changes in Gallagher's accounting estimates and assumptions; integration risks related to acquisitions; uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits to operate facilities; Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating clean-energy facilities; other regulatory uncertainties such as potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45; uncertainties surrounding utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity; operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 operations; business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners; intellectual property risks; environmental risks; and the other factors that are described in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, including in the section entitled "Risk Factors" in Item 1A.
 
 
Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in the press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC Adjusted EBITDAC margin, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are meant to reflect the true operating performance of Gallagher's business; consequently, they exclude items that could be considered "non-operating" or "non-core" in nature.
Earnings Measures.
 
 
 
 
 
Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period over period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2010 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2009.
Organic Revenues.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for EBITDAC (on page 8); for Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments); for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on page 1); and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measure.
 
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 9 of 10.
 
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 9 of 10.
 
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2010 Earnings Release
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures (See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 6 of 10 above)
 
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2010 Earnings Release (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
Investor Relations - 630-285-3501
marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20101118170836.txt.gz
TIME:20101118170836
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 18, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) registered for resale 512,590 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
November 18, 2010
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 512,590 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold by certain selling stockholders from time to time, as described in the prospectus supplement dated November 18, 2010 (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20101216163216.txt.gz
TIME:20101216163216
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 16, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) registered for resale 475,766 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to Prospectus Supplement #3 under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 16, 2010
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 475,766 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in Prospectus Supplement #3 dated December 16, 2010 (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20101217180205.txt.gz
TIME:20101217180205
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 17, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) registered for resale 243,015 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to Prospectus Supplement #5 under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 17, 2010
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 243,015 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in Prospectus Supplement #5 dated December 17, 2010 (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20101220143137.txt.gz
TIME:20101220143137
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 20, 2010, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) registered for resale 381,745 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to Prospectus Supplement #6 under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 20, 2010
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 381,745 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in Prospectus Supplement #6 dated December 20, 2010 (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110201163906.txt.gz
TIME:20110201163906
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 1, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2010. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, February 1, 2011  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2010. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at .
www.ajg.com
Quarter Ended December 31
 
Year Ended December 31
 
 
 
"We ended 2010 with strong momentum and believe we are well positioned for 2011," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Fourth quarter adjusted EBITDAC was up nearly 17% in our Brokerage Segment and up over 18% in our Risk Management Segment. For the year, we continued to grow and hold our margins during a period that was marked by soft rates and poor economic conditions. Despite these headwinds, the Gallagher team accomplished a lot.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
"The Gallagher team is energized, focused on growth in 2011 and continuing to deliver excellent service to our clients and solid returns for our shareholders."
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2010 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2009 (in millions):
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Income Taxes
Continuing Operations
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for the year ended December 31, 2010 and 2009 was 19.6% and 36.9%, respectively. The following provides a reconciliation of the expected federal and state statutory tax amounts to the provision (benefit) for income taxes as reported in continuing operations for 2010 and 2009:
 
Discontinued Operations
Due to the IRS completing its examination of Gallagher's 2007 and 2008 tax years in fourth quarter 2010, Gallagher recognized $8.5 million of previously unrecognized tax benefits in its provision for income taxes related to discontinued operations.
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, February 2, 2011 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT to discuss its financial results for the quarter ended December 31, 2010. To listen to the call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
 
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 16 countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations, statements regarding the future revenue and earnings impact of acquisitions and statements regarding anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking statements are based on Gallagher's current expectations and assumptions regarding its business, the economy and other future conditions. Because forward-looking statements relate to the future, they are subject to inherent uncertainties, risks and changes in circumstances that are difficult to predict. Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance.
Important factors that could cause actual results to differ from those in the forward-looking statements include: changes in worldwide and national economic conditions; changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally; changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape; integration risks related to acquisitions; changes in Gallagher's accounting estimates and assumptions; uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits to operate facilities; Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating clean-energy facilities; other regulatory uncertainties such as potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45; uncertainties surrounding utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity; operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 operations; business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners; intellectual property risks; environmental risks; and the other factors that are described in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009, including in the section entitled "Risk Factors" in Item 1A.
Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in the press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
. Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are meant to reflect the true operating performance of Gallagher's business; consequently, they exclude items that could be considered "non-operating" or "non-core" in nature.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
. Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2010 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2009.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
. This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for EBITDAC (on page 9); for Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments); for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on page 1); and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measure
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 10 of 11.
 
 
 
See notes to fourth quarter 2010 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 10 of 11.
 
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2010 Earnings Release
Non-GAAP Financial Measures (See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 6 of 11 above)
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2010 Earnings Release (continued)
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
Investor Relations - 630-285-3501
marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110204145638.txt.gz
TIME:20110204145638
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On February 4, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) registered for resale 342,151 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
February 4, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 342,151 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement dated February 4, 2011 (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110208152741.txt.gz
TIME:20110208152741
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 8, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) registered for resale 74,528 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to Prospectus Supplement #8 under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
February 8, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 74,528 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in Prospectus Supplement #8 dated February 8, 2011 (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110211151536.txt.gz
TIME:20110211151536
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The information required by this item with respect to the Purchase Agreement (as defined below) is incorporated herein by reference to Item 2.03.
 
On February 10, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") and certain of its subsidiaries (collectively, the "Subsidiary Obligors") issued, in a private placement, $75 million aggregate principal amount of 5.18% Series D Senior Notes, due February 10, 2021, and $50 million aggregate principal amount of 5.49% Series E Senior Notes, due February 10, 2023 (collectively, the "Notes"). Interest on the Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on February 10 and August 10 of each year, beginning on August 10, 2011. Gallagher issued the Notes pursuant to the terms of a Note Purchase Agreement dated as of February 10, 2011 (the "Purchase Agreement") with certain accredited institutional investors (collectively, the "Purchasers"). The Notes are senior unsecured obligations of Gallagher and the Subsidiary Obligors and rank equal in right of payment with all other senior unsecured indebtedness of Gallagher and the Subsidiary Obligors.
The Purchase Agreement contains customary provisions for transactions of this type, including representations and warranties regarding Gallagher and its subsidiaries and various covenants, including covenants that require Gallagher to maintain specified financial ratios. The Purchase Agreement provides for customary events of default, generally with corresponding grace periods, including, without limitation, payment defaults with respect to the Notes, covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other agreements evidencing indebtedness of Gallagher or its subsidiaries, certain judgments against Gallagher or its subsidiaries and events of bankruptcy involving Gallagher or its material subsidiaries.
Under the terms of the Purchase Agreement, the Notes are redeemable, in whole or in part, at 100% of the principal amount being redeemed, together with accrued and unpaid interest and a "make-whole amount" (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) with respect to each Note. If within 90 days after a "change in control" Gallagher (or its successor) does not have an "investment grade rating", Gallagher is obligated to offer to prepay all of the outstanding Notes at the principal amount thereof plus accrued interest (but without any "make-whole amount") (as each term is defined in the Purchase Agreement).
The foregoing summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Purchase Agreement and forms of the Notes, filed herewith as Exhibit 4.1 and Exhibit 4.2, respectively.
 
On February 10, 2011, Gallagher issued a press release announcing it had completed the issuance of the Notes. A copy of this press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 4.1
CONFORMED COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Dated as of February 10, 2011
T E P L
O
ACH
OF
THE
URCHASERS
ISTED
IN
S A H:
CHEDULE
ERETO
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally agree with each of the Purchasers whose names appear in attached hereto (each, a and, collectively, the ) as follows:
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
Section 9.7,
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Schedule A
"Purchaser"
"Purchasers"
 
The Obligors will authorize the issue and sale of (i) $75,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.18% Senior Notes, Series D, due February 10, 2021 (the "") and (ii) $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023 (the "", together with the Series D Notes, the "," such term to include any such notes issued in substitution therefor pursuant to ). The Series D Notes shall be substantially in the form set out in . The Series E Notes shall be substantially in the form set out in . Certain capitalized and other terms used in this Agreement are defined in ; and references to a "" or an are, unless otherwise specified, to a Schedule or an Exhibit attached to this Agreement.
Series D Notes
Series E Notes
Notes
Section 13
Exhibit 1(a)
Exhibit 1(b)
Schedule B
Schedule
"Exhibit"
 
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Obligors will issue and sell to each Purchaser and each Purchaser will purchase
Section 2.1 Purchase and Sale of Notes.
from the Obligors, at the Closing provided for in , Notes in the principal amount and in the series specified opposite such Purchaser's name in at the purchase price of 100% of the principal amount thereof. The Purchasers' obligations hereunder are several and not joint obligations and no Purchaser shall have any liability to any Person for the performance or non-performance of any obligation by any other Purchaser hereunder.
Section 3
Schedule A
(a) The holders of the Notes acknowledge and agree that any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor (other than the Company) shall be automatically discharged and released from the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, pursuant to the written request of the Company, that (i) such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, has been released and discharged as a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of all Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement and the Company so certifies to the holders of the Notes in a certificate which accompanies such request for release and discharge, (ii) any such release and discharge shall be expressly conditioned upon receipt by the holders of the Notes of a written agreement executed by the Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, to be released pursuant to which such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, shall agree that if, for any reason whatsoever, it thereafter becomes a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of any Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement, then such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, shall contemporaneously provide written notice thereof to the holders of the Notes accompanied by an executed (A) Subsidiary Guaranty or (B) Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, of such Subsidiary, and (iii) at the time of such release and discharge, the Company shall deliver a certificate of a Responsible Officer to the holders of the Notes to the effect that no Default or Event of Default exists; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
Section 2.2 Release of Subsidiary Guarantors and Obligors.
provided
provided
Section 10.5
(b) The Company agrees that it will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary or Affiliate to, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration or remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, to any creditor of the Company or of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any such creditor of any release or discharge of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, with respect to any liability of such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as a guarantor or obligor under or in respect of Indebtedness of the Company, unless such consideration or remuneration is concurrently paid, on the same terms, ratably to the holders of all of the Notes then outstanding.
(c) Each holder of the Notes further acknowledges and agrees that following the release of an Obligor pursuant to this , if requested in writing by the Obligor Agent, that such holder of the Notes shall, at the cost and expense of the Obligors, within 20 Business Days following the date of such request, surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note and in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the remaining Obligors.
Section 2.2
 
The sale and purchase of the Notes to be purchased by each Purchaser shall occur at the offices of Schiff Hardin LLP, Suite 6600, 233 S. Wacker Dr., Chicago, Illinois 60606, at 10:00 .. Chicago time, at a closing (the ) on February 10, 2011. At the Closing, the Obligors will deliver to each Purchaser the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser in the form of a single Note of each series to be purchased by such Purchaser (or such greater number of Notes in denominations of at least $100,000 as such Purchaser may request) dated the date of the Closing and registered in such Purchaser's name (or in the name of its nominee), against delivery by such Purchaser to the Obligors or their order of immediately available funds in the amount of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of immediately available funds for the account of the Company to account number 265-977-9, Account Name: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.  Delaware Dividend Account, at Harris N.A., Chicago, IL (ABA No.: 071-000-288). If at the Closing the Obligors shall fail to tender such Notes to any Purchaser as provided above in this , or any of the conditions specified in shall not have been fulfilled to such Purchaser's satisfaction, such Purchaser shall, at its election, be relieved of all further obligations under this Agreement, without thereby waiving any rights such Purchaser may have by reason of such failure or such nonfulfillment.
A
M
"Closing"
Section 3
Section 4
 
Each Purchaser's obligation to purchase and pay for the Notes to be sold to such Purchaser at the Closing is subject to the fulfillment to such Purchaser's satisfaction, prior to or at the Closing, of the following conditions:
. The representations and warranties of each Obligor in this Agreement shall be correct when made and at the time of the Closing.
Section 4.1 Representations and Warranties
. Each Obligor shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in this Agreement required to be performed or complied with by it prior to or at the Closing, and after giving effect to the issue and sale of the Notes (and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated by ), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 4.2 Performance; No Default
Section 5.14
.
Section 4.3 Compliance Certificates
(a) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser an Officer's Certificate, dated the date of the Closing, certifying that the conditions specified in , and have been fulfilled.
Officer's Certificate
Sections 4.1
4.2
4.9
(b) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser a certificate of its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, dated the date of Closing, certifying as to the resolutions attached thereto and other corporate proceedings relating to the authorization, execution and delivery of the Notes and this Agreement.
Secretary's Certificate
. Such Purchaser shall have received opinions in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser, dated the date of the Closing (a) from Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Obligors, in the form set forth in (and
Section 4.4 Opinions of Counsel
Exhibit 4.4(a)
 
each Obligor hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) (b) from Walter D. Bay, Esq., General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, in the form set forth in (and the Company hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) and (c) from Schiff Hardin LLP, the Purchasers' special counsel in connection with such transactions, substantially in the form set forth in and covering such other matters incident to such transactions as such Purchaser may reasonably request.
Exhibit 4.4(b)
Exhibit 4.4(c)
On the date of the Closing such Purchaser's purchase of Notes shall (a) be permitted by the laws and regulations of each jurisdiction to which such Purchaser is subject, without recourse to provisions (such as section 1405(a)(8) of the New York Insurance Law) permitting limited investments by insurance companies without restriction as to the character of the particular investment, (b) not violate any applicable law or regulation (including, without limitation, Regulation T, U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) and (c) not subject such Purchaser to any tax, penalty or liability under or pursuant to any applicable law or regulation, which law or regulation was not in effect on the date hereof. If requested by such Purchaser, such Purchaser shall have received an Officer's Certificate certifying as to such matters of fact as such Purchaser may reasonably specify to enable such Purchaser to determine whether such purchase is so permitted.
Section 4.5 Purchase Permitted by Applicable Law, Etc.
. Contemporaneously with the Closing, the Obligors shall sell to each other Purchaser, and each other Purchaser shall purchase, the Notes to be purchased by it at the Closing as specified in .
Section 4.6 Sale of Other Notes
Schedule A
. Without limiting the provisions of , the Obligors shall have paid on or before the Closing the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of the Purchasers' special counsel referred to in to the extent reflected in a statement of such counsel rendered to the Company at least one Business Day prior to the Closing.
Section 4.7 Payment of Special Counsel Fees
Section 15.1
Section 4.4
. A Private Placement Number issued by Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau (in cooperation with the Securities Valuation Office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) shall have been obtained for each series of the Notes.
Section 4.8 Private Placement Number
. No Obligor shall have changed its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization, as applicable, or been a party to any merger or consolidation or succeeded to all or any substantial part of the liabilities of any other entity, at any time following the date of the most recent financial statements referred to in .
Section 4.9 Changes in Corporate Structure
Schedule 5.5
At least three Business Days prior to the date of the Closing, each Purchaser shall have received written instructions signed by a Responsible Officer on letterhead of the Company confirming the information specified in including (a) the name and address of the transferee bank, (b) such transferee bank's ABA number and (c) the account name and number into which the purchase price for the Notes is to be deposited.
Section 4.10 Funding Instructions.
Section 3
. All corporate or limited liability company and other proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and
Section 4.11 Proceedings and Documents
 
all documents and instruments incident to such transactions shall be reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser and its special counsel, and such Purchaser and its special counsel shall have received all such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as such Purchaser or such special counsel may reasonably request.
 
Each Obligor represents and warrants to each Purchaser that:
. Such Obligor is a corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation or formation, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Such Obligor has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Notes and to perform the provisions hereof and thereof.
Section 5.1 Organization; Power and Authority
. This Agreement and the Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of such Obligor, and this Agreement constitutes, and upon execution and delivery thereof each Note will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Obligor enforceable against such Obligor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (a) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (b) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Section 5.2 Authorization, Etc
. This Agreement and the documents, certificates or other writings delivered to the Purchasers by or on behalf of the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and identified in , and the financial statements listed in (this Agreement, and such documents, certificates or other writings and such financial statements delivered to each Purchaser prior to February 10, 2011 being referred to, collectively, as the ), taken as a whole, do not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in light of the circumstances under which they were made. Since December 31, 2010, there has been no change in the financial condition, operations, business or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, except changes that individually or in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There is no fact known to any Obligor that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect that has not been set forth herein or in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.3 Disclosure
Schedule 5.3
Schedule 5.5
"Disclosure Documents"
. (a)  contains (except as noted therein) complete and correct lists (i) of the Company's Subsidiaries, showing, as to each Subsidiary, the correct name thereof, the jurisdiction of its organization, the percentage of shares of each class of its capital stock or
Section 5.4 Organization and Ownership of Shares of Subsidiaries; Affiliates
Schedule 5.4
 
similar equity interests outstanding owned by the Company and each other Subsidiary and designation of whether or not such Subsidiary is an obligor or guarantor under the Bank Credit Agreement, (ii) of the Company's Affiliates, other than Subsidiaries, and (iii) of the Company's directors and senior officers.
(b) All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of each Subsidiary shown in as being owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries have been validly issued, are (in the case of capital stock) fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Company or another Subsidiary free and clear of any Lien (except as otherwise disclosed in ).
Schedule 5.4
Schedule 5.4 or Schedule 5.15(b)
(c) Each Subsidiary identified in is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each such Subsidiary has the corporate or other legal entity power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease and to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact other than that which could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule 5.4
(d) No Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to, any legal, regulatory, contractual or other restriction (other than this Agreement, the agreements listed on and limitations imposed by law) restricting the ability of such Subsidiary to pay dividends out of profits or make any other similar distributions of profits to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that owns outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of such Subsidiary.
Schedule 5.4
. The Company has delivered to each Purchaser copies of the financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries listed on . All of said financial statements (including in each case the related schedules and notes) fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the respective dates specified in such financial statements and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the respective periods so specified and have been prepared in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the periods involved except as set forth in the notes thereto (subject, in the case of any interim financial statements, to normal year-end adjustments). To the knowledge of the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries do not have any Material liabilities that are not disclosed in such financial statements or otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.5 Financial Statements; Material Liabilities
Schedule 5.5
. The execution, delivery and performance by the Obligors of this Agreement and the Notes will not (a) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of any Obligor or any Subsidiary under, any Material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, corporate charter or by-laws, or any other Material agreement or instrument to which such Obligor or any Subsidiary is bound or by which any Obligor or any Subsidiary or any of their respective properties may be bound or affected,
Section 5.6 Compliance with Laws, Other Instruments, Etc
 
(b) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary or (c) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary.
. No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by the Obligors of this Agreement or the Notes.
Section 5.7 Governmental Authorizations, Etc
(a) Except as disclosed in the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, there are no actions, suits, investigations or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of each of the Obligors, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary or any property of the Company or any Subsidiary in any court or before any arbitrator of any kind or before or by any Governmental Authority that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.8 Litigation; Observance of Agreements, Statutes and Orders.
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default under any term of any agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it is bound, or any order, judgment, decree or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority or is in violation of any applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation (including without limitation Environmental Laws or the USA Patriot Act) of any Governmental Authority, which default or violation, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have filed all tax returns that are required to have been filed in any jurisdiction, and have paid all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes and assessments levied upon them or their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent such taxes and assessments have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent, except for any taxes and assessments (a) the amount of which is not individually or in the aggregate Material or (b) the amount, applicability or validity of which is currently being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and with respect to which the Company has established adequate reserves on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP. No Obligor knows of any basis for any other tax or assessment that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The charges, accruals and reserves on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries in respect of Federal, state or other taxes for all fiscal periods are, in the judgment of the Company, adequate. The Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries have been finally determined (whether by reason of completed audits or the statute of limitations having run) for all fiscal years up to and including the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008; , , that this sentence shall not apply to any Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries arising from an examination by a Governmental Authority of any of the investment partnerships of the Company.
Section 5.9 Taxes
provided
however
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to their respective properties that individually or in the aggregate are Material, including all such properties reflected in the most recent audited balance sheet referred to in or purported to have been acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary after said date
Section 5.10 Title to Property; Leases
Section 5.5
 
(except as sold or otherwise disposed of in the ordinary course of business), in each case free and clear of Liens prohibited by this Agreement. All leases that individually or in the aggregate are Material are valid and subsisting and are in full force and effect in all material respects.
(a) The Company and its Subsidiaries own or possess all licenses, permits, franchises, authorizations, patents, copyrights, proprietary software, service marks, trademarks and trade names, or rights thereto, without known conflict with the rights of others, except those conflicts that, individually and in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.11 Licenses, Permits, Etc.
(b) To the knowledge of each Obligor, no product of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries infringes in any respect with any license, permit, franchise, authorization, patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned by any other Person, except to the extent any such infringement could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) To the knowledge of each Obligor, there is no Material violation by any Person of any right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned or used by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
. (a) The Company and each ERISA Affiliate have operated and administered each Plan in compliance with all applicable laws except for such instances of noncompliance as have not resulted in and could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any ERISA Affiliate has incurred any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans (as defined in section 3 of ERISA), and no event, transaction or condition has occurred or exists that could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any such liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, in either case pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or to such penalty or excise tax provisions or to sections 401(a)(29), 412 or 430 of the Code or section 4068 of ERISA, other than such liabilities or Liens as would not be individually or in the aggregate Material.
Section 5.12 Compliance with ERISA
(b) The present value of the aggregate benefit liabilities under each of the Plans (other than Multiemployer Plans), determined as of the end of such Plan's most recently ended plan year on the basis of the actuarial assumptions specified for funding purposes in such Plan's most recent actuarial valuation report, did not exceed the aggregate current value of the assets of such Plan allocable to such benefit liabilities. The term "benefit liabilities" has the meaning specified in Section 4001 of ERISA and the terms "current value" and "present value" have the meaning specified in section 3 of ERISA.
(c) The Company and its ERISA Affiliates have not incurred withdrawal liabilities (and are not subject to contingent withdrawal liabilities) under Section 4201 or 4204 of ERISA in respect of Multiemployer Plans that individually or in the aggregate are Material.
(d) The expected post retirement benefit obligation (determined as of the last day of the Company's most recently ended fiscal year in accordance with Accounting Standard Codification 715, formerly known as Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 106,
 
without regard to liabilities attributable to continuation coverage mandated by Section 4980B of the Code) of the Company and its Subsidiaries is not Material or has otherwise been disclosed in the financial statements set forth on .
Schedule 5.5
(e) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the issuance and sale of the Notes hereunder will not involve any transaction that is subject to the prohibitions of Section 406 of ERISA or in connection with which a tax could be imposed pursuant to Section 4975(c)(1)(A)-(D) of the Code. The representation by the Company in the first sentence of this is made in reliance upon and subject to the accuracy of such Purchaser's representation in as to the sources of the funds used to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser.
Section 5.12(e)
Section 6.2
. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has offered the Notes or any similar securities for sale to, or solicited any offer to buy any of the same from, or otherwise approached or negotiated in respect thereof with, any Person other than the Purchasers and not more than 10 other Institutional Investors, each of which has been offered the Notes at a private sale for investment. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has taken, or will take, any action that would subject the issuance or sale of the Notes to the registration requirements of Section 5 of the Securities Act or to the registration requirements of any securities or blue sky laws of any applicable jurisdiction.
Section 5.13 Private Offering by the Company
. The Obligors will apply the proceeds of the sale of the Notes to repay outstanding borrowings under the Bank Credit Agreement (without reducing the commitments thereunder) and for general corporate purposes, including the financing of acquisitions. No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of buying or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 CFR 221), or for the purpose of buying or carrying or trading in any securities under such circumstances as to involve the Company in a violation of Regulation X of said Board (12 CFR 224) or to involve any broker or dealer in a violation of Regulation T of said Board (12 CFR 220), in each case, in contravention of applicable margin stock regulations. Margin stock does not constitute more than 15% of the value of the consolidated assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries and the Company does not have any present intention that margin stock will constitute more than 15% of the value of such assets. As used in this , the terms "margin stock" and "purpose of buying or carrying" shall have the meanings assigned to them in said Regulation U.
Section 5.14 Use of Proceeds; Margin Regulations
Section 5.14
. (a)  sets forth the outstanding Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2010, which list is complete and correct in all material respects (including a description of the obligors and obligees, principal amount outstanding and collateral therefor, if any, and Guaranty thereof, if any), since which date there has been no Material change in the amounts, interest rates, sinking funds, installment payments or maturities of the Indebtedness of the Company or its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default and no waiver of default is currently in effect, in the payment of any principal or interest on any Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary and no event or condition exists with respect to any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary that would permit (or that with notice or the lapse of time, or both, would permit) one or more Persons to cause such Indebtedness to become due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment.
Section 5.15 Existing Indebtedness; Future Liens
Schedule 5.15(a)
 
(b) Except as disclosed in , neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has agreed or consented to cause or permit in the future (upon the happening of a contingency or otherwise) any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, to be subject to a Lien not permitted by .
Schedule 5.15(b)
Section 10.4
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to any provision contained in, any instrument evidencing Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary, any agreement relating thereto or any other agreement (including, but not limited to, its charter or other organizational document) which limits the amount of, or otherwise imposes restrictions on the incurring of, Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary, except as specifically indicated in .
Schedule 5.15(c)
. (a) Neither the sale of the Notes by the Company hereunder nor its use of the proceeds thereof will violate the Trading with the Enemy Act, as amended, or any of the foreign assets control regulations of the United States Treasury Department (31 CFR, Subtitle B, Chapter V, as amended) or any enabling legislation or executive order relating thereto.
Section 5.16 Foreign Assets Control Regulations, Etc
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary (i) is a Person described or designated in the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List of the Office of Foreign Assets Control or in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism Order or (ii) engages in any dealings or transactions with any such Person. The Company and its Subsidiaries are in compliance with the USA Patriot Act to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such law could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for any payments to any governmental official or employee, political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage, in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977, as amended, assuming in all cases that such Act applies to the Company.
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is subject to regulation under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, the ICC Termination Act of 1995, as amended, or the Federal Power Act, as amended.
Section 5.17 Status under Certain Statutes
. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement and the Notes rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured Senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of the Company, including, without limitation, all senior unsecured Indebtedness of the Company described in hereto.
Section 5.18 Notes Rank Pari Passu
pari passu
Schedule 5.15(a)
. (a) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any claim or has received any notice of any claim, and no proceeding has been instituted raising any claim against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or other assets, alleging any damage to the environment or violation of any Environmental Laws, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.19 Environmental Matters
 
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any facts which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any claim, public or private, of violation of Environmental Laws or damage to the environment emanating from, occurring on or in any way related to real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or to other assets or their use, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has stored any Hazardous Materials on real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or has disposed of any Hazardous Materials in a manner contrary to any Environmental Laws, in each case in any manner that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(d) All buildings on all real properties now owned, leased or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary are in compliance with applicable Environmental Laws, except where failure to comply could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
. Each Purchaser severally represents that (a) it is purchasing the Notes for its own account or for one or more separate accounts maintained by such Purchaser or for the account of one or more pension or trust funds and not with a view to the distribution thereof; that the disposition of such Purchaser's or their property shall at all times be within such Purchaser's or such pension or trust fund's control and (b) is an "Accredited Investor" as defined in Regulation D of the Securities Act and an experienced and sophisticated investor with such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters as is necessary to evaluate the merits and risks of an investment in the Notes. Each Purchaser understands that the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and may be resold only if registered pursuant to the provisions of the Securities Act or if an exemption from registration is available, except under circumstances where neither such registration nor such an exemption is required by law, and that neither the Company nor any Obligor is required to register the Notes.
Section 6.1 Purchase for Investment
provided
. Each Purchaser severally represents that at least one of the following statements is an accurate representation as to each source of funds (a ) to be used by such Purchaser to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser hereunder:
Section 6.2 Source of Funds
"Source"
(a) the Source is an "insurance company general account" (as the term is defined in the United States Department of Labor's Prohibited Transaction Exemption () 95-60) in respect of which the reserves and liabilities (as defined by the annual statement for life insurance companies approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (the ")) for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any employee benefit plan together with the amount of the reserves and liabilities for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any other employee benefit plans maintained by the same employer (or affiliate thereof as defined in PTE 95-60) or by the same employee organization in the general account do
"PTE"
NAIC Annual Statement"
 
not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total reserves and liabilities of the general account (exclusive of separate account liabilities) plus surplus as set forth in the NAIC Annual Statement filed with such Purchaser's state of domicile; or
(b) the Source is a separate account that is maintained solely in connection with such Purchaser's fixed contractual obligations under which the amounts payable, or credited, to any employee benefit plan (or its related trust) that has any interest in such separate account (or to any participant or beneficiary of such plan (including any annuitant)) are not affected in any manner by the investment performance of the separate account; or
(c) the Source is either (i) an insurance company pooled separate account, within the meaning of PTE 90-1, or (ii) a bank collective investment fund, within the meaning of the PTE 91-38 and, except as have been disclosed by such Purchaser to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (c), no employee benefit plan or group of plans maintained by the same employer or employee organization beneficially owns more than 10% of all assets allocated to such pooled separate account or collective investment fund; or
(d) the Source constitutes assets of an "investment fund" (within the meaning of Part VI of the QPAM Exemption) managed by a "qualified professional asset manager" or "QPAM" (within the meaning of Part VI of the QPAM Exemption), no employee benefit plan's assets that are included in such investment fund, when combined with the assets of all other employee benefit plans established or maintained by the same employer or by an affiliate (within the meaning of Section VI(c)(1) of the QPAM Exemption) of such employer or by the same employee organization and managed by such QPAM exceed 20% of the total client assets managed by such QPAM; the conditions of Part I(c) and (g) of the QPAM Exemption are satisfied; as of the last day of its most recent calendar quarter, the QPAM does not own a 10% or more interest in the Company and no Person controlling or controlled by the QPAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section VI(e) of the QPAM Exemption) owns a 20% or more interest in the Company (or less than 20% but greater than 10%, if such person exercises control over the management or policies of the Company by reason of its ownership interest); and (i) the identity of such QPAM and (ii) the names of all employee benefit plans whose assets are included in such investment fund have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (d); or
(e) the Source constitutes assets of a "plan(s)" (within the meaning of Section IV of PTE 96-23 (the )) managed by an "in-house asset manager" or "INHAM" (within the meaning of Part IV of the INHAM Exemption), the conditions of Part I(a), (g) and (h) of the INHAM Exemption are satisfied, neither the INHAM nor a Person controlling or controlled by the INHAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section IV(d) of the INHAM Exemption) owns a 5% or more interest in the Company and (i) the identity of such INHAM and (ii) the name(s) of the employee benefit plan(s) whose assets constitute the Source have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (e); or
"INHAM Exemption"
(f) the Source is a governmental plan; or
 
(g) the Source is one or more employee benefit plans, or a separate account or trust fund comprised of one or more employee benefit plans, each of which has been identified to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (g); or
(h) the Source does not include assets of any employee benefit plan, other than a plan exempt from the coverage of ERISA.
As used in this , the terms "employee benefit plan", "governmental plan", "party in interest" and "separate account" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in section 3 of ERISA.
Section 6.2
 
. The Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.1 Financial and Business Information
(a)  within 60 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each quarterly fiscal period in each fiscal year of the Company (other than the last quarterly fiscal period of each such fiscal year), duplicate copies of:
Quarterly Statements
"Form 10-Q"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at the end of such quarter (compared to the previous fiscal year end), and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such quarter and (in the case of the second and third quarters) for the portion of the fiscal year ending with such quarter (compared to the corresponding periods in the previous fiscal year),
all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP applicable to quarterly financial statements generally, and certified by a Senior Financial Officer as fairly presenting, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported on and their results of operations and cash flows, subject to changes resulting from year-end adjustments; that delivery within the time period specified above of copies of the Company's Form 10-Q prepared in compliance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-Q if it shall have timely made such Form 10-Q available on the SEC's "EDGAR" system (or any successor thereto) or any other publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web (at the date of this Agreement located at: http//www.ajg.com) and shall have given each holder of a Note prior notice of such availability on EDGAR (or any such successor thereto) or any other such publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web in connection with each delivery (such availability and notice thereof being referred to as );
provided
Section 7.1(a)
provided, further,
"Electronic Delivery"
(b)  within 120 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Annual Report on
Annual Statements
 
Form 10-K (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, duplicate copies of,
"Form 10-K"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries, as at the end of such year, and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries, for such year,
setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP, and accompanied by an opinion thereon of independent public accountants of recognized national standing, which opinion shall state that such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported upon and their results of operations and cash flows and have been prepared in conformity with GAAP, and that the examination of such accountants in connection with such financial statements has been made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, and that such audit provides a reasonable basis for such opinion in the circumstances, that the delivery within the time period specified above of the Company's Form 10-K for such fiscal year (together with the Company's annual report to stockholders, if any, prepared pursuant to Rule 14a-3 under the Exchange Act) prepared in accordance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC, shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-K if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
provided
Section 7.1(b)
provided, further,
(c)  promptly upon their becoming available, one copy of (i) each financial statement, report, notice or proxy statement sent by the Company or any Subsidiary to its principal lending banks as a whole (excluding information sent to such banks in the ordinary course of administration of a bank facility, such as information relating to pricing and borrowing availability or to its public securities holders generally) and (ii) each regular or periodic report, each registration statement (without exhibits except as expressly requested by such holder and excluding registration statements on Form S-8), and each prospectus and all amendments thereto (excluding those related to plans or plan interests registered on a Form S-8 registration statement) filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC and of all press releases and other statements made available generally by the Company or any Subsidiary to the public concerning developments that are Material; that with respect to any such report, registration statement or prospectus filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC, the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such report, registration statement or prospectus if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
SEC and Other Reports
provided
(d)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of the existence of any Default or Event of Default or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default hereunder or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default of the type referred to in , a written notice specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
Notice of Default or Event of Default
Section 11(f)
 
(e)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of any of the following, a written notice setting forth the nature thereof and the action, if any, that the Company or an ERISA Affiliate proposes to take with respect thereto:
ERISA Matters
(i) with respect to any Plan, any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA and the regulations thereunder, for which notice thereof has not been waived pursuant to such regulations as in effect on the date hereof; or
(ii) the taking by the PBGC of steps to institute, or the threatening by the PBGC of the institution of, proceedings under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Plan, or the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of a notice from a Multiemployer Plan that such action has been taken by the PBGC with respect to such Multiemployer Plan; or
(iii) any event, transaction or condition that could result in the incurrence of any liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or such penalty or excise tax provisions, if such liability or Lien, taken together with any other such liabilities or Liens then existing, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
(f)  promptly, and in any event within 30 days of receipt thereof, copies of any notice to any Obligor or any Subsidiary from any Federal or state Governmental Authority relating to any order, ruling, statute or other law or regulation that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
Notices from Governmental Authority
(g)  with reasonable promptness, such other data and information relating to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Obligors or any of their Subsidiaries or relating to the ability of the Obligors to perform their respective obligations hereunder and under the Notes as from time to time may be reasonably requested by any such holder of Notes.
Requested Information
. Each set of financial statements delivered to a holder of Notes pursuant to or shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer setting forth (which, in the case of Electronic Delivery of such financial statements, shall be by separate concurrent delivery of such certificate to each holder of Notes):
Section 7.2 Officer's Certificate
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
(a)  the information (including detailed calculations) required in order to establish whether the Company was in compliance with the
Covenant Compliance
 
requirements of through , inclusive, during the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished (including with respect to each such Section, where applicable, the calculations of the maximum or minimum amount, ratio or percentage, as the case may be, permissible under the terms of such Sections, and the calculation of the amount, ratio or percentage then in existence) and, to the extent that the Agreement Accounting Principles applied in connection with determining compliance with the requirements of through and are not the same as the generally accepted accounting principles used in preparation of the financial statements delivered pursuant to or , a reconciliation of the consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Subsidiaries delivered pursuant to or and the financial information used to determine compliance with the requirements of through and ; and
Sections 10.1
Section 10.3
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
(b)  a statement that such Senior Financial Officer has reviewed the relevant terms hereof and has made, or caused to be made, under his or her supervision, a review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries from the beginning of the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished to the date of the certificate and that such review shall not have disclosed, to the best of such Senior Financial Officer's knowledge and belief, the existence during such period of any condition or event that constitutes a Default or an Event of Default or, if any such condition or event existed or exists (including, without limitation, any such event or condition resulting from the failure of the Company or any Subsidiary to comply with any Environmental Law), specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company shall have taken or proposes to take with respect thereto.
Event of Default
. The Company shall permit the representatives of each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.3 Visitation
(a)  if no Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of such holder and upon reasonable prior notice to the Company, to visit the principal executive office of the Company, to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with the Company's Senior Financial Officers, and (with the consent of the Company, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld) to visit during normal business hours the other offices and properties of the Company and each Subsidiary, all at such reasonable times and as often as may be reasonably requested in writing; and
No Default
(b)  if a Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of the Company, to visit and inspect any of the offices or properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, to examine all their respective books of account, records, reports and other papers, to make copies and extracts therefrom, and to discuss their respective affairs, finances and accounts with their respective Senior Financial Officers and independent public accountants (and by this provision the Company authorizes said accountants to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries), all at such times and as often as may be requested, that prior to disclosure of any material non public information pursuant to this , the holders of the Notes
Default
provided
Section 7.3
 
shall, if requested by the Company, provide the Company with reasonable assurance that such disclosure will be held in confidence in accordance with the requirements of Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC, subject to the last sentence of .
Section 20
 
.
Section 8.1
Maturity
(a) The entire unpaid principal amount of the Series D Notes shall become due and payable on February 10, 2021.
(b) The entire unpaid principal amount of the Series E Notes shall become due and payable on February 10, 2023.
. The Obligors may, at their option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the Notes at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, together with interest accrued thereon to the date of such prepayment, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount. If the entire principal amount of the Notes then outstanding are not being prepaid, then the Notes must be prepaid in an amount not less than 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding; , , that the Obligors may prepay all of the Notes of any (or both) series then outstanding at any time with or without prepaying any of the Notes of the other series so long as no Default or Event of Default is then in existence or would be caused thereby. The Company will give each holder of Notes the Obligors intend to prepay written notice of each optional prepayment under this not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment. Each such notice shall specify such date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of each series of Notes to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each Note held by such holder to be prepaid (determined in accordance with ), and the interest to be paid on the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such prepayment, the Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes of any series being prepaid a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified prepayment date.
Section 8.2 Optional Prepayments with Make-Whole Amount
provided
however
Section 8.2
Section 8.3
. Unless the Obligors are prepaying all of the Notes of any series, in the case of each partial prepayment of Notes pursuant to , the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid shall be allocated pro rata among all holders of the Notes at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof. If the Obligors are prepaying all of the Notes of any series and prepaying the Notes of the other series in part, the principal amount of the Notes of the series to be prepaid in part shall be allocated pro rata among all holders of such series of Notes at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof.
Section 8.3 Allocation of Partial Prepayments
Section 8.2
. In the case of each prepayment of Notes of any series pursuant to this , the principal amount of each Note to be prepaid shall
Section 8.4 Maturity; Surrender, Etc
Section 8
 
mature and become due and payable on the date fixed for such prepayment (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any. From and after such date, unless the Obligors shall fail to pay such principal amount when so due and payable, together with the interest and Make-Whole Amount, if any, as aforesaid, interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. Any Note paid or prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Obligor Agent and cancelled and shall not be reissued, and no Note shall be issued in lieu of any prepaid principal amount of any Note.
. The Company will not and will not permit any Affiliate to purchase, redeem, prepay or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, any of the outstanding Notes or any part or portion thereof except (a) upon the payment or prepayment of such Notes in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and such Notes or (b) pursuant to an offer to purchase made by the Company or an Affiliate pro rata to the holders of all Notes at the time outstanding upon the same terms and conditions (other than differences attributable to the differences in the interest rates and maturity dates of the Series D Notes and the Series E Notes). Any such offer shall provide each holder with sufficient information to enable it to make an informed decision with respect to such offer, and shall remain open for at least 15 Business Days. If the holders of more than 10% of the principal amount of the Notes then outstanding accept such offer, the Obligor Agent shall promptly notify the remaining holders of Notes of such fact and the expiration date for the acceptance by holders of such Notes of such offer shall be extended by the number of days necessary to give each such remaining holder at least 5 Business Days from its receipt of such notice to accept such offer. The Obligor Agent will promptly cancel all Notes acquired by it or any Affiliate pursuant to any payment, prepayment or purchase of Notes pursuant to any provision of this Agreement and no Notes may be issued in substitution or exchange for any such Notes.
Section 8.5 Purchase of Notes
. The term means, with respect to any Note, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such Note over the amount of such Called Principal; that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Section 8.6 Make-Whole Amount
"Make-Whole Amount"
provided
means, with respect to any Note, the principal of such Note that is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Called Principal"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on such Note is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
"Discounted Value"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, 0.50% (50 basis points) over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as "Page PX1" (or
"Reinvestment Yield"
 
such other display as may replace Page PX1) on Bloomberg Financial Markets for the most recently issued actively traded on the run U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (or any comparable successor publication) for U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. In the case of each determination under clause (i) or clause (ii), as the case may be, of the preceding paragraph, such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond-equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable Note.
means, with respect to any Called Principal of any Note, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (a) such Called Principal into (b) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (i) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (ii) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
"Remaining Average Life"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date; that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of such Note, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to or .
"Remaining Scheduled Payments"
provided
Section 8.2
12.1
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Settlement Date"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
(a) . The Company will, within five Business Days after any Responsible Officer has knowledge of the occurrence of any Change in Control, give written notice of such Change in Control to each holder of Notes. If within 90 days after such Change in Control, the Company does not, for any reason, have an Investment Grade Rating, a "" shall be deemed to have occurred. If a Change in Control Event has occurred, the Company shall promptly give written notice thereof to the holders of Notes, and
Section 8.7 Mandatory Offer to Prepay Upon Change in Control.
Notice of Change in Control and Change in Control Event
Change in Control Event
 
such notice shall contain and constitute an offer to prepay Notes as described in subparagraph (b) of this and shall be accompanied by the certificate described in subparagraph (e) of this .
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(b) The offer to prepay the Notes contemplated by subparagraph (a) of this shall be an offer to prepay, in accordance with and subject to this , all, but not less than all, the Notes held by each holder (in this case only, "" in respect of any Note registered in the name of a nominee for a disclosed beneficial owner shall mean such beneficial owner) on a date specified in such offer (the ""). Such date shall be a Business Day not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after the date of such offer.
Offer to Prepay Notes.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
holder
Proposed Prepayment Date
(c) A holder of Notes may accept the offer to prepay made pursuant to this by causing a written notice of such acceptance to be delivered to the Company not later than 15 days prior to the Proposed Prepayment Date. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond to the offer to prepay made pursuant to this within the specified time period shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder.
Acceptance/Rejection.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(d) Prepayment of the Notes to be prepaid pursuant to this shall be at 100% of the principal amount of such Notes, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment, but in no event with a Make-Whole Amount or other premium. The prepayment shall be made on the Proposed Prepayment Date.
Prepayment.
Section 8.7
(e) . Each offer to prepay the Notes pursuant to this shall be accompanied by a certificate, executed by a Senior Financial Officer and dated the date of such offer, specifying: (i) the Proposed Prepayment Date; (ii) that such offer is made pursuant to this ; (iii) the principal amount of each Note offered to be prepaid; (iv) the interest that would be due on each Note offered to be prepaid, accrued to the Proposed Prepayment Date; (v) that the conditions of this have been fulfilled; (vi) in reasonable detail, the nature of the Change in Control Event; and (vii) any written response from the relevant rating agency.
Officer's Certificate
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(f) shall be deemed to have occurred if any person (as such term is used in Section 13(d) and Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) or related persons constituting a group (as such term is used in Rule 13d-5 under the Exchange Act):
Certain Definitions. "Change in Control"
(i) become the "beneficial owners" (as such term is used in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the total voting power of all classes then outstanding of the Voting Stock of the Company; or
(ii) acquire after the date of the Closing (x) the power to elect, appoint or cause the election or appointment of at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the Company, through beneficial ownership of the capital stock of the Company or otherwise, or (y) all or substantially all of the assets of the Company.
in respect of any Person means, at the time of determination, at least two of the following ratings of its senior, unsecured, non-credit enhanced, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money: (i) by Standard & Poor's Rating
"Investment Grade Rating"
 
Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, or any successor thereof, "BBB-" or better, (ii) by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereof, "Baa3" or better, or (iii) by any other nationally recognized statistical rating agency, an equivalent or better rating.
(g) All calculations contemplated in this involving the capital stock of any Person shall be made with the assumption that all convertible Securities of such Person then outstanding and all convertible Securities issuable upon the exercise of any warrants, options and other rights outstanding at such time were converted at such time and that all options, warrants and similar rights to acquire shares of capital stock of such Person were exercised at such time.
Section 8.7
 
The Obligors, jointly and severally, covenant that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
. Without limiting , each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations to which each of them is subject, including, without limitation, ERISA, the USA Patriot Act and Environmental Laws, and will obtain and maintain in effect all licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations necessary to the ownership of their respective properties or to the conduct of their respective businesses, in each case to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations or failures to obtain or maintain in effect such licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.1 Compliance with Law
Section 10.9
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurers, insurance with respect to their respective properties and businesses against such casualties and contingencies, of such types, on such terms and in such amounts (including deductibles, co-insurance and self-insurance, if adequate reserves are maintained with respect thereto) as is customary in the case of entities of established reputations engaged in the same or a similar business and similarly situated.
Section 9.2 Insurance
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain and keep, or cause to be maintained and kept, their respective properties in good repair, working order and condition (other than ordinary wear and tear), so that the business carried on in connection therewith may be properly conducted at all times; that this shall not prevent any Obligor or any Subsidiary from discontinuing the operation and the maintenance of any of its properties if such discontinuance is desirable in the conduct of its business and the Company has concluded that such discontinuance could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.3 Maintenance of Properties
provided
Section 9.3
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, file all tax returns required to be filed in any jurisdiction and to pay and discharge all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes, assessments, governmental charges, or levies imposed on them or any of their properties, assets, income or
Section 9.4 Payment of Taxes and Claims
 
franchises, to the extent the same have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent and all claims for which sums have become due and payable that have or might become a Lien on properties or assets of any Obligor or any Subsidiary; that no Obligor nor any Subsidiary need pay any such tax, assessment, charge, levy or claim if (a) the amount, applicability or validity thereof is contested by such Obligor or such Subsidiary on a timely basis in good faith and in appropriate proceedings, and the Company or such Obligor or Subsidiary, as the case may be, has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Obligor or such Subsidiary or (b) the nonpayment of all such taxes, assessments, charges, levies and claims in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
provided
. Subject to , the Company will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence. Subject to and , each Obligor will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and that of each of its Subsidiaries (unless merged into the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary) and all rights and franchises of such Obligor and its Subsidiaries unless, in the good faith judgment of the Company, the termination of or failure to preserve and keep in full force and effect such legal existence, right or franchise could not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.5 Legal Existence, Etc
Section 10.5
Section 10.5
Section 10.6
The Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement are and at all times shall rank at least in right of payment with all other present and future unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Obligor which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other unsecured Indebtedness of each such Obligor.
Section 9.6 Notes to Rank Pari Passu.
pari passu
. The Company:
Section 9.7 Additional Obligors; Guaranty by Subsidiaries
(a) will cause each Subsidiary which becomes a guarantor or an obligor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement after the date of Closing to concurrently enter into, in the case of a guarantor, a guaranty agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (as the same may be amended, modified, extended or renewed, the "") or, in the case of an additional obligor, a joinder agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (a ""); and
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
Subsidiary Guaranty
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
Joinder Agreement
(b) may cause any other Subsidiary which is not an obligor or guarantor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement to enter into a Joinder Agreement;
and in any such case within three Business Days thereafter will deliver to each of the holders of the Notes the following items:
(i) an executed counterpart of, in the case of a guarantor, a Subsidiary Guaranty or, in the case of an additional obligor, a Joinder Agreement in respect of this Agreement and the Notes;
 
(ii) a certificate signed by the President, a Vice President or another authorized officer of such Subsidiary making representations and warranties to the effect of those contained in and , but with respect to such Subsidiary, and either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be;
Sections 5.1, 5.2, 5.6
5.7
(iii) such documents and evidence with respect to such Subsidiary as the Required Holders may reasonably request in order to establish the existence and good standing of such Subsidiary and the authorization of the transactions contemplated by either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be; and
(iv) an opinion of counsel satisfactory to the Required Holders to the effect that either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, have been duly authorized, executed and delivered and such agreement or agreements, as the case may be, constitute(s) the legal, valid and binding contract(s) and agreement(s) of such Subsidiary enforceable in accordance with its or their respective terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance, fraudulent transfer and other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors generally and by general principles of equity (whether considered in equity or at law) and will rank at all times at least in right of payment with all other unsecured and unsubordinated Indebtedness of such Subsidiary.
pari passu
(c) Promptly after each time an additional Obligor is added in respect of this Agreement and the Notes pursuant to this , the Obligor Agent shall, at its cost and expense, request in writing that each holder of a Note surrender each Note which it then holds and within twenty Business Days following the date of such request, each holder of a Note shall surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note of the same series and in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the Obligors (including such additional Obligor) reflecting the addition of any Obligor pursuant to this .
Section 9.7
Section 9.7
. The Obligors will, and will cause each of their Subsidiaries to, maintain proper books of record and account and, in the case of the Company, in conformity with GAAP and all applicable requirements of any Governmental Authority having legal or regulatory jurisdiction over the Company, or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Section 9.8 Books and Records
 
The Company covenants that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of Consolidated Indebtedness as of the last day of the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended Excess Cash, as of the last day of the same such period, to EBITDA for such most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be greater than 3.25 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.1 Cash Flow Leverage Ratio.
minus
 
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of EBITDAR to Fixed Charges for the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be less than 1.75 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.2 Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit Consolidated Priority Indebtedness to exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.3 Limitations on Consolidated Priority Indebtedness.
The Company will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent (each of the following, a ):
Section 10.4 Limitation on Liens.
provided
"Permitted Lien"
(a) Liens for taxes, assessments, governmental charges or levies; that payment thereof is not at the time required by ;
provided
Section 9.4
(b) Liens arising under statutes or by operation of law, Liens in connection with worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, social security and other similar laws (including, without limitation, pledges or deposits securing liability to insurance carriers under insurance or self-insurance arrangements), Liens to secure the performance of bids, tenders, trade, government or other similar contracts, obligations for utilities, leases, licenses, statutory obligations, completion guarantees, surety, judgment, appeal or performance bonds, or other similar bonds, or other Liens of like general nature, in any such case incurred in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness; that (i) any such Lien secures only amounts not due and payable or the payment of which is being contested in good faith by appropriate actions or proceedings and (ii) any such Lien does not materially impair the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole or the value of the related property for the purposes of such business;
provided
(c) mechanics', workmen's, materialmen's, attorney's, landlords', carriers' or other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness and in each such case with respect to obligations which are not due or that are bonded or that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
(d) Liens of or resulting from any court proceeding, judgment or award, (i) the time for the appeal or petition for rehearing of which shall not have expired, or (ii) in respect of which the Company or a Subsidiary shall be prosecuting an appeal or proceeding for a review and in respect of which a stay of execution pending such appeal or proceeding for review shall have been secured; that the Company or such Subsidiary (1) is contesting such proceeding, judgment or award on a timely basis, in good faith and by appropriate proceedings, and (2) has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be;
provided
 
(e) Liens securing Indebtedness of a Subsidiary to the Company or to another Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(f) Liens existing as of the date of the Closing and described on hereto;
Schedule 5.15(b)
(g) Liens on property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries created solely for the purpose of securing purchase money indebtedness (including in connection with the acquisition, construction or improvement of property) or Capitalized Lease Obligations and, representing or incurred to finance, refinance or refund the purchase price of property; that no such Lien shall extend to or cover other property of the Company or such Subsidiary other than the respective property so acquired, constructed or improved, and the principal amount of indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall at no time exceed the total purchase price (or cost of construction or improvement) of such property;
provided
(h) Liens existing on property of a Person at the time such Person is consolidated with or merged into the Company or a Subsidiary or becomes a Subsidiary, or any Lien existing on any property acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary at the time such property is so acquired (whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby shall have been assumed); that (i) no such Lien shall have been created or assumed in contemplation of such consolidation or merger or such Person's becoming a Subsidiary or such acquisition of property, (ii) each such Lien shall extend solely to the item or items of property so acquired and, if required by the terms of the instrument originally creating such Lien, other property which is an improvement to or is acquired for specific use in connection with such acquired property;
provided
(i) customary rights of set off, revocation, refund or chargeback under deposit agreements or under the Uniform Commercial Code in favor of banks or other financial institutions where the Company or any Subsidiary maintains deposits in the ordinary course of business;
(j) Liens constituting (i) survey restrictions, encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, condemnations, easements, encroachments, covenants, rights of way, defects, irregularities and rights or restrictions of record on the title or use of real property, and (ii) leases, subleases, licenses or sublicenses granted to others in the ordinary course of business and Liens covering property subject to any lease which was not entered into in violation of this Agreement securing the interest of the lessor or other Person under such lease, which in any such case does not materially detract from the value of the subject property or materially impair the use thereof in the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole;
(k) any encumbrance or restriction (including, but not limited to, put and call agreements, rights of first refusal, and voting or equity holder agreements) with respect to equity or ownership interests in any joint venture or similar arrangement pursuant to any joint venture or similar agreement in any such case not entered into in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness;
 
(l) Liens other than those permitted by any of the foregoing subsections (a) through (k); provided that all Indebtedness secured by any such Liens, in the aggregate with all other Consolidated Priority Indebtedness at such time, does not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles; and
(m) any extension, renewal or replacement of any Lien permitted by the preceding clauses (e), (f), (g) and (h) of this Section 10.4; provided that (i) no additional property (other than improvements thereon) shall be encumbered by such Liens, (ii) the unpaid principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not be increased on or after the date of such extension, renewal or replacement and (iii) at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default would exist, including, without limitation, under Sections 10.1, 10.2 and 10.3, with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the extension, renewal or replacement of such Lien.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Company covenants that it will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary to secure any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary under the Bank Credit Agreement unless the Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and of the Subsidiary Guarantors under any Subsidiary Guaranty, as applicable, are secured on a pari passu basis by a lien on such property pursuant to documentation, including an intercreditor agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders.
.The Company will not consolidate with or merge with any other Person or convey, transfer, sell or lease all or substantially all of its assets in a single transaction or series of transactions to any Person unless:
Section 10.5 Mergers, Consolidations, Etc
(a) the successor formed by such consolidation or the survivor of such merger or the Person that acquires by conveyance, transfer, sale or lease all or substantially all of the assets of the Company as an entirety, as the case may be, is a solvent corporation or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the United States or any state thereof (including the District of Columbia), and, if the Company is not such successor or survivor, such successor or survivor (i) shall have executed and delivered to each holder of any Notes its assumption of the due and punctual performance and observance of each covenant and condition of this Agreement and the Notes and (ii) shall have caused to be delivered to each holder of any Notes an opinion of nationally recognized independent counsel or other independent counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders, to the effect that all agreements or instruments effecting such assumption are enforceable in accordance with their terms and comply with the terms hereof;
 
(b) each Subsidiary Guarantor and each Obligor (other than the Company) shall have affirmed in writing its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be (unless and to the extent any such Subsidiary Guaranty or the obligations of any such Obligor, as the case may be, have been discharged or released as expressly permitted by or otherwise in accordance with the terms of this Agreement); and
Section 2.2(a)
(c) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such transaction.
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
Except as permitted by , the Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of, including by way of merger (collectively a ), any assets, including capital stock of Subsidiaries, in one or a series of transactions, to any Person, other than:
Section 10.6 Sale of Assets.
Section 10.5
"Disposition"
(a) Dispositions in the ordinary course of business;
(b) Dispositions by a Subsidiary to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary or by the Company to a Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(c) Dispositions of the Company's interest in Chem-Mod LLC, Chem-Mod International LLC, C-Quest Technologies LLC or C-Quest Technologies International LLC; or
(d) Dispositions not otherwise permitted bythrough, inclusive, provided that:
Sections 10.6(a)
10.6(c)
(i) in the good faith opinion of the Company, the Disposition is in exchange for consideration having a fair market value at least equal to that of the property exchanged and is in the best interest of the Company or such Subsidiary;
(ii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such Disposition; and
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
(iii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, the aggregate net book value of all assets that were the subject of any Disposition occurring in the then current fiscal year would not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Assets as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal year of the Company, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may, or may permit a Subsidiary to, make a Disposition and the assets subject to such Disposition shall not be subject to or included in the foregoing limitation and computation contained in clause (iii) of the preceding sentence if, within 365 days of such Disposition:
(1) the net proceeds from such Disposition are reinvested in productive assets to be used in the existing business of the Company or a Subsidiary; or
 
(2) the net proceeds from such Disposition are applied to the payment or prepayment of the Notes or any other outstanding Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary ranking with or senior to the Notes (other than Indebtedness of the Company owing to a Subsidiary or an Affiliate or Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or an Affiliate).
pari passu
For purposes of foregoing clause (2), the Obligors shall offer to prepay (on a Business Day not less than 30 or more than 60 days following such offer) the Notes on a pro rata basis with any such other Indebtedness that the Company elects to include in such offer at a price of 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment (but in no event with a Make Whole Amount or other premium); provided that if any holder of the Notes declines or rejects such offer, the net proceeds that would have been paid to such holder may be used by the Company for general corporate purposes. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond in writing not later than fifteen Business Days prior to the proposed prepayment date to an offer to prepay made pursuant to this shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder. To the extent that any holder of the Notes rejects or is deemed to have rejected such offer of prepayment, the Company may use the aggregate amount of such prepayments so rejected for general corporate purposes.
Section 10.6
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to enter into directly or indirectly any Material transaction or Material group of related transactions (including without limitation the purchase, lease, sale or exchange of properties of any kind or the rendering of any service) with any Affiliate (other than the Company or another Subsidiary), except upon terms and conditions which are no less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than would be obtainable in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person not an Affiliate and except for benefit and compensation plans and arrangements approved by the Board of Directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any such Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary.
Section 10.7 Transactions with Affiliates
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to engage in any business if, as a result, the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, would then be engaged would be substantially changed from the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, are engaged on the date of this Agreement.
Section 10.8 Line of Business
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to (a) become a Person described or designated in the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List of the Office of Foreign Assets Control or in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism Order or (b) knowingly engage in any dealings or transactions with any such Person.
Section 10.9 Terrorism Sanctions Regulations
 
An shall exist if any of the following conditions or events shall occur and be continuing:
"Event of Default"
(a) the Obligors default in the payment of any principal or Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Note when the same becomes due and payable, whether at maturity or at a date fixed for prepayment or by declaration or otherwise; or
(b) the Obligors default in the payment of any interest on any Note for more than five Business Days after the same becomes due and payable; or
(c) the Company defaults in the performance of or compliance with any term contained in or or; or
Section 7.1(d)
Sections 10.1, 10.2
10.3
(d) the Obligors default in the performance of or compliance with any term contained herein (other than those referred to in , and ) and such default is not remedied within 45 days after the earlier of (i) a Responsible Officer obtaining actual knowledge of such default and (ii) the Company receiving written notice of such default from any holder of a Note (any such written notice to be identified as a "notice of default" and to refer specifically to this ); or
Sections 11(a)
(b) 
(c)
Section 11(d)
(e) (i) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of the Company or by any officer of the Company in this Agreement or in any writing furnished by the Company pursuant to this Agreement, proves to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made, (ii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of an Obligor (other than the Company) or by any officer of an Obligor (other than the Company) in this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement or in any writing furnished by an Obligor (other than the Company) pursuant to this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or (iii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of a Subsidiary Guarantor or by any officer of a Subsidiary Guarantor in any Subsidiary Guaranty or in any writing furnished by a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to any Subsidiary Guaranty, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(f) (i) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default (as principal or as guarantor or other surety) in the payment of any principal of or premium or make-whole amount or interest on any Indebtedness that is outstanding in an aggregate principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets beyond any period of grace provided with respect thereto, or (ii) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default in the performance of or compliance with any term of any evidence of any Indebtedness in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets or of any mortgage, indenture or other agreement relating thereto or any other condition exists, and as a
 
consequence of such default or condition such Indebtedness has become, or has been declared, due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment, or (iii) as a consequence of the occurrence or continuation of any event or condition (other than the passage of time or the right of the holder of Indebtedness to convert such Indebtedness into equity interests), the Company or any Subsidiary has become obligated to purchase or repay Indebtedness before its regular maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets; or
(g) any Obligor or any Material Subsidiary (i) is generally not paying, or admits in writing its inability to pay, its debts as they become due, (ii) files, or consents by answer or otherwise to the filing against it of, a petition for relief or reorganization or arrangement or any other petition in bankruptcy, for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar law of any jurisdiction, (iii) makes an assignment of any substantial part of its property for the benefit of its creditors, (iv) consents to the appointment of a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, (v) is finally adjudicated as insolvent or to be liquidated, or (vi) takes corporate action for the purpose of any of the foregoing; or
(h) a court or Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction enters an order appointing, without consent by any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, or constituting an order for relief or approving a petition for relief or reorganization or any other petition in bankruptcy or for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy or insolvency law of any jurisdiction, or ordering the dissolution, winding-up or liquidation of any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, or any such petition shall be filed against any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries and such petition shall not be dismissed within 60 days; or
(i) a final judgment or judgments for the payment of money aggregating in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets (excluding for purposes of such determination such amount of any insurance proceeds paid by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of such judgment or judgments or unconditionally acknowledged in writing to be payable by the insurance carrier that issued the related insurance policy) are rendered against one or more of the Company and its Subsidiaries and which judgments are not, within 60 days after entry thereof, bonded, discharged or stayed pending appeal, or are not discharged within 60 days after the expiration of such stay; or
(j) if (i) any Plan shall fail to satisfy the minimum funding standards of ERISA or the Code for any plan year or part thereof or a waiver of such standards or extension of any amortization period is sought or granted under section 412 or 430 of the Code, (ii) a notice of intent to terminate any Plan shall have been or is reasonably expected within the immediately following two-month period, to be filed with the PBGC or the PBGC shall have instituted proceedings under ERISA Section 4042 to terminate or appoint a trustee to administer any Plan or the PBGC shall have notified the Company or any ERISA Affiliate that a Plan may become a subject of any such proceedings, (iii) the
 
aggregate "amount of unfunded benefit liabilities" (within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(18) of ERISA) under all Plans, determined in accordance with Title IV of ERISA, shall exceed the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets, (iv) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate shall have incurred or is reasonably expected to incur any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, (v) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate withdraws from any Multiemployer Plan, or (vi) the Company or any Subsidiary establishes or amends any employee welfare benefit plan that provides post-employment welfare benefits in a manner that would increase the liability of the Company or any Subsidiary thereunder; and any such event or events described in clauses (i) through (vi) above, either individually or together with any other such event or events, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(k) any Subsidiary Guaranty (once in full force and effect) shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such Subsidiary Guaranty is invalid, void or unenforceable or any Subsidiary Guarantor which is a party to such Subsidiary Guaranty shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under such Subsidiary Guaranty, but excluding any Subsidiary Guaranty which ceases to be in full force and effect in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement; or
Section 2.2
(l) the obligations of any Obligor shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such obligations are invalid, void or unenforceable or any Obligor shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under this Agreement or the Notes, but excluding any Obligor which is released in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 2.2
As used in , the terms "employee benefit plan" and "employee welfare benefit plan" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in Section 3 of ERISA.
Section 11(j)
 
. (a) If an Event of Default with respect to an Obligor described in or  (other than an Event of Default described in clause (i) of or described in clause (vi) of by virtue of the fact that such clause encompasses clause (i) of ) has occurred, all the Notes then outstanding shall automatically become immediately due and payable.
Section 12.1 Acceleration
Section 11(g)
(h)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
(b) If any other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Required Holders may at any time at their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes then outstanding to be immediately due and payable.
(c) If any Event of Default described in or has occurred and is continuing, any holder or holders of Notes at the time outstanding affected by such Event of Default may at any time, at its or their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes held by it or them to be immediately due and payable.
Section 11(a) 
(b)
 
Upon any Note becoming due and payable under this , whether automatically or by declaration, such Note will forthwith mature and the entire unpaid principal amount of such Note, plus (i) all accrued and unpaid interest thereon (including, but not limited to, interest accrued thereon at the Default Rate) and (ii) the Make-Whole Amount determined in respect of such principal amount (to the full extent permitted by applicable law), shall all be immediately due and payable, in each and every case without presentment, demand, protest or further notice, all of which are hereby waived. Each Obligor acknowledges, and the parties hereto agree, that each holder of a Note has the right to maintain its investment in the Notes free from repayment by any Obligor or Obligors (except as herein specifically provided for), and that the provision for payment of a Make-Whole Amount by the Obligors in the event that any Notes are prepaid or are accelerated as a result of an Event of Default, is intended to provide compensation for the deprivation of such right under such circumstances.
Section 12.1
. If any Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, and irrespective of whether any Notes have become or have been declared immediately due and payable under , the holder of any Note at the time outstanding may proceed to protect and enforce the rights of such holder by an action at law, suit in equity or other appropriate proceeding, whether for the specific performance of any agreement contained herein or in any Note, or for an injunction against a violation of any of the terms hereof or thereof, or in aid of the exercise of any power granted hereby or thereby or by law or otherwise.
Section 12.2 Other Remedies
Section 12.1
. At any time after any Notes have been declared due and payable pursuant to or , the Required Holders, by written notice to the Company, may rescind and annul any such declaration and its consequences if (a) the Obligors have paid all overdue interest on such Notes, all principal of and Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Notes that are due and payable and are unpaid other than by reason of such declaration, and all interest on such overdue principal and Make-Whole Amount, if any, and (to the extent permitted by applicable law) any overdue interest in respect of such Notes, at the Default Rate, (b) the Obligors shall not have paid any amounts which have become due solely by reason of such declaration, (c) all Events of Default and Defaults, other than non-payment of amounts that have become due solely by reason of such declaration, have been cured or have been waived pursuant to , and (d) no judgment or decree has been entered for the payment of any monies due pursuant hereto or to such Notes. No rescission and annulment under this will extend to or affect any subsequent Event of Default or Default or impair any right consequent thereon.
Section 12.3 Rescission
Section 12.1(b)
(c)
Section 17
Section 12.3
. No course of dealing and no delay on the part of any holder of any Note in exercising any right, power or remedy shall operate as a waiver thereof or otherwise prejudice such holder's rights, powers or remedies. No right, power or remedy conferred by this Agreement or by any Note upon any holder thereof shall be exclusive of any other right, power or remedy referred to herein or therein or now or hereafter available at law, in equity, by statute or otherwise. Without limiting the obligations of the Obligors under , the Obligors will pay to the holder of each Note on demand such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover all costs and expenses of such holder incurred in any enforcement or collection under this , including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees, expenses and disbursements.
Section 12.4 No Waivers or Election of Remedies, Expenses, Etc
Section 15
Section 12
 
. The Obligor Agent shall keep at its principal executive office a register for the registration and registration of transfers of Notes. The name and address of each holder of one or more Notes, each transfer thereof and the name and address of each transferee of one or more Notes shall be registered in such register. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Person in whose name any Note shall be registered shall be deemed and treated as the owner and holder thereof for all purposes hereof, and the Obligor Agent shall not be affected by any notice or knowledge to the contrary. The Obligor Agent shall give to any holder of a Note that is an Institutional Investor promptly upon request therefor, a complete and correct copy of the names and addresses of all registered holders of Notes.
Section 13.1 Registration of Notes
. Upon surrender of any Note to the Obligor Agent at the address of the Company and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in for registration of transfer or exchange (and in the case of a surrender for registration of transfer accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed by the registered holder of such Note or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing and accompanied by the relevant name, address and other information for notices of each transferee of such Note or part thereof), within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, execute and deliver, at the Obligors' expense (except as provided below), one or more new Notes of the same series (as requested by the holder thereof) in exchange therefor and in an aggregate principal amount equal to the unpaid principal amount of the surrendered Note. Each such new Note shall be payable to such Person as such holder may request and shall be substantially in the form of , as applicable. Each such new Note shall be dated and bear interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on the surrendered Note or dated the date of the surrendered Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon. The Obligor Agent may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any stamp tax or governmental charge imposed in respect of any such transfer of Notes. Notes shall not be transferred in denominations of less than $100,000; that if necessary to enable the registration of transfer by a holder of its entire holding of Notes of a series, one Note of such series may be in a denomination of less than $100,000. Any transferee, by its acceptance of a Note registered in its name (or the name of its nominee), shall be deemed to have made the representations set forth in and with respect to the Notes and, in addition, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption.The Obligors shall not, however, be required to register any transfer of a Note if, acting in its reasonable discretion, the Obligor Agent believes such transfer is in violation of applicable law or the representations of the transferee set forth in and are not true and correct.
Section 13.2 Transfer and Exchange of Notes
Section 18(iii))
Exhibit 1(a) or Exhibit 1(b)
provided
Section 6.1
Section 6.2
Sections 6.1
6.2
. Upon receipt by the Obligor Agent at the address and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in ) of
Section 13.3 Replacement of Notes
Section 18(iii)
 
evidence reasonably satisfactory to it of the ownership of and the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any Note (which evidence shall be, in the case of an Institutional Investor, notice from such Institutional Investor of such ownership and such loss, theft, destruction or mutilation), and
(a) in the case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it ( that if the holder of such Note is, or is a nominee for, an original Purchaser or another holder of a Note with a minimum net worth of at least $50,000,000 or a Qualified Institutional Buyer, such Person's own unsecured agreement of indemnity shall be deemed to be satisfactory), or
provided
(b) in the case of mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation thereof,
within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, at their own expense, execute and deliver, in lieu thereof, a new Note of the same series, dated and bearing interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note or dated the date of such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon.
 
. Subject to , payments of principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest becoming due and payable on the Notes shall be made in Itasca, Illinois at the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction. The Company may at any time, by notice to each holder of a Note, change the place of payment of the Notes so long as such place of payment shall be either the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction or the principal office of a bank or trust company in Chicago, Illinois.
Section 14.1 Place of Payment
Section 14.2
. So long as any Purchaser or its nominee shall be the holder of any Note, and notwithstanding anything contained in or in such Note to the contrary, the Obligors will pay all sums becoming due on such Note for principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest by the method and at the address specified for such purpose below such Purchaser's name in , or by such other method or at such other address as such Purchaser shall have from time to time specified to the Company in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of such Note or the making of any notation thereon, except that upon written request of the Company made concurrently with or reasonably promptly after payment or prepayment in full of any Note, such Purchaser shall surrender such Note for cancellation, reasonably promptly after any such request, to the Obligor Agent at the Company's principal executive office or at the place of payment most recently designated by the Company pursuant to . Prior to any sale or other disposition of any Note held by a Purchaser or its nominee, such Purchaser will, at its election, either endorse thereon the amount of principal paid thereon and the last date to which interest has been paid thereon or surrender such Note to the Obligor Agent in exchange for a new Note or Notes pursuant to . The Obligors will afford the benefits of this to any Institutional Investor that is the direct or indirect transferee of any Note purchased by a Purchaser under this Agreement and that has made the same agreement relating to such Note as the Purchasers have made in this .
Section 14.2 Home Office Payment
Section 14.1
Schedule A
Section 14.1
Section 13.2
Section 14.2
Section 14.2
 
. Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby are consummated, the Obligors will pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees of a special counsel and, if reasonably required by the Required Holders, local or other counsel) incurred by the Purchasers and each other holder of a Note in connection with such transactions and in connection with any amendments, waivers or consents under or in respect of this Agreement, any Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty (whether or not such amendment, waiver or consent becomes effective), including, without limitation: (a) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in enforcing or defending (or determining whether or how to enforce or defend) any rights under this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty or in responding to any subpoena or other legal process or informal investigative demand issued in connection with this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty, or by reason of being a holder of any Note, (b) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the insolvency or bankruptcy of any Obligor or any Subsidiary or in connection with any work-out or restructuring of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the Notes, and (c) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the delivery of any Subsidiary Guaranty or Joinder Agreement as contemplated by . The Obligors will pay, and will save each Purchaser and each other holder of a Note harmless from, all claims in respect of any fees, costs or expenses, if any, of brokers and finders (other than those, if any, retained by a Purchaser or other holder in connection with its purchase of any Notes).
Section 15.1 Transaction Expenses
Section 9.7
. The obligations of the Obligors under this will survive the payment or transfer of any Note, the enforcement, amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any Notes, and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 15.2 Survival
Section 15
 
All representations and warranties contained herein shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Notes, the purchase or transfer by any Purchaser of any Note or portion thereof or interest therein and the payment of any Note, and may be relied upon by any Obligor and any subsequent holder of a Note, regardless of any investigation made at any time by or on behalf of such Purchaser or any other holder of a Note. All statements contained in any certificate or other instrument delivered by or on behalf of any Obligor pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed representations and warranties of the Obligors under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement and the Notes embody the entire agreement and understanding between each Purchaser and the Obligors and supersede all prior agreements and understandings (written or oral) relating to the subject matter hereof.
 
. This Agreement, the Notes, any Joinder Agreement and any Subsidiary Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof or of any Joinder Agreement, Subsidiary Guaranty or the Notes may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively and for a specified time period or permanently), with (and only with) the written consent of the Obligors and the Required Holders, except that (a) no amendment or waiver of any of the provisions of or hereof, or any defined term (as it is used therein), will be effective as to any Purchaser unless consented to by such Purchaser in writing,
Section 17.1 Requirements
Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
21
 
and (b) no such amendment or waiver may, without the written consent of the holder of each Note at the time outstanding affected thereby, (i) subject to the provisions of relating to acceleration or rescission, change the amount or time of any prepayment or payment of principal of, or reduce the rate or change the time of payment or method of computation of interest or of the Make-Whole Amount on, the Notes, (ii) change the percentage of the principal amount of the Notes the holders of which are required to consent to any such amendment or waiver, or (iii) amend any of or .
Section 12
Section 8, 11(a), 11(b), 12, 17
20
.
Section 17.2 Solicitation of Holders of Notes
(a) . The Company will provide each holder of the Notes (irrespective of the amount or series of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof, of the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement. The Company will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this to each holder of outstanding Notes promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the requisite holders of Notes as specified in .
Solicitation
Section 17
Section 17.1
(b) . None of the Obligors will directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, or grant any security or provide other credit support, to any holder of Notes as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any holder of Notes of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof or of any Note or any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted or other credit support concurrently provided, on the same terms, ratably to each holder of Notes then outstanding even if such holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
Payment
(c) Any consent made pursuant to this by the holder of any Note that has transferred or has agreed to transfer such Note to any of the Obligors, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate of the Obligors and has provided or has agreed to provide such written consent as a condition to such transfer, shall be void and of no force except solely as to such holder, and any amendments effected or to be effected or granted that would not have been or would not be so effected or granted but for such consents or waivers granted (and the consents of all other holders of Notes that were acquired under the same or similar conditions) shall be void and of no force except solely as to such transferring holder.
Consent in Contemplation of Transfer.
Section 17.2
. Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all holders of each series of Notes and is binding upon them and upon each future holder of any Note and upon the Obligors without regard to whether such Note has been marked to indicate such amendment or waiver. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant, agreement, Default or Event of Default not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Obligors and the holder of any Note nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder, under any Note or under any Subsidiary Guaranty shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any holder of such Note. As used herein, the term "this Agreement" and references thereto shall mean this Agreement as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 17.3 Binding Effect, Etc
Section 17
 
. Solely for the purpose of determining whether the holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Agreement, the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement, or have directed the taking of any action provided herein, in the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement to be taken upon the direction of the holders of a specified percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Obligor or any of its Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
Section 17.4 Notes Held by the Obligors, Etc
 
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(i) if to any Purchaser or its nominee, to such Purchaser or nominee at the address specified for such communications in , or at such other address as such Purchaser or nominee shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing,
Schedule A
(ii) if to any other holder of any Note, to such holder at such address as such other holder shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing, or
(iii) if to any of the Obligors, c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning hereof to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as the Company shall have specified to the holder of each Note in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 18
 
This Agreement or any Subsidiary Guaranty and all documents relating thereto, including, without limitation, (a) consents, waivers and modifications that may hereafter be executed, (b) documents received by any Purchaser at the Closing (except the Notes themselves), and (c) financial statements, certificates and other information previously or hereafter furnished to any Purchaser, may be reproduced by such Purchaser by any photographic, photostatic, electronic, digital or other similar process and such Purchaser may destroy any original document so reproduced. Each Obligor agrees and stipulates that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, any such reproduction shall be admissible in evidence as the original itself in any judicial or administrative proceeding (whether or not the original is in existence and whether or not such reproduction was made by such Purchaser in the regular course of business) and any enlargement, facsimile or further reproduction of such reproduction shall likewise be admissible in evidence. This shall not prohibit the Obligors or any other holder of Notes from contesting any such reproduction to the same extent that it could contest the original, or from introducing evidence to demonstrate the inaccuracy of any such reproduction.
Section 19
 
For the purposes of this , means information delivered to any Purchaser by or on behalf of any Obligor or any Subsidiary in connection with the transactions contemplated by or otherwise pursuant to this Agreement and not previously disclosed in any filings by the Company with the SEC; that such term does not include information that (a) was publicly known or otherwise known to such Purchaser prior to the time of such disclosure, (b) subsequently becomes publicly known through no act or omission by such Purchaser or any Person acting on such Purchaser's behalf, (c) otherwise becomes known to such Purchaser other than through disclosure by an Obligor or any Subsidiary, or is known by such Purchaser to be under an obligation not to transmit such information to such Purchaser or (d) constitutes financial statements delivered to such Purchaser under that are otherwise publicly available. Each Purchaser will maintain the confidentiality of such Confidential Information in accordance with procedures adopted by such Purchaser in good faith to protect confidential information of third parties delivered to such Purchaser; that such Purchaser may deliver or disclose Confidential Information to (i) its directors, trustees, officers, employees, agents, attorneys and Affiliates (to the extent such disclosure reasonably relates to the administration of the investment represented by its Notes), (ii) its financial advisors and other professional advisors who agree to hold confidential the Confidential Information substantially in accordance with the terms of this , (iii) any other holder of any Note, (iv) any Institutional Investor to which it sells or offers to sell such Note or any part thereof or any participation therein (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (v) any Person from which it offers to purchase any security of an Obligor (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (vi) any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over such Purchaser, (vii) the NAIC or the SVO or, in each case, any similar organization, or any nationally recognized rating agency that requires access to information about such Purchaser's investment portfolio or (viii) any other Person to which such delivery or disclosure may be necessary or appropriate (w) to effect compliance with any law, rule, regulation or order applicable to such Purchaser, (x) in response to any subpoena or other legal process, (y) in connection with any litigation to which such Purchaser is a party or (z) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, to the extent such Purchaser may reasonably determine such delivery and disclosure to be necessary or appropriate in the enforcement or for the protection of the rights and remedies under such Purchaser's Notes and this Agreement. Each holder of a Note, by its acceptance of a Note, will be deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to be entitled to the benefits of this as though it were a party to this Agreement. On reasonable request by the Company in connection with the delivery to any holder of a Note of information required to be delivered to such holder under this Agreement or requested by such holder (other than a holder that is a party to this Agreement or its nominee), such holder will, as a condition precedent to receiving such information, enter into an agreement with the Company embodying the provisions of this and providing the Company assurances that such holder will enter into further agreements with language no more burdensome on the holder than the language contained in this as reasonably requested by the Company in order to comply with Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC. The Obligors shall reimburse such holder's reasonable expenses incurred in connection with entering into any such agreement.
Section 20
"Confidential Information"
provided
Section 7.1
provided
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
 
Each Purchaser shall have the right to substitute any one of its Affiliates as the purchaser of the Notes that it has agreed to purchase hereunder, by written notice to the Obligors, which notice shall be signed by both such Purchaser and such Affiliate, shall contain such Affiliate's agreement to be bound by this Agreement and shall contain a confirmation by such Affiliate of the accuracy with respect to it of the representations set forth in . Upon receipt of such notice, any reference to such Purchaser in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall be deemed to refer to such Affiliate in lieu of such original Purchaser. In the event that such Affiliate is so substituted as a Purchaser hereunder and such Affiliate thereafter transfers to such original Purchaser all of the Notes then held by such Affiliate, upon receipt by the Company of notice of such transfer, any reference to such Affiliate as a "Purchaser" in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall no longer be deemed to refer to such Affiliate, but shall refer to such original Purchaser, and such original Purchaser shall again have all the rights of an original holder of the Notes under this Agreement.
Section 6
Section 21
Section 21
 
. All covenants and other agreements contained in this Agreement by or on behalf of any of the parties hereto bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns (including, without limitation, any subsequent holder of a Note) whether so expressed or not.
Section 22.1 Successors and Assigns
. Anything in this Agreement or the Notes to the contrary notwithstanding (but without limiting the requirement in that the notice of any optional prepayment specify a Business Day as the date fixed for such prepayment), any payment of principal of or Make-Whole Amount or interest on any Note that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; that if the maturity date of any Note is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
Section 22.2 Payments Due on Non-Business Days
Section 8.4
provided
. All accounting terms used herein which are not expressly defined in this Agreement have the meanings respectively given to them in accordance with GAAP. Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, any calculation required by, or for purposes of determining compliance with, and shall be calculated using Agreement Accounting Principles and each financial or accounting term used in each such Section shall have the meaning given to them in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of December 31, 2010 applied on a consistent basis with that used in preparation of the most recent audited consolidated financial statements listed in (whether, in the case of capitalized terms defined in this Agreement, the definition expressly refers to Agreement Accounting Principles or not). For purposes of determining compliance with, and, any election by the Company to measure an item of Indebtedness using fair value (as permitted by Accounting Standard Codification 825-10-25, formerly known as Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 159, or any similar accounting standard) shall be disregarded and such determination shall be made as if such election had not been made.
Section 22.3 Accounting Terms
Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4
10.6
Schedule 5.5
Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4
10.6
 
. Any provision of this Agreement that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.4 Severability
. Each covenant contained herein shall be construed (absent express provision to the contrary) as being independent of each other covenant contained herein, so that compliance with any one covenant shall not (absent such an express contrary provision) be deemed to excuse compliance with any other covenant. Where any provision herein refers to action to be taken by any Person, or which such Person is prohibited from taking, such provision shall be applicable whether such action is taken directly or indirectly by such Person.
Section 22.5 Construction, Etc
For the avoidance of doubt, all Schedules and Exhibits attached to this Agreement shall be deemed to be a part hereof.
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
Section 22.6 Counterparts
. This Agreement shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the parties shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinoisexcluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
Section 22.7 Governing Law
,
(a) Each Obligor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the Notes. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Obligor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
Section 22.8 Jurisdiction and Process; Waiver of Jury Trial.
(b) Each Obligor consents to process being served by or on behalf of any holder of Notes in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in by mailing a copy thereof by registered or certified mail (or any substantially similar form of mail), postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to it at its address specified in or at such other address of which such holder shall then have been notified pursuant to said Section. Each Obligor agrees that such service upon receipt (i) shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon it in any such suit, action or proceeding and (ii) shall, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, be taken and held to be valid personal service upon and personal
Section 22.8(a)
Section 18
 
delivery to it. Notices hereunder shall be conclusively presumed received as evidenced by a delivery receipt furnished by the United States Postal Service or any reputable commercial delivery service.
(c) Nothing in this shall affect the right of any holder of a Note to serve process in any manner permitted by law, or limit any right that the holders of any of the Notes may have to bring proceedings against an Obligor in the courts of any appropriate jurisdiction or to enforce in any lawful manner a judgment obtained in one jurisdiction in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.8
(d) T A, N .
HE
PARTIES
HERETO
HEREBY
WAIVE
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
ACTION
BROUGHT
ON
OR
WITH
RESPECT
TO
THIS
GREEMENT
THE
OTES
OR
ANY
OTHER
DOCUMENT
EXECUTED
IN
CONNECTION
HEREWITH
OR
THEREWITH
. (a) The obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and the Notes are joint and several primary obligations of each Obligor regardless of which Obligor actually receives the proceeds of any Notes or the manner in which the Obligors, any Purchaser or any holder thereof accounts for such Notes on its books and records.
Section 22.9 Nature of Obligations
(b) Each Obligor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such holder of Notes upon this Agreement (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in this Agreement or the Notes shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Agreement and the Notes);
(2) demand of payment by any holder of Notes from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any holder of Notes or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Obligor.
The obligations of each Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes and the rights of any holder of Notes to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
 
(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, the obligations of the Obligors hereunder and under the Notes shall be binding upon the Obligors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due under this Agreement shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Obligors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of any Obligor or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of any Obligor to issue the Notes or any Obligor to execute and deliver this Agreement or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of any Obligor or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of any Obligor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor or any other Person; or
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of any Obligor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other , whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
force majeure
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
 
(8) the failure of any Obligor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement; or
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Obligor of failure of an Obligor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor or to any other Person or to any other Agreement or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other agreement, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor or any other Person or any release of any Obligor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Obligor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Obligor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Obligor or other Person under this Agreement or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Agreement and the Notes and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Obligor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of,
provided
 
premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and this Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or this Agreement and that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
(d) To the extent of any payments made under this Agreement, each Obligor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Obligors, but such Obligor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the holder of Notes for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Obligor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(e) Each Obligor agrees that to the extent an Obligor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Obligors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Obligors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any holder of a Note from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
(f) No holder of a Note shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Obligors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Obligors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Obligors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Obligors' burden, any right to which each Obligor hereby expressly waives.
(g) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, including this , all obligations and liabilities of an Obligor under this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement by reason of the express provisions of of this Agreement or is otherwise released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 22.9
Section 2.2
 
. (a) Each Obligor (other than the Company) by its execution of this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement irrevocably appoints the Company to act on its behalf as its agent (the ) in relation to this Agreement and the Notes and irrevocably authorizes:
Section 22.10 Obligor Agent
"Obligor Agent"
(i) the Company on its behalf to supply all information concerning itself contemplated by this Agreement to the holders of a Note and to give all notices and instructions, to execute on its behalf any Joinder Agreement, to make such agreements and to effect the relevant amendments, supplements and variations capable of being given, made or effected by any Obligor notwithstanding that they may affect the Obligor, without further reference to or the consent of that Obligor; and
(ii) each holder of a Note to give any notice, demand or other communication to that Obligor pursuant to the this Agreement and the Notes to the Company,
and in each case the Obligors shall be bound as though that Obligor itself had given the notices and instructions or executed or made the agreements or effected the amendments, supplements or variations, or received the relevant notice, demand or other communication.
(b) Every act, omission, agreement, undertaking, settlement, waiver, amendment, supplement, variation, notice or other communication given or made by the Obligor Agent or given to the Obligor Agent under this Agreement and the Notes on behalf of another Obligor or in connection with this Agreement and the Notes (whether or not known to any other Obligor and whether occurring before or after such other Obligor became an Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes) shall be binding for all purposes on that Obligor as if that Obligor had expressly made, given or concurred with it. In the event of any conflict between any notices or other communications of the Obligor Agent and any other Obligor, those of the Obligor Agent shall prevail.
 
If you are in agreement with the foregoing, please sign the form of agreement on a counterpart of this Agreement and return it to the Company, whereupon this Agreement shall become a binding agreement between you and the Obligors.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed
to as of the date thereof.
 
 
This Agreement is hereby accepted and agreed
to as of the date thereof.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
As used herein, the following terms have the respective meanings set forth below or set forth in the Section hereof following such term:
means, at any time, and with respect to any Person, any other Person that at such time directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries Controls, or is Controlled by, or is under common Control with, such first Person, and with respect to the Company, shall include any Person beneficially owning or holding, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests of the Company or any Subsidiary or any corporation of which the Company and its Subsidiaries beneficially own or hold, in the aggregate, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests. As used in this definition, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise. Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to an is a reference to an Affiliate of the Company.
"Affiliate"
"Control"
"Affiliate"
"" means this Note Purchase Agreement among the Obligors and the Purchasers dated February 10, 2011.
Agreement
means generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of August 3, 2007 applied on a basis consistent with that used in the preparation of the audited consolidated financial statements of the Company for the year ended December 31, 2006.
"Agreement Accounting Principles"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
"AJG Brokerage"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation.
"AJG Illinois"
means Executive Order No. 13,224 of September 24, 2001, Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions with Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit or Support Terrorism, 66 U.S. Fed. Reg. 49,079 (2001), as amended.
"Anti-Terrorism Order"
means Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010, among the Obligors, the lenders from time to time party thereto, Bank of Montreal, as administrative agent, Bank of America, N.A., Citibank N.A. and Barclays Bank PLC, as co-syndication agents, and JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. and U.S. Bank National Association, as documentation agents, as the same may from time to time be amended, modified, supplemented, renewed, extended, refinanced or replaced.
"Bank Credit Agreement"
means (a) for the purposes of only, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed, and (b) for the purposes of any other provision of this Agreement, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in Chicago, Illinois or New York, New York are required or authorized to be closed.
"Business Day"
Section 8.6
means any lease of property which, in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, is required to be capitalized on the balance sheet of the lessee.
"Capital Lease"
means the amount of the liability shown on the balance sheet of any Person in respect of a Capital Lease as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation"
is defined in .
"Change in Control"
Section 8.7(f)
is defined in .
"Change in Control Event"
Section 8.7(a)
is defined in .
"Closing"
Section 3
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time.
"Code"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation, or any successor that becomes such in the manner prescribed in .
"Company"
Section 10.5
is defined in .
"Confidential Information"
Section 20
means, without duplication, all Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis eliminating intercompany items.
"Consolidated Indebtedness"
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the total stockholders' equity (including capital stock, additional paid-in capital and retained earnings after deducting treasury stock, but excluding minority interests in Subsidiaries) which would appear on the balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Net Worth"
means, without duplication, all Priority Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis eliminating inter-company items.
"Consolidated Priority Indebtedness"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, total assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Total Assets"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, the sum of (a) Consolidated Indebtedness (b) Consolidated Net Worth.
"Consolidated Total Capitalization"
plus
means an event or condition the occurrence or existence of which would, with the lapse of time or the giving of notice or both, become an Event of Default.
"Default"
means, for each Note, that rate of interest stated in clause (b) of the first paragraph of such Note.
"Default Rate"
 
is defined in .
"Disclosure Documents"
Section 5.3
is defined in .
"Disposition"
Section 10.6
means each Subsidiary of the Company which is organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
means, for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of:
"EBITDA"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
means, for any period, EBITDA , to the extent deducted in determining Net Income, Rental Expense.
"EBITDAR"
plus
is defined in .
"Electronic Delivery"
Section 7.1(a)
means any and all Federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including but not limited to those related to Hazardous Materials.
"Environmental Laws"
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"ERISA"
means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that is treated as a single employer together with the Company under Section 414 of the Code.
"ERISA Affiliate"
 
is defined in .
"Event of Default"
Section 11
means, as of any date the same is to be determined, all cash on the books of the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries which is maintained in accounts located in the United States of America and which is in excess of $25,000,000, but excluding restricted cash as set forth in the financial statements of the Company delivered pursuant to .
"Excess Cash"
Section 7.1
means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Exchange Act"
means for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of Interest Expense paid or payable in cash for such period and Rental Expense for such period.
"Fixed Charges"
is defined in .
"Form 10-K"
Section 7.1(b)
is defined in .
"Form 10-Q"
Section 7.1(a)
means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect from time to time in the United States of America.
"GAAP"
means Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Bassett"
means Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Benefit"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"Gallagher Risk"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Service"
means:
"Governmental Authority"
(a) the government of
(i) the United States of America or any State or other political subdivision thereof, or
(ii) any other jurisdiction in which the Company or any Subsidiary conducts all or any part of its business, or which asserts jurisdiction over any properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, or
(b) any entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions of, or pertaining to, any such government.
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any obligation (except the endorsement in the ordinary course of business of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection) of such Person guaranteeing or in effect guaranteeing any Indebtedness, dividend
"Guaranty"
 
or other obligation of any other Person in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, including (without limitation) obligations incurred through an agreement, contingent or otherwise, by such Person:
(a) to purchase such Indebtedness or obligation or any property constituting security therefor;
(b) to advance or supply funds (i) for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation, or (ii) to maintain any working capital or other balance sheet condition or any income statement condition of any other Person or otherwise to advance or make available funds for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation;
(c) to lease properties or to purchase properties or services primarily for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation of the ability of any other Person to make payment of the Indebtedness or obligation; or
(d) otherwise to assure the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation against loss in respect thereof.
In any computation of the Indebtedness or other liabilities of the obligor under any Guaranty, the Indebtedness or other obligations that are the subject of such Guaranty shall be assumed to be direct obligations of such obligor.
means any and all pollutants, toxic or hazardous wastes or any other substances, including all substances listed in or regulated in any Environmental Law as posing a hazard to health and safety, the removal of which is required or the generation, manufacture, refining, production, processing, treatment, storage, handling, transportation, transfer, use, disposal, release, discharge, spillage, seepage, or filtration of which is or shall be restricted, regulated, prohibited or penalized by any applicable law including, but not limited to, asbestos, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, petroleum, petroleum products, lead based paint, radon gas or similar restricted, prohibited or penalized substances.
"Hazardous Materials"
means, with respect to any Note, the Person in whose name such Note is registered in the register maintained by the Obligor Agent pursuant to .
"holder"
Section 13.1
means for any Person (without duplication) (a) all indebtedness created, assumed or incurred in any manner by such Person representing money borrowed (including by the issuance of debt securities), (b) all indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than (i) trade accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which are not more than 90 days past due and (ii) obligations to make earn-out payments payable (including at the election of the Company) in capital stock of the Company pursuant to acquisitions by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), (c) all indebtedness secured by any Lien upon property of such Person, whether or not such Person has assumed or become liable for the payment of such indebtedness, (d) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person, (e) all obligations of such Person on or with respect to letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and other extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money, excluding, in each case, indebtedness which is non-recourse to such Person and its subsidiaries and (f) any Guaranty of such Person with respect to liabilities of a type described in any of clauses (a) through (e) hereof.
"Indebtedness"
 
"" is defined in .
INHAM Exemption
Section 6.2(e)
means (a) any purchaser of a Note, (b) any holder of a Note holding (together with one or more of its Affiliates) more than 5% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding, (c) any bank, trust company, savings and loan association or other financial institution, any pension plan, any investment company, any insurance company, any broker or dealer, or any other similar financial institution or entity, regardless of legal form, and (d) any Related Fund of any holder of any Note.
"Institutional Investor"
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to Capitalized Lease Obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period (after eliminating intercompany items) determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Interest Expense"
is defined in .
"Investment Grade Rating"
Section 8.7(f)
means a joinder agreement substantially in the form of .
"Joinder Agreement"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any mortgage, lien, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance, or any interest or title of any vendor, lessor, lender or other secured party to or of such Person under any conditional sale or other title retention agreement or Capital Lease, upon or with respect to any property or asset of such Person (including in the case of stock, stockholder agreements, voting trust agreements and all similar arrangements).
"Lien"
is defined in .
"Make-Whole Amount"
Section 8.6
means material in relation to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
"Material"
means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes, or (c) the ability of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than the Company) to perform its obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, when taken together with the Company's ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes and the other Subsidiary Guarantors' and the Obligors' (other than the Company) ability to perform their obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, or (d) the validity or enforceability against the Company of this Agreement or the Notes or (e) the validity or enforceability against the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Obligors (other than the Company), taken as a whole, of any Subsidiary Guaranty and this Agreement and the Notes.
"Material Adverse Effect"
means a Subsidiary of the Company whose assets represent more than 5% of the Consolidated Total Assets.
"Material Subsidiary"
 
means any Plan that is a "multiemployer plan" (as such term is defined in section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA).
"Multiemployer Plan"
means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any successor thereto.
"NAIC"
"".
NAIC Annual Statement
is defined in
Section 6.2(a)
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the net income (or net loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period as computed on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, and, without limiting the foregoing, after deduction from gross income of all expenses and reserves, including reserves for all taxes on or measured by income.
"Net Income"
means, with respect to any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of the assets or property of any Person, an amount equal to the (a) aggregate amount of the value of the consideration received by such Person in respect thereof (the value of any consideration which is not cash to be determined in good faith by a Senior Financial Officer) (b) the sum of (i) all out-of-pocket costs and expenses actually incurred by such Person and its Affiliates in connection with such sale, lease, transfer or other disposition and (ii) all state, federal or foreign taxes incurred or to be incurred by such Person or its Affiliates (assuming the highest marginal rate were applicable thereto) in connection therewith.
"net proceeds"
minus
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Notes"
and are defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement and shall include any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of ; that the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Section 9.7
provided
Section 10.5
means, the Company, as agent and attorney-in-fact for the other Obligors pursuant to of this Agreement.
"Obligor Agent"
Section 22.10
means a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer or of any other officer of the Company or an Obligor, as the case may be, whose responsibilities extend to the subject matter of such certificate.
"Officer's Certificate"
means, as to any Person, any lease of property (whether real, personal or mixed) by such Person as lessee that is not a Capital Lease.
"Operating Lease"
means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA or any successor thereto.
"PBGC"
is defined in .
"Permitted Lien"
Section 10.4
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization, business entity or Governmental Authority.
"Person"
 
means an "employee benefit plan" (as defined in section 3(3) of ERISA) subject to Title I of ERISA that is or, within the preceding five years, has been established or maintained, or to which contributions are or, within the preceding five years, have been made or required to be made, by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate or with respect to which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate may have any liability.
"Plan"
means, without duplication (a) any Indebtedness of the Company or a Subsidiary secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of and (b) any Indebtedness of the Company's Subsidiaries; that there shall be excluded from any calculation of Priority Indebtedness: (i) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of ), (ii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary of the Company, (iii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary outstanding on the date of Closing and described on hereto and any extension, renewal or refunding of any such Indebtedness, and (iv) the Indebtedness of any Person which becomes a Subsidiary after the date of Closing and any extension, renewal or refunding thereof; that such Indebtedness was not incurred in contemplation of such Person becoming a Subsidiary.
"Priority Indebtedness"
Section 10.4(l)
provided
Section 10.4(l)
Schedule 5.15(a)
provided
or means any interest in any kind of property or asset, whether real, personal or mixed, or tangible or intangible.
"property"
"properties"
is defined in .
"Proposed Prepayment Date"
Section 8.7(b)
is defined in .
"PTE"
Section 6.2(a)
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Purchaser"
means Prohibited Transaction Class Exemption 84-14 issued by the United States Department of Labor, as amended effective November 3, 2010.
"QPAM Exemption"
means any Person who is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of such term as set forth in Rule 144A(a)(1) under the Securities Act.
"Qualified Institutional Buyer"
means, with respect to any holder of any Note, any fund or entity that (a) invests in Securities or bank loans, and (b) is advised or managed by such holder, the same investment advisor as such holder or by an Affiliate of such holder or such investment advisor.
"Related Fund"
means, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries for any period, the aggregate amounts payable with respect to Operating Leases of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Rental Expense"
means, at any time, the holders of at least 66% in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding (exclusive of Notes then owned by an Obligor or any of its Affiliates).
"Required Holders"
means any Senior Financial Officer and any other officer of the Company with responsibility for the administration of the relevant portion of this Agreement.
"Responsible Officer"
 
means Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"RPS"
shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, or any successor thereto.
"SEC"
or shall have the same meaning as in Section 2(1) of the Securities Act.
"Securities"
"Security"
means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Securities Act"
means the chief financial officer, chief accounting officer or treasurer of the Company.
"Senior Financial Officer"
means all Indebtedness of the Company which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other Indebtedness of the Company.
"Senior Indebtedness"
is defined in .
"Series D Notes"
Section 1
is defined in .
"Series E Notes"
Section 1
is defined in .
"Source"
Section 6.2
means, as to any Person, any other Person in which such first Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries owns sufficient equity or voting interests to enable it or them (as a group) ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, to elect a majority of the directors (or Persons performing similar functions) of such second Person, and any partnership or joint venture if more than a 50% interest in the profits or capital thereof is owned by such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries (unless such partnership can and does ordinarily take major business actions without the prior approval of such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries). Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to a "Subsidiary" is a reference to a Subsidiary of the Company.
"Subsidiary"
means any Subsidiary which is required to deliver a Subsidiary Guaranty in compliance with the requirements of .
"Subsidiary Guarantor"
Section 9.7
means a guaranty substantially in the form of (as the same may be amended from time to time).
"Subsidiary Guaranty"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
means the Securities Valuation Office of the NAIC or any successor to such Office.
"SVO"
means United States Public Law 107-56, Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism (USA P A) Act of 2001, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"USA Patriot Act"
ATRIOT
CT
 
means Securities of any class or classes of a Person, the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to elect the corporate directors (or persons performing similar functions) of such Person.
"Voting Stock"
means, at any time, any Subsidiary of which all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (other than directors' qualifying shares as required by law) or other equity interests are owned by any one or more of the Company and the Company's other Wholly-owned Subsidiaries.
"Wholly-owned Subsidiary"
 
1. Current Report on Form 8-K of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. furnished to the SEC on February 1, 2011
2. Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, as filed by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. with the SEC on February 7, 2011
In the following list of subsidiaries of the Company, those companies which are indented represent subsidiaries of the corporation under which they are indented. Except for directors' qualifying shares, 100% of the voting stock of each of the subsidiaries listed below, other than those indicated by footnote, is owned of record or beneficially by its indicated parent.
 
 
 
 
 
As noted in Schedule 5.4(a)(i), 76% of the common stock of SEG Insurance Ltd., a corporation organized under the laws of Bermuda, is owned by two third parties.
The Company owns 38.5% of the common stock of CGM Group Limited, a corporation headquartered in St. Lucia.
According to Amendment No. 2 to a Schedule 13G filing with the SEC on February 11, 2010, Capital Research Global Investors owns 10,955,920 shares of the common stock of the Company, which represented 10.3% of the outstanding common stock of the Company as of September 30, 2010.
Directors:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
William L. Bax
Frank E. English, Jr.
Ilene S. Gordon
Elbert O. Hand
David S. Johnson
Kay W. McCurdy
Norman L. Rosenthal
James R. Wimmer
Senior Officers:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer
Walter D. Bay, Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
James W. Durkin, Jr., Vice President
James S. Gault, Vice President
Douglas K. Howell, Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Scott R. Hudson, Vice President
Susan E. McGrath, Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer
David E. McGurn, Jr., Vice President
None.
None.
1. The financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries contained in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.
 
 
 
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois)
Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC
Risk Placement Services, Inc.
Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc.
Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc.
Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc.
Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company
 
1. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of November 30, 2009, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
2. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of February 10, 2011, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
1. Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010, among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., as Borrower, the other Borrowers named therein, the several financial institutions from time to time party to the Agreement, as Lenders, Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A., Citibank N.A. and Barclays Bank PLC, as Co-Syndication Agents, and JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. and U.S. Bank National Association, as Documentation Agent.
2. 6.26% Amended and Restated Senior Notes, Series A, due August 3, 2014
3. 6.44% Amended and Restated Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017
4. Amended and Restated Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 19, 2007, among the Obligors and the Noteholders named therein.
5. 5.85% Senior Notes, Series C, due November 30, 2019
6. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of November 30, 2009, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
7. 5.18% Senior Notes, Series D, due February 10, 2021
8. 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023
9. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of February 10, 2011, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
 
F V R, the undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally, hereby promise to pay to , or registered assigns, the principal sum of D (or so much thereof as shall not have been prepaid) on February 10, 2021 with interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months) on the unpaid balance hereof at the rate of (a) 5.18% per annum from the date hereof payable semi-annually on the 10
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
                                        
                                        
OLLARS
th
day of February and August in each year commencing with the February 10 or August 10 next succeeding the date hereof, until the principal shall have become due and payable, and (b) to the extent permitted by law, on any overdue payment of principal, on any overdue payment of interest and, during the continuance of an Event of Default, on such unpaid balance and on any overdue payment of any Make-Whole Amount, at a rate per annum from time to time equal to 7.18% payable semiannually as aforesaid (or, at the option of the registered holder hereof, on demand).
Payments of principal of, interest on and any Make-Whole Amount with respect to this Note are to be made in lawful money of the United States of America at Chicago, Illinois or at such other place as the Company shall have designated by written notice to the holder of this Note as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement referred to below.
This Note is one of a series of Senior Notes (herein called the ) issued pursuant to the Note Purchase Agreement dated as February 10, 2011 (as from time to time amended, the ), among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein and is entitled to the benefits thereof. Each holder of this Note will be deemed, by its acceptance hereof, to have (i) agreed to the confidentiality provisions set forth in of the Note
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
Section 20
 
Purchase Agreement and (ii) made the representations set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and, in addition, in the case of a transferee, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption. Unless otherwise indicated, capitalized terms used in this Note shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 6
This Note is a registered Note and, as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer, duly endorsed, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed, by the registered holder hereof or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing, a new Note for a like principal amount will be issued to, and registered in the name of, the transferee. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment and for all other purposes, and the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor will not be affected by any notice to the contrary.
This Note is subject to optional prepayment, in whole or from time to time in part, at the times and on the terms specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, but not otherwise.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the principal of this Note may be declared or otherwise become due and payable in the manner, at the price (including any applicable Make-Whole Amount) and with the effect provided in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Pursuant to of the Note Purchase Agreement, an Obligor (other than the Company) may from time to time be discharged and released from its obligations under this Note on the terms and with the effect specified in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 2.2
 
This Note shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the Obligors and the holder of this Note shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
 
 
 
F V R, the undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally, hereby promise to pay to , or registered assigns, the principal sum of D (or so much thereof as shall not have been prepaid) on February 10, 2023 with interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months) on the unpaid balance hereof at the rate of (a) 5.49% per annum from the date hereof payable semi-annually on the 10
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
                                        
                                        
OLLARS
th
day of February and August in each year commencing with the February 10 or August 10 next succeeding the date hereof, until the principal shall have become due and payable, and (b) to the extent permitted by law, on any overdue payment of principal, on any overdue payment of interest and, during the continuance of an Event of Default, on such unpaid balance and on any overdue payment of any Make-Whole Amount, at a rate per annum from time to time equal to 7.49% payable semiannually as aforesaid (or, at the option of the registered holder hereof, on demand).
Payments of principal of, interest on and any Make-Whole Amount with respect to this Note are to be made in lawful money of the United States of America at Chicago, Illinois or at such other place as the Company shall have designated by written notice to the holder of this Note as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement referred to below.
This Note is one of a series of Senior Notes (herein called the ) issued pursuant to the Note Purchase Agreement dated as February 10, 2011 (as from time to time amended, the ), among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein and is entitled to the benefits thereof. Each holder of this Note will be deemed, by its acceptance hereof, to have (i) agreed to the confidentiality provisions set forth in of the Note
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
Section 20
 
Purchase Agreement and (ii) made the representations set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and, in addition, in the case of a transferee, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption. Unless otherwise indicated, capitalized terms used in this Note shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 6
This Note is a registered Note and, as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer, duly endorsed, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed, by the registered holder hereof or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing, a new Note for a like principal amount will be issued to, and registered in the name of, the transferee. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment and for all other purposes, and the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor will not be affected by any notice to the contrary.
This Note is subject to optional prepayment, in whole or from time to time in part, at the times and on the terms specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, but not otherwise.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the principal of this Note may be declared or otherwise become due and payable in the manner, at the price (including any applicable Make-Whole Amount) and with the effect provided in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Pursuant to of the Note Purchase Agreement, an Obligor (other than the Company) may from time to time be discharged and released from its obligations under this Note on the terms and with the effect specified in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 2.2
 
This Note shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the Obligors and the holder of this Note shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
 
 
To the Purchasers Listed
on Schedule I hereto
 
$50,000,000 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as counsel to (i) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), (ii) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (""), (iii) Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), (iv) Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), (v) Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vi) Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vii) Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), and (viii) Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation ("", and, collectively with the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit and Gallagher Risk, the ""), in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of that certain Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ""), among the Purchasers listed on Schedule I hereto (the "") and the Obligors, pursuant to which the Obligors are issuing to the Purchasers (i) $75,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.18% Senior Notes, Series D, due February 10, 2021 (the "") and (ii) $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023 (the "," and, together with the Series D Notes, the ""). This opinion letter is being delivered to you at the request of the Obligors pursuant to Section 4.4(a) of the Agreement.
Company
AJG Illinois
AJG Brokerage
RPS
Gallagher Bassett
Gallagher Benefit
Gallagher Risk
Gallagher Service
Obligors
Agreement
Purchasers
Series D Notes
Series E Notes
Notes
In connection with this opinion letter, we have examined originals, or copies certified or otherwise identified to our satisfaction, of:
 
 
 
We also have examined originals, or copies of originals certified to our satisfaction, of such agreements, documents, certificates and other statements of government officials and other instruments, have examined such questions of law and have satisfied ourselves as to such matters
 
of fact as we have considered relevant and necessary as a basis for this opinion letter. We have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the legal capacity of all natural persons, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals and the conformity with the original documents of all documents submitted to us as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission.
Based on and subject to the foregoing and the other limitations, qualifications, exceptions and assumptions set forth herein, this will advise you that in the opinion of the undersigned:
1. The Agreement constitutes a valid and binding obligation of each Obligor, enforceable against each Obligor in accordance with its terms.
2. The Notes, when delivered to and paid for by the Purchasers in accordance with the terms of the Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of each Obligor, enforceable against each Obligor in accordance with their respective terms.
3. Assuming the accuracy of the representations and warranties and compliance with the agreements of the Obligors and the Purchasers in the Agreement, it is not necessary, in connection with the offer and sale of the Notes by the Obligors to the Purchasers in the manner contemplated by the Agreement, to register the Notes under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or to qualify an indenture under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
4. Based upon the Officer's Certificate of the Company dated the date hereof and attached hereto, the issuance of the Notes in accordance with the provisions of and as contemplated by the Agreement do not violate Regulation U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
As to facts relevant to the opinions expressed herein, we have relied, without independent investigation or verification, upon, and assumed the accuracy and completeness of, the representations and warranties made in the Agreement and upon certificates and oral and written statements of officers of the Obligors.
The foregoing opinions are subject to the following qualifications, exceptions, assumptions and limitations:
A. The foregoing opinions are limited to matters arising under the federal laws of the United States of America and the laws of the State of Illinois. We express no opinion as to the laws, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction, or as to the municipal laws or the laws, rules or regulations of any local agencies or governmental authorities of or within the State of Illinois, or in each case as to any matters arising thereunder or relating thereto.
B. Our opinions in paragraph 1 and 2 above are subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance, fraudulent transfer and other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors generally and to general principles of equity (whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), including concepts of commercial reasonableness, good faith and fair dealing and the possible unavailability of specific performance or injunctive relief.
C. We express no opinion as to any provision of any instrument, agreement or other document regarding severability of the provisions thereof.
 
D. With respect to the Agreement and the Notes (collectively, the ""), we have assumed, to the extent relevant to the opinions set forth herein, that (i) each party to such Transaction Document (if not a natural person) was duly formed or organized, as the case may be, and was at all relevant times and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation or organization, as the case may be, and had at all relevant times and has the full right, power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under such Transaction Document, (ii) such Transaction Document has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by each party thereto, (iii) such Transaction Document was at all relevant times and is the valid, binding and enforceable agreement or obligation, as the case may be, of each party thereto in accordance with its terms, provided that we make no such assumption in this clause (iii) insofar as such matters relate to any of the Obligors and is expressly covered by our opinions in paragraph 1 or 2 above, and (iv) the terms and provisions of such Transaction Document do not, and the execution, delivery and performance thereof by each of the parties to such Transaction Document do not and will not, violate the respective organizational documents of any of the parties to such Transaction Document or any law, order or decree of any court, administrative agency or other governmental authority binding on any such party, or result in a breach of or cause a default under any contract, instrument or agreement to which each party to such Transaction Document is a party or by which any such party is bound.
Transaction Documents
This opinion letter is being rendered and delivered solely to and for the benefit of the persons to whom it is addressed in connection with the matters described above; accordingly, it may not be quoted or otherwise delivered to or relied upon by any other person or used for any other purpose without our prior written consent. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence: (i) you may make available a copy of this opinion letter to any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over you (as well as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) or any prospective purchaser of the Notes that is an Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement), provided that such recipient shall not be entitled to rely on this opinion letter; and (ii) any Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement) who purchases a Note may rely on this opinion letter as of the date hereof (and any reliance after the date hereof shall not be deemed to be an updating or re-delivery of the opinions expressed in this opinion letter). We assume no obligation to notify you or any such Institutional Investor or to supplement this opinion letter to reflect any facts or circumstances which may hereafter come to our attention with respect to the opinions expressed herein, including any changes in applicable law which may hereafter occur.
Very truly yours,
 
N Y L I C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
I S A (BOLI 30C)
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
T P I C A
HE
RUDENTIAL
NSURANCE
OMPANY
OF
MERICA
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, IL 60601
RGA R C
EINSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, IL 60601
MTL I C
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, IL 60601
 
To the Purchasers Listed
on Schedule I hereto
 
$50,000,000 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023
Ladies and Gentlemen:
I am General Counsel of (i) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), (ii) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (""), (iii) Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), (iv) Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), (v) Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vi) Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vii) Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), and (viii) Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation ("", and, collectively with the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit and Gallagher Risk, the ""), in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of that certain Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ""), among the Purchasers listed on hereto (the "") and the Obligors, pursuant to which the Obligors are issuing to the Purchasers (i) $75,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.18% Senior Notes, Series D, due February 10, 2021 (the "") and (ii) $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023 (the "," and, together with the Series D Notes, the ""). This opinion letter is being delivered to you pursuant to Section 4.4(b) of the Agreement.
Company
AJG Illinois
AJG Brokerage
RPS
Gallagher Bassett
Gallagher Benefit
Gallagher Risk
Gallagher Service
Obligors
Agreement
Schedule I
Purchasers
Series D Notes
Series E Notes
Notes
I have reviewed the following documents and all exhibits thereto for the purposes of rendering the opinions expressed herein:
 
 
 
I have also examined originals, or copies of originals certified to my satisfaction, of such agreements, documents, certificates and other statements of government officials and other instruments, have examined such questions of law and have satisfied myself as to such matters of
 
fact as I have deemed relevant and necessary as a basis for this opinion letter. I have assumed the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals, the conformity with the original documents of all documents submitted to me as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission for my examination and the legal capacity of all natural persons.
Based on and subject to the foregoing and the other limitations, qualifications, exceptions and assumptions set forth herein, this will advise you that in the opinion of the undersigned:
1. The Company is validly existing as a corporation and is in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. The Company has the corporate power and authority to execute and perform its obligations under the Agreement and to issue the Notes and has the corporate power and authority to conduct the activities in which it is now engaged and is duly licensed or qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation in each jurisdiction in which the character of the properties owned or leased by it or the nature of the business transacted by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed, qualified or in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
2. Each Obligor other than the Company is validly existing as a corporation or limited liability company and is in good standing under the laws of its state of incorporation or formation. Each Obligor other than the Company has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to execute and perform its obligations under the Agreement and has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to conduct the activities in which it is now engaged and is duly licensed or qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation or limited liability company in each jurisdiction in which the character of the properties owned or leased by it or the nature of the business transacted by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed, qualified or in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or limited liability company interests of each Obligor other than the Company have been duly issued, are (in the case of shares of capital stock) fully paid and non-assessable and are owned by the Company, by one or more subsidiaries of the Company, or by the Company and one or more of its subsidiaries, free and clear of any lien, mortgage, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance.
3. All necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of each Obligor has been taken to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of the Agreement by such Obligor, and the Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Obligor.
4. All necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of each Obligor has been taken to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of the Notes by such Obligor, and the Notes have been duly executed and delivered by each Obligor.
5. No consent, approval, authorization or other order of any federal regulatory body, federal administrative agency or other federal governmental body of the United States of America or any state regulatory body, state administrative agency or other state governmental body is required under Applicable Laws for execution, delivery or performance of the Agreement or the Notes by the Obligors or the issuance and sale of the Notes to the Purchasers as contemplated by the
 
Agreement. As used in this opinion letter, "" means the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, those state laws of the State of Illinois and those federal laws of the United States of America which a lawyer in the relevant jurisdiction exercising customary diligence would reasonably recognize as being applicable to transactions of the type contemplated by the Agreement; provided, that the term "Applicable Laws" shall not include federal or state securities or blue sky laws (including, without limitation, the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended or the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or in each case any rules or regulations thereunder).
Applicable Laws
6. The execution and delivery by each Obligor of the Agreement and the Notes do not, and the performance by each Obligor of the Agreement and the Notes (including the issuance and sale of the Notes) will not, (i) violate the certificate or articles of incorporation, certificate of formation, by-laws or limited liability company agreement, as applicable, of such Obligor, (ii) result in a violation by such Obligor of any of the terms and provisions of any Applicable Laws or (iii) result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any lien or encumbrance in respect of any property of such Obligor under, any agreement or other instrument known to me to which such Obligor is a party or by which such Obligor may be bound, including, without limitation, the agreements set forth in Schedule 5.15(c) to the Agreement.
7. No Obligor is an "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an "investment company" under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
8. To my knowledge after due inquiry, except as disclosed in the Company's reports, documents or other materials filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, there are no legal, governmental or regulatory investigations, actions, suits or proceedings pending to which any Obligor is a party or to which any property of any Obligor is the subject which, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to have a materially adverse effect on the business or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or which would impair the ability of the Obligors to issue and deliver the Notes or to comply with the provisions of the Agreement or the Notes or which challenges the legal, valid and binding nature of the Agreement or the Notes; and to my knowledge, no such investigations, actions, suits or proceedings are threatened or contemplated by any governmental or regulatory authority or threatened by others.
As to facts relevant to the opinions expressed herein, I have reviewed originals of each of the Agreement and the Notes (collectively, the "") and have relied, without independent investigation or verification, upon, and assumed the accuracy and completeness of, the representations and warranties made in the Agreement.
Relevant Documents
I am the Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, and I am delivering this opinion letter only in such capacity.
This opinion letter is subject to the following qualifications:
(A) In rendering the opinions set forth in paragraphs 1 and 2 above with respect to the Obligors' valid existence and good standing and license or qualification to transact business as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as applicable, I have relied solely on certificates of government officials, in each case as of a recent date prior to the date hereof.
 
(B) I express no opinion in paragraph 6(iii) above as to any breach of or default under any financial covenant or any provision requiring a mathematical, accounting or financial computation or determination.
(C) Any opinion herein which is expressed to be "to my knowledge" or "known to me" or is otherwise qualified by words of like import means that I have no actual knowledge of any facts or information contrary to such opinion. I have not undertaken any independent investigation, beyond that mentioned in paragraph 8 of this opinion letter, to determine the accuracy of any such facts or information, and no inference as to my knowledge of any matters bearing on the accuracy of any such facts or information should be drawn solely from the fact of my employment by the Company or the rendering of this opinion letter.
(D) This opinion letter is limited to matters arising under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, the laws of the State of Illinois and the federal laws of the United States of America. I express no opinion as to the laws, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction or, in the case of Delaware, any other Delaware laws, rules or regulations, or as to the municipal laws or the laws, rules or regulations of any local agencies or governmental authorities of or within the State of Illinois, or in each case as to any matters arising thereunder or relating thereto. I express no opinion as to matters relating to securities or blue sky laws of any jurisdiction.
This opinion letter is being rendered and delivered solely to and for the benefit of the persons to whom it is addressed in connection with the matters described above; accordingly, it may not be quoted or otherwise delivered to or relied upon by any other person or used for any other purpose without my prior written consent. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence: (i) you may make available a copy of this opinion letter to any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over you (as well as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) or any prospective purchaser of the Notes that is an Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement), provided that such recipient shall not be entitled to rely on this opinion letter; and (ii) any Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement) who purchases a Note may rely on this opinion letter as of the date hereof (and any reliance after the date hereof shall not be deemed to be an updating or re-delivery of the opinions expressed in this opinion letter). I assume no obligation to notify you or any such Institutional Investor or to supplement this opinion letter to reflect any facts or circumstances which may hereafter come to my attention with respect to the opinions expressed herein, including any changes in applicable law which may hereafter occur.
 
 
N Y L I C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A (BOLI 30C)
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
T P I C A
HE
RUDENTIAL
NSURANCE
OMPANY
OF
MERICA
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, IL 60601
RGA R C
EINSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, IL 60601
MTL I C
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, IL 60601
 
The closing opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP, special counsel to the Purchasers, called for by Section 4.4(c) of the Agreement, shall be dated the date of the Closing and addressed to the Purchasers, shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Purchasers and shall be to the effect that:
1. The Company is a corporation validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
2. Each Obligor other than the Company is validly existing as a corporation or limited liability company and is in good standing under the laws of its state of incorporation or formation.
3. The Company and each other Obligor has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under the Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance thereof by the Company and each other Obligor has been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of the Company and each other Obligor, as the case may be, and the Agreement and the Notes have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each of the other Obligors.
4. The Agreement and the Notes constitute the legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company and each other Obligor enforceable against such Person in accordance with its terms.
5. In view of the circumstances surrounding the sale and delivery of the Notes and on the basis of the representations made by the Company and each other Obligor in Section 5.13 of the Agreement and by you in Section 6.1 of the Agreement, it is not necessary in connection with the offering, issuance and delivery of the Notes under the circumstance contemplated by the Agreement to register the Notes under the Securities Act or to qualify and indenture in respect of the Notes under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended and now in effect.
The opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP shall also state that the opinions of Sidley Austin LLP and Walter D. Bay, General Counsel of the Company, are each satisfactory in scope and form to Schiff Hardin LLP and that, in their opinion, the Purchasers are justified in relying thereon.
In rendering the opinion set forth in paragraphs 1 and 2 above, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely, as to matters referred to in paragraphs 1 and 2, solely upon an examination of certificates of government officials, in each case as of a recent date prior to the date hereof. In rendering the opinion set forth in paragraph 3 above, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely upon the opinions of Sidley Austin LLP and Walter D. Bay, General Counsel of the Company. The opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP is limited to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, the laws of the State of Illinois and the federal laws of the United States of America.
 
With respect to matters of fact upon which such opinion is based, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely on appropriate certificates of public officials and officers of the Obligors and upon representations of the Obligors and the Purchasers delivered in connection with the issuance and sale of the Notes.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This G A dated as of , (the or this ) is entered into on a joint and several basis by each of the undersigned (which parties are hereinafter referred to individually as a and collectively as the ).
UARANTY
GREEMENT
                    
        
"Guaranty"
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
A. Each Guarantor is a Subsidiary (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ).
"Company"
B. For the purpose set forth in Section 5.14 thereof, the Company has entered into that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of February 10, 2011 (the ) among the Company, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement, hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ) and each of the purchasers named on Schedule A thereto (the ; the Initial Note Purchasers, together with their successors, assigns or any other future holder of the Notes (as hereinafter defined), the ), providing for, inter alia, the issue and sale by the Company to the Initial Note Purchasers of (i) $75,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.18% Senior Notes, Series D, due February 10, 2021 (the "") and (ii) $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023 (the ", together with the Series D Notes, the "").
"Note Purchase Agreement"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
"Initial Note Purchasers"
"Holders"
Series D Notes
"Series E Notes
Notes
C. The Initial Note Purchasers have required as a condition to their purchase of the Notes that the Company cause each Subsidiary that after the date of Closing delivers a guaranty pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement to enter into this Guaranty, as security for the Notes. The Company owns 100% of the equity interests of the Guarantors.
D. Each of the Guarantors has derived substantial direct and indirect benefit from the sale of the Notes to the Initial Note Purchasers.
 
N, , as required by Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement and in consideration of the premises and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency whereof are hereby acknowledged, each Guarantor does hereby covenant and agree, jointly and severally, as follows:
OW
THEREFORE
 
Capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Note Purchase Agreement unless herein defined or the context shall otherwise require.
 
(a) Subject to the limitation set forth in hereof, each Guarantor jointly and severally does hereby irrevocably, absolutely and unconditionally guarantee unto the Holders: (1) the full and prompt payment of the principal of, premium (including, without limitation, any Make-Whole Amount), if any, and interest on the Notes and any other amounts from time to time outstanding under the Note Purchase Agreement or the Notes, as and when such payments shall become due and payable whether by lapse of time, upon redemption or prepayment, by extension or by acceleration or declaration or otherwise (including (to the extent legally enforceable) interest due on overdue payments of principal, premium, if any, or interest at the rate set forth in the Notes and interest accruing at the then applicable rate provided in the Notes after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy, or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding, relating to an Obligor, whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding) in Federal or other immediately available funds of the United States of America which at the time of payment or demand therefor shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, (2) the full and prompt performance and observance by the Obligors of each and all of the obligations, covenants and agreements required to be performed or owed by the Obligors under the terms of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and (3) the full and prompt payment, upon demand by any Holder, of all costs and expenses, legal or otherwise (including reasonable attorneys' fees), if any, as shall have been expended or incurred in the protection or enforcement of any rights, privileges or liabilities in favor of the Holders under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or under this Guaranty or in any consultation or action in connection therewith or herewith and in each and every case irrespective of the validity, regularity, or enforcement of any of the Notes or Note Purchase Agreement or any of the terms thereof or any other like circumstance or circumstances.
Section 2(b)
(b) The liability of each Guarantor under this Guaranty shall not exceed an amount equal to a maximum amount as will, after giving effect to such maximum amount and all other liabilities of such Guarantor, contingent or otherwise, result in the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder not constituting a fraudulent transfer, obligation or conveyance.
 
This is a guarantee of payment and performance and each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to require that any action on or in respect of any Note or the Note Purchase Agreement be brought against an Obligor or any other Person or that resort be had to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other
 
remedy. Any Holder may, at its option, proceed hereunder against any Guarantor in the first instance to collect monies when due, the payment of which is guaranteed hereby, without first proceeding against an Obligor or any other Person and without first resorting to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. The liability of each Guarantor hereunder shall in no way be affected or impaired by any acceptance by any Holder of any direct or indirect security for, or other guaranties of, any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or any other Person to any Holder or by any failure, delay, neglect or omission by any Holder to realize upon or protect any such guarantees, Indebtedness, liability or obligation or any notes or other instruments evidencing the same or any direct or indirect security therefor or by any approval, consent, waiver, or other action taken, or omitted to be taken by any such Holder.
The covenants and agreements on the part of the Guarantors herein contained shall take effect as joint and several covenants and agreements, and references to the Guarantors shall take effect as references to each of them and none of them shall be released from liability hereunder by reason of the guarantee ceasing to be binding as a continuing security on any other of them.
 
(a) Each Guarantor hereby consents and agrees that any Holder or Holders from time to time, with or without any further notice to or assent from any other Guarantor may, without in any manner affecting the liability of any Guarantor under this Guaranty, and upon such terms and conditions as any such Holder or Holders may deem advisable:
(1) extend in whole or in part (by renewal or otherwise), modify, change, compromise, release or extend the duration of the time for the performance or payment of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of any Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligations of such Obligor on the Notes, or waive any Default or Event of Default with respect thereto, or waive, modify, amend or change any provision of any other agreement or this Guaranty; or
(2) sell, release, surrender, modify, impair, exchange or substitute any and all property, of any nature and from whomsoever received, held by, or for the benefit of, any such Holder as direct or indirect security for the payment or performance of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes; or
(3) settle, adjust or compromise any claim of an Obligor against any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes.
Each Guarantor hereby ratifies and confirms any such extension, renewal, change, sale, release, waiver, surrender, exchange, modification, amendment, impairment, substitution, settlement, adjustment or compromise and that the same shall be binding upon it, and hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any and all defenses, counterclaims or offsets which it might or could have by reason thereof, it being understood that such Guarantor shall at all times be bound by this Guaranty and remain liable hereunder.
 
(b) Each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of acceptance of this Guaranty by the Holders or of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such Holders upon this Guaranty (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in hereof shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Guaranty);
Section 2
(2) demand of payment by any Holder from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any Holder or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Guarantor.
The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty and the rights of any Holder to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under the Note Purchase Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
(c) The obligations of the Guarantors hereunder shall be binding upon the Guarantors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due pursuant to Section 2 shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Guarantors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of the Obligors, any other Guarantors or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of the Obligors to issue the Notes or the Obligors to execute and deliver the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or of any other Guarantors to execute and deliver this Guaranty or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of the Obligors or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
 
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person; or
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other force majeure, whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or this Guaranty, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Guarantor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Guaranty; or
 
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Guarantor of failure of an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor, any other Guarantor or to any other Person or to any other guaranty or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other guaranty, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any release of any other Guarantor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Guarantor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Guarantor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Guarantor or other Person under this Guaranty or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Guaranty and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Guarantor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become
provided
 
due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement and that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
(d) All rights of any Holder may be transferred or assigned at any time and shall be considered to be transferred or assigned at any time or from time to time upon the transfer of such Note whether with or without the consent of or notice to the Guarantors under this Guaranty or to the Obligors.
(e) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, the Guarantors shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holder or Holders upon whose Notes such payment was made, but each Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of subrogation shall be junior and subordinate in right of payment to the prior indefeasible final payment in cash in full of all amounts due and owing by the Obligors with respect to the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and by the Guarantors under this Guaranty, and the Guarantors shall not take any action to enforce such right of subrogation, and the Guarantors shall not accept any payment in respect of such right of subrogation, until all amounts due and owing by the Obligors under or in respect of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and all amounts due and owing by the Guarantors hereunder have indefeasibly been finally paid in cash in full. If any amount shall be paid to any Guarantor in violation of the preceding sentence at any time prior to the indefeasible payment in cash in full of the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Holders and shall forthwith be paid to the Holders to be credited and applied to the amounts due or to become due with respect to the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, whether matured or unmatured. Each Guarantor acknowledges that it has received direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by the Note Purchase Agreement and that the waiver set forth in this is knowingly made as a result of the receipt of such benefits.
paragraph (e)
(f) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, each Guarantor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Guarantors, but such Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the Holders for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Guarantor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(g) Each Guarantor agrees that to the extent an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person
 
under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Guarantors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Guarantors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any Holder from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
(h) No Holder shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Guarantors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Guarantors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Guarantors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Guarantors' burden, any right to which each Guarantor hereby expressly waives.
(i) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank in right of payment with all other Indebtedness of such Guarantor which is not secured or which is not expressly subordinated in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of such Guarantor.
pari passu
(j) A Guarantor shall be automatically discharged and released from this Guaranty pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
 
Each Guarantor represents and warrants to each Holder that:
(a) Such Guarantor is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (1) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of such Guarantor and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (2) the ability of such Guarantor to perform its obligations under this Guaranty, or (3) the validity or enforceability of this Guaranty (herein in this , a ). Such Guarantor has the power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Guaranty and to perform the provisions hereof.
Section 5
"Material Adverse Effect"
(b) This Guaranty has been duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of such Guarantor, and this Guaranty constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Guarantor enforceable against such Guarantor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (1) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
 
(c) The execution, delivery and performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty will not (1) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries under any material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, charter document or by-law, or any other material agreement or instrument to which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries is bound or by which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective properties may be bound or affected, (2) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or (3) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to the such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries.
(d) No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty.
(e) Such Guarantor is solvent, has capital not unreasonably small in relation to its business or any contemplated or undertaken transaction and has assets having a value both at fair valuation and at present fair salable value greater than the amount required to pay its debts as they become due and greater than the amount that will be required to pay its probable liability on its existing debts as they become absolute and matured. Such Guarantor does not intend to incur, or believe or should have believed that it will incur, debts beyond its ability to pay such debts as they become due. Such Guarantor will not be rendered insolvent by the execution and delivery of, and performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty. Such Guarantor does not intend to hinder, delay or defraud its creditors by or through the execution and delivery of, or performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty.
(f) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Guarantor.
pari passu
 
From and after the date of issuance of the Notes by the Obligors and continuing so long as any amount remains unpaid thereon each Guarantor agrees to comply with the terms and provisions of Sections 9.1, 9.2, 9.3, 9.4, 9.5 and 9.8 of the Note Purchase Agreement, insofar as such provisions apply to such Guarantor, as if said Sections were set forth herein in full.
 
 
(a)
THIS GUARANTY SHALL BE CONSTRUED AND ENFORCED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, AND THE RIGHTS OF THE PARTIES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS, EXCLUDING CHOICE-OF-LAW PRINCIPLES OF THE LAW OF SUCH STATE THAT WOULD PERMIT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF A JURISDICTION OTHER THAN SUCH STATE.
 
(b) Each Guarantor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guaranty. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, such Guarantor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
(c) The parties hereto waive any right to have a jury participate in resolving any dispute, whether sounding in contract, tort, or otherwise, between them arising out of, connected with, related to or incidental to the relationship established between them in connection with this Guaranty, any financing agreement, any loan party document or any other instrument, document or agreement executed or delivered in connection herewith or the transactions related hereto. The parties hereto hereby agree and consent that any such claim, demand, action or cause of action shall be decided by court trial without a jury and that any of them may file an original counterpart or a copy of this Guaranty with any court as written evidence of the consent of the parties hereto to the waiver of their right to trial by jury.
 
 
(a) This Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively), with (and only with) the written consent of each Guarantor and the Required Holders.
(b) The Guarantors will provide each Holder (irrespective of the amount of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such Holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof. The Guarantors will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this Section 10 to each Holder promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the Required Holders.
(c) The Obligors will not directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of fee or otherwise, or grant any security, to any Holder as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any Holder of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted, on the same terms, ratably to each Holder even if such Holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
(d) Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all Holders and is binding upon them and upon each future holder and upon the Guarantors. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant or agreement not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course
Section 10
 
of dealing between the Guarantors and any Holder nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any Holder. As used herein, the term "this Guaranty" and references thereto shall mean this Guaranty as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
(e) Solely for the purpose of determining whether the Holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Guaranty, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Guarantor, any Obligor or any of their respective subsidiaries or Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
 
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(1) if to an Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee, to such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee at the address specified for such communications in Schedule A to the Note Purchase Agreement, or at such other address as such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing,
(2) if to any other Holder, to such Holder at such address as such Holder shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing, or
(3) if to any Guarantor, to such Guarantor c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning of the Note Purchase Agreement to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as such Guarantor shall have specified to the Holders in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 11
 
(a) No remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to any Holder is intended to be exclusive of any other available remedy or remedies, but each and every such remedy shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to every other remedy given under this Guaranty now or hereafter existing at law or in equity. No delay or omission to exercise any right or power accruing upon any default, omission or failure of performance hereunder shall impair any such right or power or shall be construed to be a waiver thereof but any such right or power may be exercised from time to time and as often as may be deemed expedient. In order to entitle any Holder to exercise any remedy reserved to it under the Guaranty, it shall not be necessary for such Holder to physically produce its Note in any proceedings instituted by it or to give any notice, other than such notice as may be herein expressly required.
 
(b) The Guarantors will pay all sums becoming due under this Guaranty by the method and at the address specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, or by such other method or at such other address as any Holder shall have from time to time specified to the Guarantors in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of this Guaranty or any Note.
(c) Any provision of this Guaranty that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
(d) If the whole or any part of this Guaranty shall be now or hereafter become unenforceable against any one or more of the Guarantors for any reason whatsoever or if it is not executed by any one or more of the Guarantors, this Guaranty shall nevertheless be and remain fully binding upon and enforceable against each other Guarantor as if it had been made and delivered only by such other Guarantors.
(e) This Guaranty shall be binding upon each Guarantor and its successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of each Holder and its successors and assigns so long as its Notes remain outstanding and unpaid.
(f) This Guaranty may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
 
To the fullest extent of applicable law, each Guarantor shall indemnify and save each Holder harmless from and against any losses which may arise by virtue of any of the obligations hereby guaranteed being or becoming for any reason whatsoever in whole or in part void, voidable, contrary to law, invalid, ineffective or otherwise unenforceable by the Holder or any of them in accordance with its terms (all of the foregoing collectively, an "Indemnifiable Circumstance"). For greater certainty, these losses shall include without limitation all obligations hereby guaranteed which would have been payable by the Obligors but for the existence of an Indemnifiable Circumstance, net of any withholding or deduction of or on account of any tax; provided, however, that the extent of the Guarantor's aggregate liability under this Section 13 shall not at any time exceed the amount (but for any Indemnifiable Circumstance) otherwise guaranteed pursuant to Section 2.
 
This Guaranty shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to any Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Guaranty by reason of the express provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement or is otherwise released from this Guaranty in accordance with the terms of the Note Purchase Agreement.
 
I W W, the undersigned has caused this Guaranty to be duly executed by an authorized representative as of this day of , .
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
    
                    
        
 
 
 
 
 
 
T J A, dated as of [], is made by [], a [] (the ) in favor of the holders of the Notes (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) under the Note Purchase Agreement (as hereinafter defined).
HIS
OINDER
GREEMENT
            
            
                    
"New Obligor"
A. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, a Delaware corporation (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an , collectively as the ) are parties to that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of February 10, 2011 (as amended, the "") with the Purchasers named therein.
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Existing Obligor"
"Existing Obligors"
Note Purchase Agreement
B. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement, the New Obligor desires to become an obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes.
N T, for and in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement, and other valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, each undersigned hereby consents and agrees as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
1. Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Note Purchase Agreement.
2. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, the New Obligor hereby assumes and agrees to perform all of the terms, restrictions, obligations and conditions of an "Obligor" under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, and, by execution of this Joinder Agreement, is hereby designated an "Obligor" for purposes of, and agrees to be bound by, each and all terms of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes. Without limiting the generality of the forgoing, the New Obligor hereby (a) expressly agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for and assumes all obligations of an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party, and (b) agrees to perform for the holders' benefit and be bound by the terms and covenants applicable to an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party.
3. The undersigned is the duly elected of the New Obligor, a Subsidiary of the Company, and is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Joinder Agreement to each of you. The execution by the undersigned of this Joinder Agreement shall evidence its consent to and acknowledgment and approval of the terms set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement and by such execution the New Obligor shall be deemed to have made in favor of the holders the representations and warranties set forth in Section 5 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
                                        
4. Upon execution of this Joinder Agreement, the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes shall be deemed to be amended as set forth above. Except as amended herein, the terms and provisions of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes are hereby ratified, confirmed and approved in all respects.
5. Any and all notices, requests, certificates and other instruments (including the Notes) may refer to the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes without making specific reference to this Joinder Agreement, but nevertheless all such references shall be deemed to include this Joinder Agreement unless the context shall otherwise require.
6. This Joinder Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument, and any of the parties hereto may execute this Joinder Agreement by signing any such counterpart.
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Joinder Agreement to be executed as of the date and year first above written.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
Each of the undersigned consents to the terms of this Joinder Agreement and reaffirms, ratifies and confirms in all respects each and every obligation and covenant made by it in the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes executed by each of the undersigned in favor of the holders and that the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes remain the legal, valid and binding obligation of the undersigned enforceable against the undersigned in accordance with their terms.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, Ill., February 10, 2011  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today announced that the company has completed a private placement of $125 million of senior unsecured notes. This private placement includes $75 million of Series D notes bearing interest at 5.18% due in 2021, and $50 million of Series E notes bearing interest at 5.49% due in 2023. The company intends to use the net proceeds of the debt transaction to fund acquisitions.
The notes have not been registered under the Securities Act or any state securities laws and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements. This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the notes, nor shall it constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale is unlawful.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 16 countries and does business in over 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
CONTACT: Marsha J. Akin  Investor Relations
(630) 285-3501 
marsha_akin@ajg.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110215163311.txt.gz
TIME:20110215163311
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 9, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., the Company's Chairman, President and CEO, will speak at the annual Bank of America Merrill Lynch Insurance Conference in New York on Wednesday, February 16, 2011 at 11:10 a.m. ET. A copy of the press release, which contains information on how to access the live audio webcast of Mr. Gallagher's presentation, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Mr. Gallagher's presentation, including the presentation slides, will provide a general discussion of the Company's business, discussing both GAAP and a variety of non-GAAP measures. Attached to the presentation slides are exhibits that contain reconciliations of these non-GAAP measures to the most directly related comparable GAAP measures. The presentation slides, including exhibits, are attached hereto as Exhibits 99.2 and 99.3 and can also be accessed at the Company's website at .
www.ajg.com/ir
Mr. Gallagher's presentation, including the exhibits to the presentation slides, will also provide stockholders and other interested persons with information regarding certain financial metrics of the Company's brokerage and risk management segments in 2008, 2009 and 2010. The Company is providing this information to assist such persons in analyzing its historical operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for the Company.
 
In addition to the presentation slides and exhibits attached hereto as Exhibits 99.2 and 99.3, the Company's February 2011 Investment Profile to be distributed to attendees at the Bank of America Merrill Lynch Insurance Conference referenced in Item 2.02 of this report (and which may be used at other investor conferences) is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.4. This exhibit includes certain non-GAAP financial measures. A reconciliation of those measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures can be accessed at the Company's website at .
www.ajg.com/ir
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEWS RELEASE
Itasca, IL, February 9, 2011  J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG), will speak at the annual Bank of America Merrill Lynch Insurance Conference in New York on Wednesday, February 16, 2011 at 11:10 a.m. (ET).
To listen to the live audio webcast of Mr. Gallagher's presentation, log onto the conference Web site at .
https://www.veracast.com/webcasts/baml/insurance2011/id29113130.cfm
A replay of this webcast will be available at the same URL within 24 hours following Mr. Gallagher's presentation and remain archived at the same link through February 25, 2011.
Information distributed during Mr. Gallagher's presentation will also be available on Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.'s Web site at following his presentation.
http://www.ajg.com/presentations
It should be noted that Mr. Gallagher's, or other of our executives', remarks may contain forward-looking statements. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements Mr. Gallagher or other of our executives may make relating to our future results, future income and tax credits generated by our clean-energy facilities, and the future of the insurance or insurance brokerage industries. These forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected, depending on a variety of factors such as changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, and significant uncertainties related to our clean-energy investments. Please refer to our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including Item 1, "Business  Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements" and Item 1A, "Risk Factors", of Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in our forward-looking statements.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 16 countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Contact: Marsha J. Akin-Investor Relations
(630) 285-3501/marsha_akin@ajg.com


Exhibit 99.3
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this presentation, including these exhibits, provide information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, adjusted pretax profit margin, adjusted compensation expense ratio, adjusted operating expense ratio and cash generation. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided.
. Gallagher believes that the adjusted historical presentation of 2008, 2009 and 2010 statements of earnings, presented on the following pages, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher's Brokerage and Risk Management segments that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's historical operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after tax amounts relate to the adjustments were computed using a 40% marginal tax rate.
Adjusted historical presentation
 
 
. Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provide a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are meant to reflect the true operating performance of Gallagher's brokerage business; consequently, they exclude items that could be considered "non-operating" or "non-core" in nature.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
. Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2010 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2009.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
. Gallagher defines this measure as adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to add back stock compensation expense (a non-cash charge) and to deduct capital expenditures, interest paid on corporate debt, corporate overhead expenses and income taxes paid. Gallagher considers cash generation as a way to measure net cash generated from its operations on an ongoing basis.
Cash generation
. These exhibits include tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and cash generation. For organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, please see reconciliations in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010 and in its 2010 quarterly reports on Form 10-Q.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measure
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
The information on this page is being presented to highlight the seasonality of the operating results of the Brokerage segment.
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
Gallagher does not intend to present this adjusted information in the future.
The information on this page is being presented to highlight the seasonality of the operating results of the Brokerage segment.
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on the first page of these exhibits.
 

Exhibit 99.4
 
Exhibit 99.4
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and the world's largest third-party property/casualty (P/C) claims administrator.* Gallagher generates approximately 87% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 13% derived primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada, New Zealand and the United Kingdom.
*According to Business Insurance magazine.
FEBRUARY 2011
Brokerage Segment 2
Brokerage Acquisition Strategy 4
Risk Management Segment 4
Corporate Segment 5
Insurance Market Overview 6
Condensed Financial Information 7
Why Invest? 8
www.ajg.com
As of December 31, 2010 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $29.08
52-week high/low $29.80 - $21.90
Trailing 12-mos. revenues $1.9 billion
Market cap $3.2 billion
Indicated annual dividend $1.32*
Yield 4.5%
Shares outstanding 108.4 million
End of fiscal year December 31
Number of employees 10,736
* On January 27, 2011, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.33 per share first-quarter dividend.
GALLAGHER 3-YEAR STOCK PERFORMANCE
TOTAL RETURNS JANUARY 1, 2008 - DECEMBER 31, 2010
50%
40% AJG 41%
30% 20% 10%
0%
S&P 500
-10% -8% -20%
-30%
-40%
-50%
Mar.-08 Jun.-08 Sept.-08 Dec.-08 Mar.-09 Jun.-09 Sept.-09 Dec.-09 Mar.-10 Jun-10 Sept.-10 Dec.-10
Source for data: BloombergTotal Returns assume dividend reinvestment
AJG S&P 500
Brokerage Risk Corporate
Segment Management Segment
Segment
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 72% OF 2010 REVENUES
Gallagher operates its Brokerage operations through a network of more than 250 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 15 other countries. In addition, Gallagher has developed the Gallagher Optimus Network of independent insurance brokers and consultants that enables it to provide coverage and services to its clients in more than 110 countries around the world.
Retail Insurance Brokerage Operations
79% of 2010 Brokerage Segment Revenues
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property/casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Primary Lines of Coverage
 -  Aviation  -  Errors & Omissions  -  Professional Liability
 -  Casualty  -  Fire  -  Property
 -  Commercial Auto  -  General Liability  -  Retirement Solutions
 -  Dental  -  Life  -  Voluntary Benefits
 -  Directors & Officers Liability  -  Marine  -  Wind
 -  Disability  -  Medical  -  Workers Compensation
 -  Earthquake  -  Product Liability
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into approximately 180 geographic profit centers located primarily throughout the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 66% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
Gallagher's specialized focus on these niche/practice groups allows for highly targeted marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; cross-selling new brokerage products and services to existing customers; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
2
 
Niche/Practice Groups
 -  Agribusiness  -  Habitational  -  Private Equity
 -  Aviation & Aerospace  -  Healthcare  -  Public Entity
 -  Captive Consulting  -  Higher Education  -  Real Estate
 -  Construction  -  Hospitality  -  Religious/Not-for-Profit
 -  Cyber Risk  -  Marine  -  Restaurant
 -  Energy  -  Manufacturing  -  Scholastic
 -  Entertainment  -  Personal  -  Technology/Telecom
 -  Global Risks  -  Professional Groups  -  Transportation
Wholesale Insurance Brokerage Operations
21% of 2010 Brokerage Segment Revenues
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Wholesale revenues are generated from sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurance carrier.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into more than 60 geographic profit centers located primarily in the United States and Bermuda, and through its approved Lloyd's of London broker. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent, handling specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
More than 75% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents who are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency, according to Business Insurance magazine.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of agent and broker clients, by developing new managing general agency programs and through mergers and acquisitions.
Gallagher Optimus Network
The Gallagher Optimus Network is a global alliance of independent broker partners. Optimus Network partners are selected by Gallagher based upon common business philosophies and the partners' strengths and service capabilities within their respective countries. Through the Gallagher Optimus Network and its own international operations, Gallagher offers client-service capabilities in more than 110 countries around the world.
3
 
Brokerage Segment Acquisition Strategy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components: organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated approximately 254 acquisitions from 1985 through 2010, substantially all within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that generate between $1 million and $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through acquisitions and joint ventures, where the company begins its relationship with an equity position.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on:
Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Gallagher believes that growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
25% OF 2010 REVENUES
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims-handling services.
Expertise
 -  Real-time Claims Management  -  Managed Care Services
 -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)  -  Risk Control Services
 -  Appraisal Services  -  Safety Programs
 -  Litigation Management  -  Settlement Management
 -  Information Management  -  Education & Training
4
 
Approximately 69% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-related claims, 27% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims, and 4% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management (employee absence management) programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance, on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the United States, United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 80% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments. In addition, the risk management segment may grow in the future through mergers and acquisitions.
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Gallagher's debt, investment in clean-energy ventures, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs are reported in this segment.
With respect to the clean-energy ventures, Gallagher owns positions in various commercial operations that help several coal-fired utilities eliminate large quantities of harmful emissions.
Although Gallagher expects to have them in production by third or fourth quarter of 2011, Gallagher cannot predict with certainty when the negotiations will be complete, when sites will be secured or when permanent operating permits will be issued. If these two operations are running at planned levels, they could generate up to $3.0 to $5.0 million of quarterly net earnings through 2019.
5
 
INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW
Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factors  including competition for market share among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidations  can result in flat or reduced P/C premium rates (a "soft" market). A soft market tends to exert downward pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as greater than anticipated loss experience and capital shortages, can result in increases in P/C premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas.
From 2004 through 2010, the P/C market has remained soft in most lines and geographic areas. A quarterly market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers at the beginning of 2011 indicated that the level of rate reductions for commercial business averaged 5.4%, year-over-year, in the fourth quarter of 2010, compared with a 5.2% year-over-year decline in the third quarter of 2010.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This investment profile contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment profile, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this investment profile include, but are not limited to, statements related to anticipated areas of revenue growth within the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments, Gallagher's acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations, and future trends in the insurance and insurance brokerage industries. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
Refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
This investment profile includes references to non-GAAP measures as defined under SEC rules, including EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, pretax profit margin, and diluted earnings per share from continuing operations. As required by SEC rules, Gallagher has provided a reconciliation of each such measure to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, on its Web site at www.ajg.com under "Investor Relations."
6
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. | Condensed Quarterly Segment Financial Information 2009 and 2010
(Unaudited- in millions, except per share data and other information)
2009
2010
1st Q
2nd Q
3rd Q
4th Q
Full Year
1st Q
2nd Q
3rd Q
4th Q
Full Year
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
Revenues
$289.5
$340.1
$325.8
$320.8
$1,276.2
$304.4
$347.0
$351.3
$337.9
$1,340.6
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
39.2
69.5
61.4
32.2
202.3
39.4
62.8
73.6
47.4
223.2
Earnings from continuing operations
24.1
41.5
36.9
21.2
123.7
23.5
37.4
44.2
30.4
135.5
Growth-revenues excluding retail contingent commissions
12%
9%
4%
6%
7%
5%
2%
8%
5%
5%
Pretax profit margin (1)
14%
20%
19%
10%
16%
13%
18%
21%
14%
17%
EBITDAC margin (2)
19%
26%
25%
16%
22%
20%
24%
25%
20%
22%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.25
$0.41
$0.36
$0.21
$1.23
$0.23
$0.36
$0.42
$0.28
$1.29
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
Revenues
$112.2
$113.3
$113.5
$114.2
$453.2
$110.5
$111.4
$111.4
$128.8
$462.1
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
14.3
13.4
14.3
6.6
48.6
15.4
13.4
10.8
12.0
51.6
Earnings from continuing operations
8.7
7.9
8.7
5.4
30.7
9.2
8.1
6.4
7.6
31.3
Growth (decline)-revenues
-3%
-2%
-4%
-1%
-3%
-2%
-2%
-2%
13%
2%
Pretax profit margin (1)
13%
12%
13%
6%
11%
14%
12%
10%
9%
11%
EBITDAC margin (2)
16%
14%
15%
8%
13%
17%
15%
13%
12%
14%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.09
$0.08
$0.09
$0.05
$0.30
$0.09
$0.08
$0.06
$0.07
$0.30
BROKERAGE & RISK MGMT. COMBINED
Revenues
$401.7
$453.4
$439.3
$435.0
$1,729.4
$414.9
$458.4
$462.7
$466.7
$1,802.7
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
53.5
82.9
75.7
38.8
250.9
54.8
76.2
84.4
59.4
274.8
Earnings from continuing operations
32.8
49.4
45.6
26.6
154.4
32.7
45.5
50.6
38.0
166.8
Growth-revenues
7%
6%
1%
4%
5%
3%
1%
2%
6%
4%
Pretax profit margin (1)
13%
18%
17%
9%
15%
13%
17%
18%
13%
15%
EBITDAC margin (2)
18%
23%
22%
14%
20%
19%
22%
22%
18%
20%
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.34
$0.49
$0.45
$0.26
$1.53
$0.32
$0.44
$0.48
$0.35
$1.59
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Net operating activity
$(2.7)
$(1.8)
$(5.8)
$(1.0)
$(11.3)
$(3.3)
$(3.6)
$(5.4)
$(24.9)
$(37.2)
Interest expense
7.3
7.0
6.8
7.4
28.5
8.6
8.7
8.6
8.7
34.6
Loss from continuing operations before income taxes
(10.0)
(8.8)
(12.6)
(8.4)
(39.8)
(11.9)
(12.3)
(14.0)
(33.6)
(71.8)
Loss from continuing operations
(4.5)
(5.6)
(4.0)
(7.2)
(21.3)
(3.5)
(3.6)
(4.4)
8.0
(3.5)
Diluted loss per share from continuing operations
$(0.05)
$(0.05)
$(0.04)
$(0.07)
$(0.21)
$(0.04)
$(0.04)
$(0.04)
$0.08
$(0.03)
TOTAL COMPANY
Revenues
$401.1
$453.6
$439.5
$435.1
$1,729.3
$482.4
$459.5
$463.2
$459.1
$1,864.2
Earnings from continuing operations before income taxes
43.5
74.1
63.1
30.4
211.1
42.9
63.9
70.4
25.8
203.0
Earnings from continuing operations
28.3
43.8
41.6
19.4
133.1
29.2
41.9
46.2
46.0
163.3
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations
$0.29
$0.44
$0.41
$0.19
$1.32
$0.28
$0.42
$0.44
$0.43
$1.56
Dividends declared per share
$0.32
$0.32
$0.32
$0.32
$1.28
$0.32
$0.32
$0.32
$0.32
$1.28
CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET
Total assets
$3,108.6
$3,652.5
$3,241.1
$3,250.3
$3,232.1
$3,555.8
$3,460.7
$3,596.0
Total liabilities
$2,310.4
$2,812.7
$2,372.0
$2,357.4
$2,315.4
$2,590.4
$2,449.3
$2,489.3
Total stockholders' equity
$798.2
$839.8
$869.1
$892.9
$916.7
$965.4
$1,011.4
$1,106.7
OTHER INFORMATION
Diluted weighted average shares (000s)
98,084
100,717
101,550
102,213
100,625
102,936
104,648
105,736
107,327
105,099
Common shares repurchased (000s)
11
7
17
10
45
9
6
10
7
32
Annualized return on beginning stockholders' equity (3)
14%
19%
20%
17%
17%
13%
16%
18%
20%
20%
Number of acquisitions closed
3
6
2
4
15
3
5
4
7
19
Workforce from continuing operations
9,986
10,145
10,015
9,840
9,734
10,034
9,967
10,736
TOTAL COMPANY EBITDAC (4)
Net earnings (loss)
$26.4
$43.8
$41.6
$16.8
$128.6
$29.2
$44.0
$46.2
$54.7
$174.1
(Earnings) loss on discontinued operations, net of income taxes
1.9
  
  
2.6
4.5
  
(2.1)
  
(8.7)
(10.8)
Earnings from continuing operations
28.3
43.8
41.6
19.4
133.1
29.2
41.9
46.2
46.0
163.3
Provision for income taxes
15.2
30.3
21.5
11.0
78.0
13.7
22.0
24.2
(20.2)
39.7
Interest
7.3
7.0
6.8
7.4
28.5
8.6
8.7
8.6
8.7
34.6
Depreciation
7.7
7.5
7.7
7.7
30.6
7.7
8.0
8.3
8.3
32.3
Amortization
12.4
14.1
13.8
14.7
55.0
13.9
16.6
14.5
15.8
60.8
Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables
  
1.4
1.2
1.5
4.1
1.9
(0.9)
(3.9)
0.3
(2.6)
Total company EBITDAC
$70.9
$104.1
$92.6
$61.7
$329.3
$75.0
$96.3
$97.9
$58.9
$328.1
 
WHY INVEST?
EBITDAC Growth*
$500
AGR
%C
13
$400 $362
$34 7 $300 $281
$200
$100
$0
2008 2009 2010
* Brokerage & Risk Management Adjusted EBITDAC from Continuing Operations- see Non-GAAP disclosure on page 6
EBITDAC Margin*
21%
20 .3%
20%
19%
18%
17% 17 .2%
16%
15%
2008 2010
* Brokerage & Risk Management Adjusted EBITDAC Margins From Continuing Operations- see Non-GAAP disclosure on page 6
Dividends Per Share
$1.60
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
$0.05
1986
2011
$1.32**
16% Average Annual Increase
** Indicated  On January 27, 2011, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.33 per share first-quarter dividend.
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Marsha J. Akin  Investor Relations | 630.773.3800
8


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110302080634.txt.gz
TIME:20110302080634
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On March 2, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 436,648 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
March 2, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 436,648 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110316160809.txt.gz
TIME:20110316160809
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 15, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") filed a Form 8-K, which included as Exhibit 99.2 presentation slides to be used at the February 16, 2011 Bank of America Merrill Lynch Insurance Conference in New York and a link to the live conference webcast. During his remarks at the conference, J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., the Company's Chairman, President and CEO, directed conference attendees and investors to page 63 of Exhibit 99.2.
Page 63 of the presentation provides 2008, 2009 and 2010 adjusted financial information on a quarter-to-quarter comparative basis for the Company's Brokerage Segment. Information on page 63 was summarized from pages 53, 56 and 59 of the presentation which provide detailed reconciliations of reported information to non-GAAP adjusted information. Adjustments made on those pages remove significant non-recurring and unusual items.
In his remarks at the conference, Mr. Gallagher stated that page 63 of the presentation shows important trends and quarterly seasonality in the Company's historical Brokerage Segment financial results and provides adjusted compensation expense ratios and operating expense ratios. Mr. Gallagher strongly encouraged investors to use the information on page 63 when making their future quarterly and annual earnings estimates for the Company's Brokerage Segment.
It appears to the Company that many analysts seem to have made adjustments to prior periods for the Brokerage Segment in their models reflecting information provided on pages 53, 56 and 59. However, it appears that many have not recalculated historical compensation expense ratios and operating expense ratios after making such adjustments, which could have a meaningful effect on their future earnings estimates.
The Company is filing this Form 8-K to again direct analysts as well as other interested persons to Exhibit 99.2 of the Form 8-K filed on February 15, 2011, including page 63. The Company believes the information on page 63 should be considered by analysts when projecting future results and when selecting compensation expense ratios and operating expense ratios as part of making earnings estimates for each quarter of 2011.
As Mr. Gallagher stated in his presentation, the Company does not plan to present similar information in the future.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110426195239.txt.gz
TIME:20110426195239
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 26, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
In addition to the first quarter 2011 press release, attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2 is a supplemental quarterly financial information exhibit, containing financial metrics for 2008, 2009, 2010 and first quarter 2011 that will be referred to in the company's webcast conference call on Wednesday, April 27, 2011 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, April 26, 2011  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011 and will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, April 27, 2011 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT. Management will be referring to specific pages of both the earnings release and a supplemental quarterly financial information exhibit available on our website. It is highly recommended that listeners have these documents available to view during the call. To listen to this call and access both documents, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days. Please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 5.
www.ajg.com
"While our results for first quarter 2011 are difficult to compare to last year primarily because of the timing of the supplemental commission revenues and GAB Robins integration costs, our business posted strong results," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO.
 
 
 
 
 
"We achieved these results during our seasonally smallest quarter despite the soft pricing environment and an economy still trying to recover. We had an excellent start to 2011 and our global team is committed to making this our best year ever."
Quarter Ended March 31
 
 
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing first quarter 2011 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same period in 2010 (in millions):
 
 
 
Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for first quarter was 35.3% in 2011 and 31.9% in 2010. The increase in the first quarter 2011 effective tax rate compared to the same period in 2010 was primarily the result of the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits that were generated in 2010.
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 16 countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations, our corporate income tax rate, the integration of the GAB Robins acquisition, the future revenue and earnings impact of acquisitions, drivers of organic growth in the brokerage and risk management segments and anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in the press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
- Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentation of 2011 and 2010 statements of earnings, presented on the following pages, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
- Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are meant to reflect the true operating performance of Gallagher's business; consequently, they exclude items that could be considered "non-operating" or "non-core" in nature.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
- Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2011 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2010.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
- This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, EBITDAC (on pages 6 and 7); for Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments); for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on page 1); and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 9.
 
 
See notes to first quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 8 of 9.
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2011 Earnings Release
Non-GAAP Financial Measures (See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 5 of 9 above)
 
 
 
Other
 
 
 
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2011 Earnings Release (continued)
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
Investor Relations - 630-285-3501
marsha_akin@ajg.com
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, these spreadsheets provide information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, expenses and earnings from continuing operations, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided herein. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided.
- Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentation of 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011 statements of earnings, presented on the following pages, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher's Brokerage and Risk Management segments that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
- Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provide a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are meant to reflect the true operating performance of Gallagher's brokerage business; consequently, they exclude items that could be considered "non-operating" or "non-core" in nature.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
- Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (change in organic revenues) in excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the change in organic revenues that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, change in organic revenues exclude the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying current period foreign exchange rates to the same periods in prior years.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in future periods. Gallagher has historically viewed change in organic revenues as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
- These spreadsheets include tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for adjusted revenues, expenses and earnings from continuing operations, EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments. For organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, please see reconciliations in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010 and in its 2011 and 2010 quarterly reports on Form 10-Q.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measure
 
Page 1
 
 
Page 2
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
Page 3
 
Note: This page is the result of subtracting the Adjustments Page 3 from As Reported on Page 2.
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
 
Page 4
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
 
Page 5
 
 
Page 6
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
 
Page 7
 
Note: This page is the result of subtracting the Adjustments on Page 7 from As Reported on Page 6.
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
 
Page 8
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
 
Page 9
 
 
 
Page 10
 
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
Page 11
 
Note: This page is the result of subtracting the Adjustments Page 11 from As Reported on Page 10.
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
 
Page 12
 
See information regarding Non-GAAP Financial Measures on Page 1 of these exhibits.
 
Page 13
 
 
Page 14


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110511163135.txt.gz
TIME:20110511163135
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 10, 2011 (the "Annual Meeting"). At the Annual Meeting, five items were submitted to Gallagher's stockholders. The items are described in more detail in Gallagher's definitive proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 28, 2011. The final voting results were as set forth below.
: Election of nine directors to serve for one-year terms until Gallagher's 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders:
Item 1
 
: Advisory Vote on the Frequency of a Stockholder Vote on the Compensation of Gallagher's Named Executive Officers
Item 5
 
The slides containing information presented at the Annual Meeting are furnished as Exhibit 99 to this report. This exhibit may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com).
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
Please turn off all cell phones and PDAs at this time.
Thank you for your cooperation.
 
Stockholders' Meeting
May 10, 2011
2011 Annual Meeting
Chairman's Remarks
2010 Review
 -  Questions & Answers
 
2011 Board of Directors
William L. Bax
Frank E. English, Jr.
Ilene S. Gordon
Elbert O. Hand
David S. Johnson
Kay W. McCurdy
Norman L. Rosenthal, Ph.D.
James R. Wimmer
Also in attendance:
 -  A. James Gallagher, Jr.  Former CEO
 
Stockholders' Meeting
May 10, 2011
 -  2011 Annual Meeting
 
Stockholders' Meeting
May 10, 2011
2011 Annual Meeting
Chairman's Remarks
2010 in Review
 
Information Regarding Forward -Looking Statements
This investment presentation contains "forward -looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment presentation, the words "anticipates," "expects," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "intends," "plans" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward -looking statements. Examples of forward -looking statements in this investment presentation include, but are not limited to, statements related to the integration of the GAB Robins acquisition, Gallagher's capabilities for future growth and expansion, Gallagher's acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, expected uses of cash, drivers of organic growth in the brokerage and risk management segments, Gallagher's international opportunities, productivity and expense reduction initiatives, and future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations.
Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward -looking statements include the following:
changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, and changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape could impact Gallagher's integration of the GAB Robins acquisition, capabilities for future growth and expansion, its acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, expected uses of cash, drivers of organic growth in the brokerage and risk management segments, its international opportunities, and productivity and expense reduction initiatives; and
uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including uncertainties related to (i) receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits, (ii) Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating operations, (iii) potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45, (iv) utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity, (v) operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 operations, (vi) business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners, (vii) intellectual property risks and (viii) environmental risks, could impact Gallagher's future income and tax credits generated by its clean-energy operations.
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward -looking statements.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this presentation provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, adjusted pretax profit margin, adjusted compensation expense ratio, adjusted operating expense ratio and cash generation. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this presentation. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for the GAAP information provided.
Adjusted historical presentation. Gallagher believes that the adjusted historical presentation of 2008, 2009 and 2010 provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher's Brokerage and Risk Management segments that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's historical operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using a 40% marginal tax rate.
Adjusted revenues  Gallagher defines this measure as revenues from continuing operations adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business and supplemental commission timing amounts.
Adjusted ratios  Pretax profit margin, compensation expense ratio, and operating expense ratio are defined as adjusted pretax earnings from continuing operations, adjusted compensation expense and adjusted operating expense, respectively, each divided by adjusted revenues from continuing operations.
Earning Measures. Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provide a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are meant to reflect the true operating performance of Gallagher's brokerage business; consequently, they exclude items that could be considered "non-operating" or "non-core" in nature.
EBITDAC  Gallagher defines this measure as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables.
EBITDAC margin  Gallagher defines this measure as EBITDAC divided by total revenues.
Adjusted EBITDAC  Gallagher defines this measure as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, litigation settlement amounts.
Adjusted EBITDAC margin  Gallagher defines this measure as Adjusted EBITDAC divided by adjusted revenues.
Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments  Gallagher defines this measure as earnings from continuing operations adjusted to exclude the after-tax impact of gains realized from sales of books of business, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, litigation settlement amounts and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables, divided by diluted weighted average shares outstanding.
Organic Revenues. Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2010 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2009.
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
Cash generation. Gallagher defines this measure as adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to add back stock compensation expense (a non-cash charge) and to deduct capital expenditures, interest paid on corporate debt, corporate overhead expenses and income taxes paid. Gallagher considers cash generation as a way to measure net cash generated from its operations on an ongoing basis.
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measure. Please see the Form 8-K filed on February 15, 2011 for tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and cash generation. For organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, please see reconciliations in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010 and in its 2011 quarterly reports on Form 10-Q.
 
Two Core Businesses
Revenue  $1.8 billion
EBITDAC  $365 million
Brokerage Segment 74% Brokerage 82%
Risk Management Segment 26% Risk Management 18%
Year 2010 as reported. See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures in Exhibits
9
 
Brokerage
Segment
Revenues  $1.3 billion
Wholesale 21%
Retail P/C 53%
Mostly U.S. and U.K.
Mostly U.S., Canadaand U.K.
Retail-Benefits 26%
U.S. and U.K.
Year 2010 as reported
10
 
Risk Management Segment
Revenues  $462 million EBITDAC  $65 million
Workers Domestic 83% Compensation 69%
Property 4% Liability 27% International 17%
Year 2010 as reported. See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
11
 
A Perfect Storm for Insurance Brokers
Worst economic recession since the Great Depression
Zero investment yields
12
 
Economy  GDP shrinks
5% 4% 3%
1.9%
2% 1%
0.0%
0% -1% -2% -3%
-2.6%
-4%
2007 2008 2009
U.S. Real GDP Annual Rates of Change Source for data: Bureau of Economic Analysis
13
 
U.S. Unemployment Skyrockets
10%
9.3%
9% 8% 7%
5.8%
6%
4.6%
5% 4% 3% 2%
2007 2008 2009
U.S. Unemployment Average Annual Rates. Source for data: Bureau of Labor Statistics
14
 
U.S. Employment Down 9 Million Jobs
140,000
137,983
138,000
136,000
134,383
134,000
132,000
129,320
130,000
128,000
126,000
YE 2007 YE 2008 YE 2009
Total Nonfarm Employees ( in thousands) . Source for data: Bureau of Labor Statistics
15
 
Short-Term Interest Rates Fall
6.0%
5.0%
5.0%
480 bps decline
4.0%
3.0%
1.9%
2.0%
1.0%
0.2% 0.2%
0.0%
2007 2008 2009 2010
Average Annual Effective Fed Funds Rates. Source for data: Bloomberg
16
 
Commercial P&C Pricing Below Year 2000 Significantly Lagging Inflation
Commercial Rate Index Pro-Forma at CPI Rate
160
100) 150 = 140
2000 130 126 (Year 120
Value 110 Index 100
90 91
80
00 01 2 03 4 5 6 7 8 9 0 00000010 QQQQQQQQQQQ
4th 4th 4th 4th 4th 4th th th th th
Commercial Rate Index reflects the cost of P&C premiums relative to the year 2000. Constructed using Counsel of Insurance Agents and Brokers data
17
 
Global P&C Market Shrinks
5%
4.0%
4%
3%
1.5%
2%
1%
0%
-1% -0.1% -0.8%
-2%
2006 2007 2008 2009
Global P&C change in Premiums. Source for Data: Swiss Re's "World Insurance" sigma studies (in real terms, ie adjusted for inflation)
18
 
But, Gallagher
Sailed through the Economic Storm
19
 
Gallagher's Sales Culture Outperforms Economic Environment
Gallagher Organic CIAB Avg. Commercial Rate Declines
6.0% 3.0%
0.0%
0.0% -3.0%
-2.0% -2.0%
-6.0%
-5.4% -5.6%
-9.0% -12.0%
-11.0%
-15.0%
2008 2009 2010
Gallagher's Brokerage Segment Organic Growth
Year 2010 as reported. See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
20
 
Gallagher's Acquisition Program Fuels Growth
Organic Revenue Growth from Acquisitions CIAB
9.0% 9.0% 7.0% 7.0% 6.0% 5.0% 6.0%
3.0% 3.0% 0.0% 0.0% 0.0% -3.0% -2.0% -2.0% -3.0%
-6.0% -6.0% -5.4% -5.6%
-9.0% -9.0%
-12.0% -11.0% -12.0%
-15.0% -15.0% 2008 2009 2010
21
 
Gallagher Grows Adjusted Revenue
$2,500
4% CAGR
$2,100 $1,782 $1,635 $1,719 $1,700
$1,300 $900 $500
2008
2009
2010
Brokerage & Risk Management Adjusted Revenues from Continuing OperationsSee NonGAAP measures.
22
 
Gallagher's Workforce Discipline & Expense Reduction
Brokerage
Compensation Ratio Operating Expense Ratio 70% 61.4% 30% 60.1% 61.1% 60% 25% 20.8% 50% 20%
16.9% 16.6% 40% 15% 30% 10% 20% 10% 5%
0% 0%
2008 2009 2010 2008 2009 2010
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
23
 
Gallagher's Workforce Discipline & Expense Reduction
Risk Management
Compensation Ratio Operating Expense Ratio 70% 60.9% 30% 27.0% 60.4% 60.9%
60% 24.0% 23.5% 25% 50% 20% 40% 15% 30% 10% 20% 10% 5%
0% 0%
2008 2009 2010 2008 2009 2010
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
24
 
Gallagher Grows Adjusted EBITDAC
$500
13% CAGR
$400 $362 $347 $281 $300
$200
$100
$0
2008 2009 2010
Brokerage & Risk Management Adjusted EBITDAC from Continuing OperationsSee Non GAAP measures.
25
 
Gallagher Improves Adjusted EBITDAC Margins Brokerage
23% 21.9% 22% 21% 20% 19.0% 19% 18% 17% 16% 15% 2008 2010
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
26
 
Gallagher Improves Adjusted EBITDAC Margins Risk Management
16% 15.6% 15%
14%
12.6% 13%
12%
11%
10%
2008 2010
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
27
 
Gallagher Continues Acquisition Momentum
Annualized Revenues Acquired
From 2008 to 2010:
$200
$166
 - 
Completed 71 deals
$145
$160
 - 
$409m in annualized
$120
$98
revenues
 - 
Highlighted by Liberty
$80
Mutual/Wausau and GAB
$40
Robins acquisitions
$0
2008
2009
2010
(In millions)
28
 
Risk Management M&A
 -  GAB Robins
Completed October 1, 2010
Acquired TPA and managed care subsidiariesExpect up to:
$50 million of annualized revenues
$10 million of EBITDAC by 2012
Added over 400 talented employeesExcellent culture fitIntegration going as planned
29
 
Gallagher Continued to Invest in the Company
Positioned company for future expansion capacity
Systems investment
Centralization
Global Systems
Centralized processes
 -  Offshoring initiatives
30
 
Gallagher Continued Relentless Focus on Quality & Customer Service
31
 
Maintained Prudent Balance Sheet
Global
Insurance
Gallagher @
Broker Avg. @
12/31/2010
12/31/2010
S&P 1000
Total Debt
$550
Stockholders' Equity
$1,107
Debt to Total Capital (Debt/(Debt + Equity))
33%
38%
40%
Debt to EBITDAC
1.5x
2.1x
2.8x
$s in millions. Global Insurance Brokers' ratios are adjusted for unusual items. Source for S&P 1000: Bloomberg as of 01/28/11.
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
32
 
Gallagher's Stockholders Benefited
Total Returns January 2008April 2011
AJG versus S&P 500
50%
47%
45%
40%
35%
30%
25%
20%
15%
10%
5%
0%
-5%
-3%
-10%
-15%
-20%
-25%
-30%
-35%
-40%
-45%
-50%
Mar-08 Jun-08 Sep-08 Dec-08 Mar-09 Jun-09 Sep-09 Dec-09 Mar-10 Jun-10 Sep-10 Dec-10
AJG S&P 500
Source for data: Bloomberg. Total Returns assume dividend reinvestment.
33
 
The Power of Dividends
Price Only Dividends
+ 47% -3%
60% 60% 50% 50% 40% 40%
22%
30% 30% 20% 20% 10% 25% 10%
7%
0% 0% -10% -10%
-20% -10% -20%
AJG S&P 500
Source for Data: Bloomberg. Total Returns assume dividend reinvestment.
34
 
Cash Generation
Dividend Below 50%
(In millions)
$400
$300
$200
Dividend $100
$0
2008 2009 2010
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
35
 
On the
36
 
Starting from a Strong Financial Position
 -  Cash available for M&A
$100m available cash at 12/31/10
Added $125m of new debt in February 2011
Debt still below 2x EBITDAC
Significant flexibility remains
$500m in credit line
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures.
37
 
Three Uses of Cash
Re-invest in company  CapEx and acquisitions
Dividends
Repurchase shares  currently not anticipated
38
 
Brokerage Growth  Organic Drivers
Cross-selling and new business initiatives
Recruiting new producers and teams
Domestically and Internationally
Capitalize on niche expertise
Developing our own  Internship program
Focus on new niches
Improving carrier compensation
Implementing global sales management systems
39
 
Brokerage Growth  Organic Drivers (cont)
 -  Opportunities from Healthcare Turmoil
Clients need helpWe have the tools and resources
Many consulting opportunities for new/existing clientsTurmoil will continue with evolution of this bill
Expanding program managers to utilize current distribution
Business migration to standard markets is slowing
Continue to expand International capabilities
40
 
Acquisition Strategy  Brokerage
 -  Unlimited opportunity
18,000 retail and wholesale brokerages and agencies* just in the U.S. (Retail P&C, Benefits and Wholesale)
 - Owned by baby boomers who need an exit strategy yet still want to be in the business  - Need depth of capabilities to grow to the next level
Small number of consolidators
*Source: Hales & Company and D&B
41
 
Current Gallagher U. S. Locations
WA
MT ME ND
OR MN
VT NH
ID MA SD WI NY
WY MI RI IA CT
PA
NE NJ NV OH
UT IL DE CO IN WV MD
KS VA CA MO KY
NC OK TN
AR AZ NM
SC MS
AL GA
TX LA
FL
AK
HI
42
 
Larger cities where we aren't located
WA
MT ME ND
OR MN
VT NH
ID MA SD WI NY
WY MI RI IA CT
PA
NE NJ NV OH
UT IL DE CO IN WV MD
KS VA CA MO KY
NC OK TN
AR AZ NM
SC MS
AL GA
TX LA
FL
AK
HI
43
 
Acquisition Strategy  Brokerage (cont.)
 -  How we do it
Domestically looking for "tuck-ins" as well as stand alone platformsInternational expansion
Joint ventures
Network of correspondent brokers source for future partners
Cultural fit is crucial
44
 
Acquisition Strategy  Brokerage (cont.)
 -  Long-term strategic value
Additional expertise for nichesBroaden geographic penetration
Additional leverage with markets, vendors, etc.
Manage and monitor closely post acquisition to assure strategy meets return on capital targets
45
 
Acquisition Strategy  International Brokerage
 -  Solid acquisition activity in 2010
FirstCity  LondonSecuritas  Brazil
SBA  Australia  now own 100%Risk & Reward  U.K. employee benefits
Global joint ventures are important
Profit sharing
Additional London flow through
Huge geographic opportunities
46
 
Gallagher
Global
Alliance
47
 
Brokerage Productivity & Expense Reductions
Upgrading and consolidating agency systems
Centralizing back office support
Utilizing offshore centers of excellence
Maintaining headcount controls
Reducing real estate footprint
Capitalizing on procurement/sourcing capabilities
48
 
Risk Management  Growth, Productivity & Expense Management
Attract and retain clients with superior value proposition
Unsurpassed claims handling capabilities and expertiseSuperior outcomesIndustry -leading service experienceIndustry -specific best practice solutionsUniformly high levels of qualityStability and long-term commitment to industry leadership
49
 
Risk Management  Growth, Productivity & Expense Management (cont'd)
 -  Build on recent success in international markets
Target Australia, Canada, New Zealand & U.K.Expand sales capacity and capability with a focus towards commercial sectorLeverage cross-selling opportunities with AJG Int'l and domestic clients
Maintain focus on productivity and overall expense management
Tightly manage headcount and compensation Opportunistically close/combine locationsReduce T&E, office expenses and outside fees where possible
50
 
Corporate Segment Evolving
Legacy investment era effectively behind us
Clean-energy projects contributing
Viewed as cash generation vehiclesEarned $8 million after tax in 2010
51
 
Summary
52
 
Significant Headwinds
Economy  GDP shrinks U.S. Employment Down 9 Million Jobs
5%
140,000
4% 137,983
138,000 3%
1.9%
2% 136,000
134,383
1% 134,000
0.0%
0%
132,000
-1% 130,000 129,320 -2% -3% 128,000
-2.6%
-4% 126,000
2007 2008 2009 YE 2007 YE 2008 YE 2009
Short -Term Interest Rates Fall Global P&C Market Shrinks
6.0% 5%
4.0% 5.0% 4% 5.0% 3% 4.0% 480 bps decline
1.5%
2% 3.0% 1%
1.9%
2.0%
0%
-0.1%
1.0% 0.2% -1%
0.2% -0.8%
0.0% -2%
2007 2008 2009 2010 2006 2007 2008 2009
53
 
Gallagher Sailed Through
Gallagher Grows Adjusted Revenue Gallagher Grows Adjusted EBITDAC
$2,500 $500
4% CAGR $2,100 13% CAGR $400 $362 $1,782 $347 $1,635 $1,719 $281 $1,700 $300
$1,300 $200
$900 $100
$500 2008 2009 2010
$0
2008 2009 2010
Gallagher Improves Adjusted Gallagher Continues Acquisition EBITDAC Margins Momentum
Brokerage & Risk Management
23% Annualized Revenues Acquired $200 22% $166 $145 $160 21% 20.3% 20% $98 $120 19% $80 18% 17.2% 17% $40 16% $0 15% 2008 2009 2010 2008 2010
(In millions)
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures in Exhibits 54
 
Gallagher's Stockholders Benefited
Total Returns January 2008April 2011
AJG versus S&P 500
50%
47%
45% 40% 35% 30% 25% 20% 15% 10% 5% 0%
-3%
-5% -10% -15% -20% -25% -30% -35% -40% -45% -50%
Mar-08 Jun-08 Sep-08 Dec-08 Mar-09 Jun-09 Sep-09 Dec-09 Mar-10 Jun-10 Sep-10 Dec-10
AJG S&P 500
Source for data: Bloomberg. Total Returns assume dividend reinvestment.
55
 
Summary
 -  Why own Gallagher?
Steady long-term growth
Strong cash flows
Prudent Balance Sheet
History of solid dividend yield shows confidence in future growth
56
 
Questions & Answers
57
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110517115512.txt.gz
TIME:20110517115512
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 12, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., through its subsidiary, Gallagher Holdings Two (UK) Limited (together, "Gallagher"), entered into a Share Purchase Agreement (the "Agreement") with HLG Holdings Limited ("HLGH") and the shareholders of HLGH named therein (the "Sellers"). Under the Agreement, Gallagher purchased all of the outstanding ordinary shares of HLGH for net cash consideration of approximately $158 million (the "Acquisition"). Contemporaneous with the closing of the Acquisition, HLGH used a substantial portion of the net proceeds to redeem outstanding preference shares and accrued interest and dividends. HLGH, which trades as Heath Lambert, brokers property & casualty and employee benefit insurance products throughout the United Kingdom.
The Agreement contains customary warranties with respect to matters such as operation of the acquired business, regulatory compliance, litigation and taxes, as well as indemnification provisions with respect to certain identified liabilities. Approximately $6.4 million of the total consideration was held back and placed in escrow as partial security for the indemnification obligations. The liability of the Sellers under the Agreement is limited to the amount of the escrow. Additionally, Gallagher purchased an insurance policy to stand behind the general and tax warranties and an amount equal to the deductible for that insurance policy, approximately $0.8 million, was also placed in escrow. The foregoing description of the Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Agreement, which is attached to this report as Exhibit 2.1 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety.
 
On May 12, 2011, Gallagher completed the Acquisition. The information set forth above under Item 1.01 is incorporated by reference into this Item 2.01.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 2.1
 
 
Certain schedules have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K. Gallagher agrees to furnish supplementally a copy of any such schedule, or any section thereof, to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
BETWEEN:
 
 
 
 
 
RECITALS:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
as follows:
THIS DEED WITNESSES
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
namely, 32,153,621.10; (the "").
Consideration
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Provisions relating to the Retention Account are set out in Schedule 6.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The provisions of Schedule 9 limit the liability of the Warrantor in relation to any Claim.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
"" means any loss of net retained revenue, not exceeding net retained revenue for a single 12 month period, incurred by any Group Company where such Group Company has to cease to do business with, or materially alter any contract with, a Client during the period from the date of this agreement until the third anniversary thereof as a result of any of the circumstances referred to in clauses 9.1.3.1-9.1.3.3 above;
Annualised Revenue Losses
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Warrantor hereby covenants with the Buyer in the terms of Schedule 12.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
but shall use reasonable endeavours to consult the other parties and to take into account any reasonable requests they may have in relation to the disclosure before making it.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Unless otherwise provided, all costs in connection with the negotiation, preparation, execution and performance of this agreement, and any documents referred to in it, shall be borne by the party that incurred the costs.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
name: West Register (Investments) Limited
address: c/o The Royal Bank of Scotland Group, 280 Bishopsgate, London EC2M 4RB
for the attention of: Kam Sondhi
fax number: +44 (0)20 7672 0321
 
name: William Bloomer and Keith Hamill
address: William Bloomer's and Keith Hamill's addresses as set out in Schedule 1
fax number: William Bloomer's and Keith Hamill's fax numbers as set out in Schedule 1
with a copy of the notice to the Company's Solicitors, reference 0Z1065.00118 (or to such other person(s) as the Management Sellers' and Precis Representative may notify in accordance with the provisions of this clause 21 from time to time)
 
name: Gallagher Holdings Two (UK) Limited
address: 9 Alie Street, London E1 8DE
for the attention of: Alissa Pfitzner, Chief Counsel and Company Secretary
fax number: +44 (0)20 7204 6025
 
name: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co
address: The Gallagher Centre, Two Pierce Place, Itasca, Illinois 60143
for the attention of: Walter Bay, General Counsel
fax number: +1 630 285 3483
(or such other address and fax number, or person, as each party may notify to the others in accordance with the provisions of this clause 21).
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This agreement (other than obligations that have already been fully performed) remains in full force after Completion.
 
 
 
 
The rights and obligations of the Sellers, the Management Sellers and the Buyer under this agreement shall continue for the benefit of, and shall be binding on, their respective successors and assigns.
 
This agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which is an original and which together have the same effect as if each party had signed the same document.
 
Save only as may be required by law, all sums payable to the Sellers and/or the Management Sellers under or pursuant to this agreement shall be paid in full when due without deduction, withholding, set-off or counterclaim.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
of which the parties have executed this Deed and delivered the same on the date set out above.
IN WITNESS
 
 
 
 
At Completion, each Seller in respect of itself only shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Buyer the following:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At Completion, the Management Sellers shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, (or in the case of the statutory minute books and registers referred to in paragraph 15 below, shall make available) to the Buyer the following:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At Completion, the Warrantor shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Buyer the following:
 
 
 
 
The Sellers (in so far as they are able) and the Management Sellers shall cause a board meeting of the Company to be held at Completion at which the following matters shall take place:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Management Sellers (other than Appleby) shall cause a board meeting of the Subsidiaries of the Company to be held at Completion at which the following matters shall take place:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The particulars relating to the Group Companies set out in Schedule 3 to this agreement are true and accurate.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and, so far as the Warrantor is aware, there are no circumstances which may give rise to the giving of any such notice or the making of any such notification.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Compliance
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For the purposes of warranty 27.1 "Third Parties" means an individual, company or organisation who or which received prior to Completion any payment from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of the introduction of business to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and with whom the Company or any of the Subsidiaries shared revenue, including, but not limited to, any placing or producing intermediaries.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and, so far as the Warrantor is aware, there is no reason why any such action might be taken or any such claims might be brought.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In this Schedule 6 the following definitions shall apply:
(a) "" means the amount due to the Buyer in relation to a Substantiated Claim;
Due Amount
(b) "" means a Warranty Claim, a claim under the Tax Covenant and/or a claim under the Indemnities;
Relevant Claim
(c) "" means the date falling twenty four calendar months from the Completion Date;
Release Date
(d) "" means a Relevant Claim in respect of which liability is admitted or agreed in writing by the Management Sellers' and Precis Representative and the Sellers' Representative or has been determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in respect of which no appeal has been lodged or from which it is not possible to appeal; and
Substantiated Claim
(e) "" means the date thirty six calendar months from the Completion Date.
W&I Release Date
 
No amount shall be released out of the Retention Account otherwise than in accordance with this Schedule 6.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(the amounts at paragraphs 5.3.1 and 5.3.2 being together an "") then, subject to such Relevant Claim becoming a Substantiated Claim, each of the Sellers and Management Sellers hereby agrees that the Unrecovered Amount in relation to such Substantiated Claim shall be deducted from the
Unrecovered Amount
Retention Account up to a maximum aggregate amount equal to the balance standing to the credit of the Retention Account and the Buyer, the Management Sellers' and Precis Representative and the Sellers' Representative shall instruct the Escrow Agents to pay the Buyer out of the Retention Account the lesser of the Unrecovered Amount and the amount standing to the credit of the Retention Account.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
then such amount shall be dealt with in accordance with paragraphs 7.2 and 7.3.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
the Buyer, the Management Sellers' and Precis Representative and the Sellers' Representative shall instruct the Escrow Agents to forthwith pay any balance of the Retention Amount standing to the credit of the Retention Account, less an amount equal to any Retained Amount validly withheld in accordance with paragraph 6, to the Company's Solicitors and the Sellers' Solicitors (in the proportions set out opposite their respective names of the Sellers and Management Sellers in column (8) of Parts 1 and 2 of Schedule 1).
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The definitions in this paragraph apply in this agreement.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Provision will be made in the Completion Statement for the purpose of calculating the Completion Net Working Capital for guaranteed bonuses as follows:
Guaranteed Bonus provision = A X B / C
Whereby:
A is the budgeted full period bonus (as used for the purposes of preparing the Pro Forma Completion Statement) for each relevant individual;
B is the number of days from and including the day comprising the start of the applicable bonus period to and including 30 April 2011; and
C is the number of days in the bonus period (e.g 365 days if in respect of an annual bonus scheme)
 
Bonus incentives directly tied to a specific income stream shall be accrued in the Completion Statement for the purpose of calculating the Completion Net Working Capital at their contracted rate based on the Applicable Revenue recorded in the Group Companies' management accounts prior to Completion. "Applicable Revenue" shall mean revenue related to the specific incentive scheme and for which the bonus has not yet been paid.
No provision shall be made for the 2,845,000 of accrued but un-paid bonuses notwithstanding that these are reflected as a liability in the 30 April Estimated Management Accounts.
 
In respect of insurance policies written during calendar year FY11 which are subject to BISC rebates, a debtor shall be recognised on a pro-rata basis using the below 2011 quarterly amounts. The debtor shall be verified with insurers and amended where possible but shall be reduced by any cash receipts in respect of FY11 accrued BISC rebates.
 
For example, if Completion had occurred on 20 April 2011, the following debtor balance would have been recognised:
01 January - 31 March 1,356,669
01 April - 20 April: (calculation 20 / 91 x 809,106) 177,825
add
amounts settled in cash from suppliers directly in respect of the above amounts
Subtract
( X )
Debtor balance X
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Buyer shall at all times procure that there is no duplication of any claim relating to the same subject matter, whether under this agreement, the Tax Covenant or otherwise.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
in each case so as to leave the Buyer, taking into account the amounts received from the third party and from the Retention Account and those payable to the Seller and Management Sellers under this paragraph 6.2, in no better or worse position than they would have been in (subject always to the other provisions of this paragraph 6) had the Warranty Claim not arisen.
 
If any Warranty Claim arises by reason of a liability of any Group Company which is a contingent liability when the Warranty Claim is notified to the Sellers' Representative and the Management Sellers' and Precis Representative, the Buyer shall not be paid from the Retention Account until the contingent liability ceases to be contingent and becomes an actual liability and is due and payable. So long as any Warranty Claim arising by reason of a contingent liability shall have been notified to the Sellers' Representative and the Management Sellers' and Precis Representative in accordance with paragraph 3.1, paragraph 3.3 shall be amended in relation to such Warranty Claim so as to require that proceedings be commenced within six months from the date on which the liability ceases to be contingent.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Nothing in this Schedule shall in any way restrict or limit the general obligation of the Buyer to mitigate any loss or damage which it may suffer in consequence of any breach by the Warrantor of the Warranties or in consequence of any matter giving rise to a Warranty Claim against the Warrantor.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
the Buyer, the Company or the relevant Subsidiary shall have the conduct of the Dispute absolutely (without prejudice to its rights under this Tax Covenant) and shall be entitled to take such action as is reasonable in the circumstances to settle the Tax Claim.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The covenant contained in paragraph 2 of this Tax Covenant shall extend to all reasonable costs and expenses properly incurred by the Buyer, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in connection with a successful claim under paragraph 2 of this Tax Covenant and the successful enforcement of rights under this Tax Covenant.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110518104236.txt.gz
TIME:20110518104236
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 18, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 243,563 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 18, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 243,563 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110525121735.txt.gz
TIME:20110525121735
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 25, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 81,492 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 25, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 81,492 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110527160300.txt.gz
TIME:20110527160300
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 27, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 327,544 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 27, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 327,544 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110531135643.txt.gz
TIME:20110531135643
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 31, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 244,585 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 31, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 244,585 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110610154334.txt.gz
TIME:20110610154334
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 10, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 64,374 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
June 10, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 64,374 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110726171537.txt.gz
TIME:20110726171537
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 26, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2011. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, July 26, 2011  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2011. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at . For a description of the measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 6.
www.ajg.com
"I am extremely pleased with our second quarter. Our financial results were strong; we posted another quarter of positive organic growth in both operating segments; our acquisition program is robust; our international presence is growing, especially with the acquisition of Heath Lambert; and we are doing a good job of controlling our expenses," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO.
 
 
 
"We're also beginning to see some spots of market firming and our customers' businesses seem more stable than a year ago. Looking forward, we are on track to exceed $2.0 billion in revenues in 2011 with nearly 25% of our revenues now coming from our international operations. Our global team is energized by our prospects for future growth and 2011 is shaping up to be an outstanding year."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2011 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same quarter and six-month period in 2010:
Quarter Ended June 30
 
 
Six Months Ended June 30
 
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Acquisition of Heath Lambert
On May 12, 2011, Gallagher acquired Heath Lambert. The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when analyzing the impact of the Heath Lambert acquisition on Gallagher's second quarter 2011 results and the potential future results estimated at the time of the acquisition using an assumed exchange rate of $1.65 to 1.00. Gallagher expects that it could take up to two years to fully integrate the Heath Lambert operations into its existing operations. Actual results will differ from the amounts estimated below based on actual performance and exchange rates in those future periods. Gallagher does not intend to update this information in the future.
 
 
Corporate Segment Second Quarter Highlights
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2011 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2010 (in millions):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for second quarter was 36.7% in 2011 and 34.4% in 2010. The increase in the second quarter 2011 effective tax rate compared to the same period in 2010 was primarily the result of the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits that were generated in 2010.
 
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, July 27, 2011 at 9:15 a.m. ET/8:15 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 16 countries and does business in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations, our corporate income tax rate, the integration of the Heath Lambert and GAB Robins acquisitions, the future revenue and earnings impact of acquisitions (including Heath Lambert), drivers of organic growth in the brokerage and risk management segments and anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in the press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
- Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentation of 2011 and 2010 statements of earnings, presented on the following pages, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
- Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
- Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2011 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2010.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
- This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, EBITDAC (on pages 8 and 9), for Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on pages 1 and 2), and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
See notes to second quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2011 Earnings Release
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures (See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 6 of 13 above)
 
 
Other
 
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2011 Earnings Release (continued)
 
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
Investor Relations - 630-285-3501
marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110729114949.txt.gz
TIME:20110729114949
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On July 29, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 40,332 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
July 29, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 40,332 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110802114453.txt.gz
TIME:20110802114453
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On August 2, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 63,582 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
August 2, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 63,582 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110809120235.txt.gz
TIME:20110809120235
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 9, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 107,993 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
August 9, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 107,993 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110908145700.txt.gz
TIME:20110908145700
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 31, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., the Company's Chairman, President and CEO, will speak at the Keefe Bruyette & Woods 2011 Insurance Conference in New York on Thursday, September 8, 2011 at 11:05 a.m. ET. The presentation slides for the conference are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and can also be accessed at the Company's website at .
www.ajg.com/ir
In addition to the presentation slides, the Company's August 2011 Investment Profile, to be distributed to attendees at the Keefe Bruyette & Woods 2011 Insurance Conference (and which may be used at other investor conferences), is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Investment Presentation
August 2011
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking
Statements
This presentation contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this presentation, the words "anticipates," "expects," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this presentation include, but are not limited to, statements relating to: (i) Gallagher's capabilities for growth and expansion; (ii) Gallagher's acquisition strategy and planned levels of acquisition activity; (iii) the integration of recent acquisitions (including GAB Robins and Heath Lambert); (iv) the revenue and earnings impact of such acquisitions; (v) drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments; (vi) anticipated future results or performance (including margins) of any segment or Gallagher as a whole; (vii) Gallagher's stock performance (including dividend payments); (viii) future debt levels; (ix) expected uses of cash; (x) international opportunities; (xi) productivity and expense reduction initiatives; and (xii) potential future developments in, and income and tax credits that could be generated by, Gallagher's clean-energy investments.
Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 - changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape, and the difficulties inherent in combining the cultures and systems of different companies could impact (i) through (xi) above; and
 - uncertainties related to Gallagher's clean-energy investments, including uncertainties related to receipt and maintenance by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits, Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating and future operations, potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45, utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity, operational risks at Gallagher's clean-energy operations, business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners, intellectual property risks and environmental risks, could impact (xii) above.
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
This presentation includes references to EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted Revenues and Organic Growth, which are performance measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided herein.
Earnings MeasuresGallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin are presented to improve the comparability of Gallagher's results between periods by eliminating the impact of certain items that have a high degree of variability.
EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout
payables.
Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, workforce
related charges, lease termination related charges, acquisition related integration costs and litigation settlements.
Adjusted EBITDAC margin is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC divided by total revenues, as adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business and
supplemental commission timing amounts.
The most directly comparable GAAP measure for these non-GAAP earnings measures is earnings from continuing operations. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, earnings from continuing operations was $136 million, $31 million, and $167 million, respectively, in 2010, $61 million, $17 million, and $78 million, respectively, for the 6 months ended June 30, 2010 and $62 million, $13 million, and $75 million, respectively, for the 6 months ended June 30, 2011.
Revenue MeasuresGallagher believes that Adjusted Revenues, as defined below, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future outlook for Gallagher. Gallagher believes that Organic Growth provides a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed Organic Growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments in a meaningful and consistent manner. Adjusted Revenues is defined as revenues adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business and supplemental commission timing amounts. Organic Growth is organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, which excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2011 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2010.
The most directly comparable GAAP measure for Adjusted Revenues and Organic Growth is revenues. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, revenues were $1,341 million, $462 million, and $1,803 million, respectively, in 2010, $651 million, $222 million, and $873 million, respectively, for the 6 months ended June 30, 2010 and $721 million, $264 million, and $985 million, respectively, for the 6 months ended June 30, 2011. For the Brokerage Segment, revenues were $780 million, $849 million, $926 million, $1,001 million, $1,071 million, $1,114 million, $1,188 million, $1,276 million, $1,341 million, $317 million and $404 million, in 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, first quarter 2011 and second quarter 2011, respectively.
ReconciliationsPlease see "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures" on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com under "Investor Relations" for a reconciliation of non-GAAP measures to the most directly comparable GAAP measures.
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 -  Brokerage Segment74% of Revenue
We sell insurance and consult on insurance programs
Retail P&C, benefits and wholesale
 -  Risk Management Segment26% of Revenue
We adjust claims and help companies reduce their losses
Workers Comp, liability, managed care & property
Modest amount of storm/quake claims
QJ
 
Brokerage Segment Revenues
Retail P/C
Mostly U.S., Canada, and U.K.
Domestic
76%
%%
9% J
Year 2011 estimated
 
Risk Management Segment Revenues
 
Strong StartFirst Half 2011
Brokerage Segment
Adjusted Revenues
$ 750
700
650
600
550
1H2011
1H2010
(in $M)
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
Adjusted EBITDAC
 
Strong StartFirst Half 2011
Risk Management Segment
$ 275
Adjusted Revenues
250
264
225
222
200
1H2011
1H2010
(in $M)
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
Adjusted EBITDAC
 
Strong StartFirst Half 2011
Brokerage & Risk Management Combined
19.7%
1H2011
Adjusted Revenues
(in $M)
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
Adjusted EBITDAC
9
 
Corporate SegmentClean Energy Update
Gallagher owns 42% of Chem-Mod, LLC. Chem-Mod is a multi-pollutant reduction venture that owns technologies to reduce harmful emissions from coal fired power plants. When The Chem-Mod Solution is used in refined coal plants placed in service by December 31, 2011, the operation can qualify for tax credits under IRC Section 45.
Gallagher owns approximately 25% of six Section 45 operations. Collectively, these six operations could generate approximately $4.5 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter through 2019.
Gallagher has signed agreements with a utility to build and run two new refined coal operations. Gallagher expects to retain 40% to 49% ownership. These two operations could generate approximately $2.5 to $3.0 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter through 2021.
Demand for Section 45 plants using The Chem-Mod Solution is increasing. Accordingly, Gallagher has obtained an extension of its license from Chem-Mod and is in the process of constructing up to 10 additional facilities.
10
 
Maintaining a Prudent Balance Sheet
Gallagher S&P 1000
Total Debt $710
Stockholders' Equity $1,203
Net Debt to Total Capital 35% 30%
Net Debt to Adjusted EBITDAC 1.5x 1.7x
G
$s in millions. Gallagher data as of 06/30/2011. Source for S&P 1000 data: Bloomberg as of 08/19/11. Gallagher's ratios reflect reported debt less $75m of cash available on our balance sheet for acquisitions and include pro-forma EBITDAC from the GAB Robins and Heath Lambert acquisitions.
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
11
 
Cash Generation
Three Uses of Cash
 -  M&A
Dividendsbelow 50% of cash generation
 -  Repurchase sharescurrently not anticipated
$ 400
300
200
100
Dividend
2008
2009
($Ms)
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3 and on page 47.
2010
G
12
 
Looking Forward
View of operating environment Plan for growth
13
 
Economy  GDP
Real GDP in billons of chained 2005 dollars. Source for data: Bureau of Economic Analysis
14
 
U.S. Jobs
140,000 T
Lost Decade of Job Growth
135,000
130,000
JL
125,000
120,000
115,000
YE 2001 YE 2002 YE 2003 YE 2004 YE 2005 YE 2006 YE 2007 YE 2008 YE 2009 YE 2010 Aug-11
Total Nonfarm Employees ( in thousands) seasonally adjusted. Source for data: Bureau of Labor Statistics
G
15
 
Short-Term Rates
 - EBHttE
6.0%
5.0%
4.0%
3.0%
2.0% 4
1.0% \
0.0%
3.9%
1.7%
1.1%
hl.4%
1.9%
0.2% 0.2% 0.1%
r r
Hi i
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 1H
2011
Average Annual Effective Fed Funds Rates. Source for data: Bloomberg
G
16
 
Commercial P&C Pricing Well Below Year 2000 Significantly Lagging Inflation
17
 
Commercial P&C Pricing Stabilizing?
18
 
Global P&C Market Growing Again
19
 
Plan For GrowthFuture Drivers
Organic A Growth Mergers and Acquisitions
Growth
Productivity and Quality Maintain W Unique Culture
G
20
 
Plan For GrowthFuture Drivers
Organic A Growth Mergers and Acquisitions
Growth
Productivity and Quality Maintain W Unique Culture
21
 
Gallagher's Sales Culture Overcomes
 - Gallagher Organic -a-ClABChange in Avg. Commercial Rates
12.0%
9.0%
6.0%
3.0%
0.0%
-3.0%
-6.0%
-9.0%
-12.0%
?15.0%
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 1Q 2Q
2011 2011
Gallagher's Brokerage Segment Organic Growth including Supplemental Commissions. See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
G
22
 
Grow Our Own
Driving Organic Growth
Hire Experienced Teams
Focus Into Niches
Provide Sales Mgmt.
Tools and Training
Cross Selling
Organic Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Domestic and International
23
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our Own
Hire Experienced Teams
Focus Into Niches
Provide Sales Mgmt.
Tools and Training
Cross Selling
Organic Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Domestic and International
24
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Own Sales Focus
Mgmt. Cross Into Tools Selling Hire Niches
Experienced and Organic Training
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Domestic and International
25
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Own Sales Focus
Mgmt. Cross Into Tools Selling Hire Niches
Experienced and Organic Training
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Domestic and International
26
 
Plan For GrowthFuture Drivers
Organic A Growth Mergers and Acquisitions
Growth
Productivity and Quality Maintain W Unique Culture
27
 
Strong Acquisition Momentum
28
 
Strong Acquisition Momentum
13 acquisitions for $211m annualized revenues in 1H 2011 ? Domestic $48m International $163m
Strong international activity
 -  Oxygen Insurance Managers
Securitas RE
First City
Specialized Broking
Associates
Risk & Reward (Benefits)
Woodbrook Underwriting Agencies
Heath Lambert
Lonmar(London Binder / Wholesaler)
ITI (Singapore)
2008
2010
2011
1H 2011
 - 
GAB integration on-track for completion in September. 95% of the clients have been converted to Risx-Facs.
G
29
 
M & ALooking Forward
Vast Pipeline
Domestic and International Markets Highly Fragmented
18,000 agents / brokers in the U.S.
Baby boomers looking for exit strategy
Need Gallagher's Expertise
Numerous Specialties
Retail P&C Wholesale Benefits International MGA
MGU
Captive
Limited Consolidators
Arthur J. Gallagher
& Co.
Gallagher's Core Competency
Culture
Proven History of Doing the Deal
Ability to Integrate
30
 
Current Gallagher U.S. Locations
31
 
Larger Cities With Expansion Potential
Cities with population of 100,000+ where Gallagher has no presence
32
 
Gallagher Global Alliance Creates Pipeline
33
 
Plan For GrowthFuture Drivers
Organic Growth Mergers and Acquisitions
Growth productivity & quality Maintain Unique Culture
34
 
Productivity & Quality
Established
Offshore
Centers of
Excellence
Controlling Headcount
Reducing Real Estate
Leveraging
Sales Force
Management
Tools
Investing in
Business
Intelligence
Improving Productivity
and Quality
Standardizing
Processes and Systems
Managing Expenses
Building
Productivity
ToolsDMS
and
Workflow
35
 
Relentless Focus on Quality & Customer Service
EMPLOYEE BENEFIT CONSULTANT W THE BRITISH
I INSURANCE
\ WINNER
&S G
20 0 5
THIRD-PARTY CLAIMS ADMINISTRATORPROPERTY/CASUALTY
Winner of 2011 Greenwich Excellence Awards in U.S. Large Corporate Insurance Brokerage
SBA Gallagher -ANZZIIF 2011 "Sources to the Community Award"
Australis Group Underwriting -Finalist for the "Underwriting Agency of the Year" award
*fr* C/^
s 2010 
RETAIL AGENT/BROKER REVENUES >$250M
36
 
Plan For GrowthFuture Drivers
Organic Growth Mergers and Acquisitions
Growth
Productivity and quality Maintain W Unique Culture
37
 
Maintain Unique Culture
People
Core Values
G
38
 
Why Invest?
You believe in Gallagher's
Organic growth opportunities M&A opportunities
Productivity and quality gains resulting in margin improvement
Experienced management team
Focus on culture
Solid financial foundation
39
 
Why Invest?
You like Gallagher's return to stockholders
Outperformed the S&P 500 in total returns over last decade
Outperformed the S&P 500 in total returns since the Great Recession
?Consistent dividend growth since 1984
40
 
Total Returns January 1, 2000August 31, 2011
AJG versus S&P 500
200% 175% 150% 125% 100%
75%
50%
25%
0%
-25%
-50%
-AJG ? S&P 500
Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns assume dividend reinvestment.
41
 
Total Returns since the Great Recession
January 1, 2008August 31, 2011 AJG versus S&P 500
55%
50%
45%
40%
35%
30%
25%
20%
15%
10%
5%
0%
-5%
-10%
-15%
-20%
-25%
-30%
-35%
-40%
-45%
-50%
-10%
Mar-08 Jun-08 Sep-08 Dec-08 Mar-09 Jun-09 Sep-09 Dec-09 Mar-10 Jun-10 Sep-10 Dec-10 Mar-11 Jun-11
-AJG
?S&P 500
Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns assume dividend reinvestment.
42
 
Paying Dividends
Dividends Per Share
$1.32
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
Year
1984 ,v~" 2011
IndicatedOn July 21, 2011, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.33 per share 3Q 11 quarterly dividend ff^
43
 
44
Questions
& Answers
 
For Additional Information
Marsha Akin
DirectorInvestor Relations
Marsha_Akin@ajg.com
Phone: 630-285-3501
45
 
Appendix
46
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Cash Generation for 2008 to 2010
(Unauditedin millions )
2008 2009 2010
Earnings from continuing operationsBrokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined
Provision for income taxes
Depreciation
Amortization
Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables
EBITDACBrokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined
Gains from books of business sales and other
Net supplemental commission timing
Workforce related charges
Lease termination related charges
Litigation settlements
GAB Robins integration costs
Adjusted EBITDACBrokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined
Stock compensation expense Capital expenditures Interest and banking costs Corporate and acquisition costs Income taxes paid
Cash generation $ 132.4 $ 154.4 $ 166.8
85.1 96.5 108.0
29.8 30.5 31.9
43.7 55.0 60.8
4.1 (2.6)
291.0 340.5 364.9
(23.8) (11.6) (5.9)
6.1 1.4 (14.7) 3.9 12.0 6.8
4.2 2.7 0.7 2.2 6.3
3.6
281.4 347.2 361.7
18.3 16.1 15.6
(32.0) (23.5) (25.4) (28.9) (29.5) (36.4)
(5.4) (6.2) (6.9)
(40.1) (27.7) (37.6)
$ 193.3 $ 276.4 $ 271.0
See information regarding Non-GAAP financial measures on page 3.
47

Exhibit 99.2
 
NYSE: AJG
INVESTMENT PROFILE
Brokerage Risk Management Segment Segment
GROWING VALUE
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and the world's largest third-party property/casualty (P/C) claims administrator.* Gallagher generates approximately 82% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 18% derived primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada, New Zealand and the United Kingdom.
*According to Business Insurance magazine.
AUGUST 2011
Brokerage Segment 2 Brokerage Acquisition Strategy 4 Risk Management Segment 4 Corporate Segment 5 Insurance Market Overview 6 Why Invest? 7 Contact Information 8
www.ajg.com
GALLAGHER STOCK PERFORMANCE
TOTAL RETURNS JANUARY 1, 2008AUGUST 31, 2011
As of June 30, 2011 (unless otherwise indicated)
Price $28.54
52-week high/low $31.92$24.30 Trailing 12-mos. revenues $1.9 billion Market cap $3.2 billion Indicated annual dividend $1.32* Yield 4.6% Shares outstanding 112.2 million End of fiscal year December 31 Number of employees 12,315
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 72% OF 2010 REVENUES
Gallagher's Brokerage Segment operates through a network of more than 250 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 15 other countries. In addition, Gallagher has developed the Gallagher Global Alliance of independent insurance brokers and consultants that enables it to provide coverage and services to its clients in more than 100 countries around the world.
Retail Insurance Brokerage Operations
79% of 2010 Brokerage Segment Revenues
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property/casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, which are usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Primary Lines of Coverage
 -  Aviation  -  Errors & Omissions  -  Professional Liability
 -  Casualty  -  Fire  -  Property
 -  Commercial Auto  -  General Liability  -  Retirement Solutions
 -  Dental  -  Life  -  Voluntary Benefits
 -  Directors & Officers Liability  -  Marine  -  Wind
 -  Disability  -  Medical  -  Workers Compensation
 -  Earthquake  -  Product Liability
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into approximately 200 geographic profit centers located primarily throughout the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 66% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
Gallagher's specialized focus on these niche/practice groups allows for highly targeted marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; cross-selling new brokerage products and services to existing customers; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives, deductible plans and self-insurance; and mergers and acquisitions.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
AUGUST 2011
 
Niche/Practice Groups
 -  Agribusiness  -  Habitational  -  Private Equity
 -  Aviation & Aerospace  -  Healthcare  -  Public Entity
 -  Captive Consulting  -  Higher Education  -  Real Estate
 -  Construction  -  Hospitality  -  Religious/Not-for-Profit
 -  Cyber Risk  -  Institutional Investment Advisory  -  Restaurant
 -  Energy  -  Marine  -  Scholastic
 -  Entertainment  -  Manufacturing  -  Technology/Telecom
 -  Environmental  -  Personal  -  Transportation
 -  Global Risks  -  Professional Groups
Wholesale Insurance Brokerage Operations
21% of 2010 Brokerage Segment Revenues
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Wholesale revenues are generated from sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurance carrier.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into more than 60 geographic profit centers located primarily in the United States and Bermuda, and through its approved Lloyd's of London broker. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent, handling specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
More than 75% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents who are not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation currently ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency, according to Business Insurance magazine.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of agent and broker clients, by developing new managing general agency programs, and through mergers and acquisitions.
Gallagher Global Alliance
The Gallagher Global Alliance is an alliance of independent broker partners. Global Alliance partners are selected by Gallagher based upon common business philosophies and the partners' strengths and service capabilities within their respective countries. Through the Gallagher Global Alliance and its own international operations, Gallagher offers client-service capabilities in more than 100 countries around the world.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
AUGUST 2011
 
Brokerage Segment Acquisition Strategy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components: organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated approximately 267 acquisitions from 1985 through June 30, 2011, substantially all within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that generate between $1 million and $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through acquisitions and joint ventures, where the company begins its relationship with an equity position.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on:  -  a corporate culture that matches Gallagher's sales-oriented culture  -  a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources  -  clearly defined financial criteria.
Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Gallagher believes that growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 25% OF 2010 REVENUES
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and insurance companies that choose to outsource their claims-handling services.
Expertise
 -  Real-time Claims Management  -  Managed Care Services  -  Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.)  -  Risk Control Services  -  Appraisal Services  -  Safety Programs  -  Litigation Management  -  Settlement Management  -  Information Management  -  Education & Training
INVESTMENT PROFILE
AUGUST 2011
 
Approximately 69% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-related claims, 27% from general and commercial auto liability-related claims, and 4% from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management (employee absence management) programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance, on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the United States, United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 80% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments. In addition, the Risk Management Segment may grow in the future through mergers and acquisitions.
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Gallagher's debt, clean-energy investments, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs are reported in this segment.
With respect to the clean-energy investments, Gallagher owns positions in various commercial operations that help coal-fired utilities reduce harmful emissions.
 -  Gallagher owns 42% of Chem-Mod, LLC. Chem-Mod is a multi-pollutant reduction venture that owns technologies to reduce harmful emissions from coal fired power plants. When The Chem-Mod Solution is used in refined coal plants placed in service by December 31, 2011, the operation can qualify for tax credits under IRC Section 45.
 -  Gallagher owns approximately 25% of six Section 45 operations. Collectively, these six operations could generate approximately $4.5 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter through 2019.
 -  Gallagher has signed agreements with a utility to build and run two new refined coal operations. Gallagher expects to retain 40% to 49% ownership. These two operations could generate approximately $2.5 to $3.0 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter through 2021.
 -  Demand for Section 45 plants using The Chem-Mod Solution is increasing. Accordingly, Gallagher has obtained an extention of its license from Chem-Mod and is in the process of constructing up to ten additional facilities.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
AUGUST 2011
 
INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW
INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW
Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Various factorsincluding competition for market share among insurance carriers, increased underwriting capacity and improved economies of scale following consolidationscan result in flat or reduced P/C premium rates (a "soft" market). A soft market tends to exert downward pressure on commission revenues. Various countervailing factors, such as greater than anticipated loss experience and capital shortages, can result in increases in P/C premium rates (a "hard" market). A hard market tends to favorably impact commission revenues. Hard and soft markets may be broad-based or more narrowly focused across individual product lines or geographic areas.
From 2004 into 2011, the P/C market has remained soft in most lines and geographic areas. A quarterly market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers in the second quarter of 2011 indicated that rate reductions for commercial business were flattening, down just 0.1%, year-over-year, compared with a 2.9% year-over-year decline in the first quarter of 2011.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This investment profile contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment profile, the words "anticipates," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this investment profile include, but are not limited to, statements related to anticipated areas of revenue growth within the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments, Gallagher's acquisition strategy and planned levels of acquisition activity, future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations, and future trends in the insurance and insurance brokerage industries. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 -  changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, and changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape could impact Gallagher's future revenue growth, its acquisition program, and trends in the insurance and insurance brokerage industries; and  -  uncertainties related to Gallagher's clean-energy investments, including uncertainties related to (i) receipt by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits, (ii) Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for its non-operating and future operations, (iii) potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45, (iv) utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity, (v) operational risks at Gallagher's IRC Section 45 operations, (vi) business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners, (vii) intellectual property risks and (viii) environmental risks, could impact Gallagher's future income and tax credits generated by its clean-energy operations.
Refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
This investment profile includes references to Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin, which are performance measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, GAAP information. EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, workforce-related charges, acquisition-related integration costs and litigation settlements. Adjusted EBITDAC margin is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC divided by total revenues. For the non-GAAP measures set forth on page 7 of this profile, the most directly comparable GAAP measure is earnings from continuing operations, which, for the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments on a combined basis, was $132 million in 2008, $154 million in 2009 and $167 million in 2010. Please see "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures" on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com <http://www.ajg.com> under "Investor Relations" for the purpose of each non-GAAP measure used and a reconciliation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
AUGUST 2011
 
INSURANCE MARKET OVERVIEW
WHY INVEST?
Supplemental quarterly data by segment from 2008 through June 30, 2011, is available at www.ajg.com.
disclosure on page 6
Adjusted EBITDAC Growth*
$500
Adjusted EBITDAC Margin*
disclosure on page 6
Dividends Per Share
** Indicated  On July 21, 2011, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.33 per share third-quarter dividend.
INVESTMENT PROFILE
AUGUST 2011
 
FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Marsha J. Akin  Director-Investor Relations 630.285.3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
INVESTMENT PROFILE
AUGUST 2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20110912115348.txt.gz
TIME:20110912115348
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On September 12, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 135,870 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
September 12, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 135,870 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111007171100.txt.gz
TIME:20111007171100
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
(1) In line with the previously disclosed final voting results at the Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") 2011 Annual Meeting of Stockholders and the Board's previously disclosed recommendation, Gallagher will submit an advisory vote to its stockholders on Gallagher's compensation program for named executive officers on an annual basis.
(2) The deadline for submitting a proposal to be included in Gallagher's proxy statement and proxy card for the 2012 Annual Meeting of Stockholders has been extended to December 6, 2011. Such a proposal must comply with the requirements of Rule 14a-8 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, regarding stockholder proposals to be included in company-sponsored proxy materials.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111025165536.txt.gz
TIME:20111025165536
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 25, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter and nine-month period ended September 30, 2011. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
99.1 Press release, dated October 25, 2011, issued by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, October 25, 2011Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine-month period ended September 30, 2011. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at . For a description of the measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 6.
www.ajg.com
"Our third quarter showed excellent progress. We are seeing organic growth in all of our operations. We are holding our margins; M&A activity is robust and we are growing our adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted diluted net earnings per share," said J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Our combined Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted 22% growth in adjusted total revenues, 5.2% organic growth in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, 20% growth in adjusted EBITDAC and 13% growth in adjusted diluted net earnings per share."
 
 
"We continue to see some indications of market firming and so far our customers' businesses seem to be weathering the recent economic uncertainty. Looking forward, our global team is pushing hard to deliver continued solid results for 2011, which should give us strong momentum going into 2012."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2011 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same quarter and nine-month period in 2010:
 
 
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2011 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2010 (in millions):
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
Gallagher is also investing approximately $12.0 million, on a net basis, in four additional commercial clean-coal operations (consisting of 6 plants), which have signed long-term agreements with utilities to purchase the refined coal produced by those operations. Gallagher plans to retain a minority investment in each operation. Beginning in early 2012, these four operations collectively could generate for Gallagher approximately $7.0 million to $8.0 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter through 2021.
In addition, Gallagher is also investing approximately $18.0 million, on a net basis, to build 10 additional commercial clean-coal plants before year-end, and is negotiating with co-investors to purchase portions of the plants, and with utility customers to purchase, under long-term contracts, refined coal produced by these plants. It is too early at this time to predict when these negotiations will be complete and what the ultimate earnings potential could be from these plants.
 
 
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 39% to 41% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for third quarter was 34.2% in 2011 and 34.4% in 2010. The third quarter 2011 and 2010 effective tax rates are lower than the statutory rate due to tax credits generated during 2011 and 2010.
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 26, 2011 at 9:15 a.m. ET/8:15 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 16 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 100 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Concerning Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean-energy operations, our corporate income tax rate, the integration of the Heath Lambert and GAB Robins acquisitions, the future revenue and earnings impact of such acquisitions, drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in the press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentation of 2011 and 2010 statements of earnings, presented on the following pages, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures (continued)
 
 
Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2011 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2010.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, EBITDAC (on pages 8 through 11), for Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on pages 1 and 2), and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
See notes to third quarter 2011 earnings release and non-GAAP financial measures on page 12 of 13.
 
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2011 Earnings Release
Non-GAAP Financial Measures (See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 6 of 13 above)
 
 
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2011 Earnings Release (continued)
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
Director - Investor Relations
630-285-3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111028115351.txt.gz
TIME:20111028115351
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On October 28, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 47,000 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
October 28, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 47,000 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111101124223.txt.gz
TIME:20111101124223
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On November 1, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 348,532 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
November 1, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 348,532 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111114135943.txt.gz
TIME:20111114135943
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 14, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 68,300 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
November 14, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 68,300 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111206124910.txt.gz
TIME:20111206124910
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 6, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 352,231 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 6, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 352,231 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111209124254.txt.gz
TIME:20111209124254
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On December 9, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 74,697 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 9, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 74,697 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111216150354.txt.gz
TIME:20111216150354
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On December 16, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 80,522 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 16, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 80,522 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20111219170423.txt.gz
TIME:20111219170423
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On December 19, 2011, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 91,144 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 19, 2011
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, Illinois 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 91,144 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120131164436.txt.gz
TIME:20120131164436
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On January 31, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2011. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, January 31, 2012  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2011. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at . For a description of the measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 7.
www.ajg.com
"We finished 2011 with strong momentum. During the fourth quarter, both operating segments posted strong organic growth, improved adjusted EBITDAC margins and improved adjusted diluted net earnings per share," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Our combined Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted 20% growth in adjusted total revenues, 7.2% organic growth in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, 26% growth in adjusted EBITDAC and 19% growth in adjusted diluted net earnings per share."
 
 
"During the fourth quarter, we continued to see evidence of market firming and our customers' businesses seem to be stabilizing, even in these times of economic uncertainty. As we move into 2012, our global team continues to execute on our plans and are delivering outstanding service to our clients in this changing environment."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2011 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same periods in 2010:
Quarter Ended December 31
 
 
 
Year Ended December 31
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2011 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2010 (in millions):
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
Gallagher holds investment positions in 15 commercial clean coal production plants that were built and first began producing refined coal in fourth quarter 2011 (the 2011 Era Plants). These plants also qualify for tax credits under Section 45 of the Internal Revenue Code which pass through proportionally based on Gallagher's ownership level.
 
 
 
Gallagher holds a 42% controlling interest in Chem-Mod, LLC which possesses rights, information and technologies used for the reduction of unwanted emissions created during the combustion of coal. The clean coal production plants discussed above, as well as other unrelated parties, license and use Chem-Mod's technologies in the production of refined fuel. Based on current production estimates provided by licensees, Chem-Mod could generate for Gallagher approximately $2.5 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter.
Please note that all estimates set forth above regarding the future quarterly earnings impact of our clean-energy investments are subject to significant risks, including those referred to below under "Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements."
 
 
 
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 38% to 40% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for the year ended December 31, 2011 and 2010 was 30.7% and 19.6%, respectively. The following provides a reconciliation of the expected federal and state statutory tax amounts to the provision (benefit) for income taxes as reported in continuing operations for 2011 and 2010:
 
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, February 1, 2012 at 9:15 a.m. ET/8:15 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 17 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding future income and tax credits generated by Gallagher's clean energy investments, our corporate income tax rate, the future revenue and earnings impact of recent acquisitions, drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers may provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in this press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentation of 2011 and 2010 statements of earnings, presented on the following pages, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that may assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after-tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the normalized effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures (continued)
 
Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2011 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2010.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2011 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, EBITDAC (on pages 9 through 12), for Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on pages 1 and 2), and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
 
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 14 and notes to fourth quarter 2011 earnings release on page 13 of 14.
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 14 and notes to fourth quarter 2011 earnings release on page 13 of 14.
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 14 and notes to fourth quarter 2011 earnings release on page 13 of 14.
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 14 and notes to fourth quarter 2011 earnings release on page 13 of 14.
 
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2011 Earnings Release
 
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2011 Earnings Release (continued)
 
(1) (Continued)
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
DirectorInvestor Relations
630-285-3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120203105132.txt.gz
TIME:20120203105132
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 3, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 427,243 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
February 3, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 427,243 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120207155157.txt.gz
TIME:20120207155157
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 7, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 104,078 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
February 7, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 104,078 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120214124416.txt.gz
TIME:20120214124416
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 14, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 103,104 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
February 14, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 103,104 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120216130904.txt.gz
TIME:20120216130904
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") issued a press release on February 9, 2012 announcing that J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., the Company's Chairman, President and CEO, will speak at the Bank of America Merrill Lynch Insurance Conference in New York on Thursday, February 16, 2012 at 1:10 p.m. ET.
The presentation slides for this conference are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. In addition, the Company's February 2012 Investment Profile, to be distributed to attendees at the conference, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2. Both documents may also be used at other investor conferences, and can be accessed at the Company's website at www.ajg.com/ir.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO. Investment Presentation February 2012
2 Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements This presentation contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this presentation, the words "anticipates," "expects," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this presentation include, but are not limited to, statements relating to: (i) improvements in the economy and rate environment; (ii) Gallagher's capabilities for growth and expansion; (iii) trends in Gallagher's acquisition strategy and planned levels of acquisition activity; (iv) the integration of recent acquisitions (including Heath Lambert); (v) drivers of organicgrowth in Gallagher's core businesses; (vi) anticipated future results or performance (including margins) of any segment or Gallagher as awhole; (vii) Gallagher's stock performance (including expected future dividend payments); (viii) future debt levels; (ix) expected uses of cash; (x) international opportunities; (xi) productivity and expense reduction initiatives; and (xii) potential future developments in, and income and tax credits that could be generated by, Gallagher's clean-energy investments. Important factorsthat could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:  - changes in worldwide and national economic conditions (such as a European debt crisis), changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape, and the difficulties inherent in combining the cultures and systems of different companies could impact (i) through (xi) above; and  - uncertainties related to Gallagher's clean-energy investments, including uncertainties related to maintenance of long-term permits to operate the facilities by Gallagher's utility partners; Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for the non-operating clean energy investments; potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section45; utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity; operational risks at the clean-energy operations (including Gallagher's lack of control over such operations); business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners; intellectual property risks; political and regulatory developments, including the risk that tax incentives for coal could be eliminated retroactively; and environmental risks, could impact (xii) above. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
3 Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures This presentation includes references to Adjusted Revenues, Organic Growth, EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert and Cash Generation, which are measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided herein. Revenue MeasuresGallagher believes that Adjusted Revenues, as defined below, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future outlook for Gallagher. Gallagher believes that Organic Growth provides a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2012 and beyond.Gallagher has historically viewed Organic Growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments.Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.  - Adjusted Revenuesis defined as revenues adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business and supplemental commission timing amounts.  - Organic Growthis the change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, which excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related tooperations disposed of in each year presented.These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year.In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2011 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2010. The most directly comparable GAAP measure for Adjusted Revenues and Organic Growth is revenues. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, revenues were $1,341 million, $462 million and $1,803 million, respectively, in 2010, and $1,556 million, $549 million and $2,105 million, respectively, in 2011. Additionally, for the Brokerage Segment, revenues were $849 million, $926 million, $1,001 million, $1,071million, $1,114 million, $1,188 million and $1,276 million in 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008 and 2009, respectively. Earnings MeasuresGallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin and Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance.Gallagher considers EBITDAC as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis.Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin and Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert are presented to improve the comparability of Gallagher's results between periods by eliminating the impact of certain items that have a high degree of variability.  - EBITDACis defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change inestimated acquisition earnout payables.  - Adjusted EBITDACis defined as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, earnout related compensation charges, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, acquisition related integration costs andlitigation settlements.  - Adjusted EBITDAC Marginis defined as Adjusted EBITDAC divided by Adjusted Revenues.  - Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambertis defined as Adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to exclude the EBITDAC associated with the acquired Heath Lambert operations divided by Adjusted Revenues, as further adjusted to exclude the revenues associated with the acquired Heath Lambert operations. The most directly comparable GAAP measure for these non-GAAP earnings measures is earnings from continuing operations. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, earnings from continuing operations was $136 million, $31 million and $167 million, respectively, in 2010, and $140 million, $34 million and $174 million, respectively, in 2011. Cash GenerationGallagher defines this measure as adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to add back stock compensation expense (a non-cash charge) and to deduct capital expenditures, interest paid on corporate debt, corporate overhead expenses and income taxes paid. Gallagher considers Cash Generation as a way to measure net cash generated from its operations on an ongoing basis. ReconciliationsFor a reconciliation of Cash Generation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, please see page 54. For all other measures, please see "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures" on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.comunder "Investor Relations"
4 Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Brokerage Segment  - 73% of revenue  - We sell insurance and consult on insurance programs  - Retail P&C, benefits and wholesale Risk Management Segment  - 26% of revenue  - We adjust claims and help companies reduce their losses  - Workers compensation, liability, managed care & property  - Modest amount of storm/quake claims
7 Brokerage Segment 2011$1,320 $1,551$700 $950 $1,200 $1,450 $1,700 2010 2011 Adjusted Revenues $290 $341 $150 $200$250 $300$350 $400 2010 2011 Adjusted EBITDAC 21.9% 22.4% 21.5% 21.8% 22.0% 22.3%22.5% 22.8%23.0% 2010 2011 Adjusted EDITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert (in $M) See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3. 18% 18%
 
8 Risk Management Segment 2011 $462 $549 $200 $300$400$500 $600 2010 2011Adjusted Revenues$72 $88 $20 $40 $60 $80 $100 20102011Adjusted EBITDAC15.6% 15.9% 15.0%15.3% 15.5% 15.8% 16.0% 16.3% 16.5% 2010 2011 Adjusted EDITDAC Margin (in $M) 19% 22% See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
9 Brokerage & Risk Mgmt Combined 2011 $1,782 $2,100 $500 $1,000 $1,500 $2,000 $2,500 20102011 Adjusted Revenues $362 $428$100 $200 $300 $400 $500 2010 2011 Adjusted EBITDAC 20.3% 20.7% 20.0% 20.3% 20.5%20.8% 21.0% 21.3% 21.5% 2010 2011 Adjusted EDITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert (in $M) 18% 18% See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
10 Maintaining a Prudent Balance Sheet$'s in millions. Using Gallagher's combined Brokerage and Risk Management EBITDAC. Net Debt for Gallagher reflects total debt outstanding at 12/31/11 less $164m of cash on hand and available for general corporate purposes. Source for S&P 1000 data: Bloomberg as of 01/26/12. See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3. Gallagher S&P 1000 Total Debt $685 Stockholders' Equity $1,244 Net Debt to Total Capital 30% 27% Net Debt to Adjusted EBITDAC 1.2x 1.8x
11 Clean Energy Investments Summary # ofPlants GAAP Net Carrying Value3 Est. QtrlyNet Earnings1 EarningsEnd Date 2009 Era Plants Operating -under long-term contracts (minority positions) 12 $ 8.9 $ 4.3 Idle-seeking long-term contracts and co-investors 2 1.5 n/a2 Total 2009 Era Plants 14 10.4 4.3 2019 2011 Era Plants Operating -under long-term contracts(minority positions3) 5 10.7 8.0 Idle -non-binding agreement for long-term contract 1 1.0 1.7 Idle -seeking long-term contracts and co-investors 9 8.8 n/a2 Total 2011 Era Plants 15 20.5 9.7 2021 Chem-Mod, LLC (42% ownership)   2.5 N/A Total clean energy investments 29 $ 30.9 $ 16.5 1 Quarterly amount shown is ultimate run rate and not current run rate.3. As of January 1, 2012 2 The company has not given guidance as to the earnings potential of the idle plants. As of 12/31/11 (in $M)
12 Dividends Per Share $0.00$0.20 $0.40 $0.60 $0.80 $1.00 $1.20 $1.40 *Indicated On January 26, 2012, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.34 per share first quarter 2012 quarterly dividend. 1984 2012 $1.36*
13 Total Stockholder Returns Since 1/1/2011 -15% -10% -5% 0%5%10% 15% 20% 25% 30% AJG27% S&P9% Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns include reinvesting all dividends at the ex-dividend date.
14 Economy GDP $10,000 $10,500$11,000$11,500 $12,000 $12,500 $13,000 $13,500 2001 20022003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 20102011 Real GDP in billons of chained 2005 dollars. Source for data: Bureau of Economic Analysis Growing Back to 2007 Levels
15 U.S. Jobs 115,000 120,000 125,000 130,000 135,000 140,000 20012002 2003 2004 2005 200620072008 2009 2010 2011 Total Nonfarm Employees (in thousands) seasonally adjusted. Source for data: Bureau of Labor Statistics Recovering, but only to 2004 levels
16 Short-Term Rates 3.9%1.7%1.1% 1.3% 3.2% 5.0% 5.0%1.9%0.2% 0.2% 0.1% 0% 1%2% 3% 4% 5%6%2001 2002 2003 2004 200520062007 2008 2009 2010 2011 Average Annual Effective Fed Funds Rates. Source for data: Bloomberg NIL
17 Commercial P&C Pricing Commercial Rate Index reflects the cost of P&C premiums relative to the year 2000. Constructed using Counsel of Insurance Agents and Brokers data. 80 90100 110120130 140 150 160 CPI130 Rates91
 
18 Rate Environment CIAB-6.4% -5.2% -5.4% -2.9% -0.1%0.9% 2.8% -8.0% -6.0%-4.0%-2.0% 0.0% 2.0% 4.0%Change in Avg. Commercial Rates
 
19 U.S. PC Industry Premiums Written8.6% 15.0%9.7% 4.5% 0.0% 4.3% -0.8% -1.9% -3.8%0.8% 3.3% -8% -3% 2% 7%12%17% 20012002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 20082009 2010 2011* Growth in net premiums written. Source for data: AM Best as of December 2, 2011. *Growth rate for 9 months 2011 compared to 9 months 2010. Growing Again
 
20 Brokerage During Great Recession $223$341 $150 $200$250$300 $350 $400 2008 2011Adjusted EBITDAC $1,170 $1,551 $700 $950$1,200 $1,450 $1,70020082011 Adjusted Revenues 10% CAGR 19.0% 22.4% 15.0% 17.5% 20.0% 22.5%25.0% 2008 2011 Adjusted EDITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert (in $M) 15% CAGR See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
21 Risk Mgmt During Great Recession $465 $549 $200$300 $400 $500 $600 2008 2011 Adjusted Revenues $59 $88$20 $40 $60 $80 $1002008 2011 Adjusted EBITDAC 12.6% 15.9% 10.0% 12.0% 14.0%16.0% 18.0% 20.0% 2008 2011Adjusted EDITDAC Margin (in $M) 6% CAGR 14% CAGR See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
22 Brokerage & Risk Mgmt During Great Recession $1,635$2,100 $500 $1,000 $1,500$2,000 $2,500 2008 2011 Adjusted Revenues$281 $428$100 $200 $300$400 $500 2008 2011Adjusted EBITDAC 17.2% 20.7% 15.0%17.5% 20.0%22.5% 25.0% 20082011 Adjusted EDITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert (in $M) 9% CAGR 15% CAGR See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
23 Total Stockholder Returns During Great Recession Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns include reinvesting all dividends at the ex-dividend date. -60%-40% -20% 0% 20%40% 60% 80% 100% AJG79% S&P0%
 
24 Plan For Growth
 
25 Plan For Growth Organic
 
26 Gallagher's Sales Culture Overcomes10.0%2.0%2.0%5.0%2.0%-0.8%-2.4%-1.7%Gallagher Organic3.1%8.1%-4.1%-8.0%-5.2%-12.1%-11.0%-5.4%-5.6%CIAB*0.2%-15.0%-10.0%-5.0% 0.0%5.0%10.0%15.0%200320042005200620072008200920102011 Gallagher's Brokerage Segment Organic Growth including Supplemental Commissions. See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures on Page 3. *Change in Average Commercial Rates
 
27 Driving Organic GrowthOrganic Growth Enhance Carrier Compensation Domestic and International Grow Our Own Hire Experienced Teams Focus Into Niches Provide Sales Mgmt. Tools and Training Cross Selling
 
28 Driving Organic GrowthOrganic Growth Enhance Carrier Compensation Domestic and International Grow Our Own Hire Experienced Teams Focus Into Niches Provide Sales Mgmt. Tools and Training Cross Selling
 
29 Driving Organic Growth Organic Growth Enhance Carrier Compensation Domestic and International Grow Our Own Hire Experienced Teams Focus Into Niches Provide Sales Mgmt. Tools and Training Cross Selling
 
30 Driving Organic Growth Organic Growth Enhance Carrier Compensation Domestic and International Grow Our Own Hire Experienced Teams Focus Into Niches Provide Sales Mgmt. Tools and Training Cross Selling
 
31 Organic Illustration Negative $1.0m $976k ~(-3%) +10% (-5%) (-4%) Renewal BasePrior Year New Business Lost Business Current Year Revenue (-4%) Impact of Rate on Renewals Impact of Exposure on Renewals All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not estimates of Gallagher's future performance.
 
32 Organic Illustration Flat $1.0m $1.0m 0% +10% (-5%) (-2.5%) Renewal BasePrior Year Lost Business Current Year Revenue (-2.5%) All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not estimates of Gallagher's future performance. New Business Impact of Rate on Renewals Impact of Exposure on Renewals
 
33 Organic Illustration Growth $1.0m $1.09m 9% +10% (-5%) +2% Renewal BasePrior Year Lost Business Current Year Revenue +2% All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not estimates of Gallagher's future performance. New Business Impact of Rate on Renewals Impact of Exposure on Renewals
 
34 Plan For Growth M&A
 
35 Strong Acquisition Momentum$0$50$100 $150$200$250$30020012002200320042005200620072008200920102011 ($Ms) International $175m Domestic $102m $277m* GAB Robins $45m *Annualized revenues acquired
 
36 Strong International Acquisition Momentum200820102011  - Oxygen Insurance Managers  - Securitas RE  - First City  - Specialized Broking Associates  - Risk & Reward (Benefits)  - Health Lambert  - Lonmar(London Binder/Wholesales)  - WoodbrookUnderwriting Agencies
 
37 Acquisition Update  - Integration completed as planned in 2011  - Paid $24m for $45m of revenues which contributes to $9m of annual EBITDAC as expected  - Increased margins to 20% through expense saves and synergies  - All clients have been converted to our GB claim system (over 2.6m claims) GABRobinsAcquiredOct. 12, 2010  - Integration as planned and on schedule  - Integration costs of about $.08 for 2012 and $.04 for 2013 Heath Lambert AcquiredMay 13, 2011
 
38 M&A Looking ForwardLimitedConsolidators Numerous Specialties Gallagher'sCoreCompetency Vast Pipeline Domestic and International Markets Highly Fragmented 18,000 agents/brokersin the U.S. Baby boomers looking for exit strategy Need Gallagher's Expertise Retail P&C Wholesale Benefits International MGA MGU Captive Gallagher Culture Proven History of Doing the Deal Ability to Integrate
 
39 Current Gallagher U.S. Locations
 
40 Larger Cities With Expansion Potential Cities with population of 100,000+ where Gallagher has no presence
 
41 Gallagher Global Alliance
 
42 Productivity, Quality and Culture
 
43 Controlling Headcount Established Offshore Centers of Excellence Managing Expenses Building Productivity Tools DMS and Workflow Standardizing Processes and Systems Reducing Real Estate Investing in Business Intelligence Leveraging Sales Force Management tools Improving Productivity and Quality Productivity & Quality
 
44 Reasons for Offshore Centers of ExcellenceIncrease Speed to Market15%Foster Innovation5% Reduce Costs35%Focus on Core25% Improve Quality20%
 
45 Offshore Centers of ExcellenceExamples of Benefits Efficiency Improvements QualityImprovements Reduce policy delivery from 30 to 10 days Achieve 98% quality rate Reduce certificateof insurance delivery expense by 20% Improvedquality rate to 99% Implemented claims adjusters enhancedquality audit programs Realized20% improvement on adjuster quality rate
 
46 IT Systems Achievements 2004-2011 Email 2004 Global Corporate Systems
 
47 IT Systems Achievements 2004-2011 T&E General Ledger HR/Payroll Planning Document Mgmt Data Warehouse RealEstateLeasing Corporate Intranet Email 2004 2011 Global Corporate Systems
 
48 Current Systems Activity Client Communication Tools CRM Customer Relationship Centralized Agency System Internal BrokerSocial Media External Client Prospecting Tools
 
49 Reducing Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio20.8% 16.8%10.0% 12.5%15.0% 17.5%20.0% 22.5%25.0% 2008201127.0% 23.7% 20.0% 22.5%25.0% 27.5%30.0% 20082011 Brokerage Segment Risk Management Segment See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
50 Mark of Achievement Award winner British Insurance 2011 Greenwich Excellence award for quality of service to large corporations 2011 Mid-Market Buyers Choice TPAExpertise Honoree Business Insurance 2011 Commercial Broker of the Year (Heath Lambert) Insurance Times Underwriting Agency of the year finalist (AustralisGroup Underwriting) ANZIIF 2011 Sources tothe Community Award (SBA Gallagher)ANZIIF
 
51 Maintain Unique Culture Shared values at Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. are the rock foundation of the Company and our Culture. What is a Shared Value? These are concepts that the vast majority of the movers and shakers in the Company passionately adhere to. What are some of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.'s Shared Values? 1. We are a Sales and Marketing Company dedicated to providing excellence in Risk Manage ment Services to our clients. 2. We support one another. We believe in one another. We acknowledge and respect the ability of one another. 3. We push for professional excellence. 4. We can all improve and learn from one another. 5. There are no second-class citizenseveryone is important and everyone's job is important. 5. We're an open society. 7. Empathy for the other person is not a weakness. 8. Suspicion breeds more suspicion. To trust and be trusted is vital. 9. Leaders need followers. How leaders treat followers has a direct impact on the effectiveness of the leader. 10. Interpersonal business relationships should be built. 11. We all need one another. We are all cogs in a wheel. 12. No department or person is an island. 13. Professional courtesy is expected. 14. Never ask someone to do something you wouldn't do yourself. 15. I consider myself support for our Sales and Marketing. We can't make things happen without each other. We are a team. 16. Loyalty and respect are earnednot dictated. 17. Fear is a turnoff. 18. People skills are very important at Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. 19. We're a very competitive and aggressive Company. 20. We run to problemsnot away from them. 21. We adhere to the highest standards of moral and ethical behavior. 22. People work harder and are more effective when they're turned onnot turned off. 23. We are a warm, close Company. This is a strengthnot a weakness. 24. We must continue building a professional Companytogetheras a team. 25. Shared values can be altered with circumstancesbut carefully and with tact and consider ation for one another's needs. When accepted Shared Values are changed or challenged, the emotional impact and negative feelings can damage the Company.Robert E. Gallagher May 1984
 
52 Why Invest?Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns include reinvesting all dividends at the ex-dividend date.
 
QUESTIONS &ANSWERS For Additional Information Marsha AkinDirector Investor Relations Marsha_Akin@ajg.com Phone: 630-285-3501
 
54 Cash Generation for 2008 to 2011 See information regarding Non-GAAP financial measures on page 3. 2008 2009 2010 2011 Earnings from continuing operationsBrokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined $132.4 $154.4 $166.8 $173.5 Provision for income taxes 85.1 96.5 108.0 107.7 Depreciation 29.8 30.5 31.9 35.4 Amortization 43.7 55.0 60.8 79.3 Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables4.1 (2.6) (6.2) EBITDAC Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined 291.0 340.5 364.9 389.7 Gains from books of business sales and other (23.8) (11.6) (5.9) (5.5) Net supplemental commission timing 6.1 1.4 (14.7)Workforce & lease termination-related charges 8.1 14.7 7.5 8.2 Acquisition-related adjustments 7.0 Litigation settlements2.2 6.3Heath Lambert integration costs 16.0 GAB Robins integration costs- 3.6 13.0 Adjusted EBITDAC Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined 281.4 347.2 361.7 428.4 Stock compensation expense 18.3 16.1 15.6 21.1 Capital expenditures (32.0) (23.5) (25.4) (40.0) Interest and banking costs (28.9) (29.5) (36.4) (43.8) Corporate and acquisition costs (5.4) (6.2) (12.1) (14.5) Income taxes paid (40.1) (27.7) (37.6) (32.0) Cash generation $193.3 $276.4 $265.8 $319.2 Dividends paid $118.5 $127.9 $133.5 $145.8 Dividendspaid as % of cash generation 61% 46% 50% 46% (Unaudited in millions ) APPENDIX

Exhibit 99.2
 
INVESTMENT PROFILE NYSE: AJG GROWING VALUE : Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and third-party property/casualty claims administrators. Gallagher generates approximately 81% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 19% derived primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada, New Zealand and the United Kingdom. FEBRUARY 2012 Operating Segments Brokerage Segment Risk Management Segment80%60%40%20% 0%20%40%60%80%DEC'08DEC'09DEC'10DEC'1179%AJGFinancial Index (S&P 500)S&P 5000%45%Total Stockholder Returns January 1, 2008February 10, 2012 " Our team is incredibly energized. All of our operating divisions around the globe are contributing to our growth." Source data: Bloomberg. Total Stockholder Returns assume dividend reinvestment. Highlights as of February 10, 2012 J. PATRICK GALLAGHER, JR. Chairman, President and CEO Price $35.22 52-week high/low $35.55$24.29 Trailing 12-mos. revenues $ 2.1 billion** Market cap $ 4.0 billion Indicated annual dividend $ 1.36* Yield 3.9% Shares outstanding 114.7 million** End of fiscal year December 31 Number of employees 12,383** *On January 26, 2012, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.34 per share first-quarter 2012 dividend. **At December 31, 2011 p.2 Brokerage Segment p.3 Brokerage Acquisition Strategy p.4 Risk Management Segment p.5 Corporate Segment p.6 Why Invest? ajg.com
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT 73% OF 2011 REVENUES Gallagher's Brokerage Segment does business through a network of more than 300 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 16 other countries. In addition, Gallagher has developed the Gallagher Global Alliance of independent insurance brokers and consultants, which enables it to provide coverages and services to its clients in more than 110 countries around the world. Retail Insurance Brokerage Operations 78% OF 2011 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES NICHE/PRACTICE GROUPS Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property/casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients. Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into more than 190 geographic profit centers located primarily throughout the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 67% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. The concentrated focus of these niche/practice groups allows for highly targeted marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage. Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: mergers and acquisitions; its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; cross-selling other brokerage products and services to existing customers; developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives and deductible plans/self insurance. Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. After several years of premium rate reductions driven by competitive market conditions, commercial P/C pricing began to rebound in the fourth quarter of 2011. According to a market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers, U.S. commercial P/C premiums rose by an average of 2.8% in the fourth quarter of 2011. Agribusiness Aviation & Aerospace Captive Consulting Construction Energy Entertainment Executive Benefits Global Risks Health and Welfare Healthcare Healthcare Analytics Higher Education Hospitality Human Resources International Benefits Marine Manufacturing Personal Professional Groups Private Equity Public Entity Real Estate Religious/Not-for-Profit Restaurant Retirement Scholastic Technology/Telecom Transportation Voluntary Benefits 2Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
SIGNIFICANT LINES OF COVERAGE & CONSULTING SERVICE CAPABILITIES Wholesale Insurance Brokerage Operations 22% OF 2011 BROKERAGE SEGMENT REVENUES 401(k) Solutions 403(b) Solutions Aviation Casualty Commercial Auto Dental Directors & Officers Liability Disability Earthquake Errors & Omissions Fire General Liability Life Marine Medical Product Liability Professional Liability Property Wind Workers Compensation GALLAGHER DELIVERS GLOBAL BROKERAGE CAPABILITIES In addition to the 17 countries where Gallagher now has operations, the company actively manages business relationships with a network of approved independent brokers that expands the P/C brokerage capabilities it offers multinational clients to more than 110 countries around the world. Gallagher Global Alliance (GGA) members are selected based upon common business philosophies and their capabilities within their respective countries. GGA offers both strength and flexibility, enabling global servicing of Gallagher clients, and the clients of other GGA members, no matter where in the world they operate. Gallagher also offers employee benefits brokerage and consulting services to clients throughout North America and the United Kingdom. Through Gallagher International Benefit Services (GIBS), a joint venture formed in 2011 between Gallagher and IBIS Advisors, Gallagher can now handle the international benefits needs of its U.S. clients in more than 90 countries around the world. Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Wholesale revenues are generated from sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurance carrier. Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into more than 65 geographic profit centers located primarily in the United States and Bermuda, and through its approved Lloyd's of London broker. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent or managing general underwriter, handling specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers. More than 75% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency/underwriting manager, according to Business Insurance magazine. That operation places a strong focus on binding, programs, standard lines aggregation and open brokerage business. Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of broker clients, by developing new managing general agency programs, and through mergers and acquisitions. BROKERAGE SEGMENT ACQUISITION STRATEGY Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components: organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated approximately 286 acquisitions from 1985 through 2011, substantially all within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that generate between $1 million and $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through acquisitions and joint ventures, where the company typically begins its relationship with an equity position. Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on: a corporate culture that matches Gallagher's sales-oriented culture a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources clearly defined financial criteria. Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Gallagher believes that growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources. 2012 Investment Profile3
 
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT 26% OF 2011 REVENUES Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and insurance companies that outsource their claims-handling services. Gallagher's Risk Management operation also offers managed care, information management and appraisal services, as well as consultative services and training programs that help clients mitigate losses, combat claims fraud and maintain regulatory compliance. Approximately 67% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-related claims, 26% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims, and 7% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management (employee absence management) programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance, on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed. Gallagher manages its third-party claims management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the United States, the United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 86% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker. The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from new business with Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments. In addition, the Risk Management Segment may grow in the future through mergers and acquisitions. EXPERTISE Real-time Claims Management Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management Information Management Managed Care Services Risk Control Services Safety Programs Settlement Management Education & Training Investigative Services Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures This investment profile includes references to Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert, which are performance measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, GAAP information. EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, workforce-related charges, acquisition-related integration costs and litigation settlements. Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to exclude the EBITDAC associated with the acquisition of Heath Lambert operations, divided by total revenues, as adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts and the revenues associated with the acquired Heath Lambert operations. For the non-GAAP measures set forth on page 6 of this profile, the most directly comparable GAAP measure is earnings from continuing operations, which, for the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments on a combined basis, was $132 million in 2008, $154 million in 2009, $167 million in 2010 and $174 million in 2011. Please see "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures" on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com under "Investor Relations" for the purpose of each non-GAAP measure used and a reconciliation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure. 4Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
CORPORATE SEGMENT Gallagher's debt, clean-energy investments, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs are reported in this segment. With respect to the clean-energy investments, Gallagher owns positions in various commercial operations that help coal-fired utilities eliminate large quantities of harmful emissions. 1. Gallagher holds investment positions in 29 commercial clean coal production plants of which 14 were built and began production in 2009 and 15 were built and began production in 2011. Of the 14 total 2009-Era Plants, 12 are currently producing refined coal under long-term agreements with utilities. Gallagher is currently seeking co-investors and long-term utility customers for the remaining two plants. Of the 15 total 2011-Era Plants, 5 are currently producing refined coal under long-term agreements with utilities. Gallagher also has non-binding agreements in principle with a utility and co-investor for one plant, and is currently seeking co-investors and long-term utility customers for the remaining nine plants. Gallagher believes all these plants qualify for tax credits under Section 45 of the Internal Revenue Code. See Gallagher's most recent earnings release at www.ajg.com for management's latest guidance on earnings and additional information on these investments. 2. Gallagher owns 42% of Chem-Mod, LLC which possesses rights, information and technologies used for the reduction of unwanted emissions created during the combustion of coal. Various clean coal production plants, including those in which Gallagher has invested, license and use Chem-Mod's technologies in the production of refined fuel. See Gallagher's most recent earnings release at www.ajg.com for management's latest guidance on earnings and additional information on this investment. Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements This investment profile contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment profile, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this investment profile include, but are not limited to, statements related to expected dividend amounts, anticipated areas of revenue growth within the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments, Gallagher's acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, future income and tax credits generated by and developments relating to Gallagher's clean-energy investments. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following: changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, and changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape could impact Gallagher's future dividends, revenue growth and acquisition program; and uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including uncertainties related to (i) maintenance by Gallagher's utility partners of long-term permits, (ii) Gallagher's ability to find operating sites and co-investors for the non-operating investments, (iii) potential IRS challenges to Gallagher's ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45, (iv) utilities' future use of coal to generate electricity, (v) operational risks at the IRC Section 45 operations (including Gallagher's lack of control over such operations), (vi) business risks relating to Gallagher's co-investors and partners, (vii) intellectual property risks, (viii) political and regulatory developments, including the risk that tax incentives for coal could be eliminated retroactively, and (ix) environmental risks, could impact Gallagher's future income and tax credits generated by and developments relating to its clean-energy investments. Refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. 2012 Investment Profile5
 
WHY INVEST? Supplemental quarterly data as ofDecember 31, 2011 is available at www.ajg.com.CAGR0105152025%2008201120.7%0200100300400$50020082011$281$428Brokerage & Risk Management Adjusted EBITDAC Growth* (in millions)Brokerage & Risk Management Adjusted EBITDAC Margins* Excluding Heath Lambert CAGR17.2%$1.501.200.90 0.300.6001984$0.032012$1.36**16% Average Annual IncreaseDividends Per Share *See Non-GAAP disclosure on page 4.**IndicatedOn January 26, 2012, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.34 per share first-quarter 2012 dividend. FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Marsha J. AkinDirector-Investor Relations 630.285.3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com 6Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120217083253.txt.gz
TIME:20120217083253
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 17, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 599,337 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
February 17, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 599,337 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120308131253.txt.gz
TIME:20120308131253
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 8, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 141,690 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
March 8, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 141,690 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120313150453.txt.gz
TIME:20120313150453
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 13, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 143,332 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5.1
March 13, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 143,332 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120315144325.txt.gz
TIME:20120315144325
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 15, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 356,970 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
March 15, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 356,970 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120316104429.txt.gz
TIME:20120316104429
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 16, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 230,383 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
March 16, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 230,383 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120410160112.txt.gz
TIME:20120410160112
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01. Regulation FD Disclosure.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") issued a press release on March 29, 2012 announcing that Company management will host a conference call on April 11, 2012 at 8:00 am ET/7:00 am CT in order to provide additional information on the Company's clean energy investments.
A copy of the Company's press release, which contains information on how to access the conference call, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
The presentation slides to be discussed during the conference call are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2. Such presentation slides can also be accessed at the Company's website at .
www.ajg.com/investors/special
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEWS RELEASE
Itasca, IL, March 29, 2012Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) will hold a special conference call on April 11, 2012 at 8:00 am ET/7:00 am CT. The purpose of the call is to provide educational and background information on the company's clean energy investments. This call can be accessed live or as a replay through the investor relations section of Gallagher's website at .
www.ajg.com
In preparation for this call, the company will post essential presentation materials to its website on Tuesday, April 10, 2012 at approximately 4:00 pm ET/3:00 pm CT, at .
www.ajg.com/investors/special
During the call, management will review and frequently reference the presentation materials and then open the call for questions and answers. Management anticipates total time for the call to be approximately 1.5 hours in duration.
Some of the topics management expects to cover include the following:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Management will not provide any update on its Brokerage and Risk Management segments.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 17 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Contact: Marsha Akin
DirectorInvestor Relations
(630) 285-3501marsha_akin@ajg.com

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
Presented by:
Douglas K. Howell
CFO
Clean Energy Investments
Conference Call
April 11, 2012
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This presentation contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this presentation, the words "anticipates," "expects," "believes," "should," "could," "estimates," "intends," "plans," "contemplates" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this presentation include, but are not limited to, statements in connection with Gallagher's clean coal investments relating to:
The amount of tax credits expected to be generated by these investments;
Gallagher's estimates regarding the phase-out feature of IRC Section 45 based upon the price of coal;
Future cash flows that could be generated by these investments, and the expected impact on Gallagher's earnings, cash flows and stock price;
Assumed annual revenue and earnings growth rates for Gallagher, as well as earnings multiples to be paid on acquisitions;
Gallagher's future corporate tax rate;
Gallagher's expected uses of cash generated by these investments (including potential changes to Gallagher's dividend policy);
The long-term availability and cost-effectiveness of coal as an energy source in the United States and internationally;
The future annual volume of coal expected to be consumed by clean coal plants that license The Chem-ModTM Solution;
The ongoing role of the U.S. government in clean energy development;
The impact of MATS (Mercury and Air Toxics Standards) on utilities' operations;
Expected future subsidy rates under IRC Section 45;
The probability that utilities using The Chem-ModTM Solution in a clean coal plant will be in compliance with the EPA's 2014 mercury standard;
The long-term potential of The Chem-ModTM Solution outside the tax-subsidized Section 45 market;
International opportunities for The Chem-ModTM Solution;
Gallagher's expected date for recouping its investment in Chem-Mod LLC;
Gallagher's expected ownership levels in the Section 45 tax entities;
Gallagher's expected role vis--vis its operational and investment partners;
Future costs related to these investments (including the cost of moving a plant from one utility to another); and
Gallagher's evaluation of strategic alternatives related to these investments.
Additionally, this presentation contains a discussion of actions management could take and other factors expected to mitigate the risks related to these investments. There can be no assurance that Gallagher will take any such contemplated actions to mitigate risk, and Gallagher's risk mitigation efforts may prove ineffective. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the risks set forth on slides 30-44, as well as those set forth in greater detail in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, under Item 1A, entitled "Risk Factors" (subheading "Risks Relating to our Investments, Debt and Common Stock").
 
Presentation Agenda
During the call, management will review and frequently reference the presentation materials and then open the call for questions and answers. Management anticipates total time for the call to be approximately 1.5 hours in duration. Some of the topics management expects to cover include the following:
A pictorial of a clean energy, how it works and plant development  Pages 4 to 9
A simplified description of the clean energy chemistry  Pages 10 to 12
Clean energy investment economics and accounting  Pages 13 to 26
Uses of cash generated by the clean energy investments  Pages 27 to 29
Risks and uncertainties associated with the clean energy investments  Pages 30 to 44
Other frequently asked questions  Pages 45 to 54
Appendix A for phase out models  Pages 56 to 58
 
What is the Clean Coal Production Process?
Conventional Coal
Clean Coal Plant
Conventional coal is treated with The Chem-ModTM Solution to capture mercury, nitrogen oxides and sulfur dioxide.
 
Parts of a Clean Coal Plant
Average Capital Cost to Construct a Plant Approximately $1,000,000 ($600,000 After-Tax*)
Storage
Mixer
* Assumes 40% tax rate
5
 
Plant Connected and in Housing
Storage
Mixer
Refined Coal Returns
Average Capital Cost to Connect and House a Plant Approximately $4,000,000 ($2,400,000 After-Tax*)
* Assumes 40% tax rate
6
 
Coal Power Facility with Clean Coal Plant*
Boiler (Furnace)
Turbine
Coal Steam Transmission Lines
Water Generator Transformer
Clean Coal Plant Utilizing The Chem-Mod Solution
* Not to scale
7
 
Simplified Clean Coal Plant Development Steps
Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4
We built the core Once a host utility is We sell a majority portion When we sell a majority components of the plants secured, we connect the of the plant to an portion, we relinquish as the developer plant to the utility's power investment partner(s) control and become a generation facility minority partner
We placed the plants in We plan to hold as high a service before 12/31/11 Incremental pre-tax percentage ownership as All future action requires capital cost of we can to optimize unanimous approval of
Some plants immediately $4,000,000 to connect profitability, but always partners connected to host utility and house plant less than 50%
We depreciate through
Other plants will not
Assuming Gallagher 2021 (2019 for 2009 era continue operating until a target ownership of 49%, plants) host utility is secured we recover $2,550,000 of
Total pre-tax capital cost the pre-tax upfront of $1,000,000 per plant development costs
Sell Portion
Connection Capitalized Cost $2,550,000 Investment $4,000,000 Carrying Value
Plant Cost $2,450,000 $2,450,000 $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Dollar Figures on an Pre-Tax Basis for an Average Plant
8
 
Operations After Selling Portion of Plant
LLC Members Chem-Mod Gallagher and Financial Partners
Unanimous Vote on "Major Decisions"
LLC Manager Manager Pitt Clean Energy Management Gallagher
Plant Manager Chemical Supply Contract Counsel Tax and Accounting Inventor Intellectual Taggart Global Heritage Greenberg Consultants Chem-Mod Property Counsel
Daily Logistics Traurig "Big Four" Firms Assist with Harness, operations Transaction Audit formula Dickey & Pierce
Quality contracts changes if Patent
Supply control Tax counsel needed application management Supply License Tax preparation
Construction management agreement On-site full- Patent
PLR applications management scale testing protection
Involved in prior clean energy investments under IRC Section 29.
9
 
Simplified Description of The Chem-ModTM Solution Chemistry
The Chem-Mod recipe is a patented combination of dry and wet chemicals
It gets mixed with coal
When the mixture heats up in the boiler, mercury, nitrogen oxides and sulfur dioxide react with the Chem-Mod chemicals
As it cools, a chemical bonding occurs and captures the mercury, etc. and becomes part of the ash rather than released into the air
Laboratory tests must prove that the mixture of coal and chemicals reduces mercury by more than 40% (or, 40% of sulfur dioxide) plus reduces nitrogen oxides by more than 20% to qualify Chem-Mod achieves these levels, and depending on the chemical addition rate, would achieve higher reductions for further environmental remediation
Does not release from ash unless reheated to over 3000 degrees Fahrenheit
This process actually improves the ash  i.e., it is a stronger ash that can be used in making concrete
See the environmental risk factors on page 43 for information regarding risks and uncertainties related to this process.
10
 
Simplified Description of The Chem-ModTM Solution Chemistry
(Continued)
In more simplistic terms, as the chemistry cools, the mercury is encapsulated in a ceramic bond.
Think of a coated chocolate candy where the chocolate center represents the mercury, etc., and the hard candy shell represents The Chem-ModTM
Solution
The "coated candies" drop into the ash and are disposed of or used in concrete production
Other benefits to the utility may include: Helps improve the efficiency of the boiler
Helps extend life of certain utility components
See the environmental risk factors on page 43 for information regarding risks and uncertainties related to this process.
11
 
Does a Clean Coal Plant Comply with
New Mercury Standards Using the Chem-ModTM Solution?
Section 45 Mercury capture standards for Clean Coal Plants are governed by tax regulations outlined in the Internal Revenue Code
These standards are different than the mercury capture standards in the EPA's 2014 MATS regulations
We believe some utilities that are using The Chem-ModTM Solution now comply with the EPA's 2014 mercury standards
We also believe other utilities that are using The Chem-ModTM Solution may comply with the EPA's 2014 mercury standards with a slight modification
Although the technology is currently focused on the tax-subsidized Section 45 market, there is significant longer-term potential for The Chem-ModTM Solution in the mercury control market driven by the new environmental regulations
However, without the tax credit subsidy, utilities will need to absorb costs to produce clean coal, or pass increased costs through to customers. Both of these scenarios will likely impact plant profitability and Chem-Mod's ability to receive royalties for use of the technology
See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.
12
 
Evolution of Chem-Mod Investment
Accounting GAAP Net Month Investment Ownership % Impairment1 Carrying Value
2004  June $100,000 2.5% ($100,000) --
2004  July 200,000 2.5% (200,000) --2004  October/2005  January 227,500 5.0% (227,500) --
2005  July 1,000,000 32% Option (1,000,000) --
2007  December 5,500,000 16.0% (5,500,000) --2008  June 250,000 { 0.7% (250,000) --2008  September 6,000,000 15.3% (6,000,000) --
Total Investment $13,277,500 42.0% ($13,277,500)
Current Cash in Chem-Mod $1,000,000 $1,000,000
At current anticipated results of Chem-Mod, Gallagher would recoup its total cash investment by mid-2013
Note : All but three months' of working capital cash is distributed to the partners quarterly.
(1) The impairment was triggered because virtually all the funds invested by Gallagher went to owners, not into Chem-Mod, therefore making our investments "impaired" per GAAP (ASC 323-10-35), "Investment-Equity Method and Joint Ventures." See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.
 
Summary of Balance Sheet
Proceeds GAAP Net
Clean Energy Investments # of Gross from Sale Carrying
($ Millions as of January 1, 2012) Plants Investment to Partners Values 2009 Era Plants  Useful life 2019
Operating under - long- term contracts (minority positions(1)) 12 $ 30.8 $ 14.5 $ 8.9
Seeking long- term contracts and co- investors(3) 2 1.9 _ -- 1.5
Total 2009 Era Plants 14 32.7 14.5 10.4
2011 Era Plants  Useful life 2021
Operating under - long- term contracts (minority positions(2)) 5 23.6 12.9 10.7 Non- binding agreement for long- term contract(3) 1 1.0 -- 1.0 Seeking long- term contracts and co- investors(3) 9 8.8 -- 8.8
Total 2011 Era Plants 15 33.4 12.9 20.5 Chem- Mod, LLC (42% ownership) (see slide 13) 1.0(4) Total clean energy investments 29 $ 66.1 $ 27.4 $ 31.9
1. 24.5 to 25.0% owned 3. 100% owned until deployed
2. 30.0 to 48.0% owned 4. Net equity
14
 
Two Investment Income Value Streams to Gallagher
Clean
Chem-Mod Coal Plants
Generate pretax losses offset by Generates high margin royalty tax credits (see pages 16-18) stream (see page 19)
15
 
Simplified Illustrative Economics of Clean Coal Plant Investment$ Per Ton of Coal on an After-Tax Basis Assuming 40% Tax RateWhat Plant Receives Where it GoesMaterials and (2) Gallagher $6.40 (1) Operating Costs $1.04 From $2.27 $2.06 Estimated Ownership 2012 Tax Interest Credit + Subsidy $1.02 as Developer$2.07 Other Partners(2)(1) Inflation adjusted annually. (2) Average of all projects deployed as of December 31, 2011. See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide. 16
 
Materials and Operating Costs$ Per Ton of Coal on an After-Tax Basis Assuming 40% Tax RateLicense Fee to Chem-Mod Utility (Rent or $0.30** Discount on Coal)* $0.45 Labor and Other Plant Operating Costs $0.72 Total $2.27Materials $0.80 * In addition to a financial incentive, the utility may realize improved environmental results, better ash and favorable operating results.** Average of all projects deployed as of December 31, 2011.See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.17
 
Gallagher' s Portion*$ Per Ton of Coal on an After-Tax Basis Assuming 40% Tax RateCompensation and Other Administrative Expenses$1.91 Total $2.06 Profits/Cash Flow* Average of all projects deployed as of December 31, 2011See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.18
 
Simplified Illustrative Economics of Chem-Mod Investment$ Per Ton of Coal on an After-Tax Basis Assuming 40% Tax RateRoyalty Income Where it GoesCompensation, Gallagher 42% of Administrative, Profits/Cash Flow Business Development & Insurance $0.05 $0.11 $0.30 ($0.50 Pretax) $0.14 Other Partners 58% of Profits/Cash FlowSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.19
 
Chem-Mod Opportunity In addition to Gallagher's clean coal plants, Chem-Mod licenses its clean coal technology to other plants not developed by Gallagher entities 33 other qualified plants owned by other investors Representing coal consumption of approximately 100 to 140 million tons per year The ultimate annual volume of coal consumption from all clean coal plants under licensing agreements with Chem-Mod could reach approximately 150 to 200 million tons per year To put these figures into perspective, that volume range represents approximately 15% to 20% of the annual coal consumption for power generation in the U.S. No revenues have yet been generated based only on mercury controlSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.20
 
Recap  Financial SnapshotClean Energy Investments Est. Qtrly# of GAAP Net Net ($ Millions as of January 1, 2012) Plants Carrying Values Earnings/Cash(1) 2009 Era Plants  Useful life 2019Operating under - long- term contracts (minority positions)(3) 12 $ 8.9 $ 4.3Seeking long- term contracts and co- investors(5) 2 1.5 n/a(2)Total 2009 Era Plants 14 10.4 4.32011 Era Plants  Useful life 2021Operating under - long- term contracts (minority positions)(4) 5 10.7 8.0 Non- binding agreement for long- term contract(5) 1 1.0 1.7 Seeking long- term contracts and co- investors(5) 9 8.8 n/a(2)Total 2011 Era Plants 15 20.5 9.7 Chem- Mod, LLC (42% ownership) 1.0(6) 2.5 Total clean energy investments 29 $ 31.9 $ 16.51. Quarterly amount shown is near-term ultimate run rate and not current run rate 4. 30.0 to 48.0%2. The company has not given guidance as to the earnings potential of the plants 5. 100% owned until deployed that are not currently operating. The plants and host power generation facilities 6. Net equity have different capacities. 3. 24.5 to 25.0%See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.21
 
Example of Excerpt from Press Release and 10-Q/10-KCorporate Segment Fourth Quarter HighlightsThe following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 20XY operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 20XY (in millions):Pretax Income Net Earnings Tax Earnings (Loss) Benefit (Loss) 4th Quarter Interest and banking costs $ (X.X) $ X.X $ (XX) Clean energy investments (X.X) XX.X 16.5) Acquisition costs (X.X) X.X (X.X) Corporate (X.X) X.X (X.X) x4 Legacy investments (X.X) X.X (X.X) $ (X.X) $ XX.X $ XX.X) Year Interest and banking costs $ (X.X) $ X.X $ (X.X) Clean energy investments (X.X) X.X 66.0) Acquisition costs (X.X) X.X (X.X) Results from these investments are NOT included in Brokerage or Risk Management segments. All results are Corporate (X.X) X.X (X.X)in the Corporate segment. Legacy investments (X.X) X.X (X.X) Following the results through a traditional P&L is very $ (XX.X) $ XX.X $ (XX.X) difficult. Therefore, we provide a short-cut table in our earnings Quarterly amount shown is near-term ultimate run rate and not current run raterelease, 10-Qs, 10-K and IR Supplement.See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.22
 
Simplified Illustration > Annual Recognition of Clean Energy ActivityAssumed Assumed Without Assumed With Clean Energy Clean Energy Clean Energy Investments Investments InvestmentsRevenue $xxxxx $xxxxx $xxxxx Expenses ($xxxxx) ($xxxxx) ($xxxxx) Pretax Earnings $300.0 ($16.0) $284.0 ATax (Expense) Benefit at 40% ($120.0) $6.4 ($113.6) B Tax Credits $75.6 $75.6 CNet Earnings $180.0 $66.0 $246.0 Annual Expected Tax Rate 40.0% 13.4% (B- C)/ANote 1: Accounting guidance requires the expected annual tax rate to be reassessed each quarter.This example assumes the expected company-wide annual earnings and credits do not change during the year. All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not intended to be estimates of Gallagher's future performance.23
 
Simplified Illustration > Scenario 1All Clean Energy Investment Activity Occurs in FIRST QuarterTotal Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 YearASSUMPTIONSPretax Earnings Without Clean Energy Investments A $60.0 $80.0 $85.0 $75.0 $300.0 Percentage of Year 20% 27% 28% 25% 100%Pretax Loss From Clean Energy Investments B ($16.0) $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 ($16.0) Tax Credits Produced During Quarter $75.6 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 $75.6 EPretax Earnings with Clean Energy Investments A + B = C $44.0 $80.0 $85.0 $75.0 $284.0 Percentage of Annual Pretax Earnings in the Quarter D 15.5% 28.2% 29.9% 26.4% 100.0%REPORTED GAAP RESULTSPretax Earnings with Clean Energy Investments From Above C $44.0 $80.0 $85.0 $75.0 $284.0 Tax Benefit BEFORE Credits (assume 40% effective tax rate) C x 40% ($17.6) ($32.0) ($34.0) ($30.0) ($113.6) Quarterly Tax Credits Booked in Proportion to Full Year D x E = F $11.7 $21.3 $22.6 $20.0 $75.6 Tax Expense AFTER Credits G ($5.9) ($10.7) ($11.4) ($10.0) ($38.0)Net Earnings C G - $38.1 $69.3 $73.6 $65.0 $246.0 Reported Tax Rate G/C 13.4% 13.4% 13.4% 13.4% 13.4%Note 1: Accounting guidance requires the expected annual tax rate to be reassessed each quarter.This example assumes the expected company-wide annual earnings and credits do not change during the year.All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not intended to be estimates of Gallagher's future performance.24
 
Simplified Illustration > Scenario 2All Clean Energy Investment Activity Occurs EQUALLY IN EACH QuarterTotal Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 YearASSUMPTIONSPretax Earnings Without Clean Energy Investments A $60.0 $80.0 $85.0 $75.0 $300.0 Percentage of Year 20% 27% 28% 25% 100%Pretax Loss From Clean Energy Investments B ($4.0) ($4.0) ($4.0) ($4.0) ($16.0) Tax Credits Produced During Quarter $18.9 $18.9 $18.9 $18.9 $75.6 EPretax Earnings with Clean Energy Investments A + B = C $56.0 $76.0 $81.0 $71.0 $284.0 Percentage of Annual Pretax Earnings in the Quarter D 19.7% 26.8% 28.5% 25.0% 100.0%REPORTED GAAP RESULTSPretax Earnings with Clean Energy Investmenets From Above C $56.0 $76.0 $81.0 $71.0 $284.0 Tax Benefit BEFORE Credits (assume 40% effective tax rate) C x 40% ($22.4) ($30.4) ($32.4) ($28.4) ($113.6) Quarterly Tax Credits Booked in Proportion to Full Year D x E = F $14.9 $20.2 $21.6 $18.9 $75.6 Tax Expense AFTER Credits G ($7.5) ($10.2) ($10.8) ($9.5) ($38.0)Net Earnings C G - $48.5 $65.8 $70.2 $61.5 $246.0 Reported Tax Rate G/C 13.4% 13.4% 13.4% 13.4% 13.4%Note 1: Accounting guidance requires the expected annual tax rate to be reassessed each quarter.This example assumes the expected company-wide annual earnings and credits do not change during the year.All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not intended to be estimates of Gallagher's future performance.25
 
Simplified Illustration > Scenario 3All Clean Energy Investment Activity Occurs in FOURTH QuarterTotal Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 YearASSUMPTIONSPretax Earnings Without Clean Energy Investments A $60.0 $80.0 $85.0 $75.0 $300.0 Percentage of Year 20% 27% 28% 25% 100%Pretax Loss From Clean Energy Investments B $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 ($16.0) ($16.0) Tax Credits Produced During Quarter $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 $75.6 $75.6 EPretax Earnings with Clean Energy Investments A + B = C $60.0 $80.0 $85.0 $59.0 $284.0 Percentage of Annual Pretax Earnings in the Quarter D 21.1% 28.2% 29.9% 20.8% 100.0%REPORTED GAAP RESULTSPretax Earnings with Clean Energy Investments From Above C $60.0 $80.0 $85.0 $59.0 $284.0 Tax Benefit BEFORE Credits (assume 40% effective tax rate) C x 40% ($24.0) ($32.0) ($34.0) ($23.6) ($113.6) Quarterly Tax Credits Booked in Proportion to Full Year D x E = F $16.0 $21.3 $22.6 $15.7 $75.6 Tax Expense AFTER Credits G ($8.0) ($10.7) ($11.4) ($7.9) ($38.0)Net Earnings C G - $52.0 $69.3 $73.6 $51.1 $246.0 Reported Tax Rate G/C 13.4% 13.4% 13.4% 13.4% 13.4%Note 1: Accounting guidance requires the expected annual tax rate to be reassessed each quarter.This example assumes the expected company-wide annual earnings and credits do not change during the year.All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not intended to be estimates of Gallagher's future performance.26
 
Intended Uses of Cash Flows Generated by Clean Energy Investments Gallagher's clean energy investments will generate cash flows for a limited time (through 2019 for 2009 Era Plants and 2021 for 2011 Era Plants) Cash intended to be used for: Acquiring insurance brokers and risk managers thereby creating recurring earnings for the company We may also repurchase our shares These cash flows are not intended to directly impact Gallagher's dividend. However, as the cash flows are used to purchase recurring brokerage and risk management earnings, those earnings may ultimately influence dividends.See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.27
 
Illustration: Converting Clean Energy Investments Cash Flows to Brokerage and Risk Management Cash Flows The expected purchase multiple is 5x to 8x EBITDAC*  we are using 7x EBITDAC for this illustration Accordingly, $66 million of annual cash flow from clean energy investments would buy approximately $9.5 million of EBITDAC Assuming all intangibles are tax deductible: $66 million  15 years = $4.4 million deduction per year $9.5 million of EBITDAC (proxy for tax-basis income) less $4.4 million of tax amortization = $5.1 million of taxable income $5.1 million x 40% tax rate = $2.0 million of taxes $9.5 million of cash less $2.0 of tax = $7.5 million of annual after-tax cash flowIllustrative example implies conversion of $66 million of clean energy cash flows into approximately $7.5 million of brokerage and risk management after-tax annual cash flowsAll figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not intended to be estimates of Gallagher's future performance.* EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. For a description of the purposes of this non-GAAP measure and a reconciliation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures and Other" beginning on page 23 in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011.See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.28
 
Converting Clean Energy Cash Flows to Brokerage and Risk Management Cash Flows Illustrative CompoundingClean *Assumes annual 5% GAAP Energy Brokerage and Risk Management Cash Flows* growth in acquired Carrying Cash brokerage and risk Value Flows 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 management cash flows.2012 $29 $66 $7.5 $7.9 $8.3 $8.7 $9.1 $9.6 $10.1 $10.6 $11.1 All figures on this slide 2013 $26 $66 $74 $8.3 $8.7 $9.1 $9.6 $10.0 $10.5 $11.1 $11.6 are used only for illustration purposes 2014 $22 $66 $82 $9.2 $9.7 $10.2 $10.7 $11.2 $11.8 $12.4 and are not intended to be estimates of 2015 $19 $66 $92 $10.4 $10.9 $11.4 $12.0 $12.6 $13.2 Gallagher's future performance.2016 $16 $66 $104 $11.7 $12.3 $12.9 $13.5 $14.2See page 2 for 2017 $13 $66 $117 $13.2 $13.9 $14.5 $15.3 information regarding 2018 $10 $66 $133 $15.0 $15.7 $16.5 how risks and 2019 $6 $66 $152 $17.0 $17.9 uncertainties could impact the forward-2020 $3 $47 $154 $17.3 looking statements, including implied 2021 $0 $47 $176 statements, on this slide.TOTAL $622Additional Brokerage and RM Cash TOTAL Flows per Year $8 $16 $26 $38 $51 $67 $86 $107 $129 $528 $1.15 Billion of Additional Cash Additional Annual EBITDAC $9 $19 $32 $48 $65 $86 $110 $137 $16829
 
What Can Go Wrong?  Overview of RisksImportant factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements in this presentation include the risks set forth below, as well as those set forth in greater detail in Gallagher's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, under Item 1A, entitled "Risk Factors" (subheading "Risks Relating to our Investments, Debt and Common Stock"). Availability of the tax credits Business risks relating to our financial and operating partners Operational risks Demand for coal Intellectual property risks Environmental and product liability claims Key personnel30
 
Availability of the Tax Credits (I)RISK FACTOR (10-K, page 13): Our ability to claim tax credits under IRC Section 45 depends upon the operations in which we have invested satisfying certain ongoing conditions set forth in IRC Section 45. These include, among others, the emissions reduction, "qualifying technology", and "placed-in-service" requirements of IRC Section 45, as well as the requirement that at least one of the operations' owners qualifies as a "producer" of refined coal. While we have received some degree of confirmation from the IRS relating to our ability to claim these tax credits, the IRS could ultimately determine that the operations have not satisfied, or have not continued to satisfy, the conditions set forth in IRC Section 45. Additionally, Congress could modify or repeal IRC Section 45 and remove the tax credits retroactively.Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: Based on our communications with the IRS, we believe our operations satisfy IRC Section 45 and qualify for tax credits We have received 3 Private Letter Rulings (PLRs) covering 8 plants We are in the process of applying for 2 additional PLRs covering 5 plants However, there is nothing we can do to mitigate the risk that the IRS could write new regulations that would reduce the availability of the credits or that Congress could modify or repeal the tax credits retroactively If Congress reduces the corporate tax rate, thereby limiting our use of credits, we may be able to sell additional portions of our ownership stake in the LLCs to reduce the tax credits we receive to the level we can use See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.31
 
Availability of the Tax Credits (II)RISK FACTOR (10-K, page 14): IRC Section 45 contains phase-out provisions based upon the market price of coal, such that, if the price of coal rises to specified levels, we could lose some or all of the tax credits we expect to receive from these investments. Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: There is nothing we can do to control the risk that the price of coal will rise high enough to trigger the phase-out provisions of IRC Section 45 We have and will continue to monitor the factors that would lead to a phase-out. For 2011 and 2012, the threshold was not/is not close to triggering a phase-outSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.32
 
2005 2012 - Coal Reference Prices and Phase Out$95.00 2012 Est.$89.01 $87.16 $86.53 $85.59 $83.88 Alwa Always $85.00$81.60 $8.75 $8.75$79.15 $80.26 $77.78 $78.41 $76.69 $76.84 $75.13 2012 Est.$75.00 $72.85 +0.8%+2.3% +1.2%+2.4%$70.40 +3.1%$67.94 +3.5%+3.6%Growth from inflation$65.00 2012 Est.$58.49 $54.74 $55.66 1.25x$55.001.25x 2011 Actual*$48.35 1.25x$45.56 $46.79 $44.64 $42.78 $43.74 $45.00 $41.14 1.42x 1.28x0.97x$36.36 1.37x$35.48 $39.72 $34.09 $35.00 $31.20 1.33x$27.42 $25.002005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012Average Coal Price (EIA)* IRS Published Reference Price Derived Starting Phase Out Price Derived 100% Phase Out Price*See Appendix A for 2005-2011 data sources and note.See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.33
 
Estimated Phase Out Year(s)Important DisclaimerTrendlines were calculated using the linear trendline capability in Microsoft Excel. Each line is based on seven years of actual data (2005-2011). According to Microsoft, a linear trendline is formed by using the equation y = mx + b to calculate the least squares fit line where m is the slope and b is the intercept. The linear trendline is a best-fit straight line used with simple linear data sets. Gallagher provides no assurances as to the accuracy of the trendlines calculated in Excel.Past experience may prove to be a poor proxy for future experience. These documents were developed as an information resource, and should be used only as a guide. Gallagher assumes no liability for the consequences of any actions taken on the basis of the information provided. See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.34
 
Business Risks Relating to Our Financial and Operating Partners RISK FACTOR (10-K, pages 13-14): We are working to negotiate and finalize arrangements with potential co-investors for the purchase of equity stakes in one or more of the operations that are not currently producing refined coal. If no satisfactory arrangements can be reached with these potential co-investors, or if in the future any one of our co-investors leaves a project, we could have difficulty finding replacements in a timely manner. We could also be exposed to risk due to our lack of control over the operations if future developments, for example a regulatory change affecting public and private companies differently, caused our interests and those of our co-investors to diverge. Finally, our partners responsible for operation and management could fail to run the operations in compliance with IRC Section 45. If any of these developments occur, we may unable to take full advantage of the tax credits.Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: We work with reputable, financially stable, credit worthy partners and document these relationships carefully Our partners have limited rights to leave the projects We require our partners that are responsible for operation and management to carry insurance which meets or exceeds the requirements of the host utilities We have been working with many of our partners for over a decade (see page 9)See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.35
 
Operational RisksRISK FACTOR (10-K, page 14): Chem-Mod's multi-pollutant reduction technologies require chemicals that may not be readily available in the marketplace at reasonable costs. Utilities that use the technologies could be idled for various reasons, including operational or environmental problems at the plants or in the boilers, disruptions in the supply of coal, revocation of their Chem-Mod technologies environmental permits, labor strikes, force majeure events such as hurricanes, or terrorist attacks, any of which could halt or impede the operations. Long-term operations using Chem-Mod's multi-pollutant reduction technologies could also lead to unforeseen technical or other problems not evident in the short or medium-term. In the event of any such operational problems, we may not be able to take full advantage of the tax credits.Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: We use multiple suppliers for the same products We anticipate negotiating additional long-term supply contracts We anticipate investigating the use of different, currently non-patented chemicals that produce the same results as the current chemicals used We may have the ability to move operations from one power generation facility to another, if necessary, if operational problems occur at a particular power generation facilitySee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.36
 
Demand for CoalRISK FACTOR (10-K, page 14): Market demand for coal. If the price of natural gas and/or oil declines relative to that of coal, some utilities may choose to burn natural gas or oil instead of coal. Market demand for coal may also decline as a result of an economic slowdown and a corresponding decline in the use of electricity. If utilities burn less coal or eliminate coal in the production of electricity, the availability of the tax credits would also be reduced.RISK FACTOR (10-K, page 14): Environmental concerns regarding coal. Environmental concerns about greenhouse gases, toxic wastewater discharges and the potential hazardous nature of coal combustion waste could lead to regulations that discourage the burning of coal. For example, such regulations could mandate that electric power generating companies purchase a minimum amount of power from renewable energy sources such as wind, hydroelectric, solar and geothermal. This could result in utilities burning less coal, which would reduce the generation of tax credits.Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: There is little we can do to mitigate the risk that power plants' use of coal may decline because of market forces (e.g., natural gas prices decline or the economy slumps), or environmental concerns or regulations that limit their ability to burn coal Coal generates approximately 45% of electricity produced in the U.S. and if any facilities shut down, we have a large market into which we may be able to move the clean coal plant(s) Domestic coal reserves are vast enough to last for over 200 years Coal should continue to be a cost effective, long-term viable energy source through the life of this programSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.37
 
Demand for Coal(Continued)Total Energy Consumption by Fuel Source 2010 U.S. Electricity Source: U.S. Energy Information Administration Annual Energy Outlook 2012 Early Release as of January 2012 Generation by Fuel Source History 2010 Projections Source: U.S. Energy Information Administration and market research. Electric Power Annual 125 Renewables 2011; Revised December 2011.(excluding Renewables liquid biofuels) OtherCoal7%100 10% 11%4% Nuclear 11% Year 1% Liquid biofuels 25% Natural gas 25% 75Per 20% u 9% 45% Bt Nuclear 9%50 21% uadrillion Coal 20%24% Q 25 37% Oil and other liquids 32%Natural Gas01980 1990 2000 2010 2020 2035See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide. 38
 
Demand for Coal(Continued)How Much Coal is Consumed in the U.S. for Electricity Generation?Billions of Tons 1.21.0 0.8 0.6 0.4 0.20.02001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011Source: U.S. Energy Information Administration (EIA)Note: Coal consumption is expected to decrease modestly in 2012 and increase slightly in 2013 (source EIA)39
 
Demand for Coal(Continued)Electricity from Coal vs. Natural Gas  The U.S. is home to the largest recoverable coal reserves in the world (200+ years based on current consumption levels) According to the latest government estimates, the share of electricity generation in the U.S. from coal is expected to decrease by 2035 However, the growing demand for electricity is expected to lead to an increase in the actual amount of coal consumed Although some natural gas facilities are more efficient than coal facilities at generating electricity, the fuel cost of generating one kilowatt-hour of electricity from natural gas generally is higher than that of coal In addition, coal prices have historically been much less volatile than those of natural gas due, in large part, to the existence of long-term coal supply contracts Scientists are working on various emissions control technologies to improve the long-term environmental impact of burning coalSource: U.S. Energy Information AdministrationSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.40
 
Demand for Coal(Continued)If utilities stop burning coal, it is anticipated that our existing partners will want to move the Section 45 clean coal production plant to a different utility to garner the remaining potential tax benefits. There would be some "leasehold improvements" left on the site The remaining net book value would be written off, but this is expected to be minimal There would be tear down, reclamation and transportation costs estimated to be $0.5 to $1.5 million (Gallagher's commitment would be proportional to our ownership percentage) There would be new permanent installation costs estimated to be approximately $4.0 million for the average relocation (Gallagher's commitment would be proportional to our ownership percentage)See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.41
 
Intellectual Property RisksRISK FACTOR (10-K, page 14): Other companies may make claims of intellectual property infringement with respect to The Chem-Mod Solution. Such intellectual property claims, with or without merit, could require that Chem-Mod (or we and our partners) obtain a license to use the intellectual property, which might not be obtainable on favorable terms, if at all. If Chem-Mod (or we and our partners) cannot defend such claims or obtain necessary licenses on reasonable terms, the operations may be precluded from using The Chem-Mod Solution.Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: While we believe The Chem-ModTM Solution does not infringe any other company's intellectual property, there is little we can do to mitigate the risk that other companies may make claims of intellectual property infringement with respect to The Chem-ModTM Solution Chem-Mod has patent infringement insurance that partially mitigates financial exposuresSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.42
 
Environmental and Product Liability ClaimsRISK FACTOR (10-K, page 14): The construction and operation of the IRC Section 45 operations are subject to Federal, state and local laws, regulations and potential liabilities arising under or relating to the protection or preservation of the environment, natural resources and human health and safety. Such laws and regulations generally require the operations and/or the utilities at which the operations are located to obtain and comply with various environmental registrations, licenses, permits, inspections and other approvals. Such laws and regulations also impose liability, without regard to fault or the legality of a party's conduct, on certain entities that are considered to have contributed to, or are otherwise involved in, the release or threatened release of hazardous substances into the environment. Such hazardous substances could be released as a result of burning refined coal produced using The Chem-Mod Solution in a number of ways, including air emissions, waste water, and byproducts such as fly ash. One party may, under certain circumstances, be required to bear more than its share or the entire share of investigation and cleanup costs at a site if payments or participation cannot be obtained from other responsible parties. By using The Chem Mod Solution at locations owned and operated by others, we and our partners may be exposed to the risk of becoming liable for environmental damage we may have had little, if any, involvement in creating. Such risk remains even after production ceases at an operation to the extent the environmental damage can be traced to the types of chemicals or compounds used or operations conducted in connection with The Chem-Mod Solution. For example, we and our partners could face the risk of product and environmental liability claims related to concrete incorporating fly ash produced using The Chem-Mod Solution. No assurances can be given that contractual arrangements and precautions taken to ensure assumption of these risks by facility owners or operators will result in that facility owner or operator accepting full responsibility for any environmental damage. It is also not uncommon for private claims by third parties alleging contamination to also include claims for personal injury, property damage, diminution of property or similar claims. Furthermore, many environmental, health and safety laws authorize citizen suits, permitting third parties to make claims for violations of laws or permits and force compliance. Our insurance may not cover all environmental risk and costs or may not provide sufficient coverage in the event of an environmental claim. If significant uninsured losses arise from environmental damage or product liability claims, or if the costs of environmental compliance increase for any reason, our results of operations and financial condition could be adversely affected.Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: After extensive testing and trials, we believe application of the The Chem-Mod Solution at the operations in which we are invested is safe for the environment. However, given the nature of environmental liability litigation, there is little we can do to mitigate the risk that we could be sued over the environmental impact of the operations We have insurance covering some of these environmental risksSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.43
 
Key PersonnelRISK FACTOR (10-K, page 11): The loss of our chief executive officer or any of our other senior managers, brokers or other key personnel (including the key personnel that manage our interests in our IRC Section 45 investments), or our inability to identify, recruit and retain such personnel, could materially and adversely affect our business, operating results and financial condition.Management's observations regarding possible mitigation alternatives: Several key employees manage our Section 45 investments and we have partially mitigated the risk of losing them through appropriate compensation incentivesSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.44
 
Other Frequently Asked Questions45
 
How Did Gallagher Get Into These Investments? Gallagher has a history of developing and realizing value from these types of structured investments dating back to the 1980s Low-income housing Biogas from biomass facilities IRC Section 29 alternative fuel IRC Section 45 refined coal A core group of five people provide the foundation for our current clean energy investments46
 
Why a Tax Subsidy for Clean Coal? U.S. governmental policy is to subsidize the development and utilization of clean energy technologies through the application of tax incentives The government has been subsidizing energy projects in the U.S. for over a century We expect the government will continue to play an important role in energy development, particularly with respect to clean energy technologies Our current tax-advantaged investments involve Section 45 of the Internal Revenue Code which regulates tax credits for clean coal power generation, our latest area of focus The subsidy, which is inflated every year by the Federal government, was $6.33 per ton of coal sold for 2011  we anticipate the rate for 2012 to be $6.36 - $6.40 (expected to be announced in April 2012)See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.47
 
Status of Emerging Environmental Regulations? Since 2005, the Federal government/EPA have pursued regulations that would require coal power generation facilities to significantly reduce the emissions of mercury, acid gases and particulate matter Mercury and Air Toxics Standards (MATS) issued December 21, 2011, is the first national standard to reduce emissions from existing and new power facilities In particular, the rules call for a reduction in mercury emissions of approximately 90% These new Federal regulations are required to be implemented by the end of 2014, although some states have already taken action Approximately 40% of the existing coal fleet (580 facilities with 1,400 generators at an average age of 44 years) does not have the necessary emissions control to meet the new guidelines These regulations will require non-conforming power facilities to install emissions control solutions, primarily for mercury, to comply or cease operations See pages 10 and 12 for a discussion on how Chem-Mod may help utilities comply with new regulationsSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.48
 
Any Strategic Alternatives for Investments in Clean Coal Plants? While Gallagher continually evaluates strategic alternatives, we currently expect to hold minority-position investments in the 29 clean coal plants If Gallagher sold these investments prior to the expiration of the tax credits, the discount rate on the future cash flows would likely be excessiveSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.49
 
What are Next Steps for Chem-Mod? We, along with our partners, continue to evaluate alternatives to maximize the value of our investment in Chem-Mod In particular, we will likely need the expertise of a strategic partner to fully realize the financial benefits of deploying the technology into the mercury control market both domestically and internationally Potential strategic/financial alternatives include: Granting an exclusive license to a strategic partner(s) Separating the company into two distinct businesses: clean coal and mercury control Developing a sales force to market the technology Selling Chem-ModSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.50
 
What is the Competitive Landscape for Chem-Mod? There are a number of emissions control technologies that address mercury, all with varying degrees of cost and effectiveness The traditional emissions control technology for coal power generation facilities is "scrubbers", comparatively expensive solutions designed to remove a range of pollutants The traditional emissions control technology specifically for mercury is activated carbon injection (ACI) systems, often used in conjunction with scrubbers ACI systems inject powdered activated carbon, which acts as a sorbent, into the exhaust pipes of a coal furnace to capture the mercury after combustion As an alternative, The Chem-ModTM Solution involves the application of specific chemical reagents before the combustion process to capture the mercury and other pollutants in a chemical bond The chemical bonds created using Chem-Mod's patented technology are more stable and create a better fly ash for re-use51
 
Who are the Key Competitors for Mercury Emissions Control? Provides activated carbon injection systems and chemical supplies ADA Environmental  Also offers a pre-combustion coal additive Solutions technology similar to the The Chem-ModTM Solution that qualifies as a refined coal Maintains principal investments in clean coal plants Provides activated carbon injection systems and Norit chemical supplies Market leading providers of comprehensive environmental control systems for coal power Alstrom generation facilities Primarily focused on conventional "scrubbers"B&W Provide specific mercury control solutions52
 
What is the Potential for Chem-Mod in International Markets? Gallagher holds a non-controlling 20% interest in Chem-Mod International LLC Chem-Mod International LLC owns the rights to license The Chem-ModTM Solution in countries outside the U.S. and Canada The international market for mercury control solutions is much less developed Marketing activity to date has been limited Most of the opportunity will likely come from Asia, which is more dependent on coal power generation than other regions in the worldSee page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.53
 
What Other Clean Energy Technologies Are in Gallagher's Portfolio? We hold a non-controlling 8% interest in C-Quest's global operations C-Quest was founded by the same founder of Chem-Mod C-Quest possesses rights, information and technology for the reduction of carbon dioxide emissions created by burning fossil fuels Thus far, C-Quest's operations have been limited to laboratory testing We have options to acquire an additional 19% interest in C-Quest's global operations for $9.5 million at any time prior to August 1, 201354
 
For Additional InformationMarsha Akin Director  Investor Relations Marsha_Akin@ajg.com Phone: 630-285-350155
 
Appendix A
Prices and Phase Out 2005  The reference price for refined coal production is $36.36 per ton for tax year 2005 as published in the Federal Register on April 8, 2005. 2005 phase out prices derived based on the published inflation adjustment factor for refined coal of 1.2528. Because the 2005 reference price of $36.36 does not exceed the 2002 reference price of refined coal ($31.90) multiplied by the inflation adjustment factor and 1.7, the Section 45 tax credit was not be phased out in 2005. Full text of the Federal Register can be found at: http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/FR-2005-04-08/pdf/05-7096.pdf 2006  The reference price for refined coal production is $42.78 per ton for tax year 2006 as published in the Federal Register on March 31, 2006. 2006 phase out prices derived based on the published inflation adjustment factor for refined coal of 1.2981. Because the 2006 reference price of $42.78 does not exceed the 2002 reference price of refined coal ($31.90) multiplied by the inflation adjustment factor and 1.7, the Section 45 tax credit was not be phased out in 2006. Full text of the Federal Register can be found at: http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/FR-2006-03-31/pdf/E6-4668.pdf 2007  The reference price for refined coal production is $48.35 per ton for tax year 2007 as published in the Federal Register on March 29, 2007. 2007 phase out prices derived based on the published inflation adjustment factor for refined coal of 1.3433. Because the 2007 reference price of $48.35 does not exceed the 2002 reference price of refined coal ($31.90) multiplied by the inflation adjustment factor and 1.7, the Section 45 tax credit was not be phased out in 2007. Full text of the Federal Register can be found at: http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/FR-2007-03-29/pdf/E7-5733.pdf 2008  The reference price for refined coal production is $45.56 per ton for tax year 2008 as published in the Federal Register on April 30, 2008. 2008 phase out prices derived based on the published inflation adjustment factor for refined coal of 1.3854. Because the 2008 reference price of $45.56 does not exceed the 2002 reference price of refined coal ($31.90) multiplied by the inflation adjustment factor and 1.7, the Section 45 tax credit was not be phased out in 2008. Full text of the Federal Register can be found at: http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/FR-2008-04-30/pdf/E8-9501.pdf 2009  The reference price for refined coal production is $39.72 per ton for tax year 2009 as published in the Federal Register on April 9, 2009. 2009 phase out prices derived based on the published inflation adjustment factor for refined coal of 1.4171. Because the 2009 reference price of $39.72 does not exceed the 2002 reference price of refined coal ($31.90) multiplied by the inflation adjustment factor and 1.7, the Section 45 tax credit was not be phased out in 2009. Full text of the Federal Register can be found at: http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/FR-2009-04-09/pdf/E9-8029.pdf 2010  The reference price for refined coal production is $54.74 per ton for tax year 2010 as published in the Federal Register on April 1, 2010. 2010 phase out prices derived based on the published inflation adjustment factor for refined coal of 1.4342. Because the 2010 reference price of $54.74 does not exceed the 2002 reference price of refined coal ($31.90) multiplied by the inflation adjustment factor and 1.7, the Section 45 tax credit was not be phased out in 2010. Full text of the Federal Register can be found at: http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/FR-2010-04-01/pdf/2010-7263.pdf 2011  The reference price for refined coal production is $55.66 per ton for tax year 2011 as published in the Federal Register on April 19, 2011. 2011 phase out prices derived based on the published inflation adjustment factor for refined coal of 1.4459. Because the 2011 reference price of $55.66 does not exceed the 2002 reference price of refined coal ($31.90) multiplied by the inflation adjustment factor and 1.7, the Section 45 tax credit was not be phased out in 2011. Full text of the Federal Register can be found at: http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/FR-2011-04-19/pdf/2011-9471.pdf *Average Coal Price (EIA) used is on a one-year look back basis. For example, 2012 looks back to 2011 data from the EIA. URLs for the Federal Registers are current as of March 27, 2012. Gallagher assumes no duty to update should the URLs change in the future. See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.56
 
Appendix AEstimating 2012 Reference Price & Phase-OutPhase-out threshold = 2002 reference price x inflation adjustment factor(1) x 1.7CONSTANTEstimated Starting Phase-Out Price = $31.90 x 113.361 x 1.7 = $80.2676.598CONSTANTEstimated 100% Phase-Out Price = $80.26 + $8.75 = $89.01Expected annual reference price for coal = prior year average coal price x 1.252011 actual average coal price (EIA) = $46.79 2012 estimated reference price = $46.79 x 1.25 = $58.49No phase-out expected in 20121. Section 45(e)(2)(B) defines the inflation adjustment factor for a calendar year as the GDP implicit price deflator for the preceding calendar year divided by the GDP implicit price deflator for the calendar year 1992. The term "GDP implicit price deflator" means the most recent revision of the implicit price deflator for the gross domestic product as computed and published by the Department of Commerce before March 15 of the calendar year. See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.57
 
Appendix AEstimating 2012 Reference PriceAvg.Cost Of Markup Calendar Coal Factor Tax Reference Year ($/ton) (derived) Year Price2004 $27.42 1.3260 2005 $36.36 2005 $31.20 1.3712 2006 $42.78 2006 $34.09 1.4183 2007 $48.35 2007 $35.48 1.2841 2008 $45.56 2008 $41.14 0.9655 2009 $39.72 2009 $43.74 1.2515 2010 $54.74 2010 $44.64 1.2469 2011 $55.66 2011 $46.79 1.2500 2012 $58.49 (Est.) (Est.)Source: EIA Electric Power Monthly February 2012, Table 4.1., Receipts, Average Cost, and Quality of Fossil Fuels: Total (All Sectors), 1997 through December 2011.See page 2 for information regarding how risks and uncertainties could impact the forward-looking statements, including implied statements, on this slide.58


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120501163757.txt.gz
TIME:20120501163757
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On May 1, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, May 1, 2012  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at www.ajg.com. For a description of the non-GAAP measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 5.
"Our positive operating momentum continued in the first quarter of 2012 despite it being seasonally our smallest quarter. Coming off a strong finish in 2011, we are pleased to see another quarter of strong organic growth, improved adjusted EBITDAC margins and improved adjusted diluted net earnings per share," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Our combined Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted 18% growth in adjusted total revenues, 4.6% organic growth in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, 23% growth in adjusted EBITDAC and 12% growth in adjusted diluted net earnings per share."
 
 
"We are seeing further evidence of market firming and our customers' businesses are showing growth. Our sales and support teams are delivering excellent client service; our M&A pipeline is full of outstanding prospects; our operational improvement teams continue to make strides in improving productivity and quality; and our culture is thriving across our global enterprise."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same period in 2011:
Quarter Ended March 31
 
 
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same period in 2011 (in millions):
 
 
Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights (continued)
Gallagher has $675.0 million of long-term borrowings outstanding under three private placement agreements, which are due and payable in various amounts in 2014 through 2023. Gallagher also maintains an unsecured line of credit of $500.0 million that expires July 14, 2014. There were $92.0 million of borrowings outstanding under Gallagher's line of credit facility at March 31, 2012.
Debt, interest and banking
 
 
 
Gallagher holds investment positions in 15 commercial clean coal production plants that were built and first began producing refined coal in fourth quarter 2011 (the 2011 Era Plants). These plants also qualify for tax credits under Section 45 of the Internal Revenue Code which pass through in proportion to Gallagher's ownership level.
 
 
 
Gallagher holds a 42% controlling interest in Chem-Mod, LLC which possesses rights, information and technologies used for the reduction of unwanted emissions created during the combustion of coal. The clean coal production plants discussed above, as well as other unrelated parties, license and use Chem-Mod's technologies in the production of refined fuel. Based on current production estimates provided by licensees, Chem-Mod could ramp-up in the second and third quarters and ultimately generate for Gallagher approximately $2.5 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter starting in the fourth quarter of 2012.
Please note that all estimates set forth above regarding the future quarterly earnings impact of our clean-energy investments are subject to significant risks, including those referred to below under "Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements."
 
 
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 38% to 40% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 and 2011 was 13.5% and 35.3%, respectively. Gallagher's tax rate for first quarter 2012 was lower than the same period in 2011 and the statutory rate due to the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits earned in 2012.
 
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, May 2, 2012 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 17 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding investment returns generated by Gallagher's clean energy investments (which own commercial clean coal plants), our corporate income tax rate, the future revenue and earnings impact of recent acquisitions, drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers may provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in this press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentation of 2012 and 2011 statements of earnings, presented on the following pages, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that may assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after-tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the normalized effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
 
Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to help interested persons analyze the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2012 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2011.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2012 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures for adjusted revenues, expenses and net earnings, EBITDAC (on pages 7 and 8), for Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for Diluted Net Earnings Per Share (As Adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments (on page 1), and for organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 5 of 9 and notes to first quarter 2012 earnings release on page 9 of 9.
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 5 of 9 and notes to first quarter 2012 earnings release on page 9 of 9.
 
 
 
Notes to First Quarter 2012 Earnings Release
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
DirectorInvestor Relations
630-285-3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120508102453.txt.gz
TIME:20120508102453
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 8, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 194,926 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 8, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 194,926 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120510163440.txt.gz
TIME:20120510163440
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01    Other Events.
On May 10, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 744,069 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 10, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 744,069 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120515172306.txt.gz
TIME:20120515172306
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 15, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 30,995 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 15, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 30,995 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120518142555.txt.gz
TIME:20120518142555
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 18, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 174,850 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 18, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 174,850 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120525111400.txt.gz
TIME:20120525111400
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 25, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 47,212 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
May 25, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 47,212 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120606125026.txt.gz
TIME:20120606125026
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
On June 6, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 99,270 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5
June 6, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 99,270 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120607150242.txt.gz
TIME:20120607150242
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 7, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 180,103 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
June 7, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 180,103 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120619130614.txt.gz
TIME:20120619130614
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 19, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 74,500 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
June 19, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 74,500 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120711163755.txt.gz
TIME:20120711163755
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The information required by this item with respect to the Purchase Agreement (as defined below) is incorporated herein by reference to Item 2.03.
 
On July 10, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") and certain of its subsidiaries (collectively, the "Subsidiary Obligors") issued, in a private placement, $50 million aggregate principal amount of 3.99% Series F Senior Notes, due July 10, 2020 (the "Notes"). Interest on the Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on January 10 and July 10 of each year, beginning on January 10, 2013. Gallagher issued the Notes pursuant to the terms of a Note Purchase Agreement dated as of July 10, 2012 (the "Purchase Agreement") with certain accredited institutional investors (collectively, the "Purchasers"). The Notes are senior unsecured obligations of Gallagher and the Subsidiary Obligors and rank equal in right of payment with all other senior unsecured indebtedness of Gallagher and the Subsidiary Obligors.
The Purchase Agreement contains customary provisions for transactions of this type, including representations and warranties regarding Gallagher and its subsidiaries and various covenants, including covenants that require Gallagher to maintain specified financial ratios. The Purchase Agreement provides for customary events of default, generally with corresponding grace periods, including, without limitation, payment defaults with respect to the Notes, covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other agreements evidencing indebtedness of Gallagher or its subsidiaries, certain judgments against Gallagher or its subsidiaries and events of bankruptcy involving Gallagher or its material subsidiaries.
Under the terms of the Purchase Agreement, the Notes are redeemable, in whole or in part, at 100% of the principal amount being redeemed, together with accrued and unpaid interest and a "make-whole amount" (as defined in the Purchase Agreement). If within 90 days after a "change in control" Gallagher (or its successor) does not have an "investment grade rating", Gallagher is obligated to offer to prepay all of the outstanding Notes at the principal amount thereof plus accrued interest (but without any "make-whole amount") (as each term is defined in the Purchase Agreement).
The foregoing summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Purchase Agreement and form of the Notes, filed herewith as Exhibit 4.1 and Exhibit 4.2, respectively.
 
On July 10, 2012, Gallagher issued a press release announcing it had completed the issuance of the Notes. A copy of this press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Table of Contents
Exhibit 4.1
E C
XECUTION
OPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
Dated as of July 10, 2012
T E P L
O
ACH
OF
THE
URCHASERS
ISTED
IN
S A H:
CHEDULE
ERETO
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally agree with each of the Purchasers whose names appear in attached hereto (each, a and, collectively, the ) as follows:
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
Section 9.7,
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Schedule A
"Purchaser"
"Purchasers"
SECTION 1. Authorization of Notes.
The Obligors will authorize the issue and sale of $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020 (the "Series F Notes" or the "Notes," such term to include any such notes issued in substitution therefor pursuant to ). The Series F Notes shall be substantially in the form set out in . Certain capitalized and other terms used in this Agreement are defined in ; and references to a "" or an are, unless otherwise specified, to a Schedule or an Exhibit attached to this Agreement.
Section 13
Exhibit 1
Schedule B
Schedule
"Exhibit"
SECTION 2. Sale and Purchase of Notes.
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Obligors will issue and sell to each Purchaser and each Purchaser will purchase from the Obligors, at the Closing provided for in , Series F Notes in the principal amount specified opposite such Purchaser's name in at the purchase price of 100% of the principal amount thereof. The Purchasers' obligations hereunder are several and not joint obligations and no Purchaser shall have any liability to any Person for the performance or non-performance of any obligation by any other Purchaser hereunder.
Section 2.1 Purchase and Sale of the Series F Notes.
Section 3
Schedule A
Table of Contents
(a) The holders of the Notes acknowledge and agree that any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor (other than the Company) shall be automatically discharged and released from the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, pursuant to the written request of the Company, that (i) such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, has been released and discharged as a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of all Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement and the Company so certifies to the holders of the Notes in a certificate which accompanies such request for release and discharge, (ii) any such release and discharge shall be expressly conditioned upon receipt by the holders of the Notes of a written agreement executed by the Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, to be released pursuant to which such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, shall agree that if, for any reason whatsoever, it thereafter becomes a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of any Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement, then such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, shall contemporaneously provide written notice thereof to the holders of the Notes accompanied by an executed (A) Subsidiary Guaranty or (B) Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, of such Subsidiary, and (iii) at the time of such release and discharge, the Company shall deliver a certificate of a Responsible Officer to the holders of the Notes to the effect that no Default or Event of Default exists; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
Section 2.2 Release of Subsidiary Guarantors and Obligors.
provided
provided
Section 10.5
(b) The Company agrees that it will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary or Affiliate to, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration or remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, to any creditor of the Company or of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any such creditor of any release or discharge of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, with respect to any liability of such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as a guarantor or obligor under or in respect of Indebtedness of the Company, unless such consideration or remuneration is concurrently paid, on the same terms, ratably to the holders of all of the Notes then outstanding.
(c) Each holder of the Notes further acknowledges and agrees that following the release of an Obligor pursuant to this , if requested in writing by the Obligor Agent, that such holder of the Notes shall, at the cost and expense of the Obligors, within 20 Business Days following the date of such request, surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note and in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the remaining Obligors.
Section 2.2
 
Table of Contents
SECTION 3. Closing.
The sale and purchase of the Notes to be purchased by each Purchaser shall occur at the offices of Schiff Hardin LLP, Suite 6600, 233 S. Wacker Dr., Chicago, Illinois 60606, at 10:00 .. Chicago time, at a closing (the ) on July 10, 2012. At the Closing, the Obligors will deliver to each Purchaser the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser in the form of a single Note to be purchased by such Purchaser (or such greater number of Notes in denominations of at least $100,000 as such Purchaser may request) dated the date of the Closing and registered in such Purchaser's name (or in the name of its nominee), against delivery by such Purchaser to the Obligors or their order of immediately available funds in the amount of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of immediately available funds for the account of the Company to account number 265-977-9, Account Name: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.  Delaware Dividend Account, at Harris N.A., Chicago, IL (ABA No.: 071-000-288). If at the Closing the Obligors shall fail to tender such Notes to any Purchaser as provided above in this , or any of the conditions specified in shall not have been fulfilled to such Purchaser's satisfaction, such Purchaser shall, at its election, be relieved of all further obligations under this Agreement, without thereby waiving any rights such Purchaser may have by reason of such failure or such nonfulfillment.
A
M
"Closing"
Section 3
Section 4
SECTION 4. Conditions to Closing.
Each Purchaser's obligation to purchase and pay for the Notes to be sold to such Purchaser at the Closing is subject to the fulfillment to such Purchaser's satisfaction, prior to or at the Closing, of the following conditions:
. The representations and warranties of each Obligor in this Agreement shall be correct when made and at the time of the Closing.
Section 4.1 Representations and Warranties
. Each Obligor shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in this Agreement required to be performed or complied with by it prior to or at the Closing, and after giving effect to the issue and sale of the Notes (and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated by ), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 4.2 Performance; No Default
Section 5.14
.
Section 4.3 Compliance Certificates
(a) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser an Officer's Certificate, dated the date of the Closing, certifying that the conditions specified in , and have been fulfilled.
Officer's Certificate
Sections 4.1
4.2
4.9
(b) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser a certificate of its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, dated the date of Closing, certifying as to the resolutions attached thereto and other corporate proceedings relating to the authorization, execution and delivery of the Notes and this Agreement.
Secretary's Certificate
. Such Purchaser shall have received opinions in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser, dated the date of the Closing (a) from Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Obligors, in the form set forth in (and each Obligor hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) (b) from Walter D. Bay, Esq., General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, in the form set forth in (and the Company hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) and (c) from Schiff Hardin LLP, the Purchasers' special counsel in connection with such transactions, substantially in the form set forth in and covering such other matters incident to such transactions as such Purchaser may reasonably request.
Section 4.4 Opinions of Counsel
Exhibit 4.4(a)
Exhibit 4.4(b)
Exhibit 4.4(c)
 
Table of Contents
On the date of the Closing such Purchaser's purchase of Notes shall (a) be permitted by the laws and regulations of each jurisdiction to which such Purchaser is subject, without recourse to provisions (such as section 1405(a)(8) of the New York Insurance Law) permitting limited investments by insurance companies without restriction as to the character of the particular investment, (b) not violate any applicable law or regulation (including, without limitation, Regulation T, U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) and (c) not subject such Purchaser to any tax, penalty or liability under or pursuant to any applicable law or regulation, which law or regulation was not in effect on the date hereof. If requested by such Purchaser, such Purchaser shall have received an Officer's Certificate certifying as to such matters of fact as such Purchaser may reasonably specify to enable such Purchaser to determine whether such purchase is so permitted.
Section 4.5 Purchase Permitted by Applicable Law, Etc.
. Contemporaneously with the Closing, the Obligors shall sell to each other Purchaser, and each other Purchaser shall purchase, the Notes to be purchased by it at the Closing as specified in .
Section 4.6 Sale of Other Notes
Schedule A
. Without limiting the provisions of , the Obligors shall have paid on or before the Closing the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of the Purchasers' special counsel referred to in to the extent reflected in a statement of such counsel rendered to the Company at least one Business Day prior to the Closing.
Section 4.7 Payment of Special Counsel Fees
Section 15.1
Section 4.4
. A Private Placement Number issued by Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau (in cooperation with the Securities Valuation Office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) shall have been obtained for the Series F Notes.
Section 4.8 Private Placement Number
. No Obligor shall have changed its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization, as applicable, or been a party to any merger or consolidation or succeeded to all or any substantial part of the liabilities of any other entity, at any time following the date of the most recent financial statements referred to in .
Section 4.9 Changes in Corporate Structure
Schedule 5.5
At least three Business Days prior to the date of the Closing, each Purchaser shall have received written instructions signed by a Responsible Officer on letterhead of the Company confirming the information specified in including (a) the name and address of the transferee bank, (b) such transferee bank's ABA number and (c) the account name and number into which the purchase price for the Notes is to be deposited.
Section 4.10 Funding Instructions.
Section 3
. All corporate or limited liability company and other proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and all documents and instruments incident to such transactions shall be reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser and its special counsel, and such Purchaser and its special counsel shall have received all such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as such Purchaser or such special counsel may reasonably request.
Section 4.11 Proceedings and Documents
 
Table of Contents
SECTION 5. Representations and Warranties of the Obligors.
Each Obligor represents and warrants to each Purchaser as of the date hereof that:
. Such Obligor is a corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation or formation, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Such Obligor has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Notes and to perform the provisions hereof and thereof.
Section 5.1 Organization; Power and Authority
. This Agreement and the Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of such Obligor, and this Agreement constitutes, and upon execution and delivery thereof each Note will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Obligor enforceable against such Obligor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (a) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (b) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Section 5.2 Authorization, Etc
. This Agreement and the documents, certificates or other writings delivered to the Purchasers by or on behalf of the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and identified in , and the financial statements listed in (this Agreement, and such documents, certificates or other writings and such financial statements delivered to each Purchaser prior to July 10, 2012 being referred to, collectively, as the ), taken as a whole, do not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in light of the circumstances under which they were made. Since December 31, 2011, there has been no change in the financial condition, operations, business or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, except changes that individually or in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There is no fact known to any Obligor that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect that has not been set forth herein or in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.3 Disclosure
Schedule 5.3
Schedule 5.5
"Disclosure Documents"
. (a)  contains (except as noted therein) complete and correct lists (i) of the Company's Subsidiaries, showing, as to each Subsidiary, the correct name thereof, the jurisdiction of its organization, the percentage of shares of each class of its capital stock or similar equity interests outstanding owned by the Company and each other Subsidiary and designation of whether or not such Subsidiary is an obligor or guarantor under the Bank Credit Agreement, (ii) of the Company's Affiliates, other than Subsidiaries, and (iii) of the Company's directors and senior officers.
Section 5.4 Organization and Ownership of Shares of Subsidiaries; Affiliates
Schedule 5.4
 
Table of Contents
(b) All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of each Subsidiary shown in as being owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries have been validly issued, are (in the case of capital stock) fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Company or another Subsidiary free and clear of any Lien (except as otherwise disclosed in ).
Schedule 5.4
Schedule 5.4 or Schedule 5.15(b)
(c) Each Subsidiary identified in is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each such Subsidiary has the corporate or other legal entity power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease and to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact other than that which could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule 5.4
(d) No Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to, any legal, regulatory, contractual or other restriction (other than this Agreement, the agreements listed on and limitations imposed by law) restricting the ability of such Subsidiary to pay dividends out of profits or make any other similar distributions of profits to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that owns outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of such Subsidiary.
Schedule 5.4
. The Company has delivered to each Purchaser copies of the financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries listed on . All of said financial statements (including in each case the related schedules and notes) fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the respective dates specified in such financial statements and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the respective periods so specified and have been prepared in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the periods involved except as set forth in the notes thereto (subject, in the case of any interim financial statements, to normal year-end adjustments). To the knowledge of the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries do not have any Material liabilities that are not disclosed in such financial statements or otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.5 Financial Statements; Material Liabilities
Schedule 5.5
. The execution, delivery and performance by the Obligors of this Agreement and the Notes will not (a) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of any Obligor or any Subsidiary under, any Material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, corporate charter or by-laws, or any other Material agreement or instrument to which such Obligor or any Subsidiary is bound or by which any Obligor or any Subsidiary or any of their respective properties may be bound or affected, (b) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary or (c) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary.
Section 5.6 Compliance with Laws, Other Instruments, Etc
 
Table of Contents
. No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by the Obligors of this Agreement or the Notes.
Section 5.7 Governmental Authorizations, Etc
(a) Except as disclosed in the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 or the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012, there are no actions, suits, investigations or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of each of the Obligors, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary or any property of the Company or any Subsidiary in any court or before any arbitrator of any kind or before or by any Governmental Authority that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.8 Litigation; Observance of Agreements, Statutes and Orders.
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default under any term of any agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it is bound, or any order, judgment, decree or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority or is in violation of any applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation (including without limitation Environmental Laws or the USA Patriot Act) of any Governmental Authority, which default or violation, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have filed all tax returns that are required to have been filed in any jurisdiction, and have paid all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes and assessments levied upon them or their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent such taxes and assessments have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent, except for any taxes and assessments (a) the amount of which is not individually or in the aggregate Material or (b) the amount, applicability or validity of which is currently being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and with respect to which the Company has established adequate reserves on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP. No Obligor knows of any basis for any other tax or assessment that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The charges, accruals and reserves on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries in respect of Federal, state or other taxes for all fiscal periods are, in the judgment of the Company, adequate. The Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries have been finally determined (whether by reason of completed audits or the statute of limitations having run) for all fiscal years up to and including the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008; , , that this sentence shall not apply to any Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries arising from an examination by a Governmental Authority of any of the investment partnerships of the Company.
Section 5.9 Taxes
provided
however
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to their respective properties that individually or in the aggregate are Material, including all such properties reflected in the most recent audited balance sheet referred to in or purported to have been acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary after said date (except as sold or otherwise disposed of in the ordinary course of business), in each case free and clear of Liens prohibited by this Agreement. All leases that individually or in the aggregate are Material are valid and subsisting and are in full force and effect in all material respects.
Section 5.10 Title to Property; Leases
Section 5.5
 
Table of Contents
(a) The Company and its Subsidiaries own or possess all licenses, permits, franchises, authorizations, patents, copyrights, proprietary software, service marks, trademarks and trade names, or rights thereto, without known conflict with the rights of others, except those conflicts that, individually and in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.11 Licenses, Permits, Etc.
(b) To the knowledge of each Obligor, no product of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries infringes in any respect with any license, permit, franchise, authorization, patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned by any other Person, except to the extent any such infringement could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) To the knowledge of each Obligor, there is no Material violation by any Person of any right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned or used by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
. (a) The Company and each ERISA Affiliate have operated and administered each Plan in compliance with all applicable laws except for such instances of noncompliance as have not resulted in and could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any ERISA Affiliate has incurred any liability (other than liabilities for PBGC premiums that have been paid or will be paid on a timely basis) pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans (as defined in section 3 of ERISA), and no event, transaction or condition has occurred or exists that could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any such liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, in either case pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or to such penalty or excise tax provisions or to sections 412 or 430 of the Code or section 4068 of ERISA, other than such liabilities or Liens as would not be individually or in the aggregate Material.
Section 5.12 Compliance with ERISA
(b) The present value of the aggregate benefit liabilities under each of the Plans (other than Multiemployer Plans), determined as of the end of such Plan's most recently ended plan year on the basis of the actuarial assumptions specified for funding purposes in such Plan's most recent actuarial valuation report, did not exceed the aggregate current value of the assets of such Plan allocable to such benefit liabilities by more than $30,000,000. The term "benefit liabilities" has the meaning specified in Section 4001 of ERISA and the terms "current value" and "present value" have the meaning specified in section 3 of ERISA.
(c) In respect of each Plan, the Company and each other member of its Controlled Group has fulfilled its obligations under the minimum funding standards of ERISA and the Code to the extent applicable to it.
(d) The Company and its ERISA Affiliates have not incurred withdrawal liabilities (and are not subject to contingent withdrawal liabilities) under Section 4201 or 4204 of ERISA in respect of Multiemployer Plans that individually or in the aggregate are Material.
 
Table of Contents
(e) The expected post retirement benefit obligation (determined as of the last day of the Company's most recently ended fiscal year in accordance with Accounting Standard Codification 715, formerly known as Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 106, without regard to liabilities attributable to continuation coverage mandated by Section 4980B of the Code) of the Company and its Subsidiaries is not Material or has otherwise been disclosed in the financial statements set forth on .
Schedule 5.5
(f) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the issuance and sale of the Notes hereunder will not involve any transaction that is subject to the prohibitions of Section 406 of ERISA or in connection with which a tax could be imposed pursuant to Section 4975(c)(1)(A)-(D) of the Code. The representation by the Company in the first sentence of this is made in reliance upon and subject to the accuracy of such Purchaser's representation in as to the sources of the funds used to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser.
Section 5.12(f)
Section 6.2
. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has offered the Notes or any similar securities for sale to, or solicited any offer to buy any of the same from, or otherwise approached or negotiated in respect thereof with, any Person other than the Purchasers and not more than 10 other Institutional Investors, each of which has been offered the Notes at a private sale for investment. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has taken, or will take, any action that would subject the issuance or sale of the Notes to the registration requirements of Section 5 of the Securities Act or to the registration requirements of any securities or blue sky laws of any applicable jurisdiction.
Section 5.13 Private Offering by the Company
. The Obligors will apply the proceeds of the sale of the Notes to repay outstanding borrowings under the Bank Credit Agreement (without reducing the commitments thereunder) and for general corporate purposes, including the financing of acquisitions. No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of buying or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 CFR 221), or for the purpose of buying or carrying or trading in any securities under such circumstances as to involve the Company in a violation of Regulation X of said Board (12 CFR 224) or to involve any broker or dealer in a violation of Regulation T of said Board (12 CFR 220), in each case, in contravention of applicable margin stock regulations. Margin stock does not constitute more than 15% of the value of the consolidated assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries and the Company does not have any present intention that margin stock will constitute more than 15% of the value of such assets. As used in this , the terms "margin stock" and "purpose of buying or carrying" shall have the meanings assigned to them in said Regulation U.
Section 5.14 Use of Proceeds; Margin Regulations
Section 5.14
. (a)  sets forth the outstanding Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of March 31, 2012, which list is complete and correct in all material respects (including a description of the obligors and obligees, principal amount outstanding and collateral therefor, if any, and Guaranty thereof, if any), since which date there has been no Material change in the amounts, interest rates, sinking funds, installment payments or maturities of the Indebtedness of the Company or its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default and no waiver of default is currently in effect, in the payment of any principal or interest on any Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary and no event or condition exists with respect to any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary that would permit (or that with notice or the lapse of time, or both, would permit) one or more Persons to cause such Indebtedness to become due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment.
Section 5.15 Existing Indebtedness; Future Liens
Schedule 5.15(a)
 
Table of Contents
(b) Except as disclosed in , neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has agreed or consented to cause or permit in the future (upon the happening of a contingency or otherwise) any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, to be subject to a Lien not permitted by .
Schedule 5.15(b)
Section 10.4
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to any provision contained in, any instrument evidencing Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary, any agreement relating thereto or any other agreement (including, but not limited to, its charter or other organizational document) which limits the amount of, or otherwise imposes restrictions on the incurring of, Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary, except as specifically indicated in .
Schedule 5.15(c)
. (a) Neither the Company nor any Controlled Entity is (i) a Person whose name appears on the list of Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons published by the Office of Foreign Assets Control, U.S. Department of Treasury ("") (an "") or (ii) a department, agency or instrumentality of, or is otherwise controlled by or acting on behalf of, directly or indirectly, (x) any OFAC Listed Person or (y) any Person, entity, organization, foreign country or regime that is subject to any OFAC Sanctions Program (each OFAC Listed Person and each other Person, entity, organization and government of a country described in clause (ii), a "").
Section 5.16 Foreign Assets Control Regulations, Etc
OFAC
OFAC Listed Person
Blocked Person
(b) No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder constitutes or will constitute funds obtained on behalf of any Blocked Person or will otherwise be used, directly by the Company or indirectly through any Controlled Entity, in connection with any investments in, or any transactions or dealings with, any Blocked Person.
(c) To the Company's knowledge, neither the Company nor any Controlled Entity (i) is under investigation by any Governmental Authority for, or has been charged, with, or convicted of, money laundering, drug trafficking, terrorist-related activities or other money laundering predicate crimes under any applicable law (collectively, ""), (ii) has been assessed civil penalties under any Anti-Money Laundering Laws or (iii) has had any of its funds seized or forfeited in an action under any Anti-Money Laundering Laws. The Company has taken reasonable measures appropriate to the circumstances (in any event in all material respects as required by applicable law) to ensure to the extent necessary that the Company and each Controlled Entity is and will continue to be in compliance in all material respects with all applicable current and future Anti-Money Laundering Laws.
Anti-Money Laundering Laws
(d) No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for any improper payments to any governmental official or employee, political party, official of a political party, candidate for political office, official of any public international organization or anyone else acting in an official capacity, in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper advantage in violation of applicable law. The Company has taken reasonable measures appropriate to the circumstances (in any event in all material respects as required by applicable law) to the extent necessary to ensure that the Company and each Controlled Entity is and will continue to be in compliance in all material respects with all applicable current and future anti-corruption laws and regulations.
 
Table of Contents
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is subject to regulation under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, the ICC Termination Act of 1995, as amended, or the Federal Power Act, as amended.
Section 5.17 Status under Certain Statutes
. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement and the Notes rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured Senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of the Company, including, without limitation, all senior unsecured Indebtedness of the Company described in hereto.
Section 5.18 Notes Rank Pari Passu
pari passu
Schedule 5.15(a)
. (a) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any claim or has received any notice of any claim, and no proceeding has been instituted raising any claim against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or other assets, alleging any damage to the environment or violation of any Environmental Laws, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.19 Environmental Matters
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any facts which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any claim, public or private, of violation of Environmental Laws or damage to the environment emanating from, occurring on or in any way related to real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or to other assets or their use, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has stored any Hazardous Materials on real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or has disposed of any Hazardous Materials in a manner contrary to any Environmental Laws, in each case in any manner that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(d) All buildings on all real properties now owned, leased or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary are in compliance with applicable Environmental Laws, except where failure to comply could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 6. Representations of the Purchasers.
. Each Purchaser severally represents that (a) it is purchasing the Notes for its own account or for one or more separate accounts maintained by such Purchaser or for the account of one or more pension or trust funds and not with a view to the distribution thereof; that the disposition of such Purchaser's or their property shall at all times be within such Purchaser's or such pension or trust fund's control and (b) is an "Accredited Investor" as defined in Regulation D of the Securities Act and an experienced and sophisticated investor with such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters as is necessary to evaluate the merits and risks of an investment in the Notes. Each Purchaser
Section 6.1 Purchase for Investment
provided
 
Table of Contents
understands that the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and may be resold only if registered pursuant to the provisions of the Securities Act or if an exemption from registration is available, except under circumstances where neither such registration nor such an exemption is required by law, and that neither the Company nor any Obligor is required to register the Notes.
. Each Purchaser severally represents that at least one of the following statements is an accurate representation as to each source of funds (a ) to be used by such Purchaser to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser hereunder:
Section 6.2 Source of Funds
"Source"
(a) the Source is an "insurance company general account" (as the term is defined in the United States Department of Labor's Prohibited Transaction Exemption () 95-60) in respect of which the reserves and liabilities (as defined by the annual statement for life insurance companies approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (the ")) for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any employee benefit plan together with the amount of the reserves and liabilities for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any other employee benefit plans maintained by the same employer (or affiliate thereof as defined in PTE 95-60) or by the same employee organization in the general account do not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total reserves and liabilities of the general account (exclusive of separate account liabilities) plus surplus as set forth in the NAIC Annual Statement filed with such Purchaser's state of domicile; or
"PTE"
NAIC Annual Statement"
(b) the Source is a separate account that is maintained solely in connection with such Purchaser's fixed contractual obligations under which the amounts payable, or credited, to any employee benefit plan (or its related trust) that has any interest in such separate account (or to any participant or beneficiary of such plan (including any annuitant)) are not affected in any manner by the investment performance of the separate account; or
(c) the Source is either (i) an insurance company pooled separate account, within the meaning of PTE 90-1, or (ii) a bank collective investment fund, within the meaning of the PTE 91-38 and, except as have been disclosed by such Purchaser to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (c), no employee benefit plan or group of plans maintained by the same employer or employee organization beneficially owns more than 10% of all assets allocated to such pooled separate account or collective investment fund; or
(d) the Source constitutes assets of an "investment fund" (within the meaning of Part VI of the QPAM Exemption) managed by a "qualified professional asset manager" or "QPAM" (within the meaning of Part VI of the QPAM Exemption), no employee benefit plan's assets that are included in such investment fund, when combined with the assets of all other employee benefit plans established or maintained by the same employer or by an affiliate (within the meaning of Section VI(c)(1) of the QPAM Exemption) of such employer or by the same employee organization and managed by such QPAM exceed 20% of the total client assets managed by such QPAM; the conditions of Part I(c) and (g) of the QPAM Exemption are satisfied; as of the last day of
 
Table of Contents
its most recent calendar quarter, the QPAM does not own a 10% or more interest in the Company and no Person controlling or controlled by the QPAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section VI(e) of the QPAM Exemption) owns a 20% or more interest in the Company (or less than 20% but greater than 10%, if such person exercises control over the management or policies of the Company by reason of its ownership interest); and (i) the identity of such QPAM and (ii) the names of all employee benefit plans whose assets are included in such investment fund have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (d); or
(e) the Source constitutes assets of a "plan(s)" (within the meaning of Section IV of PTE 96-23 (the )) managed by an "in-house asset manager" or "INHAM" (within the meaning of Part IV of the INHAM Exemption), the conditions of Part I(a), (g) and (h) of the INHAM Exemption are satisfied, neither the INHAM nor a Person controlling or controlled by the INHAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section IV(d) of the INHAM Exemption) owns a 5% or more interest in the Company and (i) the identity of such INHAM and (ii) the name(s) of the employee benefit plan(s) whose assets constitute the Source have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (e); or
"INHAM Exemption"
(f) the Source is a governmental plan; or
(g) the Source is one or more employee benefit plans, or a separate account or trust fund comprised of one or more employee benefit plans, each of which has been identified to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (g); or
(h) the Source does not include assets of any employee benefit plan, other than a plan exempt from the coverage of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code.
As used in this , the terms "employee benefit plan", "governmental plan", "party in interest" and "separate account" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in section 3 of ERISA.
Section 6.2
SECTION 7. Information as to the Company.
. The Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.1 Financial and Business Information
(a)  within 60 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each quarterly fiscal period in each fiscal year of the Company (other than the last quarterly fiscal period of each such fiscal year), duplicate copies of:
Quarterly Statements
"Form 10-Q"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at the end of such quarter (compared to the previous fiscal year end), and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such quarter and (in the case of the second and third quarters) for the portion of the fiscal year ending with such quarter (compared to the corresponding periods in the previous fiscal year),
 
Table of Contents
all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP applicable to quarterly financial statements generally, and certified by a Senior Financial Officer as fairly presenting, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported on and their results of operations and cash flows, subject to changes resulting from year-end adjustments; that delivery within the time period specified above of copies of the Company's Form 10-Q prepared in compliance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-Q if it shall have timely made such Form 10-Q available on the SEC's "EDGAR" system (or any successor thereto) or any other publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web (at the date of this Agreement located at: http//www.ajg.com) and shall have given each holder of a Note prior notice of such availability on EDGAR (or any such successor thereto) or any other such publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web in connection with each delivery (such availability and notice thereof being referred to as );
provided
Section 7.1(a)
provided, further,
"Electronic Delivery"
(b)  within 120 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, duplicate copies of,
Annual Statements
"Form 10-K"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries, as at the end of such year, and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries, for such year,
setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP, and accompanied by an opinion thereon of independent public accountants of recognized national standing, which opinion shall state that such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported upon and their results of operations and cash flows and have been prepared in conformity with GAAP, and that the examination of such accountants in connection with such financial statements has been made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, and that such audit provides a reasonable basis for such opinion in the circumstances, that the delivery within the time period specified above of the Company's Form 10-K for such fiscal year (together with the Company's annual report to stockholders, if any, prepared pursuant to Rule 14a-3 under the Exchange Act) prepared in accordance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC, shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-K if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
provided
Section 7.1(b)
provided, further,
 
Table of Contents
(c)  promptly upon their becoming available, one copy of (i) each financial statement, report, notice or proxy statement sent by the Company or any Subsidiary to its principal lending banks as a whole (excluding information sent to such banks in the ordinary course of administration of a bank facility, such as information relating to pricing and borrowing availability or to its public securities holders generally) and (ii) each regular or periodic report, each registration statement (without exhibits except as expressly requested by such holder and excluding registration statements on Form S-8), and each prospectus and all amendments thereto (excluding those related to plans or plan interests registered on a Form S-8 registration statement) filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC and of all press releases and other statements made available generally by the Company or any Subsidiary to the public concerning developments that are Material; that with respect to any such report, registration statement or prospectus filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC, the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such report, registration statement or prospectus if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
SEC and Other Reports
provided
(d)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of the existence of any Default or Event of Default or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default hereunder or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default of the type referred to in , a written notice specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
Notice of Default or Event of Default
Section 11(f)
(e)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of any of the following, a written notice setting forth the nature thereof and the action, if any, that the Company or an ERISA Affiliate proposes to take with respect thereto:
ERISA Matters
(i) with respect to any Plan, any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA and the regulations thereunder, for which notice thereof has not been waived pursuant to such regulations as in effect on the date hereof; or
(ii) the taking by the PBGC of steps to institute, or the threatening by the PBGC of the institution of, proceedings under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Plan, or the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of a notice from a Multiemployer Plan that such action has been taken by the PBGC with respect to such Multiemployer Plan; or
(iii) any event, transaction or condition that could result in the incurrence of any liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or such penalty or excise tax provisions, if such liability or Lien,
 
Table of Contents
taken together with any other such liabilities or Liens then existing, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
(f)  promptly, and in any event within 30 days of receipt thereof, copies of any notice to any Obligor or any Subsidiary from any Federal or state Governmental Authority relating to any order, ruling, statute or other law or regulation that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
Notices from Governmental Authority
(g)  with reasonable promptness, such other data and information relating to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Obligors or any of their Subsidiaries or relating to the ability of the Obligors to perform their respective obligations hereunder and under the Notes as from time to time may be reasonably requested by any such holder of Notes.
Requested Information
. Each set of financial statements delivered to a holder of Notes pursuant to or shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer setting forth (which, in the case of Electronic Delivery of such financial statements, shall be by separate concurrent delivery of such certificate to each holder of Notes):
Section 7.2 Officer's Certificate
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
(a) the information (including detailed calculations) required in order to establish whether the Company was in compliance with the requirements of through , inclusive, during the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished (including with respect to each such Section, where applicable, the calculations of the maximum or minimum amount, ratio or percentage, as the case may be, permissible under the terms of such Sections, and the calculation of the amount, ratio or percentage then in existence) and, to the extent that the Agreement Accounting Principles applied in connection with determining compliance with the requirements of through and are not the same as the generally accepted accounting principles used in preparation of the financial statements delivered pursuant to or , a reconciliation of the consolidated financial statements for the Company and its Subsidiaries delivered pursuant to or and the financial information used to determine compliance with the requirements of through and ; and
Covenant Compliance
Sections 10.1
Section 10.3
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
Section 10.1
Section 10.4
Section 10.6
(b)  a statement that such Senior Financial Officer has reviewed the relevant terms hereof and has made, or caused to be made, under his or her supervision, a review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries from the beginning of the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished to the date of the certificate and that such review shall not have disclosed, to the best of such Senior Financial Officer's knowledge and belief, the existence during such period of any condition or event that constitutes a Default or an Event of Default or, if any such condition or event existed or exists (including, without limitation, any such event or condition resulting from the failure of the Company or any Subsidiary to comply with any Environmental Law), specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company shall have taken or proposes to take with respect thereto.
Event of Default
 
Table of Contents
. The Company shall permit the representatives of each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.3 Visitation
(a)  if no Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of such holder and upon reasonable prior notice to the Company, to visit the principal executive office of the Company, to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with the Company's Senior Financial Officers, and (with the consent of the Company, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld) to visit during normal business hours the other offices and properties of the Company and each Subsidiary, all at such reasonable times and as often as may be reasonably requested in writing; and
No Default
(b)  if a Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of the Company, to visit and inspect any of the offices or properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, to examine all their respective books of account, records, reports and other papers, to make copies and extracts therefrom, and to discuss their respective affairs, finances and accounts with their respective Senior Financial Officers and independent public accountants (and by this provision the Company authorizes said accountants to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries), all at such times and as often as may be requested, that prior to disclosure of any material non public information pursuant to this , the holders of the Notes shall, if requested by the Company, provide the Company with reasonable assurance that such disclosure will be held in confidence in accordance with the requirements of Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC, subject to the last sentence of .
Default
provided
Section 7.3
Section 20
SECTION 8. Prepayment of the Notes.
. The entire unpaid principal amount of the Series F Notes shall become due and payable on July 10, 2020.
Section 8.1
Maturity
. The Obligors may, at their option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the Notes at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, together with interest accrued thereon to the date of such prepayment, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount. If the entire principal amount of the Notes then outstanding are not being prepaid, then the Notes must be prepaid in an amount not less than 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding. The Company will give each holder of the Notes written notice of each optional prepayment under this not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment. Each such notice shall specify such date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of Notes to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each Note held by such holder to be prepaid (determined in accordance with ), and the interest to be paid on the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were
Section 8.2 Optional Prepayments with Make-Whole Amount
Section 8.2
Section 8.3
 
Table of Contents
the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such prepayment, the Company shall deliver to each holder of a Note a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified prepayment date.
. Unless the Obligors are prepaying all of the Notes, in the case of each partial prepayment of Notes pursuant to , the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid shall be allocated pro rata among all holders of the Notes at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof.
Section 8.3 Allocation of Partial Prepayments
Section 8.2
. In the case of each prepayment of Notes pursuant to this , the principal amount of each Note to be prepaid shall mature and become due and payable on the date fixed for such prepayment (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any. From and after such date, unless the Obligors shall fail to pay such principal amount when so due and payable, together with the interest and Make-Whole Amount, if any, as aforesaid, interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. Any Note paid or prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Obligor Agent and cancelled and shall not be reissued, and no Note shall be issued in lieu of any prepaid principal amount of any Note.
Section 8.4 Maturity; Surrender, Etc
Section 8
. The Company will not and will not permit any Affiliate to purchase, redeem, prepay or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, any of the outstanding Notes or any part or portion thereof except (a) upon the payment or prepayment of such Notes in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and such Notes or (b) pursuant to an offer to purchase made by the Company or an Affiliate pro rata to the holders of all Notes at the time outstanding upon the same terms and conditions. Any such offer shall provide each holder with sufficient information to enable it to make an informed decision with respect to such offer, and shall remain open for at least 15 Business Days. If the holders of more than 10% of the principal amount of the Notes then outstanding accept such offer, the Obligor Agent shall promptly notify the remaining holders of Notes of such fact and the expiration date for the acceptance by holders of such Notes of such offer shall be extended by the number of days necessary to give each such remaining holder at least 5 Business Days from its receipt of such notice to accept such offer. The Obligor Agent will promptly cancel all Notes acquired by it or any Affiliate pursuant to any payment, prepayment or purchase of Notes pursuant to any provision of this Agreement and no Notes may be issued in substitution or exchange for any such Notes.
Section 8.5 Purchase of Notes
. The term means, with respect to any Note, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such Note over the amount of such Called Principal; that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Section 8.6 Make-Whole Amount
"Make-Whole Amount"
provided
means, with respect to any Note, the principal of such Note that is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Called Principal"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
 
Table of Contents
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on such Note is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
"Discounted Value"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, 0.50% (50 basis points) over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as "Page PX1" (or such other display as may replace Page PX1) on Bloomberg Financial Markets for the most recently issued actively traded on the run U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (or any comparable successor publication) for U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. In the case of each determination under clause (i) or clause (ii), as the case may be, of the preceding paragraph, such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond-equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable Note.
"Reinvestment Yield"
means, with respect to any Called Principal of any Note, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (a) such Called Principal into (b) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (i) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (ii) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
"Remaining Average Life"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date; that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of such Note, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to or .
"Remaining Scheduled Payments"
provided
Section 8.2
12.1
 
Table of Contents
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Settlement Date"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
(a) . The Company will, within five Business Days after any Responsible Officer has knowledge of the occurrence of any Change in Control, give written notice of such Change in Control to each holder of Notes. If within 90 days after such Change in Control, the Company does not, for any reason, have an Investment Grade Rating, a "" shall be deemed to have occurred. If a Change in Control Event has occurred, the Company shall promptly give written notice thereof to the holders of Notes, and such notice shall contain and constitute an offer to prepay Notes as described in subparagraph (b) of this and shall be accompanied by the certificate described in subparagraph (e) of this .
Section 8.7 Mandatory Offer to Prepay Upon Change in Control.
Notice of Change in Control and Change in Control Event
Change in Control Event
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(b) The offer to prepay the Notes contemplated by subparagraph (a) of this shall be an offer to prepay, in accordance with and subject to this , all, but not less than all, the Notes held by each holder (in this case only, "" in respect of any Note registered in the name of a nominee for a disclosed beneficial owner shall mean such beneficial owner) on a date specified in such offer (the ""). Such date shall be a Business Day not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after the date of such offer.
Offer to Prepay Notes.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
holder
Proposed Prepayment Date
(c) A holder of Notes may accept the offer to prepay made pursuant to this by causing a written notice of such acceptance to be delivered to the Company not later than 15 days prior to the Proposed Prepayment Date. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond to the offer to prepay made pursuant to this within the specified time period shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder.
Acceptance/Rejection.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(d) Prepayment of the Notes to be prepaid pursuant to this shall be at 100% of the principal amount of such Notes, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment, but in no event with a Make-Whole Amount or other premium. The prepayment shall be made on the Proposed Prepayment Date.
Prepayment.
Section 8.7
(e) . Each offer to prepay the Notes pursuant to this shall be accompanied by a certificate, executed by a Senior Financial Officer and dated the date of such offer, specifying: (i) the Proposed Prepayment Date; (ii) that such offer is made pursuant to this ; (iii) the principal amount of each Note offered to be prepaid; (iv) the interest that would be due on each Note offered to be prepaid, accrued to the Proposed Prepayment Date; (v) that the conditions of this have been fulfilled; (vi) in reasonable detail, the nature of the Change in Control Event; and (vii) any written response from the relevant rating agency.
Officer's Certificate
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(f) shall be deemed to have occurred if any person (as such term is used in Section 13(d) and Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) or related persons constituting a group (as such term is used in Rule 13d-5 under the Exchange Act):
Certain Definitions. "Change in Control"
 
Table of Contents
(i) become the "beneficial owners" (as such term is used in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the total voting power of all classes then outstanding of the Voting Stock of the Company; or
(ii) acquire after the date of the Closing (x) the power to elect, appoint or cause the election or appointment of at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the Company, through beneficial ownership of the capital stock of the Company or otherwise, or (y) all or substantially all of the assets of the Company.
in respect of any Person means, at the time of determination, at least two of the following ratings of its senior, unsecured, non-credit enhanced, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money: (i) by Standard & Poor's Rating Services, or any successor thereof, "BBB-" or better, (ii) by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereof, "Baa3" or better, or (iii) by any other nationally recognized statistical rating agency, an equivalent or better rating.
"Investment Grade Rating"
(g) All calculations contemplated in this involving the capital stock of any Person shall be made with the assumption that all convertible Securities of such Person then outstanding and all convertible Securities issuable upon the exercise of any warrants, options and other rights outstanding at such time were converted at such time and that all options, warrants and similar rights to acquire shares of capital stock of such Person were exercised at such time.
Section 8.7
SECTION 9. Affirmative Covenants.
The Obligors, jointly and severally, covenant that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
. Without limiting , each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations to which each of them is subject, including, without limitation, ERISA, the USA Patriot Act and Environmental Laws, and will obtain and maintain in effect all licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations necessary to the ownership of their respective properties or to the conduct of their respective businesses, in each case to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations or failures to obtain or maintain in effect such licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.1 Compliance with Law
Section 10.9
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurers, insurance with respect to their respective properties and businesses against such casualties and contingencies, of such types, on such terms and in such amounts (including deductibles, co-insurance and self-insurance, if adequate reserves are maintained with respect thereto) as is customary in the case of entities of established reputations engaged in the same or a similar business and similarly situated.
Section 9.2 Insurance
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain and keep, or cause to be maintained and kept, their respective properties in good repair, working order and condition (other than ordinary wear and tear), so that the business carried on in connection therewith may be properly conducted at all times;
Section 9.3 Maintenance of Properties
 
Table of Contents
that this shall not prevent any Obligor or any Subsidiary from discontinuing the operation and the maintenance of any of its properties if such discontinuance is desirable in the conduct of its business and the Company has concluded that such discontinuance could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
provided
Section 9.3
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, file all tax returns required to be filed in any jurisdiction and to pay and discharge all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes, assessments, governmental charges, or levies imposed on them or any of their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent the same have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent and all claims for which sums have become due and payable that have or might become a Lien on properties or assets of any Obligor or any Subsidiary; that no Obligor nor any Subsidiary need pay any such tax, assessment, charge, levy or claim if (a) the amount, applicability or validity thereof is contested by such Obligor or such Subsidiary on a timely basis in good faith and in appropriate proceedings, and the Company or such Obligor or Subsidiary, as the case may be, has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Obligor or such Subsidiary or (b) the nonpayment of all such taxes, assessments, charges, levies and claims in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.4 Payment of Taxes and Claims
provided
. Subject to , the Company will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence. Subject to and , each Obligor will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and that of each of its Subsidiaries (unless merged into the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary) and all rights and franchises of such Obligor and its Subsidiaries unless, in the good faith judgment of the Company, the termination of or failure to preserve and keep in full force and effect such legal existence, right or franchise could not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.5 Legal Existence, Etc
Section 10.5
Section 10.5
Section 10.6
The Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement are and at all times shall rank at least in right of payment with all other present and future unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Obligor which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other unsecured Indebtedness of each such Obligor.
Section 9.6 Notes to Rank Pari Passu.
pari passu
. The Company:
Section 9.7 Additional Obligors; Guaranty by Subsidiaries
(a) will cause each Subsidiary which becomes a guarantor or an obligor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement after the date of Closing to concurrently enter into, in the case of a guarantor, a guaranty agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (as the same may be amended, modified, extended or renewed, the "") or, in the case of an additional obligor, a joinder agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (a ""); and
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
Subsidiary Guaranty
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
Joinder Agreement
 
Table of Contents
(b) may cause any other Subsidiary which is not an obligor or guarantor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement to enter into a Joinder Agreement;
and in any such case within three Business Days thereafter will deliver to each of the holders of the Notes the following items:
(i) an executed counterpart of, in the case of a guarantor, a Subsidiary Guaranty or, in the case of an additional obligor, a Joinder Agreement in respect of this Agreement and the Notes;
(ii) a certificate signed by the President, a Vice President or another authorized officer of such Subsidiary making representations and warranties to the effect of those contained in and , but with respect to such Subsidiary, and either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be;
Sections 5.1, 5.2, 5.6
5.7
(iii) such documents and evidence with respect to such Subsidiary as the Required Holders may reasonably request in order to establish the existence and good standing of such Subsidiary and the authorization of the transactions contemplated by either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be; and
(iv) an opinion of counsel satisfactory to the Required Holders to the effect that either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, have been duly authorized, executed and delivered and such agreement or agreements, as the case may be, constitute(s) the legal, valid and binding contract(s) and agreement(s) of such Subsidiary enforceable in accordance with its or their respective terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance, fraudulent transfer and other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors generally and by general principles of equity (whether considered in equity or at law) and will rank at all times at least in right of payment with all other unsecured and unsubordinated Indebtedness of such Subsidiary.
pari passu
(c) Promptly after each time an additional Obligor is added in respect of this Agreement and the Notes pursuant to this , the Obligor Agent shall, at its cost and expense, request in writing that each holder of a Note surrender each Note which it then holds and within twenty Business Days following the date of such request, each holder of a Note shall surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note and in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the Obligors (including such additional Obligor) reflecting the addition of any Obligor pursuant to this .
Section 9.7
Section 9.7
. The Obligors will, and will cause each of their Subsidiaries to, maintain proper books of record and account and, in the case of the Company, in conformity with GAAP and all applicable requirements of any Governmental Authority having legal or regulatory jurisdiction over the Company, or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Section 9.8 Books and Records
 
Table of Contents
SECTION 10. Negative Covenants.
The Company covenants that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of Consolidated Indebtedness as of the last day of the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended Excess Cash, as of the last day of the same such period, to EBITDA for such most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be greater than 3.25 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.1 Cash Flow Leverage Ratio.
minus
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of EBITDAR to Fixed Charges for the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be less than 1.75 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.2 Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit Consolidated Priority Indebtedness to exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Section 10.3 Limitations on Consolidated Priority Indebtedness.
The Company will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent (each of the following, a ):
Section 10.4 Limitation on Liens.
provided
"Permitted Lien"
(a) Liens for taxes, assessments, governmental charges or levies; that payment thereof is not at the time required by ;
provided
Section 9.4
(b) Liens arising under statutes or by operation of law, Liens in connection with worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, social security and other similar laws (including, without limitation, pledges or deposits securing liability to insurance carriers under insurance or self-insurance arrangements), Liens to secure the performance of bids, tenders, trade, government or other similar contracts, obligations for utilities, leases, licenses, statutory obligations, completion guarantees, surety, judgment, appeal or performance bonds, or other similar bonds, or other Liens of like general nature, in any such case incurred in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness; that (i) any such Lien secures only amounts not due and payable or the payment of which is being contested in good faith by appropriate actions or proceedings and (ii) any such Lien does not materially impair the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole or the value of the related property for the purposes of such business;
provided
(c) mechanics', workmen's, materialmen's, attorney's, landlords', carriers' or other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness and in each such case with respect to obligations which are not due or that are bonded or that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
 
Table of Contents
(d) Liens of or resulting from any court proceeding, judgment or award, (i) the time for the appeal or petition for rehearing of which shall not have expired, or (ii) in respect of which the Company or a Subsidiary shall be prosecuting an appeal or proceeding for a review and in respect of which a stay of execution pending such appeal or proceeding for review shall have been secured; that the Company or such Subsidiary (1) is contesting such proceeding, judgment or award on a timely basis, in good faith and by appropriate proceedings, and (2) has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be;
provided
(e) Liens securing Indebtedness of a Subsidiary to the Company or to another Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(f) Liens existing as of the date of the Closing and described on hereto;
Schedule 5.15(b)
(g) Liens on property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries created solely for the purpose of securing purchase money indebtedness (including in connection with the acquisition, construction or improvement of property) or Capitalized Lease Obligations and, representing or incurred to finance, refinance or refund the purchase price of property; that no such Lien shall extend to or cover other property of the Company or such Subsidiary other than the respective property so acquired, constructed or improved, and the principal amount of indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall at no time exceed the total purchase price (or cost of construction or improvement) of such property;
provided
(h) Liens existing on property of a Person at the time such Person is consolidated with or merged into the Company or a Subsidiary or becomes a Subsidiary, or any Lien existing on any property acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary at the time such property is so acquired (whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby shall have been assumed); that (i) no such Lien shall have been created or assumed in contemplation of such consolidation or merger or such Person's becoming a Subsidiary or such acquisition of property, (ii) each such Lien shall extend solely to the item or items of property so acquired and, if required by the terms of the instrument originally creating such Lien, other property which is an improvement to or is acquired for specific use in connection with such acquired property;
provided
(i) customary rights of set off, revocation, refund or chargeback under deposit agreements or under the Uniform Commercial Code in favor of banks or other financial institutions where the Company or any Subsidiary maintains deposits in the ordinary course of business;
(j) Liens constituting (i) survey restrictions, encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, condemnations, easements, encroachments, covenants, rights of way, defects, irregularities and rights or restrictions of record on the title or use of real property, and (ii) leases, subleases, licenses or sublicenses granted to others in the ordinary course of business and Liens covering property subject to any lease which was not entered into in violation of this Agreement securing the interest of the lessor or other Person under such lease, which in any such case does not materially detract from the value of the subject property or materially impair the use thereof in the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole;
 
Table of Contents
(k) any encumbrance or restriction (including, but not limited to, put and call agreements, rights of first refusal, and voting or equity holder agreements) with respect to equity or ownership interests in any joint venture or similar arrangement pursuant to any joint venture or similar agreement in any such case not entered into in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness;
(l) Liens other than those permitted by any of the foregoing subsections (a) through (k); provided that all Indebtedness secured by any such Liens, in the aggregate with all other Consolidated Priority Indebtedness at such time, does not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles; and
(m) any extension, renewal or replacement of any Lien permitted by the preceding clauses (e), (f), (g) and (h) of this Section 10.4; provided that (i) no additional property (other than improvements thereon) shall be encumbered by such Liens, (ii) the unpaid principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not be increased on or after the date of such extension, renewal or replacement and (iii) at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default would exist, including, without limitation, under Sections 10.1, 10.2 and 10.3, with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the extension, renewal or replacement of such Lien.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Company covenants that it will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary to secure any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary under the Bank Credit Agreement unless the Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and of the Subsidiary Guarantors under any Subsidiary Guaranty, as applicable, are secured on a pari passu basis by a lien on such property pursuant to documentation, including an intercreditor agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders.
The Company will not consolidate with or merge with any other Person or convey, transfer, sell or lease all or substantially all of its assets in a single transaction or series of transactions to any Person unless:
Section 10.5 Mergers, Consolidations, Etc
.
(a) the successor formed by such consolidation or the survivor of such merger or the Person that acquires by conveyance, transfer, sale or lease all or substantially all of the assets of the Company as an entirety, as the case may be, is a solvent corporation or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the United States or any state thereof (including the District of Columbia), and, if the Company is not such successor or survivor, such successor or survivor (i) shall have executed and delivered to each holder of any Notes its assumption of the due and punctual performance and
 
Table of Contents
observance of each covenant and condition of this Agreement and the Notes and (ii) shall have caused to be delivered to each holder of any Notes an opinion of nationally recognized independent counsel or other independent counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders, to the effect that all agreements or instruments effecting such assumption are enforceable in accordance with their terms and comply with the terms hereof;
(b) each Subsidiary Guarantor and each Obligor (other than the Company) shall have affirmed in writing its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be (unless and to the extent any such Subsidiary Guaranty or the obligations of any such Obligor, as the case may be, have been discharged or released as expressly permitted by or otherwise in accordance with the terms of this Agreement); and
Section 2.2(a)
(c) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such transaction.
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
Except as permitted by , the Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of, including by way of merger (collectively a ), any assets, including capital stock of Subsidiaries, in one or a series of transactions, to any Person, other than:
Section 10.6 Sale of Assets.
Section 10.5
"Disposition"
(a) Dispositions in the ordinary course of business;
(b) Dispositions by a Subsidiary to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary or by the Company to a Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(c) Dispositions of the Company's interest in Chem-Mod LLC, Chem-Mod International LLC, C-Quest Technologies LLC or C-Quest Technologies International LLC; or
(d) Dispositions not otherwise permitted bythrough, inclusive, provided that:
Sections 10.6(a)
10.6(c)
(i) in the good faith opinion of the Company, the Disposition is in exchange for consideration having a fair market value at least equal to that of the property exchanged and is in the best interest of the Company or such Subsidiary;
(ii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such Disposition; and
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
 
Table of Contents
(iii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, the aggregate net book value of all assets that were the subject of any Disposition occurring in the then current fiscal year would not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Assets as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal year of the Company, calculated in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may, or may permit a Subsidiary to, make a Disposition and the assets subject to such Disposition shall not be subject to or included in the foregoing limitation and computation contained in clause (iii) of the preceding sentence if, within 365 days of such Disposition:
(1) the net proceeds from such Disposition are reinvested in productive assets to be used in the existing business of the Company or a Subsidiary; or
(2) the net proceeds from such Disposition are applied to the payment or prepayment of the Notes or any other outstanding Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary ranking with or senior to the Notes (other than Indebtedness of the Company owing to a Subsidiary or an Affiliate or Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or an Affiliate).
pari passu
For purposes of foregoing clause (2), the Obligors shall offer to prepay (on a Business Day not less than 30 or more than 60 days following such offer) the Notes on a pro rata basis with any such other Indebtedness that the Company elects to include in such offer at a price of 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment (but in no event with a Make Whole Amount or other premium); provided that if any holder of the Notes declines or rejects such offer, the net proceeds that would have been paid to such holder may be used by the Company for general corporate purposes. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond in writing not later than fifteen Business Days prior to the proposed prepayment date to an offer to prepay made pursuant to this shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder. To the extent that any holder of the Notes rejects or is deemed to have rejected such offer of prepayment, the Company may use the aggregate amount of such prepayments so rejected for general corporate purposes.
Section 10.6
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to enter into directly or indirectly any Material transaction or Material group of related transactions (including without limitation the purchase, lease, sale or exchange of properties of any kind or the rendering of any service) with any Affiliate (other than the Company or another Subsidiary), except upon terms and conditions which are no less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than would be obtainable in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person not an Affiliate and except for benefit and compensation plans and arrangements approved by the Board of Directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any such Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary.
Section 10.7 Transactions with Affiliates
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to engage in any business if, as a result, the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, would then be engaged would be substantially changed from the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, are engaged on the date of this Agreement.
Section 10.8 Line of Business
 
Table of Contents
. The Company covenants that it will not and will not permit any Controlled Entity to (a) become a Blocked Person or (b) knowingly have any investments in or engage in any dealings or transactions with any Blocked Person if such investments, dealings or transactions would cause any holder of a Note to be in violation of any laws or regulations that are applicable to such holder.
Section 10.9 Terrorism Sanctions Regulations
SECTION 11. Events of Default.
An shall exist if any of the following conditions or events shall occur and be continuing:
"Event of Default"
(a) the Obligors default in the payment of any principal or Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Note when the same becomes due and payable, whether at maturity or at a date fixed for prepayment or by declaration or otherwise; or
(b) the Obligors default in the payment of any interest on any Note for more than five Business Days after the same becomes due and payable; or
(c) the Company defaults in the performance of or compliance with any term contained in or or; or
Section 7.1(d)
Sections 10.1, 10.2
10.3
(d) the Obligors default in the performance of or compliance with any term contained herein (other than those referred to in , and ) and such default is not remedied within 45 days after the earlier of (i) a Responsible Officer obtaining actual knowledge of such default and (ii) the Company receiving written notice of such default from any holder of a Note (any such written notice to be identified as a "notice of default" and to refer specifically to this ); or
Sections 11(a)
(b) 
(c)
Section 11(d)
(e) (i) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of the Company or by any officer of the Company in this Agreement or in any writing furnished by the Company pursuant to this Agreement, proves to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made, (ii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of an Obligor (other than the Company) or by any officer of an Obligor (other than the Company) in this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement or in any writing furnished by an Obligor (other than the Company) pursuant to this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or (iii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of a Subsidiary Guarantor or by any officer of a Subsidiary Guarantor in any Subsidiary Guaranty or in any writing furnished by a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to any Subsidiary Guaranty, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
 
Table of Contents
(f) (i) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default (as principal or as guarantor or other surety) in the payment of any principal of or premium or make-whole amount or interest on any Indebtedness that is outstanding in an aggregate principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets beyond any period of grace provided with respect thereto, or (ii) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default in the performance of or compliance with any term of any evidence of any Indebtedness in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets or of any mortgage, indenture or other agreement relating thereto or any other condition exists, and as a consequence of such default or condition such Indebtedness has become, or has been declared, due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment, or (iii) as a consequence of the occurrence or continuation of any event or condition (other than the passage of time or the right of the holder of Indebtedness to convert such Indebtedness into equity interests), the Company or any Subsidiary has become obligated to purchase or repay Indebtedness before its regular maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets; or
(g) any Obligor or any Material Subsidiary (i) is generally not paying, or admits in writing its inability to pay, its debts as they become due, (ii) files, or consents by answer or otherwise to the filing against it of, a petition for relief or reorganization or arrangement or any other petition in bankruptcy, for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar law of any jurisdiction, (iii) makes an assignment of any substantial part of its property for the benefit of its creditors, (iv) consents to the appointment of a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, (v) is finally adjudicated as insolvent or to be liquidated, or (vi) takes corporate action for the purpose of any of the foregoing; or
(h) a court or Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction enters an order appointing, without consent by any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, or constituting an order for relief or approving a petition for relief or reorganization or any other petition in bankruptcy or for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy or insolvency law of any jurisdiction, or ordering the dissolution, winding-up or liquidation of any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, or any such petition shall be filed against any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries and such petition shall not be dismissed within 60 days; or
(i) a final judgment or judgments for the payment of money aggregating in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets (excluding for purposes of such determination such amount of any insurance proceeds paid by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of such judgment or judgments or unconditionally acknowledged in writing to be payable by the insurance carrier that issued the related insurance policy) are rendered against one or more of the Company and its Subsidiaries and which judgments are not, within 60 days after entry thereof, bonded, discharged or stayed pending appeal, or are not discharged within 60 days after the expiration of such stay; or
 
Table of Contents
(j) if (i) any Plan shall fail to satisfy the minimum funding standards of ERISA or the Code for any plan year or part thereof or a waiver of such standards or extension of any amortization period is sought or granted under section 412 or 430 of the Code, (ii) a notice of intent to terminate any Plan shall have been or is reasonably expected within the immediately following two-month period, to be filed with the PBGC or the PBGC shall have instituted proceedings under ERISA Section 4042 to terminate or appoint a trustee to administer any Plan or the PBGC shall have notified the Company or any ERISA Affiliate that a Plan may become a subject of any such proceedings, (iii) the aggregate "amount of unfunded benefit liabilities" (within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(18) of ERISA) under all Plans, determined in accordance with Title IV of ERISA, shall exceed the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets, (iv) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate shall have incurred or is reasonably expected to incur any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, (v) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate withdraws from any Multiemployer Plan, or (vi) the Company or any Subsidiary establishes or amends any employee welfare benefit plan that provides post-employment welfare benefits in a manner that would increase the liability of the Company or any Subsidiary thereunder; and any such event or events described in clauses (i) through (vi) above, either individually or together with any other such event or events, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(k) any Subsidiary Guaranty (once in full force and effect) shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such Subsidiary Guaranty is invalid, void or unenforceable or any Subsidiary Guarantor which is a party to such Subsidiary Guaranty shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under such Subsidiary Guaranty, but excluding any Subsidiary Guaranty which ceases to be in full force and effect in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement; or
Section 2.2
(l) the obligations of any Obligor shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such obligations are invalid, void or unenforceable or any Obligor shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under this Agreement or the Notes, but excluding any Obligor which is released in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 2.2
As used in , the terms "employee benefit plan" and "employee welfare benefit plan" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in Section 3 of ERISA.
Section 11(j)
SECTION 12. Remedies on Default, Etc.
. (a) If an Event of Default with respect to an Obligor described in or  (other than an Event of Default described in clause (i) of or described in clause (vi) of by virtue of the fact that such clause encompasses clause (i) of ) has occurred, all the Notes then outstanding shall automatically become immediately due and payable.
Section 12.1 Acceleration
Section 11(g)
(h)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
 
Table of Contents
(b) If any other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Required Holders may at any time at their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes then outstanding to be immediately due and payable.
(c) If any Event of Default described in or has occurred and is continuing, any holder or holders of Notes at the time outstanding affected by such Event of Default may at any time, at its or their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes held by it or them to be immediately due and payable.
Section 11(a) 
(b)
Upon any Note becoming due and payable under this , whether automatically or by declaration, such Note will forthwith mature and the entire unpaid principal amount of such Note, plus (i) all accrued and unpaid interest thereon (including, but not limited to, interest accrued thereon at the Default Rate) and (ii) the Make-Whole Amount determined in respect of such principal amount (to the full extent permitted by applicable law), shall all be immediately due and payable, in each and every case without presentment, demand, protest or further notice, all of which are hereby waived. Each Obligor acknowledges, and the parties hereto agree, that each holder of a Note has the right to maintain its investment in the Notes free from repayment by any Obligor or Obligors (except as herein specifically provided for), and that the provision for payment of a Make-Whole Amount by the Obligors in the event that any Notes are prepaid or are accelerated as a result of an Event of Default, is intended to provide compensation for the deprivation of such right under such circumstances.
Section 12.1
. If any Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, and irrespective of whether any Notes have become or have been declared immediately due and payable under , the holder of any Note at the time outstanding may proceed to protect and enforce the rights of such holder by an action at law, suit in equity or other appropriate proceeding, whether for the specific performance of any agreement contained herein or in any Note, or for an injunction against a violation of any of the terms hereof or thereof, or in aid of the exercise of any power granted hereby or thereby or by law or otherwise.
Section 12.2 Other Remedies
Section 12.1
. At any time after any Notes have been declared due and payable pursuant to or , the Required Holders, by written notice to the Company, may rescind and annul any such declaration and its consequences if (a) the Obligors have paid all overdue interest on such Notes, all principal of and Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Notes that are due and payable and are unpaid other than by reason of such declaration, and all interest on such overdue principal and Make-Whole Amount, if any, and (to the extent permitted by applicable law) any overdue interest in respect of such Notes, at the Default Rate, (b) the Obligors shall not have paid any amounts which have become due solely by reason of such declaration, (c) all Events of Default and Defaults, other than non-payment of amounts that have become due solely by reason of such declaration, have been cured or have been waived pursuant to , and (d) no judgment or decree has been entered for the payment of any monies due pursuant hereto or to such Notes. No rescission and annulment under this will extend to or affect any subsequent Event of Default or Default or impair any right consequent thereon.
Section 12.3 Rescission
Section 12.1(b)
(c)
Section 17
Section 12.3
 
Table of Contents
. No course of dealing and no delay on the part of any holder of any Note in exercising any right, power or remedy shall operate as a waiver thereof or otherwise prejudice such holder's rights, powers or remedies. No right, power or remedy conferred by this Agreement or by any Note upon any holder thereof shall be exclusive of any other right, power or remedy referred to herein or therein or now or hereafter available at law, in equity, by statute or otherwise. Without limiting the obligations of the Obligors under , the Obligors will pay to the holder of each Note on demand such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover all costs and expenses of such holder incurred in any enforcement or collection under this , including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees, expenses and disbursements.
Section 12.4 No Waivers or Election of Remedies, Expenses, Etc
Section 15
Section 12
SECTION 13. Registration; Exchange; Substitution of Notes
. The Obligor Agent shall keep at its principal executive office a register for the registration and registration of transfers of Notes. The name and address of each holder of one or more Notes, each transfer thereof and the name and address of each transferee of one or more Notes shall be registered in such register. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Person in whose name any Note shall be registered shall be deemed and treated as the owner and holder thereof for all purposes hereof, and the Obligor Agent shall not be affected by any notice or knowledge to the contrary. The Obligor Agent shall give to any holder of a Note that is an Institutional Investor promptly upon request therefor, a complete and correct copy of the names and addresses of all registered holders of Notes.
Section 13.1 Registration of Notes
. Upon surrender of any Note to the Obligor Agent at the address of the Company and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in for registration of transfer or exchange (and in the case of a surrender for registration of transfer accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed by the registered holder of such Note or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing and accompanied by the relevant name, address and other information for notices of each transferee of such Note or part thereof), within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, execute and deliver, at the Obligors' expense (except as provided below), one or more new Notes (as requested by the holder thereof) in exchange therefor and in an aggregate principal amount equal to the unpaid principal amount of the surrendered Note. Each such new Note shall be payable to such Person as such holder may request and shall be substantially in the form of , as applicable. Each such new Note shall be dated and bear interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on the surrendered Note or dated the date of the surrendered Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon. The Obligor Agent may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any stamp tax or governmental charge imposed in respect of any such transfer of Notes. Notes shall not be transferred in denominations of less than $100,000; that if necessary to enable the registration of transfer by a holder of its entire holding of Notes, one Note may be in a denomination of less than $100,000. Any transferee, by its acceptance of a Note registered in its name (or the name of its nominee), shall be deemed to have made the representations set forth in and with respect to the Notes and, in addition, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption.The Obligors shall not, however, be required to register any transfer of a Note if, acting in its reasonable discretion, the Obligor Agent believes such transfer is in violation of applicable law or the representations of the transferee set forth in and are not true and correct.
Section 13.2 Transfer and Exchange of Notes
Section 18(iii))
Exhibit 1(a) or Exhibit 1(b)
provided
Section 6.1
Section 6.2
Sections 6.1
6.2
 
Table of Contents
. Upon receipt by the Obligor Agent at the address and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in ) of evidence reasonably satisfactory to it of the ownership of and the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any Note (which evidence shall be, in the case of an Institutional Investor, notice from such Institutional Investor of such ownership and such loss, theft, destruction or mutilation), and
Section 13.3 Replacement of Notes
Section 18(iii)
(a) in the case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it ( that if the holder of such Note is, or is a nominee for, an original Purchaser or another holder of a Note with a minimum net worth of at least $50,000,000 or a Qualified Institutional Buyer, such Person's own unsecured agreement of indemnity shall be deemed to be satisfactory), or
provided
(b) in the case of mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation thereof,
within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, at their own expense, execute and deliver, in lieu thereof, a new Note, dated and bearing interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note or dated the date of such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon.
SECTION 14. Payments on Notes.
. Subject to , payments of principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest becoming due and payable on the Notes shall be made in Itasca, Illinois at the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction. The Company may at any time, by notice to each holder of a Note, change the place of payment of the Notes so long as such place of payment shall be either the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction or the principal office of a bank or trust company in Chicago, Illinois.
Section 14.1 Place of Payment
Section 14.2
. So long as any Purchaser or its nominee shall be the holder of any Note, and notwithstanding anything contained in or in such Note to the contrary, the Obligors will pay all sums becoming due on such Note for principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest by the method and at the address specified for such purpose below such Purchaser's name in , or by such other method or at such other address as such Purchaser shall have from time to time specified to the Company in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of such Note or the making of any notation thereon, except that upon written request of the Company made concurrently with or reasonably promptly after payment or prepayment in full of any Note, such Purchaser shall surrender such Note for cancellation, reasonably promptly after any such request, to the Obligor Agent at the Company's principal executive office or at the place of payment most recently designated by the Company pursuant to . Prior to any sale or other disposition of any Note held by a Purchaser or its nominee, such Purchaser will, at its election, either endorse thereon the amount of principal paid thereon and the last date to which interest has been paid thereon or surrender such Note to the Obligor Agent in exchange for a new Note or Notes pursuant to .
Section 14.2 Home Office Payment
Section 14.1
Schedule A
Section 14.1
Section 13.2
 
Table of Contents
The Obligors will afford the benefits of this to any Institutional Investor that is the direct or indirect transferee of any Note purchased by a Purchaser under this Agreement and that has made the same agreement relating to such Note as the Purchasers have made in this .
Section 14.2
Section 14.2
SECTION 15. Expenses, Etc.
. Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby are consummated, the Obligors will pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees of a special counsel and, if reasonably required by the Required Holders, local or other counsel) incurred by the Purchasers and each other holder of a Note in connection with such transactions and in connection with any amendments, waivers or consents under or in respect of this Agreement, any Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty (whether or not such amendment, waiver or consent becomes effective), including, without limitation: (a) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in enforcing or defending (or determining whether or how to enforce or defend) any rights under this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty or in responding to any subpoena or other legal process or informal investigative demand issued in connection with this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty, or by reason of being a holder of any Note, (b) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the insolvency or bankruptcy of any Obligor or any Subsidiary or in connection with any work-out or restructuring of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the Notes, and (c) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the delivery of any Subsidiary Guaranty or Joinder Agreement as contemplated by . The Obligors will pay, and will save each Purchaser and each other holder of a Note harmless from, all claims in respect of any fees, costs or expenses, if any, of brokers and finders (other than those, if any, retained by a Purchaser or other holder in connection with its purchase of any Notes).
Section 15.1 Transaction Expenses
Section 9.7
. The obligations of the Obligors under this will survive the payment or transfer of any Note, the enforcement, amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any Notes, and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 15.2 Survival
Section 15
SECTION 16. Survival of Representations and Warranties; Entire Agreement.
All representations and warranties contained herein shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Notes, the purchase or transfer by any Purchaser of any Note or portion thereof or interest therein and the payment of any Note, and may be relied upon by any Obligor and any subsequent holder of a Note, regardless of any investigation made at any time by or on behalf of such Purchaser or any other holder of a Note. All statements contained in any certificate or other instrument delivered by or on behalf of any Obligor pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed representations and warranties of the Obligors under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement and the Notes embody the entire agreement and understanding between each Purchaser and the Obligors and supersede all prior agreements and understandings (written or oral) relating to the subject matter hereof.
 
Table of Contents
SECTION 17. Amendment and Waiver.
. This Agreement, the Notes, any Joinder Agreement and any Subsidiary Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof or of any Joinder Agreement, Subsidiary Guaranty or the Notes may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively and for a specified time period or permanently), with (and only with) the written consent of the Obligors and the Required Holders, except that (a) no amendment or waiver of any of the provisions of or hereof, or any defined term (as it is used therein), will be effective as to any Purchaser unless consented to by such Purchaser in writing, and (b) no such amendment or waiver may, without the written consent of the holder of each Note at the time outstanding affected thereby, (i) subject to the provisions of relating to acceleration or rescission, change the amount or time of any prepayment or payment of principal of, or reduce the rate or change the time of payment or method of computation of interest or of the Make-Whole Amount on, the Notes, (ii) change the percentage of the principal amount of the Notes the holders of which are required to consent to any such amendment or waiver, or (iii) amend any of or .
Section 17.1 Requirements
Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
21
Section 12
Section 8, 11(a), 11(b), 12, 17
20
.
Section 17.2 Solicitation of Holders of Notes
(a) . The Company will provide each holder of the Notes (irrespective of the amount then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof, of the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement. The Company will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this to each holder of outstanding Notes promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the requisite holders of Notes as specified in .
Solicitation
Section 17
Section 17.1
(b) . None of the Obligors will directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, or grant any security or provide other credit support, to any holder of Notes as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any holder of Notes of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof or of any Note or any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted or other credit support concurrently provided, on the same terms, ratably to each holder of Notes then outstanding even if such holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
Payment
(c) Any consent made pursuant to this by the holder of any Note that has transferred or has agreed to transfer such Note to any of the Obligors, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate of the Obligors and has provided or has agreed to provide such written consent as a condition to such transfer, shall be void and of no force except solely as to such holder, and any amendments effected or to be effected or granted that would not have been or would not be so effected or granted but for such consents or waivers granted (and the consents of all other holders of Notes that were acquired under the same or similar conditions) shall be void and of no force except solely as to such transferring holder.
Consent in Contemplation of Transfer.
Section 17.2
. Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all holders of Notes and is binding upon them and upon each future holder of any Note and upon the Obligors without regard to whether such Note has been marked to indicate such amendment or waiver. No such amendment or waiver will
Section 17.3 Binding Effect, Etc
Section 17
 
Table of Contents
extend to or affect any obligation, covenant, agreement, Default or Event of Default not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Obligors and the holder of any Note nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder, under any Note or under any Subsidiary Guaranty shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any holder of such Note. As used herein, the term "this Agreement" and references thereto shall mean this Agreement as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
. Solely for the purpose of determining whether the holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Agreement, the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement, or have directed the taking of any action provided herein, in the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement to be taken upon the direction of the holders of a specified percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Obligor or any of its Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
Section 17.4 Notes Held by the Obligors, Etc
SECTION 18. Notices.
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(i) if to any Purchaser or its nominee, to such Purchaser or nominee at the address specified for such communications in , or at such other address as such Purchaser or nominee shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing,
Schedule A
(ii) if to any other holder of any Note, to such holder at such address as such other holder shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing, or
(iii) if to any of the Obligors, c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning hereof to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as the Company shall have specified to the holder of each Note in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 18
SECTION 19. Reproduction of Documents.
This Agreement or any Subsidiary Guaranty and all documents relating thereto, including, without limitation, (a) consents, waivers and modifications that may hereafter be executed, (b) documents received by any Purchaser at the Closing (except the Notes themselves), and (c) financial statements, certificates and other information previously or hereafter furnished to any Purchaser, may be reproduced by such Purchaser by any photographic, photostatic, electronic, digital or other similar process and such Purchaser may destroy any original document so reproduced. Each Obligor agrees and stipulates that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, any such reproduction shall be admissible in evidence as the original itself in any judicial or administrative proceeding (whether or not the original is in existence and whether or
 
Table of Contents
not such reproduction was made by such Purchaser in the regular course of business) and any enlargement, facsimile or further reproduction of such reproduction shall likewise be admissible in evidence. This shall not prohibit the Obligors or any other holder of Notes from contesting any such reproduction to the same extent that it could contest the original, or from introducing evidence to demonstrate the inaccuracy of any such reproduction.
Section 19
SECTION 20. Confidential Information.
For the purposes of this , means information delivered to any Purchaser by or on behalf of any Obligor or any Subsidiary in connection with the transactions contemplated by or otherwise pursuant to this Agreement and not previously disclosed in any filings by the Company with the SEC; that such term does not include information that (a) was publicly known or otherwise known to such Purchaser prior to the time of such disclosure, (b) subsequently becomes publicly known through no act or omission by such Purchaser or any Person acting on such Purchaser's behalf, (c) otherwise becomes known to such Purchaser other than through disclosure by an Obligor or any Subsidiary, or is known by such Purchaser to be under an obligation not to transmit such information to such Purchaser or (d) constitutes financial statements delivered to such Purchaser under that are otherwise publicly available. Each Purchaser will maintain the confidentiality of such Confidential Information in accordance with procedures adopted by such Purchaser in good faith to protect confidential information of third parties delivered to such Purchaser; that such Purchaser may deliver or disclose Confidential Information to (i) its directors, trustees, officers, employees, agents, attorneys and Affiliates (to the extent such disclosure reasonably relates to the administration of the investment represented by its Notes), (ii) its financial advisors and other professional advisors who agree to hold confidential the Confidential Information substantially in accordance with the terms of this , (iii) any other holder of any Note, (iv) any Institutional Investor to which it sells or offers to sell such Note or any part thereof or any participation therein (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (v) any Person from which it offers to purchase any security of an Obligor (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (vi) any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over such Purchaser, (vii) the NAIC or the SVO or, in each case, any similar organization, or any nationally recognized rating agency that requires access to information about such Purchaser's investment portfolio or (viii) any other Person to which such delivery or disclosure may be necessary or appropriate (w) to effect compliance with any law, rule, regulation or order applicable to such Purchaser, (x) in response to any subpoena or other legal process, (y) in connection with any litigation to which such Purchaser is a party or (z) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, to the extent such Purchaser may reasonably determine such delivery and disclosure to be necessary or appropriate in the enforcement or for the protection of the rights and remedies under such Purchaser's Notes and this Agreement. Each holder of a Note, by its acceptance of a Note, will be deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to be entitled to the benefits of this as though it were a party to this Agreement. On reasonable request by the Company in connection with the delivery to any holder of a Note of information required to be delivered to such holder under this Agreement or requested by such holder (other than a holder that is a party to this Agreement or its nominee), such holder will, as a condition precedent to receiving such information, enter into an agreement with the Company embodying the provisions of this and providing the Company assurances that such holder will enter into further agreements with language no more burdensome on the holder than the language contained in this as reasonably requested by the Company in order to comply with Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC. The Obligors shall reimburse such holder's reasonable expenses incurred in connection with entering into any such agreement.
Section 20
"Confidential Information"
provided
Section 7.1
provided
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
 
Table of Contents
SECTION 21. Substitution of Purchaser.
Each Purchaser shall have the right to substitute any one of its Affiliates as the purchaser of the Notes that it has agreed to purchase hereunder, by written notice to the Obligors, which notice shall be signed by both such Purchaser and such Affiliate, shall contain such Affiliate's agreement to be bound by this Agreement and shall contain a confirmation by such Affiliate of the accuracy with respect to it of the representations set forth in . Upon receipt of such notice, any reference to such Purchaser in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall be deemed to refer to such Affiliate in lieu of such original Purchaser. In the event that such Affiliate is so substituted as a Purchaser hereunder and such Affiliate thereafter transfers to such original Purchaser all of the Notes then held by such Affiliate, upon receipt by the Company of notice of such transfer, any reference to such Affiliate as a "Purchaser" in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall no longer be deemed to refer to such Affiliate, but shall refer to such original Purchaser, and such original Purchaser shall again have all the rights of an original holder of the Notes under this Agreement.
Section 6
Section 21
Section 21
SECTION 22. Miscellaneous.
. All covenants and other agreements contained in this Agreement by or on behalf of any of the parties hereto bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns (including, without limitation, any subsequent holder of a Note) whether so expressed or not.
Section 22.1 Successors and Assigns
. Anything in this Agreement or the Notes to the contrary notwithstanding (but without limiting the requirement in that the notice of any optional prepayment specify a Business Day as the date fixed for such prepayment), any payment of principal of or Make-Whole Amount or interest on any Note that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; that if the maturity date of any Note is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
Section 22.2 Payments Due on Non-Business Days
Section 8.4
provided
. All accounting terms used herein which are not expressly defined in this Agreement have the meanings respectively given to them in accordance with GAAP. Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, any calculation required by, or for purposes of determining compliance with, and shall be calculated using Agreement Accounting Principles and each financial or accounting term used in each such Section shall have the meaning given to them in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of December 31, 2010 applied on a consistent basis with that used
Section 22.3 Accounting Terms
Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4
10.6
 
Table of Contents
in preparation of the most recent audited consolidated financial statements listed in (whether, in the case of capitalized terms defined in this Agreement, the definition expressly refers to Agreement Accounting Principles or not). For purposes of determining compliance with, and, any election by the Company to measure an item of Indebtedness using fair value (as permitted by Accounting Standard Codification 825-10-25, formerly known as Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 159, or any similar accounting standard) shall be disregarded and such determination shall be made as if such election had not been made.
Schedule 5.5
Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4
10.6
. Any provision of this Agreement that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.4 Severability
. Each covenant contained herein shall be construed (absent express provision to the contrary) as being independent of each other covenant contained herein, so that compliance with any one covenant shall not (absent such an express contrary provision) be deemed to excuse compliance with any other covenant. Where any provision herein refers to action to be taken by any Person, or which such Person is prohibited from taking, such provision shall be applicable whether such action is taken directly or indirectly by such Person.
Section 22.5 Construction, Etc
For the avoidance of doubt, all Schedules and Exhibits attached to this Agreement shall be deemed to be a part hereof.
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
Section 22.6 Counterparts
. This Agreement shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the parties shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinoisexcluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
Section 22.7 Governing Law
,
(a) Each Obligor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the Notes. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Obligor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
Section 22.8 Jurisdiction and Process; Waiver of Jury Trial.
 
Table of Contents
(b) Each Obligor consents to process being served by or on behalf of any holder of Notes in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in by mailing a copy thereof by registered or certified mail (or any substantially similar form of mail), postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to it at its address specified in or at such other address of which such holder shall then have been notified pursuant to said Section. Each Obligor agrees that such service upon receipt (i) shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon it in any such suit, action or proceeding and (ii) shall, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, be taken and held to be valid personal service upon and personal delivery to it. Notices hereunder shall be conclusively presumed received as evidenced by a delivery receipt furnished by the United States Postal Service or any reputable commercial delivery service.
Section 22.8(a)
Section 18
(c) Nothing in this shall affect the right of any holder of a Note to serve process in any manner permitted by law, or limit any right that the holders of any of the Notes may have to bring proceedings against an Obligor in the courts of any appropriate jurisdiction or to enforce in any lawful manner a judgment obtained in one jurisdiction in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.8
(d) T A, N .
HE
PARTIES
HERETO
HEREBY
WAIVE
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
ACTION
BROUGHT
ON
OR
WITH
RESPECT
TO
THIS
GREEMENT
THE
OTES
OR
ANY
OTHER
DOCUMENT
EXECUTED
IN
CONNECTION
HEREWITH
OR
THEREWITH
. (a) The obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and the Notes are joint and several primary obligations of each Obligor regardless of which Obligor actually receives the proceeds of any Notes or the manner in which the Obligors, any Purchaser or any holder thereof accounts for such Notes on its books and records.
Section 22.9 Nature of Obligations
(b) Each Obligor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such holder of Notes upon this Agreement (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in this Agreement or the Notes shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Agreement and the Notes);
(2) demand of payment by any holder of Notes from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any holder of Notes or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Obligor.
The obligations of each Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes and the rights of any holder of Notes to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
 
Table of Contents
(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, the obligations of the Obligors hereunder and under the Notes shall be binding upon the Obligors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due under this Agreement shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Obligors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of any Obligor or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of any Obligor to issue the Notes or any Obligor to execute and deliver this Agreement or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of any Obligor or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of any Obligor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor or any other Person; or
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of any Obligor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other , whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
force majeure
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
 
Table of Contents
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Obligor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement; or
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Obligor of failure of an Obligor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor or to any other Person or to any other Agreement or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other agreement, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor or any other Person or any release of any Obligor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Obligor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Obligor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Obligor or other Person under this Agreement or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
 
Table of Contents
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Agreement and the Notes and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Obligor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and this Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or this Agreement and that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
provided
(d) To the extent of any payments made under this Agreement, each Obligor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Obligors, but such Obligor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the holder of Notes for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Obligor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(e) Each Obligor agrees that to the extent an Obligor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Obligors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Obligors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any holder of a Note from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
(f) No holder of a Note shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Obligors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Obligors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Obligors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Obligors' burden, any right to which each Obligor hereby expressly waives.
 
Table of Contents
(g) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, including this , all obligations and liabilities of an Obligor under this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement by reason of the express provisions of of this Agreement or is otherwise released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 22.9
Section 2.2
. (a) Each Obligor (other than the Company) by its execution of this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement irrevocably appoints the Company to act on its behalf as its agent (the ) in relation to this Agreement and the Notes and irrevocably authorizes:
Section 22.10 Obligor Agent
"Obligor Agent"
(i) the Company on its behalf to supply all information concerning itself contemplated by this Agreement to the holders of a Note and to give all notices and instructions, to execute on its behalf any Joinder Agreement, to make such agreements and to effect the relevant amendments, supplements and variations capable of being given, made or effected by any Obligor notwithstanding that they may affect the Obligor, without further reference to or the consent of that Obligor; and
(ii) each holder of a Note to give any notice, demand or other communication to that Obligor pursuant to the this Agreement and the Notes to the Company,
and in each case the Obligors shall be bound as though that Obligor itself had given the notices and instructions or executed or made the agreements or effected the amendments, supplements or variations, or received the relevant notice, demand or other communication.
(b) Every act, omission, agreement, undertaking, settlement, waiver, amendment, supplement, variation, notice or other communication given or made by the Obligor Agent or given to the Obligor Agent under this Agreement and the Notes on behalf of another Obligor or in connection with this Agreement and the Notes (whether or not known to any other Obligor and whether occurring before or after such other Obligor became an Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes) shall be binding for all purposes on that Obligor as if that Obligor had expressly made, given or concurred with it. In the event of any conflict between any notices or other communications of the Obligor Agent and any other Obligor, those of the Obligor Agent shall prevail.
 
Table of Contents
If you are in agreement with the foregoing, please sign the form of agreement on a counterpart of this Agreement and return it to the Company, whereupon this Agreement shall become a binding agreement between you and the Obligors.
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank
New York, New York 10019
ABA No. 021-000-021
Credit: New York Life Insurance Company
General Account No.
with sufficient information (including issuer, PPN number, interest rate, maturity and
whether payment is of principal, premium, or interest) to identify the source and
application of such funds.
All notices of payments, written confirmations of such wire transfers and any audit
confirmation:
New York Life Insurance Company
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010-1603
:         Securities Operations
Attention
                          Private Group
                          2
nd
Floor
                          Fax #: 908-840-3385
with a copy sent electronically to:
FIIGLibrary@nylim.com
TraditionalPVtOps@nylim.com
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank
New York, New York
ABA No. 021-000-021
Credit: New York Life Insurance and Annuity Corporation
General Account No.
with sufficient information (including issuer, PPN number, interest rate, maturity and
whether payment is of principal, premium, or interest) to identify the source and
application of such funds,
All notices of payments, written confirmations of such wire transfers and any audit
confirmation:
New York Life Insurance and Annuity Corporation
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010-1603
        Securities Operation
Attention:
                         Private Group
                         2
nd
Floor
                         Fax #: 908-840-3385
with a copy sent electronically to:
FIIGLibrary@nylim.com
TraditionalPVtOps@nylim.com
Any changes in the foregoing payment instructions shall be confirmed by e-mail to
NYLIMWireConfirmation@nylim.com prior to becoming effective.
Table of Contents
New York Life Insurance and Annuity Corporation
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010-1603
        Fixed Income Investors Group
Attention:
                        Private Finance
                         2
nd
Floor
                         Fax #: (212) 447-4122
with a copy sent electronically to:
FIIGLibrary@nylim.com
TraditionalPVtOps@nylim.com
and with a copy of any notices regarding defaults or Events of
Default under the operative documents to:
        Office of General Counsel
Attention:
                        Investment Section, Room 1016
                         Fax #: (212) 576-8340
Table of Contents
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank
New York, New York
ABA No. 021-000-021
Credit: NYLIAC SEPARATE BOLI 30C
General Account No.
with sufficient information (including issuer, PPN number, interest rate, maturity and
whether payment is of principal, premium, or interest) to identify the source and application
of such funds, with advice of such payments to:
All notices of payments, written confirmations of such wire transfers and any audit
confirmation:
New York Life Insurance and Annuity Corporation
Institutionally Owned Life Insurance Separate Account
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor Room 208
New York, New York 10010-1603
        Securities Operation
Attention:
                         Private Group
                         2
nd
Floor
                         Fax #: 908-840-3385
with a copy sent electronically to:
FIIGLibrary@nylim.com
TraditionalPVtOps@nylim.com
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank
New York, New York
ABA No. 021-000-021
Credit: NYLIAC SEPARATE BOLI 3 BROAD FIXED
General Account No.
with sufficient information (including issuer, PPN number, interest rate, maturity and whether
payment is of principal, premium, or interest) to identify the source and application of such
funds,
All notices of payments, written confirmations of such wire transfers and any audit
confirmation:
New York Life Insurance and Annuity Corporation
Institutionally Owned Life Insurance Separate Account
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010-1603
:      Securities Operation
Attention
                         Private Group
                         2
nd
Floor
                         Fax #: 908-840-3385
with a copy sent electronically to:
FIIGLibrary@nylim.com
TraditionalPVtOps@nylim.com
Table of Contents
Any changes in the foregoing payment instructions shall be confirmed by e-mail to
NYLIMWireConfirmation@nylim.com prior to becoming effective.
 
New York Life Insurance and Annuity Corporation
Institutionally Owned Life Insurance Separate Account
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2nd Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010-1603
       Fixed Income Investors Group
Attention:
                         Private Finance
                         2
nd
Floor
                         Fax #: (212) 447-4122
with a copy sent electronically to:
FIIGLibrary@nylim.com
TraditionalPVtOps@nylim.com
and with a copy of any notices regarding defaults or Events of
Default under the operative documents to:
       Office of General Counsel
Attention:
                         Investment Section, Room 1016
                         Fax #: (212) 576-8340
 
and Annuity Corporation Institutionally Owned Life Insurance
Separate Account (BOLI 3)
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
As used herein, the following terms have the respective meanings set forth below or set forth in the Section hereof following such term:
means, at any time, and with respect to any Person, any other Person that at such time directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries Controls, or is Controlled by, or is under common Control with, such first Person, and with respect to the Company, shall include any Person beneficially owning or holding, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests of the Company or any Subsidiary or any corporation of which the Company and its Subsidiaries beneficially own or hold, in the aggregate, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests. As used in this definition, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise. Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to an is a reference to an Affiliate of the Company.
"Affiliate"
"Control"
"Affiliate"
"" means this Note Purchase Agreement among the Obligors and the Purchasers dated July 10, 2012.
Agreement
means generally accepted accounting principles as used in the United States in effect as of August 3, 2007 applied on a basis consistent with that used in the preparation of the audited consolidated financial statements of the Company for the year ended December 31, 2006.
"Agreement Accounting Principles"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
"AJG Brokerage"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation.
"AJG Illinois"
"Anti-Money Laundering Laws" is defined in .
Section 5.16(c)
means Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010, among the Obligors, the lenders from time to time party thereto, Bank of Montreal, as administrative agent, Bank of America, N.A., Citibank N.A. and Barclays Bank PLC, as co-syndication agents, and JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. and U.S. Bank National Association, as documentation agents, as the same may from time to time be amended, modified, supplemented, renewed, extended, refinanced or replaced.
"Bank Credit Agreement"
is defined in .
"Blocked Person"
Section 5.16(a)
means (a) for the purposes of only, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed, and (b) for the purposes of any other provision of this Agreement, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in Chicago, Illinois or New York, New York are required or authorized to be closed.
"Business Day"
Section 8.6
 
Table of Contents
means any lease of property which, in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, is required to be capitalized on the balance sheet of the lessee.
"Capital Lease"
means the amount of the liability shown on the balance sheet of any Person in respect of a Capital Lease as determined in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation"
is defined in Section 8.7(f).
"Change in Control"
"Change in Control Event" is defined in .
Section 8.7(a)
is defined in .
"Closing"
Section 3
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time.
"Code"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation, or any successor that becomes such in the manner prescribed in .
"Company"
Section 10.5
is defined in .
"Confidential Information"
Section 20
means, without duplication, all Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis eliminating intercompany items.
"Consolidated Indebtedness"
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the total stockholders' equity (including capital stock, additional paid-in capital and retained earnings after deducting treasury stock, but excluding minority interests in Subsidiaries) which would appear on the balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Net Worth"
means, without duplication, all Priority Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis eliminating inter-company items.
"Consolidated Priority Indebtedness"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, total assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Consolidated Total Assets"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, the sum of (a) Consolidated Indebtedness (b) Consolidated Net Worth.
"Consolidated Total Capitalization"
plus
means any of the Subsidiaries of the Company and any of their or the Company's respective Controlled Affiliates (but in no event shall include any shareholder of the Company). As used in this definition, "Control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise.
"Controlled Entity"
 
Table of Contents
means, with respect to the Company, all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades and businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control which, together with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
"Controlled Group"
means an event or condition the occurrence or existence of which would, with the lapse of time or the giving of notice or both, become an Event of Default.
"Default"
means, for each Note, that rate of interest stated in clause (b) of the first paragraph of such Note.
"Default Rate"
is defined in .
"Disclosure Documents"
Section 5.3
"Disposition" is defined in .
Section 10.6
means each Subsidiary of the Company which is organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
means, for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of:
"EBITDA"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
means, for any period, EBITDA , to the extent deducted in determining Net Income, Rental Expense.
"EBITDAR"
plus
is defined in .
"Electronic Delivery"
Section 7.1(a)
 
Table of Contents
means any and all Federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including but not limited to those related to Hazardous Materials.
"Environmental Laws"
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"ERISA"
means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that is treated as a single employer together with the Company under Section 414 of the Code.
"ERISA Affiliate"
is defined in .
"Event of Default"
Section 11
means, as of any date the same is to be determined, all cash on the books of the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries which is maintained in accounts located in the United States of America and which is in excess of $25,000,000, but excluding restricted cash as set forth in the financial statements of the Company delivered pursuant to .
"Excess Cash"
Section 7.1
means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Exchange Act"
means for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of Interest Expense paid or payable in cash for such period and Rental Expense for such period.
"Fixed Charges"
is defined in .
"Form 10-K"
Section 7.1(b)
is defined in .
"Form 10-Q"
Section 7.1(a)
means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect from time to time in the United States of America.
"GAAP"
means Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Bassett"
means Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Benefit"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"Gallagher Risk"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC a Delaware limited liability company.
"Gallagher Service"
 
Table of Contents
means:
"Governmental Authority"
 
(i) the United States of America or any State or other political subdivision thereof, or
(ii) any other jurisdiction in which the Company or any Subsidiary conducts all or any part of its business, or which asserts jurisdiction over any properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, or
(b) any entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions of, or pertaining to, any such government.
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any obligation (except the endorsement in the ordinary course of business of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection) of such Person guaranteeing or in effect guaranteeing any Indebtedness, dividend or other obligation of any other Person in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, including (without limitation) obligations incurred through an agreement, contingent or otherwise, by such Person:
"Guaranty"
(a) to purchase such Indebtedness or obligation or any property constituting security therefor;
(b) to advance or supply funds (i) for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation, or (ii) to maintain any working capital or other balance sheet condition or any income statement condition of any other Person or otherwise to advance or make available funds for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation;
(c) to lease properties or to purchase properties or services primarily for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation of the ability of any other Person to make payment of the Indebtedness or obligation; or
(d) otherwise to assure the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation against loss in respect thereof.
In any computation of the Indebtedness or other liabilities of the obligor under any Guaranty, the Indebtedness or other obligations that are the subject of such Guaranty shall be assumed to be direct obligations of such obligor.
means any and all pollutants, toxic or hazardous wastes or any other substances, including all substances listed in or regulated in any Environmental Law as posing a hazard to health and safety, the removal of which is required or the generation, manufacture, refining, production, processing, treatment, storage, handling, transportation, transfer, use, disposal, release, discharge, spillage, seepage, or filtration of which is or shall be restricted, regulated, prohibited or penalized by any applicable law including, but not limited to, asbestos, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, petroleum, petroleum products, lead based paint, radon gas or similar restricted, prohibited or penalized substances.
"Hazardous Materials"
means, with respect to any Note, the Person in whose name such Note is registered in the register maintained by the Obligor Agent pursuant to .
"holder"
Section 13.1
 
Table of Contents
means for any Person (without duplication) (a) all indebtedness created, assumed or incurred in any manner by such Person representing money borrowed (including by the issuance of debt securities), (b) all indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than (i) trade accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which are not more than 90 days past due and (ii) obligations to make earn-out payments payable (including at the election of the Company) in capital stock of the Company pursuant to acquisitions by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), (c) all indebtedness secured by any Lien upon property of such Person, whether or not such Person has assumed or become liable for the payment of such indebtedness, (d) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person, (e) all obligations of such Person on or with respect to letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and other extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money, excluding, in each case, indebtedness which is non-recourse to such Person and its subsidiaries and (f) any Guaranty of such Person with respect to liabilities of a type described in any of clauses (a) through (e) hereof.
"Indebtedness"
"" is defined in
INHAM Exemption
Section 6.2(e).
means (a) any purchaser of a Note, (b) any holder of a Note holding (together with one or more of its Affiliates) more than 5% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding, (c) any bank, trust company, savings and loan association or other financial institution, any pension plan, any investment company, any insurance company, any broker or dealer, or any other similar financial institution or entity, regardless of legal form, and (d) any Related Fund of any holder of any Note.
"Institutional Investor"
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to Capitalized Lease Obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period (after eliminating intercompany items) determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Interest Expense"
is defined in .
"Investment Grade Rating"
Section 8.7(f)
means a joinder agreement substantially in the form of .
"Joinder Agreement"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any mortgage, lien, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance, or any interest or title of any vendor, lessor, lender or other secured party to or of such Person under any conditional sale or other title retention agreement or Capital Lease, upon or with respect to any property or asset of such Person (including in the case of stock, stockholder agreements, voting trust agreements and all similar arrangements).
"Lien"
is defined in .
"Make-Whole Amount"
Section 8.6
means material in relation to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
"Material"
 
Table of Contents
means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes, or (c) the ability of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than the Company) to perform its obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, when taken together with the Company's ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes and the other Subsidiary Guarantors' and the Obligors' (other than the Company) ability to perform their obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, or (d) the validity or enforceability against the Company of this Agreement or the Notes or (e) the validity or enforceability against the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Obligors (other than the Company), taken as a whole, of any Subsidiary Guaranty and this Agreement and the Notes.
"Material Adverse Effect"
means a Subsidiary of the Company whose assets represent more than 5% of the Consolidated Total Assets.
"Material Subsidiary"
means any Plan that is a "multiemployer plan" (as such term is defined in section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA).
"Multiemployer Plan"
means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any successor thereto.
"NAIC"
"NAIC Annual Statement" is defined in .
Section 6.2(a)
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the net income (or net loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period as computed on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles, and, without limiting the foregoing, after deduction from gross income of all expenses and reserves, including reserves for all taxes on or measured by income.
"Net Income"
means, with respect to any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of the assets or property of any Person, an amount equal to the (a) aggregate amount of the value of the consideration received by such Person in respect thereof (the value of any consideration which is not cash to be determined in good faith by a Senior Financial Officer) (b) the sum of (i) all out-of-pocket costs and expenses actually incurred by such Person and its Affiliates in connection with such sale, lease, transfer or other disposition and (ii) all state, federal or foreign taxes incurred or to be incurred by such Person or its Affiliates (assuming the highest marginal rate were applicable thereto) in connection therewith.
"net proceeds"
minus
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Notes"
and are defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement and shall include any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of ; that the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Section 9.7
provided
Section 10.5
means, the Company, as agent and attorney-in-fact for the other Obligors pursuant to of this Agreement.
"Obligor Agent"
Section 22.10
 
Table of Contents
is defined in .
"OFAC"
Section 5.16(a)
is defined in .
"OFAC Listed Persons"
Section 5.16(a)
means any economic or trade sanction that OFAC is responsible for administering and enforcing. A list of OFAC Sanctions Programs may be found at http://www.ustreas.gov/offices/enforcemtn/ofac/programs/.
"OFAC Sanctions Program"
means a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer or of any other officer of the Company or an Obligor, as the case may be, whose responsibilities extend to the subject matter of such certificate.
"Officer's Certificate"
means, as to any Person, any lease of property (whether real, personal or mixed) by such Person as lessee that is not a Capital Lease.
"Operating Lease"
means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA or any successor thereto.
"PBGC"
"Permitted Lien" is defined in .
Section 10.4
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization, business entity or Governmental Authority.
"Person"
means an "employee benefit plan" (as defined in section 3(3) of ERISA) subject to Title I of ERISA that is or, within the preceding five years, has been established or maintained, or to which contributions are or, within the preceding five years, have been made or required to be made, by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate or with respect to which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate may have any liability.
"Plan"
means, without duplication (a) any Indebtedness of the Company or a Subsidiary secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of and (b) any Indebtedness of the Company's Subsidiaries; that there shall be excluded from any calculation of Priority Indebtedness: (i) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of ), (ii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary of the Company, (iii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary outstanding on the date of Closing and described on hereto and any extension, renewal or refunding of any such Indebtedness, and (iv) the Indebtedness of any Person which becomes a Subsidiary after the date of Closing and any extension, renewal or refunding thereof; that such Indebtedness was not incurred in contemplation of such Person becoming a Subsidiary.
"Priority Indebtedness"
Section 10.4(l)
provided
Section 10.4(l)
Schedule 5.15(a)
provided
or means any interest in any kind of property or asset, whether real, personal or mixed, or tangible or intangible.
"property"
"properties"
is defined in .
"Proposed Prepayment Date"
Section 8.7(b)
is defined in .
"PTE"
Section 6.2(a)
 
Table of Contents
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Purchaser"
means Prohibited Transaction Class Exemption 84-14 issued by the United States Department of Labor, as amended effective November 3, 2010.
"QPAM Exemption"
means any Person who is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of such term as set forth in Rule 144A(a)(1) under the Securities Act.
"Qualified Institutional Buyer"
means, with respect to any holder of any Note, any fund or entity that (a) invests in Securities or bank loans, and (b) is advised or managed by such holder, the same investment advisor as such holder or by an Affiliate of such holder or such investment advisor.
"Related Fund"
means, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries for any period, the aggregate amounts payable with respect to Operating Leases of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with Agreement Accounting Principles.
"Rental Expense"
means, at any time, the holders of at least 66% in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding (exclusive of Notes then owned by an Obligor or any of its Affiliates).
"Required Holders"
means any Senior Financial Officer and any other officer of the Company with responsibility for the administration of the relevant portion of this Agreement.
"Responsible Officer"
means Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"RPS"
shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, or any successor thereto.
"SEC"
or shall have the same meaning as in Section 2(1) of the Securities Act.
"Securities"
"Security"
"Securities Act" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
means the chief financial officer, chief accounting officer or treasurer of the Company.
"Senior Financial Officer"
means all Indebtedness of the Company which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other Indebtedness of the Company.
"Senior Indebtedness"
is defined in .
"Series F Notes"
Section 1
is defined in .
"Source"
Section 6.2
 
Table of Contents
means, as to any Person, any other Person in which such first Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries owns sufficient equity or voting interests to enable it or them (as a group) ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, to elect a majority of the directors (or Persons performing similar functions) of such second Person, and any partnership or joint venture if more than a 50% interest in the profits or capital thereof is owned by such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries (unless such partnership can and does ordinarily take major business actions without the prior approval of such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries). Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to a "Subsidiary" is a reference to a Subsidiary of the Company.
"Subsidiary"
means any Subsidiary which is required to deliver a Subsidiary Guaranty in compliance with the requirements of .
"Subsidiary Guarantor"
Section 9.7
means a guaranty substantially in the form of (as the same may be amended from time to time).
"Subsidiary Guaranty"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
means the Securities Valuation Office of the NAIC or any successor to such Office.
"SVO"
means United States Public Law 107-56, Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism (USA P A) Act of 2001, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"USA Patriot Act"
ATRIOT
CT
means Securities of any class or classes of a Person, the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to elect the corporate directors (or persons performing similar functions) of such Person.
"Voting Stock"
means, at any time, any Subsidiary of which all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (other than directors' qualifying shares as required by law) or other equity interests are owned by any one or more of the Company and the Company's other Wholly-owned Subsidiaries.
"Wholly-owned Subsidiary"
 
 
Table of Contents
1. Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, as filed by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 14, 2012.
2. Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012, as filed by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 2, 2012.
 
Table of Contents
In the following list of subsidiaries of the Company, those companies that are indented represent subsidiaries of the Company under which they are indented. Except for directors' qualifying shares, 100% of the voting stock of each of the subsidiaries listed below, other than those indicated by footnote, is owned of record or beneficially by its indicated parent. None of the subsidiaries listed below is a guarantor under the Bank Credit Agreement. Each subsidiary listed below that is an obligor under the Bank Credit Agreement is indicated by an * after its name.
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
According to form Schedules 13G filed with the SEC by Capital Research Global Investors and Capital World investors on February 14, 2012 and February 10, 2012, respectively, Capital Research Global Investors owns 13,348,237 shares of the common stock of the Company, which represented 11.4% of the outstanding common stock of the Company as of March 12, 2012.
 
Table of Contents
Directors:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
William L. Bax
Frank E. English, Jr.
Ilene S. Gordon
Elbert O. Hand
David S. Johnson
Kay W. McCurdy
Norman L. Rosenthal
James R. Wimmer
Senior Officers:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer
Walter D. Bay, Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
James W. Durkin, Jr., Vice President
James S. Gault, Vice President
Douglas K. Howell, Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Scott R. Hudson, Vice President
Susan E. McGrath, Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer
David E. McGurn, Jr., Vice President
 
Table of Contents
None.
 
Table of Contents
None.
 
Table of Contents
1. The financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries contained in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011.
2. The financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries contained in the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012.
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
Table of Contents
(1) Co-obligors: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois)
Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC
Risk Placement Services, Inc.
Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc.
Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc.
Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc.
Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC
Table of Contents
1. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of November 30, 2009, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
2. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of February 10, 2011, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
3. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2012, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
Table of Contents
1. Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010, among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., as Borrower, the other Borrowers named therein, the several financial institutions from time to time party to the Agreement, as Lenders, Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A., Citibank N.A. and Barclays Bank PLC, as Co-Syndication Agents, and JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. and U.S. Bank National Association, as Documentation Agent.
2. 6.26% Amended and Restated Senior Notes, Series A, due August 3, 2014
3. 6.44% Amended and Restated Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017
4. Amended and Restated Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 19, 2007, among the Obligors and the Noteholders named therein.
5. 5.85% Senior Notes, Series C, due November 30, 2019
6. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of November 30, 2009, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
7. 5.18% Senior Notes, Series D, due February 10, 2021
8. 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023
9. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of February 10, 2011, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
10. 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020
11. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2012, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
Table of Contents
 
F V R, the undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally, hereby promise to pay to             , or registered assigns, the principal sum of             D (or so much thereof as shall not have been prepaid) on July 10, 2020 with interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months) on the unpaid balance hereof at the rate of (a) 3.99% per annum from the date hereof payable semi-annually on the 10
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
OLLARS
th
day of January and July in each year commencing with the January 10 or July 10 next succeeding the date hereof, until the principal shall have become due and payable, and (b) to the extent permitted by law, on any overdue payment of principal, on any overdue payment of interest and, during the continuance of an Event of Default, on such unpaid balance and on any overdue payment of any Make-Whole Amount, at a rate per annum from time to time equal to 5.99% payable semiannually as aforesaid (or, at the option of the registered holder hereof, on demand).
Payments of principal of, interest on and any Make-Whole Amount with respect to this Note are to be made in lawful money of the United States of America at Chicago, Illinois or at such other place as the Company shall have designated by written notice to the holder of this Note as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement referred to below.
Table of Contents
This Note is one of a series of Senior Notes (herein called the ) issued pursuant to the Note Purchase Agreement dated as July 10, 2012 (as from time to time amended, the ), among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein and is entitled to the benefits thereof. Each holder of this Note will be deemed, by its acceptance hereof, to have (i) agreed to the confidentiality provisions set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and (ii) made the representations set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and, in addition, in the case of a transferee, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption. Unless otherwise indicated, capitalized terms used in this Note shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Note Purchase Agreement.
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
Section 20
Section 6
This Note is a registered Note and, as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer, duly endorsed, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed, by the registered holder hereof or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing, a new Note for a like principal amount will be issued to, and registered in the name of, the transferee. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment and for all other purposes, and the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor will not be affected by any notice to the contrary.
This Note is subject to optional prepayment, in whole or from time to time in part, at the times and on the terms specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, but not otherwise.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the principal of this Note may be declared or otherwise become due and payable in the manner, at the price (including any applicable Make-Whole Amount) and with the effect provided in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Pursuant to of the Note Purchase Agreement, an Obligor (other than the Company) may from time to time be discharged and released from its obligations under this Note on the terms and with the effect specified in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 2.2
 
Table of Contents
This Note shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the Obligors and the holder of this Note shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Table of Contents
To the Purchasers Listed
on Schedule I hereto
Re:
$50,000,000 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as counsel to (i) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), (ii) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (""), (iii) Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), (iv) Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), (v) Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vi) Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vii) Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), and (viii) Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("", and, collectively with the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit and Gallagher Risk, the ""), in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of that certain Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ""), among the Purchasers listed on Schedule I hereto (the "") and the Obligors, pursuant to which the Obligors are issuing to the Purchasers $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020 (the ""). This opinion letter is being delivered to you at the request of the Obligors pursuant to Section 4.4(a) of the Agreement.
Company
AJG Illinois
AJG Brokerage
RPS
Gallagher Bassett
Gallagher Benefit
Gallagher Risk
Gallagher Service
Obligors
Agreement
Purchasers
Notes
In connection with this opinion letter, we have examined originals, or copies certified or otherwise identified to our satisfaction, of:
(a) the Agreement; and
(b) the Notes being delivered to the Purchasers on the date hereof.
We also have examined originals, or copies of originals certified to our satisfaction, of such agreements, documents, certificates and other statements of government officials and other instruments, have examined such questions of law and have satisfied ourselves as to such matters of fact as we have considered relevant and necessary as a basis for this opinion letter. We have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the legal capacity of all natural persons, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals and the conformity with the original documents of all documents submitted to us as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission. As to facts relevant to the opinions expressed herein, we have relied, without independent investigation or verification, upon, and assumed the accuracy and completeness of, the representations and warranties made in the Agreement and upon certificates and oral and written statements of officers of the Obligors.
Table of Contents
Based on and subject to the foregoing and the other limitations, qualifications, exceptions and assumptions set forth herein, this will advise you that in the opinion of the undersigned:
1. The Agreement constitutes a valid and binding obligation of each Obligor, enforceable against each Obligor in accordance with its terms.
2. The Notes, when delivered to and paid for by the Purchasers in accordance with the terms of the Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of each Obligor, enforceable against each Obligor in accordance with their respective terms.
3. Assuming the accuracy of the representations and warranties and compliance with the agreements of the Obligors and the Purchasers in the Agreement, it is not necessary, in connection with the offer and sale of the Notes by the Obligors to the Purchasers in the manner contemplated by the Agreement, to register the Notes under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or to qualify an indenture under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
4. Based upon the Officer's Certificate of the Company dated the date hereof and attached hereto, the issuance of the Notes in accordance with the provisions of and as contemplated by the Agreement does not violate Regulation U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
The foregoing opinions are subject to the following qualifications, exceptions, assumptions and limitations:
A. The foregoing opinions are limited to matters arising under the federal laws of the United States of America and the laws of the State of Illinois. We express no opinion as to the laws, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction, or as to the municipal laws or the laws, rules or regulations of any local agencies or governmental authorities of or within the State of Illinois, or in each case as to any matters arising thereunder or relating thereto.
B. Our opinions in paragraph 1 and 2 above are subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance, fraudulent transfer and other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors generally and to general principles of equity (whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), including concepts of commercial reasonableness, good faith and fair dealing and the possible unavailability of specific performance or injunctive relief.
C. We express no opinion as to any provision of any instrument, agreement or other document regarding (i) severability of the provisions thereof or (ii) providing that the assertion or employment of any right or remedy shall not prevent the concurrent assertion or employment of any other right or remedy, or that every right and remedy shall be cumulative and in addition to every other right and remedy, or that any delay or omission to exercise any right or remedy shall not impair any right or remedy or constitute a waiver thereof.
Table of Contents
D. With respect to the Agreement and the Notes (collectively, the ""), we have assumed, to the extent relevant to the opinions set forth herein, that (i) each party to such Transaction Document (if not a natural person) was duly formed or organized, as the case may be, and was at all relevant times and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation or organization, as the case may be, and had at all relevant times and has the full right, power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under such Transaction Document, (ii) such Transaction Document has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by each party thereto, (iii) such Transaction Document was at all relevant times and is the valid, binding and enforceable agreement or obligation, as the case may be, of each party thereto in accordance with its terms, provided that we make no such assumption in this clause (iii) insofar as such matters relate to any of the Obligors and is expressly covered by our opinions in paragraph 1 or 2 above, and (iv) the terms and provisions of such Transaction Document do not, and the execution, delivery and performance thereof by each of the parties to such Transaction Document do not and will not, violate the respective organizational documents of any of the parties to such Transaction Document or any law, order or decree of any court, administrative agency or other governmental authority binding on any such party, or result in a breach of or cause a default under any contract, instrument or agreement to which each party to such Transaction Document is a party or by which any such party is bound.
Transaction Documents
This opinion letter is being rendered and delivered solely to and for the benefit of the persons to whom it is addressed in connection with the matters described above; accordingly, it may not be quoted or otherwise delivered to or relied upon by any other person or used for any other purpose without our prior written consent. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence: (i) you may make available a copy of this opinion letter to any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over you (as well as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) or any prospective purchaser of the Notes that is an Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement), provided that such recipient shall not be entitled to rely on this opinion letter; and (ii) any Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement) who purchases a Note may rely on this opinion letter as of the date hereof (and any reliance after the date hereof shall not be deemed to be an updating or re-delivery of the opinions expressed in this opinion letter). We assume no obligation to notify you or any such Institutional Investor or to supplement this opinion letter to reflect any facts or circumstances which may hereafter come to our attention with respect to the opinions expressed herein, including any changes in applicable law which may hereafter occur.
Very truly yours,
 
Table of Contents
N Y L I C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 30C)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 3)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 3-2)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
 
Table of Contents
To the Purchasers Listed
on Schedule I hereto
Re:
$50,000,000 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020
Ladies and Gentlemen:
I am General Counsel of (i) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), (ii) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (""), (iii) Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), (iv) Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), (v) Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vi) Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vii) Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), and (viii) Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("", and, collectively with the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit and Gallagher Risk, the ""), in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of that certain Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ""), among the Purchasers listed on hereto (the "") and the Obligors, pursuant to which the Obligors are issuing to the Purchasers $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020 (the ""). This opinion letter is being delivered to you pursuant to Section 4.4(b) of the Agreement.
Company
AJG Illinois
AJG Brokerage
RPS
Gallagher Bassett
Gallagher Benefit
Gallagher Risk
Gallagher Service
Obligors
Agreement
Schedule I
Purchasers
Notes
I have reviewed the following documents and all exhibits thereto for the purposes of rendering the opinions expressed herein:
a) the Agreement; and
b) the Notes being delivered to the Purchasers on the date hereof.
I have also examined originals, or copies of originals certified to my satisfaction, of such agreements, documents, certificates and other statements of government officials and other instruments, have examined such questions of law and have satisfied myself as to such matters of fact as I have deemed relevant and necessary as a basis for this opinion letter. I have assumed the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals, the conformity with the original documents of all documents submitted to me as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission for my examination and the legal capacity of all natural persons.
 
Table of Contents
Based on and subject to the foregoing and the other limitations, qualifications, exceptions and assumptions set forth herein, this will advise you that in the opinion of the undersigned:
1. The Company is validly existing as a corporation and is in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. The Company has the corporate power and authority to execute and perform its obligations under the Agreement and to issue the Notes and has the corporate power and authority to conduct the activities in which it is now engaged and is duly licensed or qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation in each jurisdiction in which the character of the properties owned or leased by it or the nature of the business transacted by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed, qualified or in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
2. Each Obligor other than the Company is validly existing as a corporation or limited liability company and is in good standing under the laws of its state of incorporation or formation. Each Obligor other than the Company has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to execute and perform its obligations under the Agreement and has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to conduct the activities in which it is now engaged and is duly licensed or qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation or limited liability company in each jurisdiction in which the character of the properties owned or leased by it or the nature of the business transacted by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed, qualified or in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or limited liability company interests of each Obligor other than the Company have been duly issued, are (in the case of shares of capital stock) fully paid and non-assessable and are owned by the Company, by one or more subsidiaries of the Company, or by the Company and one or more of its subsidiaries, free and clear of any lien, mortgage, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance.
3. All necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of each Obligor has been taken to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of the Agreement by such Obligor, and the Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Obligor.
4. All necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of each Obligor has been taken to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of the Notes by such Obligor, and the Notes have been duly executed and delivered by each Obligor.
5. No consent, approval, authorization or other order of any federal regulatory body, federal administrative agency or other federal governmental body of the United States of America or any state regulatory body, state administrative agency or other state governmental body is required under Applicable Laws for the execution, delivery or performance of the Agreement or the Notes by the Obligors or the issuance and sale of the Notes to the Purchasers as contemplated by the Agreement. As used in this opinion letter, "" means the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, those state laws of the State of Illinois and those federal laws of the United States of America which a lawyer in the relevant jurisdiction exercising customary diligence would reasonably recognize as being applicable to transactions of the type contemplated by the Agreement; provided, that the term "Applicable Laws" shall not include federal or state securities or blue sky laws (including, without limitation, the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, or the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or in each case any rules or regulations thereunder).
Applicable Laws
 
Table of Contents
6. The execution and delivery by each Obligor of the Agreement and the Notes do not, and the performance by each Obligor of the Agreement and the Notes (including the issuance and sale of the Notes) will not, (i) violate the certificate or articles of incorporation, certificate of formation, by-laws or limited liability company agreement, as applicable, of such Obligor, (ii) result in a violation by such Obligor of any of the terms and provisions of any Applicable Laws or (iii) result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any lien or encumbrance in respect of any property of such Obligor under, any agreement or other instrument known to me to which such Obligor is a party or by which such Obligor may be bound, including, without limitation, the agreements set forth in Schedule 5.15(c) to the Agreement.
7. No Obligor is an "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an "investment company" under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
8. To my knowledge after due inquiry, except as disclosed in the Company's reports, documents or other materials filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, there are no legal, governmental or regulatory investigations, actions, suits or proceedings pending to which any Obligor is a party or to which any property of any Obligor is the subject which, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to have a materially adverse effect on the business or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or which would impair the ability of the Obligors to issue and deliver the Notes or to comply with the provisions of the Agreement or the Notes or which challenges the legal, valid and binding nature of the Agreement or the Notes; and to my knowledge, no such investigations, actions, suits or proceedings are threatened or contemplated by any governmental or regulatory authority or threatened by others.
As to facts relevant to the opinions expressed herein, I have reviewed originals of each of the Agreement and the Notes (collectively, the "") and have relied, without independent investigation or verification, upon, and assumed the accuracy and completeness of, the representations and warranties made in the Agreement.
Relevant Documents
I am the Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, and I am delivering this opinion letter only in such capacity.
This opinion letter is subject to the following qualifications:
(A) In rendering the opinions set forth in paragraphs 1 and 2 above with respect to the Obligors' valid existence and good standing and license or qualification to transact business as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as applicable, I have relied solely on certificates of government officials, in each case as of a recent date prior to the date hereof.
(B) I express no opinion in paragraph 6(iii) above as to any breach of or default under any financial covenant or any provision requiring a mathematical, accounting or financial computation or determination.
 
Table of Contents
(C) Any opinion herein which is expressed to be "to my knowledge" or "known to me" or is otherwise qualified by words of like import means that I have no actual knowledge of any facts or information contrary to such opinion. I have not undertaken any independent investigation, beyond that mentioned in paragraph 8 of this opinion letter, to determine the accuracy of any such facts or information, and no inference as to my knowledge of any matters bearing on the accuracy of any such facts or information should be drawn solely from the fact of my employment by the Company or the rendering of this opinion letter.
(D) This opinion letter is limited to matters arising under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, the laws of the State of Illinois and the federal laws of the United States of America. I express no opinion as to the laws, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction or, in the case of Delaware, any other Delaware laws, rules or regulations, or as to the municipal laws or the laws, rules or regulations of any local agencies or governmental authorities of or within the State of Illinois, or in each case as to any matters arising thereunder or relating thereto. I express no opinion as to matters relating to securities or blue sky laws of any jurisdiction.
This opinion letter is being rendered and delivered solely to and for the benefit of the persons to whom it is addressed in connection with the matters described above; accordingly, it may not be quoted or otherwise delivered to or relied upon by any other person or used for any other purpose without my prior written consent. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence: (i) you may make available a copy of this opinion letter to any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over you (as well as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) or any prospective purchaser of the Notes that is an Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement), provided that such recipient shall not be entitled to rely on this opinion letter; and (ii) any Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement) who purchases a Note may rely on this opinion letter as of the date hereof (and any reliance after the date hereof shall not be deemed to be an updating or re-delivery of the opinions expressed in this opinion letter). I assume no obligation to notify you or any such Institutional Investor or to supplement this opinion letter to reflect any facts or circumstances which may hereafter come to my attention with respect to the opinions expressed herein, including any changes in applicable law which may hereafter occur.
Very truly yours,
Walter D. Bay
Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
 
Table of Contents
N Y L I C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 30C)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 3)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 3-2)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
 
Table of Contents
The closing opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP, special counsel to the Purchasers, called for by Section 4.4(c) of the Agreement, shall be dated the date of the Closing and addressed to the Purchasers, shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Purchasers and shall be to the effect that:
1. The Company is a corporation validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
2. Each Obligor other than the Company is validly existing as a corporation or limited liability company and is in good standing under the laws of its state of incorporation or formation.
3. The Company and each other Obligor has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under the Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance thereof by the Company and each other Obligor has been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of the Company and each other Obligor, as the case may be, and the Agreement and the Notes have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each of the other Obligors.
4. The Agreement and the Notes constitute the legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company and each other Obligor enforceable against such Person in accordance with its terms.
5. In view of the circumstances surrounding the sale and delivery of the Notes and on the basis of the representations made by the Company and each other Obligor in Section 5.13 of the Agreement and by you in Section 6.1 of the Agreement, it is not necessary in connection with the offering, issuance and delivery of the Notes under the circumstance contemplated by the Agreement to register the Notes under the Securities Act or to qualify and indenture in respect of the Notes under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended and now in effect.
The opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP shall also state that the opinions of Sidley Austin LLP and Walter D. Bay, General Counsel of the Company, are each satisfactory in scope and form to Schiff Hardin LLP and that, in their opinion, the Purchasers are justified in relying thereon.
In rendering the opinion set forth in paragraphs 1 and 2 above, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely, as to matters referred to in paragraphs 1 and 2, solely upon an examination of certificates of government officials, in each case as of a recent date prior to the date hereof. In rendering the opinion set forth in paragraph 3 above, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely upon the opinions of Sidley Austin LLP and Walter D. Bay, General Counsel of the Company. The opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP is limited to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, the laws of the State of Illinois and the federal laws of the United States of America.
 
Table of Contents
With respect to matters of fact upon which such opinion is based, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely on appropriate certificates of public officials and officers of the Obligors and upon representations of the Obligors and the Purchasers delivered in connection with the issuance and sale of the Notes.
 
Table of Contents
 
 
 
Re:         $50,000,000 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, Due July 10, 2020
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
This G A dated as of             ,             (the or this ) is entered into on a joint and several basis by each of the undersigned (which parties are hereinafter referred to individually as a and collectively as the ).
UARANTY
GREEMENT
"Guaranty"
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
A. Each Guarantor is a Subsidiary (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ).
"Company"
B. For the purpose set forth in Section 5.14 thereof, the Company has entered into that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of July 10, 2012 (the ) among the Company, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement, hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ) and each of the purchasers named on Schedule A thereto (the ; the Initial Note Purchasers, together with their successors, assigns or any other future holder of the Notes (as hereinafter defined), the ), providing for, inter alia, the issue and sale by the Company to the Initial Note Purchasers of $50,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020 ( the "").
"Note Purchase Agreement"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
"Initial Note Purchasers"
"Holders"
Notes
C. The Initial Note Purchasers have required as a condition to their purchase of the Notes that the Company cause each Subsidiary that after the date of Closing delivers a guaranty pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement to enter into this Guaranty, as security for the Notes. The Company owns 100% of the equity interests of the Guarantors.
D. Each of the Guarantors has derived substantial direct and indirect benefit from the sale of the Notes to the Initial Note Purchasers.
N, , as required by Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement and in consideration of the premises and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency whereof are hereby acknowledged, each Guarantor does hereby covenant and agree, jointly and severally, as follows:
OW
THEREFORE
 
Table of Contents
SECTION 1. Definitions.
Capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Note Purchase Agreement unless herein defined or the context shall otherwise require.
SECTION 2. Guaranty of Notes and Note Purchase Agreement.
(a) Subject to the limitation set forth in hereof, each Guarantor jointly and severally does hereby irrevocably, absolutely and unconditionally guarantee unto the Holders: (1) the full and prompt payment of the principal of, premium (including, without limitation, any Make-Whole Amount), if any, and interest on the Notes and any other amounts from time to time outstanding under the Note Purchase Agreement or the Notes, as and when such payments shall become due and payable whether by lapse of time, upon redemption or prepayment, by extension or by acceleration or declaration or otherwise (including (to the extent legally enforceable) interest due on overdue payments of principal, premium, if any, or interest at the rate set forth in the Notes and interest accruing at the then applicable rate provided in the Notes after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy, or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding, relating to an Obligor, whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding) in Federal or other immediately available funds of the United States of America which at the time of payment or demand therefor shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, (2) the full and prompt performance and observance by the Obligors of each and all of the obligations, covenants and agreements required to be performed or owed by the Obligors under the terms of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and (3) the full and prompt payment, upon demand by any Holder, of all costs and expenses, legal or otherwise (including reasonable attorneys' fees), if any, as shall have been expended or incurred in the protection or enforcement of any rights, privileges or liabilities in favor of the Holders under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or under this Guaranty or in any consultation or action in connection therewith or herewith and in each and every case irrespective of the validity, regularity, or enforcement of any of the Notes or Note Purchase Agreement or any of the terms thereof or any other like circumstance or circumstances.
Section 2(b)
(b) The liability of each Guarantor under this Guaranty shall not exceed an amount equal to a maximum amount as will, after giving effect to such maximum amount and all other liabilities of such Guarantor, contingent or otherwise, result in the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder not constituting a fraudulent transfer, obligation or conveyance.
SECTION 3. Guaranty of Payment and Performance.
This is a guarantee of payment and performance and each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to require that any action on or in respect of any Note or the Note Purchase Agreement be brought against an Obligor or any other Person or that resort be had to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. Any Holder may, at its option, proceed hereunder against any Guarantor in the first instance to collect monies when due, the payment of which is guaranteed hereby, without first proceeding against an Obligor or any other Person and without first resorting to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. The liability of each Guarantor hereunder shall in no way be affected or impaired by any acceptance by any Holder of
 
Table of Contents
any direct or indirect security for, or other guaranties of, any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or any other Person to any Holder or by any failure, delay, neglect or omission by any Holder to realize upon or protect any such guarantees, Indebtedness, liability or obligation or any notes or other instruments evidencing the same or any direct or indirect security therefor or by any approval, consent, waiver, or other action taken, or omitted to be taken by any such Holder.
The covenants and agreements on the part of the Guarantors herein contained shall take effect as joint and several covenants and agreements, and references to the Guarantors shall take effect as references to each of them and none of them shall be released from liability hereunder by reason of the guarantee ceasing to be binding as a continuing security on any other of them.
SECTION 4. General Provisions Relating to the Guaranty.
(a) Each Guarantor hereby consents and agrees that any Holder or Holders from time to time, with or without any further notice to or assent from any other Guarantor may, without in any manner affecting the liability of any Guarantor under this Guaranty, and upon such terms and conditions as any such Holder or Holders may deem advisable:
(1) extend in whole or in part (by renewal or otherwise), modify, change, compromise, release or extend the duration of the time for the performance or payment of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of any Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligations of such Obligor on the Notes, or waive any Default or Event of Default with respect thereto, or waive, modify, amend or change any provision of any other agreement or this Guaranty; or
(2) sell, release, surrender, modify, impair, exchange or substitute any and all property, of any nature and from whomsoever received, held by, or for the benefit of, any such Holder as direct or indirect security for the payment or performance of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes; or
(3) settle, adjust or compromise any claim of an Obligor against any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes.
Each Guarantor hereby ratifies and confirms any such extension, renewal, change, sale, release, waiver, surrender, exchange, modification, amendment, impairment, substitution, settlement, adjustment or compromise and that the same shall be binding upon it, and hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any and all defenses, counterclaims or offsets which it might or could have by reason thereof, it being understood that such Guarantor shall at all times be bound by this Guaranty and remain liable hereunder.
 
Table of Contents
(b) Each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of acceptance of this Guaranty by the Holders or of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such Holders upon this Guaranty (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in hereof shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Guaranty);
Section 2
(2) demand of payment by any Holder from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any Holder or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Guarantor.
The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty and the rights of any Holder to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under the Note Purchase Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
(c) The obligations of the Guarantors hereunder shall be binding upon the Guarantors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due pursuant to Section 2 shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Guarantors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of the Obligors, any other Guarantors or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of the Obligors to issue the Notes or the Obligors to execute and deliver the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or of any other Guarantors to execute and deliver this Guaranty or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of the Obligors or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person; or
 
Table of Contents
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other force majeure, whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or this Guaranty, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Guarantor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Guaranty; or
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Guarantor of failure of an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor, any other Guarantor or to any other Person or to any other guaranty or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
 
Table of Contents
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other guaranty, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any release of any other Guarantor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Guarantor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Guarantor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Guarantor or other Person under this Guaranty or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Guaranty and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Guarantor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement and that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
provided
 
Table of Contents
(d) All rights of any Holder may be transferred or assigned at any time and shall be considered to be transferred or assigned at any time or from time to time upon the transfer of such Note whether with or without the consent of or notice to the Guarantors under this Guaranty or to the Obligors.
(e) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, the Guarantors shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holder or Holders upon whose Notes such payment was made, but each Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of subrogation shall be junior and subordinate in right of payment to the prior indefeasible final payment in cash in full of all amounts due and owing by the Obligors with respect to the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and by the Guarantors under this Guaranty, and the Guarantors shall not take any action to enforce such right of subrogation, and the Guarantors shall not accept any payment in respect of such right of subrogation, until all amounts due and owing by the Obligors under or in respect of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and all amounts due and owing by the Guarantors hereunder have indefeasibly been finally paid in cash in full. If any amount shall be paid to any Guarantor in violation of the preceding sentence at any time prior to the indefeasible payment in cash in full of the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Holders and shall forthwith be paid to the Holders to be credited and applied to the amounts due or to become due with respect to the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, whether matured or unmatured. Each Guarantor acknowledges that it has received direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by the Note Purchase Agreement and that the waiver set forth in this is knowingly made as a result of the receipt of such benefits.
paragraph (e)
(f) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, each Guarantor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Guarantors, but such Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the Holders for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Guarantor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(g) Each Guarantor agrees that to the extent an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Guarantors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Guarantors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any Holder from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
 
Table of Contents
(h) No Holder shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Guarantors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Guarantors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Guarantors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Guarantors' burden, any right to which each Guarantor hereby expressly waives.
(i) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank in right of payment with all other Indebtedness of such Guarantor which is not secured or which is not expressly subordinated in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of such Guarantor.
pari passu
(j) A Guarantor shall be automatically discharged and released from this Guaranty pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
SECTION 5. Representations and Warranties of the Guarantors.
Each Guarantor represents and warrants to each Holder that:
(a) Such Guarantor is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (1) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of such Guarantor and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (2) the ability of such Guarantor to perform its obligations under this Guaranty, or (3) the validity or enforceability of this Guaranty (herein in this , a ). Such Guarantor has the power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Guaranty and to perform the provisions hereof.
Section 5
"Material Adverse Effect"
(b) This Guaranty has been duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of such Guarantor, and this Guaranty constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Guarantor enforceable against such Guarantor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (1) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(c) The execution, delivery and performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty will not (1) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries under any material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, charter document or by-law, or any other material agreement or instrument to which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries is bound or by which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or any of
 
Table of Contents
their respective properties may be bound or affected, (2) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or (3) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to the such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries.
(d) No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty.
(e) Such Guarantor is solvent, has capital not unreasonably small in relation to its business or any contemplated or undertaken transaction and has assets having a value both at fair valuation and at present fair salable value greater than the amount required to pay its debts as they become due and greater than the amount that will be required to pay its probable liability on its existing debts as they become absolute and matured. Such Guarantor does not intend to incur, or believe or should have believed that it will incur, debts beyond its ability to pay such debts as they become due. Such Guarantor will not be rendered insolvent by the execution and delivery of, and performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty. Such Guarantor does not intend to hinder, delay or defraud its creditors by or through the execution and delivery of, or performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty.
(f) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Guarantor.
pari passu
SECTION 6. Guarantor Covenants.
From and after the date of issuance of the Notes by the Obligors and continuing so long as any amount remains unpaid thereon each Guarantor agrees to comply with the terms and provisions of Sections 9.1, 9.2, 9.3, 9.4, 9.5 and 9.8 of the Note Purchase Agreement, insofar as such provisions apply to such Guarantor, as if said Sections were set forth herein in full.
SECTION 7. [Reserved].
SECTION 8. Governing Law.
(a) THIS GUARANTY SHALL BE CONSTRUED AND ENFORCED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, AND THE RIGHTS OF THE PARTIES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS, EXCLUDING CHOICE-OF-LAW PRINCIPLES OF THE LAW OF SUCH STATE THAT WOULD PERMIT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF A JURISDICTION OTHER THAN SUCH STATE.
(b) Each Guarantor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guaranty. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, such Guarantor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
 
Table of Contents
(c) The parties hereto waive any right to have a jury participate in resolving any dispute, whether sounding in contract, tort, or otherwise, between them arising out of, connected with, related to or incidental to the relationship established between them in connection with this Guaranty, any financing agreement, any loan party document or any other instrument, document or agreement executed or delivered in connection herewith or the transactions related hereto. The parties hereto hereby agree and consent that any such claim, demand, action or cause of action shall be decided by court trial without a jury and that any of them may file an original counterpart or a copy of this Guaranty with any court as written evidence of the consent of the parties hereto to the waiver of their right to trial by jury.
SECTION 9. [Reserved].
SECTION 10. Amendments, Waivers and Consents.
(a) This Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively), with (and only with) the written consent of each Guarantor and the Required Holders.
(b) The Guarantors will provide each Holder (irrespective of the amount of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such Holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof. The Guarantors will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this Section 10 to each Holder promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the Required Holders.
(c) The Obligors will not directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of fee or otherwise, or grant any security, to any Holder as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any Holder of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted, on the same terms, ratably to each Holder even if such Holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
(d) Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all Holders and is binding upon them and upon each future holder and upon the Guarantors. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant or agreement not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Guarantors and any Holder nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any Holder. As used herein, the term "this Guaranty" and references thereto shall mean this Guaranty as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 10
 
Table of Contents
(e) Solely for the purpose of determining whether the Holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Guaranty, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Guarantor, any Obligor or any of their respective subsidiaries or Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
SECTION 11. Notices.
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(1) if to an Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee, to such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee at the address specified for such communications in Schedule A to the Note Purchase Agreement, or at such other address as such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing,
(2) if to any other Holder, to such Holder at such address as such Holder shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing, or
(3) if to any Guarantor, to such Guarantor c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning of the Note Purchase Agreement to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as such Guarantor shall have specified to the Holders in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 11
SECTION 12. Miscellaneous.
(a) No remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to any Holder is intended to be exclusive of any other available remedy or remedies, but each and every such remedy shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to every other remedy given under this Guaranty now or hereafter existing at law or in equity. No delay or omission to exercise any right or power accruing upon any default, omission or failure of performance hereunder shall impair any such right or power or shall be construed to be a waiver thereof but any such right or power may be exercised from time to time and as often as may be deemed expedient. In order to entitle any Holder to exercise any remedy reserved to it under the Guaranty, it shall not be necessary for such Holder to physically produce its Note in any proceedings instituted by it or to give any notice, other than such notice as may be herein expressly required.
(b) The Guarantors will pay all sums becoming due under this Guaranty by the method and at the address specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, or by such other method or at such other address as any Holder shall have from time to time specified to the Guarantors in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of this Guaranty or any Note.
 
Table of Contents
(c) Any provision of this Guaranty that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
(d) If the whole or any part of this Guaranty shall be now or hereafter become unenforceable against any one or more of the Guarantors for any reason whatsoever or if it is not executed by any one or more of the Guarantors, this Guaranty shall nevertheless be and remain fully binding upon and enforceable against each other Guarantor as if it had been made and delivered only by such other Guarantors.
(e) This Guaranty shall be binding upon each Guarantor and its successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of each Holder and its successors and assigns so long as its Notes remain outstanding and unpaid.
(f) This Guaranty may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
SECTION 13. Indemnity.
To the fullest extent of applicable law, each Guarantor shall indemnify and save each Holder harmless from and against any losses which may arise by virtue of any of the obligations hereby guaranteed being or becoming for any reason whatsoever in whole or in part void, voidable, contrary to law, invalid, ineffective or otherwise unenforceable by the Holder or any of them in accordance with its terms (all of the foregoing collectively, an "Indemnifiable Circumstance"). For greater certainty, these losses shall include without limitation all obligations hereby guaranteed which would have been payable by the Obligors but for the existence of an Indemnifiable Circumstance, net of any withholding or deduction of or on account of any tax; provided, however, that the extent of the Guarantor's aggregate liability under this Section 13 shall not at any time exceed the amount (but for any Indemnifiable Circumstance) otherwise guaranteed pursuant to Section 2.
SECTION 14. Termination.
This Guaranty shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to any Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Guaranty by reason of the express provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement or is otherwise released from this Guaranty in accordance with the terms of the Note Purchase Agreement.
 
Table of Contents
I W W, the undersigned has caused this Guaranty to be duly executed by an authorized representative as of this             day of                     ,             .
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
Table of Contents
T J A, dated as of [            ], is made by [            ], a [            ] (the ) in favor of the holders of the Notes (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) under the Note Purchase Agreement (as hereinafter defined).
HIS
OINDER
GREEMENT
"New Obligor"
A. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an, collectively as the ) are parties to that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of July 10, 2012 (as amended, the "") with the Purchasers named therein.
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Existing Obligor"
"Existing Obligors"
Note Purchase Agreement
B. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement, the New Obligor desires to become an obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes.
N T, for and in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement, and other valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, each undersigned hereby consents and agrees as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
1. Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Note Purchase Agreement.
2. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, the New Obligor hereby assumes and agrees to perform all of the terms, restrictions, obligations and conditions of an "Obligor" under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, and, by execution of this Joinder Agreement, is hereby designated an "Obligor" for purposes of, and agrees to be bound by, each and all terms of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes. Without limiting the generality of the forgoing, the New Obligor hereby (a) expressly agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for and assumes all obligations of an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party, and (b) agrees to perform for the holders' benefit and be bound by the terms and covenants applicable to an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party.
 
Table of Contents
3. The undersigned is the duly elected             of the New Obligor, a Subsidiary of the Company, and is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Joinder Agreement to each of you. The execution by the undersigned of this Joinder Agreement shall evidence its consent to and acknowledgment and approval of the terms set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement and by such execution the New Obligor shall be deemed to have made in favor of the holders the representations and warranties set forth in Section 5 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
4. Upon execution of this Joinder Agreement, the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes shall be deemed to be amended as set forth above. Except as amended herein, the terms and provisions of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes are hereby ratified, confirmed and approved in all respects.
5. Any and all notices, requests, certificates and other instruments (including the Notes) may refer to the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes without making specific reference to this Joinder Agreement, but nevertheless all such references shall be deemed to include this Joinder Agreement unless the context shall otherwise require.
6. This Joinder Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument, and any of the parties hereto may execute this Joinder Agreement by signing any such counterpart.
 
Table of Contents
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Joinder Agreement to be executed as of the date and year first above written.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
Table of Contents
Each of the undersigned consents to the terms of this Joinder Agreement and reaffirms, ratifies and confirms in all respects each and every obligation and covenant made by it in the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes executed by each of the undersigned in favor of the holders and that the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes remain the legal, valid and binding obligation of the undersigned enforceable against the undersigned in accordance with their terms.
 
 
Table of Contents
 

Exhibit 99
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL., July 10, 2012  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today announced that the company has completed a private placement of $50 million of senior unsecured Series F notes bearing interest at 3.99% due in 2020. The company intends to use the net proceeds of the debt transaction to fund acquisitions and for general corporate purposes.
The notes have not been registered under the Securities Act or any state securities laws and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements. This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the notes, nor shall it constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale is unlawful.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 17 countries and offers client service capabilities in over 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
CONTACT: Marsha Akin
Director  Investor Relations
630-285-3501/
marsha akin@ajg.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120731170100.txt.gz
TIME:20120731170100
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 31, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, July 31, 2012  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and six-month period ended June 30, 2012. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at . For a description of the non-GAAP measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 7.
www.ajg.com
"We continue to be pleased with our performance. During the second quarter we once again posted strong growth in revenues, we improved profitability margins and we grew earnings per share," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Our combined Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted 15% growth in adjusted total revenues, 5.9% organic growth in base commission and fee revenues, 20% growth in adjusted EBITDAC and 10% growth in adjusted diluted net earnings per share, and improved adjusted EBITDAC margins by 83 basis points."
 
 
"We are well positioned to grow as the insurance rate environment improves and our customers continue to find ways to grow, even in an uncertain economy. Every day, more customers and prospects recognize the expertise and value of our high-quality and client-focused services."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same periods in 2011:
Quarter Ended June 30
 
Six Months Ended June 30
 
The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2012 financial information with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
Brokerage Segment Second Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following is a summary of brokerage acquisition activity for 2012 and 2011:
 
 
The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2012 financial information with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Risk Management Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following table provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Corporate Segment Second Quarter Highlights
 
At June 30, 2012, Gallagher had $675.0 million of long-term borrowings outstanding under three private placement agreements, which are due and payable in various amounts in 2014 through 2023. Gallagher also maintains an unsecured line of credit of $500.0 million that expires July 14, 2014. There were $48.0 million of borrowings outstanding under Gallagher's line of credit facility at June 30, 2012. On July 10, 2012, Gallagher entered into a note purchase agreement, with certain accredited institutional investors, pursuant to which it issued and sold $50.0 million in aggregate principal amount of our 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020, in a private placement. These notes require semi-annual payments of interest that are due in January and July of each year.
Debt, interest and banking
Gallagher has investments in limited liability companies that own 29 clean coal production plants which produce refined coal using propriety technologies owned by Chem-Mod. We believe these plants are qualified to receive refined coal tax credits under IRC Section 45. The fourteen plants which were placed in service prior to December 31, 2009 (which we refer to as the 2009 Era Plants) can receive tax credits through 2019 and the fifteen plants which were placed in service prior to December 31, 2011 (which we refer to as the 2011 Era Plants) can receive tax credits through 2021.
Clean energy investments
 
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Second Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
Consists mostly of external professional fees and other due diligence costs related to acquisitions.
Acquisition costs
Consists of overhead allocations mostly related to corporate staff compensation.
Corporate
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 38% to 40% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 and 2011 was 21.3% and 36.7%, respectively. Gallagher's tax rate for second quarter 2012 was lower than the same period in 2011 and the statutory rate primarily due to the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits earned in 2012. Also, the Brokerage segment's second quarter 2012 effective tax rate was lower than the same period in 2011 due to the resolution of prior year foreign tax matters, which resulted in a net decrease in the income tax provision of $2.3 million.
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, August 1, 2012 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 17 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding investment returns generated by Gallagher's clean energy investments (which own commercial clean coal plants), our corporate income tax rate, the future revenue and earnings impact of recent acquisitions, drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements (continued)
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic revenue measures for each operating segment, adjusted revenues, adjusted compensation and operating expenses, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers may provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in this press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentations of the 2012 and 2011 information, presented in this earnings release, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that may assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after-tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the normalized effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures (continued)
 
 
 
Organic change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to help interested persons analyze the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth excludes the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2012 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2011. For the Risk Management segment, organic change in base domestic and international fees excludes international performance bonus fees and adjusting fees related to international natural disasters to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability or due to the limited-time nature of these revenue sources.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2012 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures, as follows: for EBITDAC (on page 9), for adjusted revenues, adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted diluted net earnings per share (on pages 1 and 2), for organic revenue measures (on pages 2 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for adjusted compensation and operating expenses, adjusted EBITDAC margin and adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments).
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
 
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 11 and notes to second quarter 2012 earnings release on page 11 of 11.
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 11 and notes to second quarter 2012 earnings release on page 11 of 11.
 
 
 
Notes to Second Quarter 2012 Earnings Release
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
DirectorInvestor Relations
630-285-3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120803120633.txt.gz
TIME:20120803120633
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 3, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 63,362 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
August 3, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 63,362 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120806121354.txt.gz
TIME:20120806121354
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On August 6, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 253,674 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
August 6, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 253,674 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling Stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120807104559.txt.gz
TIME:20120807104559
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 7, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 956,155 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 5
August 7, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 956,155 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120808102153.txt.gz
TIME:20120808102153
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On August 8, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 28,402 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
August 8, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 28,402 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120809102757.txt.gz
TIME:20120809102757
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 9, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 709,996 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
August 9, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 709,996 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120815154643.txt.gz
TIME:20120815154643
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On August 15, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 99,338 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
August 15, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 99,338 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20120905123116.txt.gz
TIME:20120905123116
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") issued a press release on August 24, 2012 announcing that J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., the Company's Chairman, President and CEO, will speak at the Keefe Bruyette & Woods 2012 Insurance Conference in New York on Wednesday, September 5, 2012 at 11:05 a.m. ET.
The presentation slides for this conference are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. In addition, the Company's August 2012 Investment Profile, to be distributed to attendees at the conference, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2. Both documents may also be used at other investor conferences, and can be accessed at the Company's website at www.ajg.com/ir.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.
Presented by:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
Chairman, President and CEO
Douglas K. Howell
CFO
Investment Presentation August, 2012
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This presentation contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this presentation, the words "anticipates," "expects," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this presentation include, but are not limited to, statements relating to: (i) improvements in the economy and rate environment; (ii) Gallagher's capabilities for growth and expansion; (iii) trends in Gallagher's acquisition strategy and planned levels of acquisition activity; (iv) the integration of recent acquisitions (including Heath Lambert); (v) drivers of organic growth in Gallagher's core businesses; (vi) anticipated future results or performance (including margins) of any segment or Gallagher as a whole; (vii) Gallagher's stock performance (including expected future dividend payments); (viii) future debt levels; (ix) expected uses of cash; (x) international opportunities; (xi) productivity and expense reduction initiatives; and (xii) potential future developments in, and income and tax credits that could be generated by, Gallagher's clean-energy investments. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:  - changes in worldwide and national economic conditions (such as a European debt crisis), changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape, and the difficulties inherent in combining the cultures and systems of different companies could impact (i) through (xi) above; and  - uncertainties related to Gallagher's clean-energy investments, including uncertainties related to political and regulatory risks, such as potential actions by Congress or challenges by the IRS eliminating or reducing the availability of tax credits under IRC Section 45 retroactively and/or going forward; maintenance of long-term permits needed to operate the plants; the ability to find new operating sites, if necessary; the ability to maintain and find co-investors; utilities' future use of, or demand for, coal; plant operational risks, including supply-chain risks; the potential for divergent business objectives by co-investors and other stakeholders; intellectual property risks; and environmental risks, could impact (xii) above.
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
This presentation includes references to Adjusted Revenues, Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio, Organic Growth, EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert and Cash Generation, which are measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided herein.
Revenue and Expense Measures  Gallagher believes that Adjusted Revenues and Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio, as defined below, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future outlook for Gallagher. Gallagher believes that Organic Growth provides a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2012 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed Organic Growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management Segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
Adjusted Revenues and Adjusted Operating Expense are defined as revenues and operating expense, respectively, each adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges and acquisition related integration costs, as applicable. Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio is calculated by dividing Adjusted Operating Expense by Adjusted Revenues. Acquisition related integration costs include costs related to transactions not expected to occur on an ongoing basis in the future once we fully assimilate the applicable acquisition. These costs are typically associated with redundant workforce, extra lease space, duplicate services and external costs incurred to assimilate the acquisition with our IT related systems  - Organic Growth used on pages 7, 8 and 9 is the change in the base commission and fee revenues, which excludes the first twelve months of net commission and fee revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each period presented. Organic growth used on page 24 is the change in commission, fee and supplemental commission revenues, which excludes the first twelve months of net commission, fee and supplemental in commission revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine the revenue growth that is associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, organic growth in both calculations defined above exclude the impact of contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying current period foreign exchange rates to the same periods in prior years.
The most directly comparable GAAP measure for Adjusted Revenues and Organic Growth is revenues. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, revenues were $1,341 million, $462 million and $1,803 million, respectively, in 2010, $1,556 million, $549 million and $2,105 million, respectively, in 2011, $721 million, $264 million and $985 million, respectively, in the first half of 2011, and $859 million, $285 million and $1,144 million, respectively, in the first half of 2012. Additionally, for the Brokerage Segment, revenues were $849 million, $926 million, $1,001 million, $1,071million, $1,114 million, $1,188 million and $1,276 million in 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008 and 2009, respectively.
Earnings Measures  Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin and Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC Margin and Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert are presented to improve the comparability of Gallagher's results between periods by eliminating the impact of certain items that have a high degree of variability.
EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables.
 - Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, earnout related compensation
charges, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, acquisition related integration costs and litigation settlements.
 - Adjusted EBITDAC Margin is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC divided by Adjusted Revenues.
 - Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to exclude the EBITDAC associated with the acquired Heath Lambert operations divided by Adjusted Revenues, as further adjusted to exclude the revenues associated with the acquired Heath Lambert operations.
The most directly comparable GAAP measure for these non-GAAP earnings measures is earnings from continuing operations. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, earnings from continuing operations was $136 million, $31 million and $167 million, respectively, in 2010, $140 million, $34 million and $174 million, respectively, in 2011, $62 million, $13 million and $75 million, respectively, in the first half of 2011, and $75 million, $22 million and $97 million, respectively, in the first half of 2012.
Cash Generation  Gallagher defines this measure as adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to add back stock compensation expense (a non-cash charge) and to deduct capital expenditures, interest paid on corporate debt, corporate overhead expenses and income taxes paid. Gallagher considers Cash Generation as a way to measure net cash generated from its operations on an ongoing basis.
Reconciliations  For a reconciliation of Cash Generation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure, please see page 55.
For all other measures, please see "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures" on Gallagher's Web site at ajg.com under "Investor Relations".
 
Snapshot of Gallagher
Brokerage Segment
3/4 of revenue
We sell insurance and consult on insurance programs
P&C and benefits
Retail and wholesale
Risk Management Segment
1/4 of revenue
We adjust claims and help companies reduce their losses
Workers compensation, liability, managed care, property and auto
Modest amount of storm/quake claims
 
Brokerage Segment Revenues
Retail-P/C 53%
Domestic 79%
Wholesale 22%
Retail-Benefits 25%
International 21%
5
 
Risk Management Revenues
Workers Compensation 67%
Domestic 78%
Property 7%
Liability 26%
International 22%
6
 
Brokerage Segment  1st Half 2012
Adjusted Revenues $1,000 20% $858 $750 $718
$500
1H 2011 1H 2012
Organic Growth
5.0% 4.2% 4.0% 3.0%
1.9%
2.0% 1.0% 0.0%
1H 2011 1H 2012
Adjusted EBITDAC
23%
$200 188 $180 $160 $153 $140 $120 $100
1H 2011 1H 2012
Adjusted EDITDAC Margin
24.0% Excluding Heath Lambert
23.0%
22.4%
22.0%
21.4%
21.0%
20.0%
1H 2011 1H 2012
(in $M) See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
7
 
Risk Management Segment  1st Half 2012
Adjusted Revenues 8% $300
$275 $264 $250
$225
1H 2011 1H 2012
Organic Growth
9.0%
8.0% .7% 7.0%
5.9%
6.0% 5.0% 4.0%
1H 2011 1H 2012
Adjusted EBITDAC 13% $60 $50
$40 $41 $30 $20
1H 2011 1H 2012
Adjusted EDITDAC Margin
17.0%
1%
16.0%
15.4%
15.0%
14.0%
1H 2011 1H 2012
(in $M) See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
8
 
Brokerage & Risk Mgmt Combined  1st Half 2012
Adjusted Revenues
16%
$1,250
1,143 $982 $1,000
$750
1H 2011 1H 2012
Organic Growth
6.0% .2% 5.0% 4.0% 3.0% 3.0% 2.0% 1.0%
1H 2011 1H 2012
Adjusted EBITDAC
21%
$250
234 $225 $200 $193 $175
1H 2011 1H 2012
Adjusted EDITDAC Margin
Excluding Heath Lambert
21.0% 20.7%
20.0% 19.7%
19.0%
1H 2011 1H 2012
(in $M) See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
9
 
Maintaining a Prudent Balance Sheet
Gallagher S&P 1000 Total Debt $723.0 Stockholders' Equity $1472.9 Net Debt to Total Capital 28% 27% Net Debt to Adjusted EBITDAC 1.2x 1.8x
$'s in millions. Using Gallagher's TTM combined Brokerage and Risk Management EBITDAC as of 06/30/12. Net Debt for Gallagher reflects total debt outstanding at 06/30/12 less $137m of cash on hand and available for general corporate purposes. Source for S&P 1000 data: Bloomberg as of 08/24/12.
Does not include private debt placement of $50 million completed on 7/10/12 which increases Net Debt to Adjusted EBITDAC to 1.4x.
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
10
 
Dividends Per Share
$1.36*
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
1984 2012
*Indicated  On July 26, 2012, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.34 per share third quarter 2012 dividend.
11
 
Environment
Economy Carrier Position Rates
12
 
Cautiously Improving Economy?
Real GDP Growth
4% 3% 2% 1% 0% -1% -2% -3% -4%
Real GDP in billons of chained 2005 dollars. Source for data: Bureau of Economic Analysis. 2012 based on the third estimate of a 1.9% annual growth rate for 1Q 2012.
Jobs
140,000 135,000 130,000 125,000 120,000 115,000
Total Nonfarm Employees (in thousands) seasonally adjusted. Source for data: Bureau of Labor Statistics. July 2012 data is preliminary.
6% Short-term Rates
4% 2% 0%
Average Annual Effective Fed Funds Rates. 2012 data as of 06/30. Source for data: Bloomberg
75 Business Confidence
50
25
Purchasing Managers Index. Source: Institute for Supply Management
13
 
Firming Indicators for Carriers -Yet Ample Capacity Remains
Combined Ratios
120 118.3 115
110 107.4 105 100 93.8 95 90
Source for calendar year combined ratio data: AM Best. Excludes certain large mortgage insurance and personal lines companies to better depict Gallagher's primary markets. Catastrophe & Prior Period Development impact on Combined Ratios based on public disclosures of larger U.S. commercial carriers where Gallagher places business.
Premium/Statutory Surplus
1.6x 1.4x 1.2x 1.0x 0.8x 0.6x
Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2001  2011. Prior to 2001, sources are A.M. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute.
7.0% Investment Yields
6.5% 6.0% 5.5% 5.0% 4.5% 4.0% 3.5% 3.0%
Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2001  2011. Prior to 2001, sources are A.M. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute.
$600 Statutory Surplus
$500 $400 $300 $200 $100
($Billions)
Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2004  2011. Prior to 2004, sources are A.M. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute.
14
 
So, A 100 Combined Ratio Isn't What It Once Was
110.0 ROE 15.9%
105.0
100.0
95.0 ROE 7.6%
90.0
85.0
Combined Combined 80.0 Ratio Ratio
1979 2010
Extrapolating from this analysis, a combined ratio in the low 90's is required to generate risk appropriate ROEs in the current environment
* 2010 figures are a return on average surplus and exclude mortgage and financial guaranty insurers.
Source: Robert P. Hartwig's Insurance Information Institute presentation from 7/17/12 using A.M. Best and ISO data.
15
 
Carrier Response  Rate Change
CIABChange in Average Commercial Rates
Constructed using Counsel of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB) data.
16
 
Commercial P&C Pricing Thru 1st Half 2012
160
150
140 CPI
132
130
120
110
Rates
100 93 90
80
Commercial Rate Index reflects the cost of P&C premiums relative to the year 2000. Constructed using Counsel of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB) data. CPI index uses data from the Bureau of Labor Statistics.
17
 
Firming Market Versus Classic Hard Market
Classic Hard Market
Firming Market
1999 2005 2012
Average Commercial Premium Rate Changes by Account Size
Source: The Council of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB). Chart prepared by Barclays Research.
Captions in the above chart were overlaid by Gallagher and do not necessarily reflect the opinions of the CIAB and/or Barclays Research.
18
 
Firming Market Versus Classic Hard Market
Classic Hard Market Firming Market
Moderate price increases for an Short-lived radical price increases extended period of time
Clients can't get coverage Clients can still get coverage
Business forced chaotically into Business moves more orderly into surplus lines surplus lines Carriers' urgent need to restore Carriers restore profitability orderly profitability
Lack of capacity Adequate capacity
19
 
Current Environment
Better for Clients
Better for Carriers
Better for Brokers
20
 
Plan For Growth  Organic
21
 
Gallagher's Sales Culture Overcomes
15.0%
10.0% 10.0%
AJG 8.1% 5.0% 3.1% 5.0% 2.0% 2.0% 2.0% -0.8% 0.0% -1.7% -2.4% 0.2% CIAB -5.0% -4.1% -5.2% -5.4% -5.6% -10.0% -8.0% -11.0% -12.1% -15.0% 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011
Gallagher's Brokerage Segment Organic Growth including Supplemental Commissions. See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
*Average change in Commercial Rates 22
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Own Focus Sales
Mgmt. Cross Into Tools Selling Hire Niches
and Organic
Experienced Training
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Global Expansion
23
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Own Focus Sales
Mgmt. Cross Into Tools Selling Hire Niches
and Organic
Experienced Training
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Global Expansion
24
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Own Focus Sales
Mgmt. Cross Into Tools Selling Hire Niches
and Organic
Experienced Training
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Global Expansion
25
 
Simplified Organic Illustration
+10% +2% (-5%) +2%
Subject $1.0m SEE to net NEXT impact of PAGE Other Revenue PAGE
Drivers
Renewal New Lost Impact of Impact of Other Current Base Business Business Rate on Exposure Revenue Year Prior Year Renewals on Drivers Revenue Renewals
All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not estimates of Gallagher's future performance.
26
 
Organic Illustration  Other Revenue Drivers
1. Client opt in
2. Client M&A
3. Expand share of wallet
4. Cross selling in AJG
1. Client opt out
2. Client M&A
3. Client out-of-business
4. Client moves to self insurance model
27
 
Plan For Growth  M&A
28
 
M&A Looking Forward  Opportunities Continue
Numerous mited Gallagher's Vast Pipeline Core Specialties olidators Competency Domestic and International Retail P&C
Markets Highly Fragmented
Wholesale Culture 18,000 agents/brokers Benefits in the U.S. Gallagher Proven History of International Doing the Baby boomers Deal looking for exit strategy MGA
Ability to MGU Integrate Need Gallagher's Captive Expertise
29
 
Current Gallagher U.S. Locations
30
 
Larger Cities With Expansion Potential
Cities with population of 100,000+ where Gallagher has no presence.
31
 
International Correspondent Brokers
Client Capabilities in More Than 110 Countries
32
 
Strong Acquisition Momentum
Domestic Brokerage Intl Brokerage (Ex: HL) Heath Lambert Risk Management
$300 $250 $200 $150 $100 $50
$0
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 YTD July 2012
Annualized revenues acquired (in $Ms).
33
 
International Acquisition Deal Flow Continues
Increased Ownership Specialised Contego to 100% Broking
Underwriting Associates FirstCity UK
Australia
Partnership
UK
Oxygen
Benefits Risk &
Insurance Woodbrook
Reward
Underwriting
UK Managers
UK
UK
Insurance ITI
Dialogue Solutions AJG Specialised
Limited Singapore Broking Acquired 40% 78.5% INT'L Associates
UK Ownership Ownership
Australia
Heath Lambert
UK Lonmar
Global Risks CGM Blenheim UK Gallagher
Group Increased Park Ownership to 80%
UK Caribbean
Binder/Wholesaler
2008 2010 2011 2012
34
 
Gallagher Heath Update
Heath Lambert Acquired May 2011
 -  Positions Gallagher in top 10 U.K. brokers
 -  Additional distribution network in 15 U.K. locations outside London
 -  Added new retail capabilities to existing London wholesale operation
 -  Executing:
 -  Bolt-on acquisition strategy  Getting access to deals not previously available
 -  Hiring Strategy  Attracting experienced producers and teams
 -  Integration as planned and on schedule
 -  Integration costs of about $.02 to $.03/quarter through mid-2013
35
 
Productivity and Quality
36
 
Optimizing
Productivity Established
& Quality Offshore Controlling
Utilizing Leveraging Sourcing to Sales Force Manage Management Expenses
Tools Improving Productivity and
Quality ng
Investing in ivity Business DMS Intelligence kflow
Standardizing Real Estate Processes and Footprint Systems
37
 
Reasons for Offshore Centers of Excellence
Reduce Costs Foster Innovation
Increase Speed to Market
Focus on Core Improve Quality
38
 
Back Office Infrastructure  2004
EMAIL Global Corporate Systems
39
 
Back OfficeToday
GENERAL LEDGER
CORPORATE INTRANET DATA WAREHOUSE
EMAIL Global HR/PAYROLL
Corporate Systems
REAL ESTATE LEASING DOCUMENT MANAGEMENT
T&E PLANNING
40
 
Current Front Office Activity
CRM  CUSTOMER RELATIONSHIP
EXTERNAL CLIENT DATA PROSPECTING TOOLS
Divisional Sales Systems
CLIENT CENTRALIZED COMMUNICATION AGENCY SYSTEM
TOOLS
INTERNAL BROKER SOCIAL MEDIA
41
 
Quality Metrics
Efficiency Improvements Drive Quality
Reduced policy delivery from Achieved 98% quality rate 30 to 10 days
Reduced certificate of insurance Improved quality rate to 99% delivery expense by 20%
Implemented claims adjusters Realized 20% improvement on enhanced quality audit programs adjuster quality rate
Standardized and automated data Better and more timely information to
capturing for proposal generationclients for renewal reducing production time by 80+%
42
 
Reducing Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio
Brokerage
21.0%
20.3% 20.0%
19.0%
18.0%
17.4%
17.1% 17.0%
16.0%
1H 2008 1H 2011 1H 2012
Risk Management
26.0%
25.2% 25.0%
24.1% 24.0%
23.0%
1H 2008 1H 2011 1H 2012
See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
43
 
AJG2012 #1 Overall Client Satisfaction for Large Corporations
-Greenwich Associates
AJG Intl  2012 Ins Broking Company of the YearReactions
Magazine
AJG Intl  2012 Best Broker M&A Deal of the Year  Reactions
Magazine
Gallagher Singapore  2012 Best Trade Credit Insurance Broker  Asia/Pacific
SBA Gallagher2011 Services to the Community
Award  ANZIIF
GB UK2012 Investor in People
UK National Standard
Australis Group Underwriting -Underwriting Agency of the Year finalist  ANZIIF
GB2011 Mid-Market Buyers Choice TPA Expertise Honoree  Business Insurance
44
 
Culture
45
 
Maintain Unique Culture
46
 
Gallagher Recognized by Ethisphere as One of the World's Most Ethical Companies in 2012
 -  Industry-leading commitment to ethics and dedication to integrity
 -  Chosen for:
Promoting ethical business standards and practicesExceeding legal compliance standardsInnovating to benefit the publicDemonstrating that corporate citizenship is tied to company success
n
n
n
n
 -  Globally, only 145 organizations named
47
 
Employee Engagement Survey Results
When a customer is dissatisfied, I can usually correct the problem to his/her satisfaction.
Benchmark Gallagher
Average Top Quartile Total Producers
How would you rate your Unit as a place to work compared to other companies?
Benchmark Gallagher
Average Top Quartile Total Producers
I can see myself working here 12 months from now.
Benchmark Gallagher
Average Top Quartile Total Producers
48
 
Why Invest?
Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns include reinvesting all dividends at the ex-dividend date.
49
 
QUESTIONS &
ANSWERS
For Additional Information
Marsha Akin
Director  Investor Relations
Marsha_Akin@ajg.com
Phone: 630-285-3501
 
APPENDIX
Adjusted Cash Generation for 2008 to 2011 (Unaudited -in $ millions )
2008 2009 2010 2011
Earnings from continuing operationsBrokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined $132.4 $154.4 $166.8 $173.5
Provision for income taxes 85.1 96.5 108.0 107.7
Depreciation 29.8 30.5 31.9 35.4
Amortization 43.7 55.0 60.8 79.3
Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables - 4.1 (2.6) (6.2)
EBITDAC Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined 291.0 340.5 364.9 389.7
Gains from books of business sales and other (23.8) (11.6) (5.9) (5.5)
Net supplemental commission timing 6.1 1.4 (14.7) -
Workforce & lease termination-related charges 8.1 14.7 7.5 8.2
Acquisition-related adjustments - - - 7.0
Litigation settlements - 2.2 6.3 -
Heath Lambert integration costs - - - 16.0
GAB Robins integration costs - - 3.6 13.0
Adjusted EBITDAC Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined 281.4 347.2 361.7 428.4
Stock compensation expense 18.3 16.1 15.6 21.1
Capital expenditures (32.0) (23.5) (25.4) (40.0)
Interest and banking costs (28.9) (29.5) (36.4) (43.8)
Corporate and acquisition costs (5.4) (6.2) (12.1) (14.5)
Income taxes paid (40.1) (27.7) (37.6) (32.0)
Adjusted cash generation $193.3 $276.4 $265.8 $319.2
Dividends paid $118.5 $127.9 $133.5 $145.8
Dividendspaid as % of adjusted cash generation 61% 46% 50% 46%
See information regarding Non-GAAP financial measures on page 3. 51

Exhibit 99.2
 
Investment ProfilE
NYSE: AJG
AuGusT
2012
Operating Segments
Brokerage Risk Management
"Every day at Gallagher, we focus on organic growth, mergers and acquisitions, operational excellence and productivity, and our culture. Our team continues to perform nicely in all of these areas."
J. PATRICK GALLAGHER, JR.
Chairman, President and CEO
p.2 Brokerage Segment p.3 Brokerage Acquisition Strategy p.4 Risk Management Segment p.5 Corporate Segment p.6 Why Invest?
ajg.com
GROWING VALUE : Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and third-party property/ casualty claims administrators. Gallagher generates approximately 79% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 21% derived primarily in the United Kingdom, Australia, Bermuda, Canada, the Caribbean and New Zealand.
Total Stockholder Returns January 1, 2008August 24, 2012
100%
AJG
80% 84% 60% 40% 20%
S&P 500
0% 7% 20%
S&P 40% Financial
43%
60%
80%
JAN'08 JAN'09 JAN'10 JAN'11 JAN'12
Source data: Bloomberg. Total Stockholder Returns assume dividend reinvestment.
Highlights as of August 24, 2012
Price $35.68 52-week high/low $38.24$25.27 Trailing 12-mos. revenues $ 2.3 billion* Market cap $ 4.2 billion* Indicated annual dividend $ 1.36** Yield 3.8% Shares outstanding 121.0 million* End of fiscal year December 31 Number of employees 12,937*
*At June 30, 2012
**On July 26, 2012, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.34 per share third-quarter 2012 dividend.
 
BROKERAGE SEGMENT
approxiMately 75% oF reVeNUes
Gallagher's Brokerage Segment does business through a network of more than 300 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 16 other countries. In addition, Gallagher has developed the Gallagher Global Alliance of independent insurance brokers and consultants, which enables it to provide coverages and services to its clients in more than 110 countries around the world.
Retail Insurance Brokerage Operations
78% oF Broker aGe seGMeNt reVeNUes
Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property/ casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients.
Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into more than 190 geographic profit centers located primarily throughout the United States, Canada, the Caribbean, the United Kingdom and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 67% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base.
The concentrated focus of these niche/practice groups allows for highly targeted marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage.
Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: mergers and acquisitions; its niche/ practice groups and middle-market accounts; cross-selling other brokerage products and services to existing customers; and developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives and deductible plans/self insurance.
Niche/practice GroUps
Agribusiness International Benefits Aviation & Aerospace Marine Captive Consulting Manufacturing Construction Personal Cyber Liability Professional Groups Energy Private Equity Entertainment Public Entity Executive Benefits Real Estate Global Risks Religious/Not-for-Profit Health and Welfare Restaurant Healthcare Retirement Healthcare Analytics Scholastic Higher Education Technology/Telecom Hospitality Transportation Human Resources Voluntary Benefits
Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on the insurance brokerage industry. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. After several years of premium rate reductions driven by competitive market conditions, commercial P/C pricing began to rebound in the fourth quarter of 2011 and rates continue to increase in 2012. According to a second quarter 2012 market survey conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers, U.S. commercial P/C premiums rose by an average of 4.3% in the second quarter of 2012.
2Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
Significant lines of coverage & consulting service capabilities
401(k) Solutions Fire 403(b) Solutions General Liability Aviation Life Casualty Marine Commercial Auto Medical Dental Product Liability Directors & Officers Professional Liability Liability Property Disability Wind Earthquake Workers Compensation Errors & Omissions
GallaGher DeliVers GloBal BrokeraGe capaBilities
In addition to the 17 countries where Gallagher now has operations, the company actively manages business relationships with a network of approved independent brokers that expands the P/C brokerage capabilities it offers multinational clients to more than 110 countries around the world. Gallagher Global Alliance (GGA) members are selected based upon common business philosophies and their capabilities within their respective countries. GGA offers both strength and flexibility, enabling global servicing of Gallagher clients, and the clients of other GGA members, no matter where in the world they operate. Gallagher also offers employee benefits brokerage and consulting services to clients throughout North America and the United Kingdom. Through Gallagher International Benefit Services (GIBS), a joint venture formed in 2011 between Gallagher and IBIS Advisors, Gallagher can now handle the international benefits needs of its U.S. clients in more than 90 countries around the world.
Wholesale Insurance Brokerage Operations 22% oF 2011 Broker aGe seGMeNt reVeNUes
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to-place insurance programs. Wholesale revenues are generated through sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the insurance carrier.
Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are organized into more than 65 geographic profit centers located primarily in the United States and Bermuda, and through its approved Lloyd's of London broker. In certain cases Gallagher acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts as a managing general agent or managing general underwriter, handling specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers.
More than 75% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues come from retail brokers and agents not affiliated with Gallagher. Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's U.S. wholesale brokerage operation ranks as the largest domestic managing general agency/underwriting manager, according to Business Insurance magazine. That operation places a strong focus on binding, programs, standard lines aggregation and open brokerage business.
Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations by increasing its number of broker clients, by developing new managing general agency/underwriter programs, and through mergers and acquisitions.
BrokeraGe seGMeNt acqUisitioN strateGy
Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment growth strategy has two primary components: organic growth through new business production and the strategic acquisition of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and integrated approximately 313 acquisitions from 1985 through June 2012, substantially all within the Brokerage Segment. Most were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desirable market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that generate between $1 million and $10 million in annual revenues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through acquisitions and joint ventures, where the company typically begins its relationship with an equity position.
Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer significant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on: a corporate culture that matches Gallagher's sales-oriented culture; a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater resources; clearly defined financial criteria.
Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its attractiveness as a merger partner. Gallagher believes that growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
2012 Investment Profile3
 
RISK MANAGEMENT SEGMENT
approxiMately 25% oF reVeNUes
Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that self-insure and insurance companies that outsource their claims-handling services.
Gallagher's Risk Management operation also offers managed care, information management and appraisal services, as well as consultative services and training programs that help clients mitigate losses, combat claims fraud and maintain regulatory compliance.
Approximately 67% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-related claims, 26% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims, and 7% are from property-related claims. In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disability management (employee absence management) programs, information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services, investigative services and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, generally negotiated in advance, on a per-claim or per-service basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed.
Gallagher manages its third-party claims management operations through a network of approximately 110 offices located throughout the United States, the United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 companies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 86% of Gallagher's risk management revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as their retail or wholesale insurance broker.
The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant growth prospects through the next several years to come from new business with Fortune 1000 companies, governmental agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims departments. In addition, the Risk Management Segment may grow in the future through mergers and acquisitions.
expertise
Real-time Claims Management Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Appraisal Services Litigation Management
Information Management Managed Care Services Risk Control Services Safety Programs
Settlement Management Education & Training Investigative Services
information regarding Non-Gaap Measures
This investment profile includes references to Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC Margin Excluding Heath Lambert, which are performance measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, GAAP information. EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, workforce-related charges, acquisition-related integration costs and litigation settlements. Adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to exclude the EBITDAC associated with the acquisition of Heath Lambert operations, divided by total revenues, as adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts and the revenues associated with the acquired Heath Lambert operations. For the non-GAAP measures set forth on page 6 of this profile, the most directly comparable GAAP measure is earnings from continuing operations, which, for the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments on a combined basis, was $132 million in 2008, $154 million in 2009, $167 million in
2010 and $174 million in 2011. Please see "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures" on Gallagher's Web site at ajg.com under "Investor Relations" for the purpose of each non-GAAP measure used and a reconciliation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure.
4Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
 
CORPORATE SEGMENT
Gallagher's debt, clean energy investments, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs are reported in this segment.
cleaN eNerGy iNVestMeNts at jUNe 30, 2012
Gallagher owns positions in various commercial operations that help coal-fired utilities eliminate large quantities of harmful emissions.
1. Gallagher holds investment positions in 29 commercial clean coal production plants of which 14 were built and began production in 2009 and 15 were built and began production in 2011.
Of the 14 total 2009-Era Plants, 12 produce refined coal under long-term agreements with utilities. Gallagher is currently seeking co-investors and long-term utility customers for the remaining 2 plants.
Of the 15 total 2011-Era Plants, 5 produce refined coal under long-term agreements with utilities. Gallagher has a signed, long-term production agreement for one plant and also has non-binding, long-term production agreements for 2 other plants. All three of these plants are currently not operating. Gallagher is currently seeing co-investors and long-term utility customers for the remaining 7 plants.
Gallagher believes all these plants qualify for tax credits under Section 45 of the Internal Revenue Code. See Gallagher's most recent earnings release at ajg.com for management's latest guidance on earnings and additional information on these investments.
2. Gallagher owns 42% of Chem-Mod LLC, which possesses rights, information and technologies used for the reduction of unwanted emissions created during the combustion of coal. Various clean coal production plants, including those in which Gallagher has invested, license and use Chem-Mod's technologies in the production of refined fuel. See Gallagher's most recent earnings release atajg.com for management's latest guidance on earnings and additional information on this investment.
information regarding Forward-looking statements
This investment profile contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment profile, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this investment profile include, but are not limited to, statements related to expected dividend amounts, anticipated areas of revenue growth within the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments, Gallagher's acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, and future income and tax credits generated by and developments relating to Gallagher's clean energy investments. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following: changes in worldwide and national economic conditions, changes in premium rates and insurance markets generally, and changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape could impact Gallagher's future dividends, revenue growth and acquisition program; and uncertainties related to Gallagher's IRC Section 45 investments, including uncertainties related to political and regulatory risks, including potential actions by Congress or challenges by the IRS eliminating or reducing the availability of tax credits under IRC Section 45 retroactively and/or going forward; maintenance of long-term permits needed to operate the plants; the ability to find new operating sites, if necessary; the ability to maintain and find co-investors; utilities' future use of, or demand for, coal; plant operational risks, including supply-chain risks; the potential for divergent business objectives by co-investors and other stakeholders; intellectual property risks; and environmental
risks; could impact Gallagher's future income and tax credits generated by and developments relating to its clean energy investments.
Refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
2012 Investment Profile5
 
Why INvEST?
Supplemental quarterly data as of June 30, 2012 is available at ajg.com.
Adjusted Brokerage EBITDAC & Risk Management Growth*
(in millions)
$500 13% 15% CAGR CAGR
400 $428 300 $281
200
100
0
2008 2011
Adjusted Brokerage EBITDAC & Risk Management Margins*
Excluding Heath Lambert
25%
20 20.7% 17.2%
15 10 5
0
2008 2011
Dividends Per Share
$1.36**
$1.50
1.20
16% Average Annual Increase
0.90
0.60
0.30 $0.03 0
1984 2012
*See Non-GAAP disclosure on page 4.
**IndicatedOn July 26, 2012, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.34 per share third-quarter 2012 dividend.
FOR A DDIT IONA L I N FOR M AT ION:
Marsha J. AkinDirector-investor relations
630.285.3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
6Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20121030162535.txt.gz
TIME:20121030162535
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On October 30, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, October 30, 2012  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and nine-month period ended September 30, 2012. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at . For a description of the non-GAAP measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 7.
www.ajg.com
"Our third quarter was another strong quarter," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "Our combined Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted 12% growth in adjusted total revenues, 4.2% organic growth in base commission and fee revenues and 18% growth in adjusted EBITDAC and we improved adjusted EBITDAC margins by 121 basis points."
 
 
"The rate environment continues to improve and portions of the economy continue to show improvement. More than ever, our clients rely on us to navigate through the changing and more complex risk environment, and our client-focused professionals are delivering every day."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same periods in 2011:
Quarter Ended September 30
 
 
Nine Months Ended September 30
 
The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2012 financial information with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
Brokerage Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following is a summary of brokerage acquisition activity for 2012 and 2011:
 
 
The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2012 financial information with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Risk Management Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following table provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights
 
At September 30, 2012, Gallagher had $725.0 million of long-term borrowings outstanding under four private placement agreements, which are due and payable in various amounts in 2014 through 2023. Gallagher also maintains an unsecured line of credit of $500.0 million that expires July 14, 2014. There were no borrowings outstanding under Gallagher's line of credit facility at September 30, 2012.
Debt, interest and banking
Gallagher has investments in limited liability companies that own 29 clean coal production plants which produce refined coal using proprietary technologies owned by Chem-Mod. We believe these plants are qualified to receive refined coal tax credits under IRC Section 45. The fourteen plants which were placed in service prior to December 31, 2009 (which we refer to as the 2009 Era Plants) can receive tax credits through 2019 and the fifteen plants which were placed in service prior to December 31, 2011 (which we refer to as the 2011 Era Plants) can receive tax credits through 2021.
Clean energy investments
 
 
 
 
Corporate Segment Third Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
Consists mostly of external professional fees and other due diligence costs related to acquisitions.
Acquisition costs
Consists of overhead allocations mostly related to corporate staff compensation.
Corporate
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 38% to 40% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 and 2011 was 19.1% and 34.2%, respectively. Gallagher's tax rate for third quarter 2012 was lower than the same period in 2011 and the statutory rate primarily due to the impact of IRC Section 45 tax credits earned in 2012.
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, October 31, 2012 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 17 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 110 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding investment returns generated by Gallagher's clean energy investments (which own commercial clean coal plants), our corporate income tax rate, the future revenue and earnings impact of recent acquisitions, drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements (continued)
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, organic revenue measures for each operating segment, adjusted revenues, adjusted compensation and operating expenses, adjusted compensation expense ratio and adjusted operating expense ratio. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers may provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information related to organic revenues and EBITDAC, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in this press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentations of the 2012 and 2011 information, presented in this earnings release, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that may assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after-tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the normalized effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert, and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures (continued)
 
 
 
Organic change in base commission and fee revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission and fee revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to help interested persons analyze the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, change in organic growth excludes the impact of supplemental commission and contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2012 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2011. For the Risk Management segment, organic change in base domestic and international fee revenues excludes international performance bonus fees and New Zealand earthquake claims administration to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability or due to the limited-time nature of these revenue sources.
Organic Revenues
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2012 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures, as follows: for EBITDAC (on page 9), for adjusted revenues, adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted diluted net earnings per share (on pages 1 and 2), for organic revenue measures (on pages 2 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for adjusted compensation and operating expenses, adjusted EBITDAC margin and adjusted EBITDAC margin excluding Heath Lambert (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments). Reported compensation and operating expense ratios can be found in the supplemental quarterly data available at .
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
www.ajg.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 11 and notes to third quarter 2012 earnings release on page 11 of 11.
 
 
Notes to Third Quarter 2012 Earnings Release
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
DirectorInvestor Relations
630-285-3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20121102105947.txt.gz
TIME:20121102105947
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 2, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 236,008 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
November 2, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 236,008 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20121218125802.txt.gz
TIME:20121218125802
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 18, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 42,314 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 18, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 42,314 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholders described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20121219124306.txt.gz
TIME:20121219124306
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 19, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 17,026 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 19, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 17,026 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20121227163824.txt.gz
TIME:20121227163824
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On December 27, 2012, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 39,552 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
December 27, 2012
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 39,552 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20130107112812.txt.gz
TIME:20130107112812
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 7, 2013, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") registered for resale 2,219 shares of Gallagher common stock pursuant to a prospectus supplement under its automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-166533), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Registration Statement). The opinion and consent of Seth Diehl, Esq., Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, as to the validity of these shares of common stock, filed as Exhibits 5 and 23 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, respectively, are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 5
January 7, 2013
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
The Gallagher Centre
Two Pierce Place
Itasca, IL 60143-3141
Ladies and Gentlemen:
In my capacity as Senior Counsel, Corporate & Securities, of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), I am furnishing this opinion in connection with the resale registration of 2,219 shares (the "") of the Company's common stock, par value $1.00 per share (the ""), which shares may be sold from time to time by the selling stockholder described in the prospectus supplement of even date herewith (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission and the related prospectus dated May 5, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Prospectus Supplement, the "") that form part of the Company's effective registration statement on Form S-3ASR (Reg. No. 333-166533) (the ""). I am delivering this letter pursuant to your request, in accordance with Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K.
Company
Shares
Common Stock
Prospectus Supplement
Base Prospectus
Prospectus
Registration Statement
I have examined such documents, records and instruments as I have deemed necessary or advisable as a basis for expressing the opinion set forth below. In arriving at this opinion, I have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity with the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies. As to certain facts material to this opinion letter, I have relied without independent verification upon oral and written statements and representations of officers and other representatives of the Company.
Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications and limitations stated herein, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
This opinion is limited in all respects to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (including the statutory provisions, all applicable provisions of the Delaware constitution and reported judicial decisions interpreting the foregoing), and I express no opinion as to the laws, statutes, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction.
I hereby consent to the inclusion of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and the reference to me under the caption "Validity of Securities" in the Prospectus forming part of the Registration Statement. In giving these consents, I do not thereby admit that I am within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act of 1933. This opinion is expressly limited to the matters set forth above and I render no opinion, whether by implication or otherwise, as to any other matters relating to the Company.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20130129172854.txt.gz
TIME:20130129172854
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 29, 2013, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2012. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, January 29, 2013  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2012. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at www.ajg.com. For a description of the non-GAAP measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 7.
"We had a strong finish to 2012 and we are well positioned for continued success in 2013," said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "In the fourth quarter, our combined Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted 14% growth in adjusted total revenues, 4.6% organic growth in base commission and fee revenues, 17% growth in adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted EBITDAC margins improved by 50 basis points."
 
 
 
 
"As we look towards 2013, we see a rate environment that is still showing signs of firming in many lines, clients that are finding ways to grow their businesses even in these uncertain times, a strong M&A pipeline, and an operating environment where we can control our costs and improve our productivity. Gallagher's sales and high-quality service culture is thriving and we are in an excellent position for success in 2013."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same periods in 2011:
 
 
 
- The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2012 financial information with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
The following is a summary of brokerage acquisition activity for 2012 and 2011:
 
- The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2012 financial information with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
- The following table provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2012 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2011 (in millions):
Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights
 
At December 31, 2012, Gallagher had $725.0 million of long-term borrowings outstanding under four private placement agreements, which are due and payable in various amounts in 2014 through 2023. Gallagher also maintains an unsecured line of credit of $500.0 million that expires July 14, 2014. There were $129.0 million of borrowings outstanding under Gallagher's line of credit facility at December 31, 2012.
Debt, interest and banking -
 
Corporate Segment Fourth Quarter Highlights (continued)
Gallagher has investments in limited liability companies that own 29 clean coal production plants which produce refined coal using proprietary technologies owned by Chem-Mod. We believe these plants are qualified to receive refined coal tax credits under IRC Section 45. The fourteen plants which were placed in service prior to December 31, 2009 (which we refer to as the 2009 Era Plants) can receive tax credits through 2019 and the fifteen plants which were placed in service prior to December 31, 2011 (which we refer to as the 2011 Era Plants) can receive tax credits through 2021.
Clean energy investments
 
 
 
 
 
 
- Consists mostly of external professional fees and other due diligence costs related to acquisitions.
Acquisition costs
Consists of overhead allocations mostly related to corporate staff compensation.
Corporate
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 37% to 39% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for the quarter ended December 31, 2012 and 2011 was 26.2% and 14.6%, respectively. Gallagher's tax rate for fourth quarter 2012 was lower than the statutory rate primarily due to the amount of IRC Section 45 tax credits earned in the quarter. Gallagher's effective tax rate for fourth quarter 2012 was higher than the same period in 2011 primarily due to several tax related adjustments made during fourth quarter 2011 which did not recur in 2012.
 
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, January 30, 2013 at 9:15 a.m. ET/8:15 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 18 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 140 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "see," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, (i) statements regarding the amount of, and potential uses for, investment returns generated by Gallagher's clean energy investments, (ii) our corporate income tax rate, (iii) the insurance premium rate environment, (iv) the strength of our clients' businesses, (v) prospects for our acquisition strategy and pipeline, (vi) our ability to control expenses and improve productivity, (vii) the future revenue and earnings impact of recent acquisitions, (viii) drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and (ix) anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, adjusted revenues, adjusted compensation and operating expenses, adjusted compensation expense ratio, adjusted operating expense ratio and organic revenue measures for each operating segment. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers may provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information related to organic revenues and EBITDAC, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in this press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
 
Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentations of the 2012 and 2011 information, presented in this earnings release, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that may assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after-tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the normalized effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
Organic change in base commission and fee revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission and fee revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to help interested persons analyze the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, change in organic growth excludes the impact of supplemental commission and contingent commission revenues, the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2012 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2011. For the Risk Management segment, organic change in base domestic and international fee revenues excludes international performance bonus fees and New Zealand earthquake claims administration to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability or due to the limited-time nature of these revenue sources.
Organic Revenues
 
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2013 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures, as follows: for EBITDAC (on page 10), for adjusted revenues, adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted diluted net earnings per share (on page 2), for organic revenue measures (on pages 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for adjusted compensation and operating expenses and adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 3, 4 and 5, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments). Reported compensation and operating expense ratios can be found in the supplemental quarterly data available at .
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
www.ajg.com
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 12 and notes to fourth quarter 2012 earnings release on page 12 of 12.
 
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 7 of 12 and notes to fourth quarter 2012 earnings release on page 12 of 12.
 
 
Notes to Fourth Quarter 2012 Earnings Release
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
DirectorInvestor Relations
630-285-3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20130213115308.txt.gz
TIME:20130213115308
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (the "Company") issued a press release on February 6, 2013 announcing that J. Patrick Gallagher Jr., the Company's Chairman, President and CEO, will speak at the Bank of America Merrill Lynch Insurance Conference in New York on Wednesday, February 13, 2013 at 11:45 a.m. ET.
The presentation slides for this conference are attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. In addition, the Company's February 2013 Investment Profile, to be distributed to attendees at the conference, is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.2. Both documents may also be used at other investor conferences, and can be accessed at the Company's website at www.ajg.com/ir.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
ARTHUR J. GALLAGHER & CO.Presented by:J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr. Chairman, President and CEO Douglas K. Howell CFO Bank of America Merrill Lynch Insurance Conference February 13, 2013
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements This presentation contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this presentation, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "see," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements in this presentation include, but are not limited to, statements relating to: (i) our debt levels and plans to borrow; (ii) the state of the economy and our industry (including combined ratios for insurance companies, insurance rates, P&C pricing and the existence of a hard or firming market); (iii) drivers and expected levels of organic growth; (iv) our pace of, and expected sources of funding for, acquisition activity (including our pace of expansion outside the United States); (v) the revenue impact of acquisitions completed during the prior fiscal year; (vi) the integration of Heath Lambert (including the expected timeframe for completion and integration costs); (vii) our success in the healthcare reform arena; (viii) efficiencies and capabilities generated by system improvements; (ix) the revenue impact of a new account in Australia; (x) the impact of expense reduction initiatives; and (xi) the earnings impact of, and developments relating to, our clean energy investments. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following: Changes in worldwide and national economic conditions (including an economic downturn and uncertainty regarding the European debt crisis), changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape, changes in the regulatory environment, our inability to identify appropriate acquisition targets at the right price, and the difficulties inherent in combining the cultures and systems of different companies could impact (i)  (x) above; and Risks and uncertainties related to Gallagher's clean energy investments  including uncertainties related to political and regulatory risks, including potential actions by Congress or challenges by the IRS eliminating or reducing the availability of tax credits under IRC Section 45 retroactively and/or going forward; the ability to maintain and find co-investors; the potential for divergent business objectives by co-investors and other stakeholders; plant operational risks, including supply-chain risks; utilities' future use of, or demand for, coal; the market price of coal; the costs of moving a clean coal plant; intellectual property risks; and environmental risks could impact (xi) above. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
 
This presentation includes references Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted Revenues, Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio, Organic Growth and Adjusted Cash Generation, which are measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided herein. Earnings MeasuresGallagher believes that each of Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance and improves the comparability of Gallagher's results between periods by eliminating the impact of certain items that have a high degree of variability. Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables (EBITDAC), further adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, Heath Lambert integration costs, earnout related compensation charges, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, New Zealand earthquake claims administration costs, GAB Robins integration costs, South Australia ramp up costs, acquisition related adjustments and the impact of foreign currency translation, as applicable. Adjusted EBITDAC margin is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC divided by Adjusted Revenues (defined below). The most directly comparable GAAP measure for these non-GAAP earnings measures is earnings from continuing operations. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, earnings from continuing operations was $140 million, $33 million, and $173 million, respectively, in 2011, and $156 million, $42 million and $198 million, respectively, in 2012. Revenue and Expense MeasuresGallagher believes that Adjusted Revenues and Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio, each as defined below, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future outlook for Gallagher. Gallagher believes that Organic Growth provides a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2013 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner. Adjusted Revenues is defined as revenues, adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business and revenue from New Zealand earthquake claims administration. Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio is defined as operating expense, adjusted to exclude Heath Lambert and GAB Robins integration costs, South Australia ramp up costs, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, acquisition related adjustments and the impact of foreign currency translation, as applicable, divided by Adjusted Revenues. Organic Growth is defined as organic change in base commission and fee revenues, and excludes the first twelve months of net commission and fee revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to help interested persons analyze the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, change in organic growth excludes the impact of supplemental commission and contingent commission revenues, and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2012 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2011. For the Risk Management segment, organic change in base domestic and international fee revenues excludes international performance bonus fees and New Zealand earthquake claims administration to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability or due to the limited-time nature of these revenue sources. The most directly comparable GAAP measure for Adjusted Revenues and Organic Growth is revenues. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, revenues were $1,556 million, $549 million, and $2,105 million, respectively, in 2011, and $1,827 million, $572 million and $2,399 million, respectively, in 2012. For the Brokerage Segment, revenues were $533 million, $679 million, $783 million, $863 million, $946 million, $1,007 million, $1,114 million, $1,188 million, $1,276 million, $1,341 million, $1,556 million and $1,827 million, in 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012, respectively. The most directly comparable GAAP measure for Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio is operating expense, which was $247 million, $267 million and $313 million in 2008, 2011 and 2012, respectively. Adjusted Cash Generation  Gallagher defines this measure as adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to add back stock compensation expense (a non-cash charge) and to deduct capital expenditures, interest and banking costs, corporate and acquisition costs and income taxes paid. Gallagher considers Adjusted Cash Generation as a way to measure net cash generated from its operations on an ongoing basis. ReconciliationsPlease see page 56 for a reconciliation of Adjusted Cash Generation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure. For all other measures, please see the examples set forth in "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures and supplemental quarterly financial data " on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com/IR.
 
Snapshot of Gallagher 3/4 of revenue We sell insurance and consult on insurance programs P&C and benefits Retail and wholesale 1/4 of revenue We adjust claims and help companies reduce their losses Workers compensation, liability, managed care, property and auto Modest amount of storm/quake claims
 
Brokerage Segment Revenues
 
Risk Management Revenues
 
Brokerage Segment  2012 Adjusted Revenues Organic Growth in base commission & fees Adjusted EDITDAC Margin Adjusted EBITDAC See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
Risk Management Segment  2012 Adjusted Revenues Organic Growth in base fees Adjusted EBITDAC Adjusted EDITDAC Margin (in $M) Adjusted EDITDAC Margin
 
Brokerage & Risk Mgmt Combined  2012 Adjusted Revenues Organic Growth in base commissions & fees Adjusted EBITDAC Adjusted EDITDAC Margin (in $M) See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
Net Earnings from Clean Energy Investments (in $M)
 
Cash and Dividends Dividends Declared as % of Adjusted Cash Generation Adjusted Cash Generation See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
Dividends Per Share *Indicated  On January 24, 2013, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.35 per share first quarter 2013 quarterly dividend.
 
Maintaining a Prudent Balance Sheet Net Debt Stockholders' Equity Net Debt to Total Capital Net Debt to Adjusted EBITDAC $s in millions. Using Gallagher's TTM combined Brokerage and Risk Management EBITDAC as of 12/31/12. Net Debt as of 12/31/12 for Gallagher reflects $725m in term notes and $129m on the line of credit less $160m of cash on hand available for general corporate purposes. Source for S&P 1000 data: Bloomberg as of 02/05/13. Gallagher is borrowing an additional $200 million of 10-year notes by mid-year 2013. See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
Environment Economy Carrier Position Rates
 
Cautiously Improving Economy Source for data: Bureau of Economic Analysis Total Nonfarm Employees (in thousands) seasonally adjusted. Source for data: Bureau of Labor Statistics. Average Annual Effective Fed Funds Rates. Source for data: Bloomberg Purchasing Managers Index. Source for data: Institute for Supply Management. Green diamond depicts the January 2013 value of 53.1
 
Firming Indicators for Carriers  Yet Ample Capacity Remains Combined Ratios Premium/Statutory Surplus Source for calendar year combined ratio data: AM Best. Excludes certain large mortgage insurance and personal lines companies to better Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2001  2011. Prior to 2001, sources are A.M. Best and ISO depict Gallagher's primary markets. Catastrophe & Prior Period Development impact on Combined Ratios based on public disclosures of via the Insurance Information Institute. larger U.S. commercial carriers where Gallagher places business. Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2001  2011. Prior to 2001, sources Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2004  2011. Prior to 2004, sources are A.M. are A.M. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute.
 
So, A 100 Combined Ratio Isn't What It Once Was Extrapolating from this analysis, a combined ratio in the low 90's is required to generate risk appropriate ROEs in the current environment * 2010 figures are a return on average surplus and exclude mortgage and financial guaranty insurers. Source: Robert P. Hartwig's Insurance Information Institute presentation from 7/17/12 using A.M. Best and ISO data.
 
Carrier Response  Rate Change CIABChange in Average Commercial Rates
 
Commercial P&C Pricing Commercial Rate Index reflects the cost of P&C premiums relative to the year 2000. Constructed using Counsel of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB) data. CPI index uses data from the Bureau of Labor Statistics.
 
Firming Market Versus Classic Hard Market Average Commercial Premium Rate Changes by Account Size Source: The Council of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB). Chart prepared by Barclays Research. Captions in the above chart were overlaid by Gallagher and do not necessarily reflect the opinions of the CIAB and/or Barclays Research.
 
Firming Market Versus Classic Hard Market Classic Hard Market Firming Market oderate price increases for an Short-lived radical price increases extended period of time Clients can't get coverage Clients can still get coverage Business forced chaotically into Business moves more orderly into surplus lines surplus lines Carriers' urgent need to restore arriers restore profitability orderly profitability Lack of capacity Adequate capacity
 
Current Environment
 
Plan For Growth  Organic
 
Driving Organic Growth
 
Driving Organic Growth
 
Driving Organic Growth
 
Simplified Organic Illustration All figures on this slide are used only for illustration purposes and are not estimates of Gallagher's future performance.
 
Organic Illustration  Other Revenue Drivers 1. Client opt in 2. Client M&A 3. Expand share of wallet 4. Cross selling in AJG Client opt out Client M&A Client out-of-business Client moves to self insurance model
 
Gallagher's Sales Culture Performs Throughout the Entire Cycle Gallagher's Brokerage Segment Organic Growth including Supplemental Commissions. See important disclosures regarding non-GAAP measures on Page 3. *Average change in Commercial Rates
 
Plan For Growth  M&A
 
M&A Looking Forward  Opportunities Continue
 
Current Gallagher U.S. Locations
 
Larger Cities With Expansion Potential
 
International Correspondent Brokers Client Capabilities in More Than 140 Countries
 
Strong Acquisition Momentum Annualized revenues acquired (in $Ms).
 
International Acquisition Deal Flow Continues
 
Gallagher Heath Update Heath Lambert Acquired May 2011  -  Additional distribution network in 15 U.K. locations outside London  -  Added new retail capabilities to existing London wholesale operation  -  Executing:  - Bolt-on acquisition strategy  Getting access to deals not previously available  - Hiring Strategy  Attracting experienced producers and teams  -  Integration as planned and on schedule  -  Integration costs of about $.02 to $.03/quarter through mid-2013
 
Productivity and Quality
 
Optimizing Productivity & Quality
 
Reasons for Offshore Centers of Excellence
 
Back Office Infrastructure  2004
 
Back Office  Today
 
Current Front Office Activity
 
Quality Metrics Efficiency Improvements Drive Quality Reduced policy delivery from Achieved 98% quality rate 30 to 10 days Reduced certificate of insurance delivery Improved quality rate to 99% expense by 20% Implemented claims adjusters Realized 20% improvement on adjuster enhanced quality audit programs quality rate Standardized and automated data Better and more timely information to capturing for proposal generation  clients for renewal reducing production time by 80+%
 
Reducing Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio See important disclosures regarding Non-GAAP measures on Page 3.
 
AJG  2012 #1 Overall Client Satisfaction for Large Corporations  Greenwich Associates AJG Intl  2012 Ins Broking Company of the Year  Reactions Magazine AJG Intl  2012 Best Broker M&A Deal of the Year  Reactions Magazine Gallagher Singapore  2012 Best Trade Credit Insurance Broker  Asia/Pacific AJG  2013 Ranked Top Ten Best Companies for Leaders  Chief Executive Magazine GB UK  2012 Investor in People UK National Standard Gallagher/Heath  2012 Commercial Lines Broker of the Year  Insurance Times GB US  2012 Small & Mid-Market Firm Services Buyers Choice TPA Overall Winner  Business Insurance
 
Culture
 
Maintain Unique Culture
 
One of the World's Most Ethical Companies as Recognized by Ethisphere ethics and dedication to integrity  -  Chosen for: Promoting ethical business standards and practices Exceeding legal compliance standards Innovating to benefit the public Demonstrating that corporate citizenship is tied to company success  -  Globally, only 145 organizations named
n
n
n
n
 
A Top Ten Best Company for Leadership Development As Recognized by Chief Executive Magazine  2013  -  Recognized for: High percentage of senior and mid-manager positions filled internally Formal leadership process Commitment to leadership development program
n
n
n
 
Employee Engagement Survey Results When a customer is dissatisfied, I can usually correct the problem to his or her satisfaction. How would you rate your Unit as a place to work compared to other companies? I can see myself working here 12 months from now.
 
Momentum Into 2013 Closed 60 acquisitions with $231m of acquired revenue Incremental roll-in revenues of $134m Completed 9 deals outside of the US Continuing our global expansion Heath Lambert integration efforts Will achieve anticipated profits Favored cash in 4th quarter to fund M&A Will favor cash and debt May generate $70m$91m of after tax Clean energy investment activity earnings. Future earnings to be used for M&A.
 
Momentum Into 2013 2012 Actions 2013 Impact Rolled out our first Private Health Exchange Provide a critical capability for clients Consolidating agency management systems Enables increased productivity and in our US P&C operations higher quality Reduced 400 positions to reap the benefits Generates about $35m of savings to offset of our productivity initiatives 2013 workforce related increases Rolled out the Gallagher Bassett client-centric analytical workbench Provide market leading tool to clients Sold and ramped up a large account in Australia Expect $20m of new revenues
 
Why Invest? Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns from 1/1/2000  1/31/2013 include reinvesting all dividends at the ex-dividend date.
 
Questions & Answers For Additional Information Marsha Akin Director  Investor Relations Marsha_Akin@ajg.com Phone: 630?285?3501
 
APPENDIX Adjusted Cash Generation for 2008 to 2012 (Unauditedin $ millions ) 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 Earnings from continuing operations  Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined $132.4 $154.4 $166.8 $173.5 $198.3 Provision for income taxes 85.1 96.5 108.0 107.7 128.9 Depreciation 29.8 30.5 31.9 35.4 40.7 Amortization 43.7 55.0 60.8 79.3 99.0 Change in estimated acquisition earnout payables4.1 (2.6) (6.2) 3.4 EBITDAC  Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined 291.0 340.5 364.9 389.7 470.3 Gains from books of business sales and other (23.8) (11.6) (5.9) (5.5) (0.2) Net supplemental commission timing 6.1 1.4 (14.7) Workforce & lease termination-related charges 8.1 14.7 7.5 8.2 17.1 Acquisition-related adjustments    7.0 Litigation settlements  2.2 6.3 New Zealand earthquake claims administration  (1.4) (6.1) (1.5) Heath Lambert integration costs    16.0 19.3 GAB Robins integration costs   3.6 13.0  Adjusted EBITDAC  Brokerage & Risk Management Segments Combined 281.4 347.2 360.3 422.3 505.0 Stock compensation expense 18.3 16.1 15.6 21.1 15.9 Capital expenditures (32.0) (23.5) (25.4) (40.0) (51.0) Interest and banking costs (28.9) (29.5) (36.4) (43.8) (46.1) Corporate and acquisition costs (5.4) (6.2) (12.1) (14.5) (18.5) Income taxes paid (40.1) (27.7) (37.6) (32.0) (47.5) Adjusted cash generation $193.3 $276.4 $264.4 $313.1 $357.8 Dividends declared $121.2 $130.3 $136.1 $149.5 $167.5 Dividends declared as % of adjusted cash generation 63% 47% 51% 48% 47% See information regarding Non-GAAP financial measures on page 3.

Exhibit 99.2
 
Exhibit 99.2 INVESTMENT PROFILE NYSE: AJG GROWING VALUE: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. is one of the world's largest insurance brokers and third-party property/casualty claims administrators. Gallagher generates approximately 80% of its revenues in the United States, with the remaining 20% derived primarily in Australia, Bermuda, Canada, New Zealand and the United Kingdom. "Gallagher's sales and high-quality service culture is thriving and we are in an excellent position for success in 2013." J. PATRICK GALLAGHER, JR. Chairman, President and CEO Source data: Bloomberg. Total Stockholder Returns assume dividend reinvestment. Highlights as of February 6, 2013 Price $38.14 52-week high/low $38.24$32.01 Trailing 12-mos. revenues $2.5 billion** Market cap $4.8 billion Indicated annual dividend* $1.40* Yield 3.7% Shares outstanding 125.6 million** End of fiscal year December 31 Number of employees 13,707** *On January 24, 2013, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $0.35 per share first-quarter 2013 dividend. **At December 31, 2012 Brokerage Segment Brokerage Acquisition Strategy Risk Management Segment Corporate Segment Why Invest?
 
Brokerage Segment Gallagher's Brokerage Segment does business through a network of approximately 350 retail and wholesale sales and service offices located throughout the United States and in 17 other countries. In addition, Gallagher has established a network of independent insurance brokers and consultants, which enables it to provide property/casualty coverages and services to its clients in more than 140 countries around the world and employee benefit coverages and services in 90 countries around the world. Retail Brokerage Insurance Operations 76% OF 2012 BROKER AGE SEGMENT REVENUES Gallagher negotiates and places nearly all lines of property/casualty (P/C) insurance, employer-provided health and welfare insurance, and retirement solutions, principally for middle-market commercial, industrial, public entity, religious and not-for-profit entities. Revenues are generated through commissions paid by insurance companies, usually based upon a percentage of the premium paid by insureds, and through brokerage and advisory fees paid directly by its clients. Gallagher's retail brokerage operations are organized into more than 300 geographic profit centers located primarily throughout the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom and Australia. They operate primarily within certain key niche/practice groups, which account for approximately 61% of Gallagher's retail brokerage revenues. These specialized teams target areas of business and/or industries in which Gallagher has developed a depth of expertise and a large client base. The concentrated focus of these niche/practice groups allows for highly targeted marketing efforts and facilitates the development of value-added products and services specific to those industries or business segments. Gallagher believes that the detailed understanding and broad client contacts developed within these niche/ practice groups provide Gallagher with a competitive advantage. Gallagher anticipates that the greatest revenue growth over the next several years within its retail brokerage operations will continue to come from: mergers and acquisitions; its niche/practice groups and middle-market accounts; cross-selling other brokerage products and services to existing customers; and developing and managing alternative market mechanisms, such as captives, rent-a-captives and deductible plans/self insurance. NICHE/PRACTICE GROUPS Agribusiness International Benefits Automotive Marine Aviation & Aerospace Manufacturing Captive Consulting Personal Construction Private Equity Energy Professional Groups Entertainment Public Entity Environmental Real Estate Executive Benefits Religious/Not-for-Profit Global Risks Restaurant Health and Welfare Retirement Healthcare Scholastic Healthcare Analytics Technology/Telecom Higher Education Transportation Hospitality Voluntary Benefits Human Resources Insurance premiums are cyclical in nature and may vary widely based on market conditions. Fluctuations in premiums charged by P/C insurance carriers have a direct and potentially material impact on insurance agents and brokers. Commission revenues are generally based on a percentage of the premiums paid by insureds and normally follow premium levels. After several years of premium rate reductions driven by competitive market conditions, commercial P/C pricing began to rebound in the fourth quarter of 2011. According to quarterly market surveys conducted by the Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers, U.S. commercial P/C premiums were up, year-over-year, in each quarter of 2012 and increased by an average of 5.0% in the fourth quarter.
SIGNIFICANT LINES OF COVERAGE & CONSULTING Wholesale Insurance SERVICE CAPABILITIES Brokerage Operations 401(k) Solutions Fire 24% 403(b) Solutions General Liability Aviation Life Casualty Marine Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations assist retail brokers and agents in the placement of specialized, unique and hard-to- Commercial Auto Medical place insurance programs. Wholesale revenues are generated Dental Product Liability from sharing the commissions paid to the retail broker by the Directors & Officers Professional Liability insurance carrier. Gallagher's wholesale brokerage operations are Liability Property organized into more than 65 geographic profit centers located pri-Disability marily in the United States, Australia and Bermuda, and through Wind its approved Lloyd's of London broker. In certain cases Gallagher Earthquake Workers Compensation acts as a brokerage wholesaler and in other cases Gallagher acts Errors & Omissions as a managing general agent or managing general underwriter, handling specialized insurance coverages for insurance carriers. GALLAGHER DELIVERS GLOBAL BROKERAGE CAPABILITIES More than 75% of Gallagher's wholesale brokerage revenues addition to the 18 countries where Gallagher now has opera- come from retail brokers and agents not affiliated with Gallagher. tions, the company actively manages business relations hips with Based on wholesale premium volume from P/C risks, Gallagher's network of approved independent brokers that expands the P/C U.S. wholesale brokerage operation ranks as the largest domestic brokerage capabilities it offers multinational clients to more than managing general agency/underwriting manager, according to 140 countries around the world. Gallagher Global Alliance (GGA) Business Insurance magazine. That operation places a strong members are selected based upon common business philoso- focus on binding, programs, standard lines aggregation and open phies and their capabilities within their respective countries. GGA brokerage business. offers both strength and flexibility, enabling global servicing of Gallagher anticipates growing its wholesale brokerage operations Gallagher clients, and the clients of other GGA members, no by increasing its number of broker clients, by developing new matter where in the world they operate. managing general agency programs, and through mergers and Gallagher also offers employee benefits brokerage and consulting acquisitions. services to clients throughout North America and the United Kingdom. Through Gallagher International Benefit Services (GIBS), Gallagher can handle its clients' international benefits needs in more than 90 countries around the world. BROKERAGE SEGMENT ACQUISITION STRATEGY Gallagher is highly selective. An acquisition must offer signifi-Gallagher is highly growth-oriented. Its Brokerage Segment cant benefits, such as expanding the company's talent pool, growth strategy has two primary components: organic growth enhancing its geographic presence and service capabilities, through new business production and the strategic acquisition and/or broadening and further diversifying its business mix. of complementary businesses. Gallagher completed and inte- In selecting acquisition candidates, Gallagher also focuses on: grated approximately 248 acquisitions from 2002 through a corporate culture that matches Gallagher's sales-oriented 2012, substantially all within the Brokerage Segment. Most culture; were regional or local retail or wholesale brokers possessing a a profitable, growing business that could further enhance its strong middle-market focus or significant expertise in a desir- ability to compete by gaining access to Gallagher's greater able market niche. Gallagher typically acquires companies that resources; and generate between $1 million and $10 million in annual reve- clearly defined financial criteria. nues. In addition, Gallagher is focused on international expansion through acquisitions and joint ventures, where the company Contributing to the company's success as an acquirer is its typically begins its relationship with an equity position. attractiveness as a merger partner. Gallagher believes that growth-oriented independent brokers and consultants are attracted by its aggressive, sales-oriented culture, team-based approach and depth of resources.
 
Risk Management Segment 22% OF 2012 REVENUES Based on revenues, Gallagher's Risk Management operation currently ranks as the world's largest third-party P/C claims administrator, according to Business Insurance magazine. Gallagher provides contract claims settlement and administration services for entities that choose to self-insure and insurance companies that outsource their claims-handling services. Gallagher's Risk Management operation also offers managed Gallagher manages its third-party claims management operations care, information management and appraisal services, as well through a network of approximately 110 offices located through-as consultative services and training programs that help clients out the United States, the United Kingdom, Australia, New mitigate losses, combat claims fraud and maintain regulatory Zealand and Canada. Clients are primarily Fortune 1000 compa-compliance. nies, larger middle-market companies, not-for-profit organizations and public entities. More than 88% of Gallagher's risk manage-Approximately 68% of Gallagher's Risk Management Segment ment revenues come from clients that do not use Gallagher as revenues are derived from managing workers compensation-their retail or wholesale insurance broker. related claims, 27% are from general and commercial auto liability-related claims, and 5% are from property-related claims. The Risk Management Segment expects its most significant In addition, Gallagher generates revenues from integrated disabil- growth prospects through the next several years to come from ity management (employee absence management) programs, new business with Fortune 1000 companies, governmental information services, risk control consulting (loss control) services agencies, larger middle-market companies, captives, program and appraisal services, either individually or in combination with business and the outsourcing of insurance company claims managing claims. Revenues are substantially in the form of fees, departments. In addition, the Risk Management Segment may generally negotiated in advance, on a per-claim or per-service grow in the future through mergers and acquisitions. basis, depending upon the type and estimated volume of the services to be performed. EXPERTISE Appraisal Services Litigation Management Risk Control Services Education & Training Managed Care Services Safety Programs Information Management Real-time Claims Management Settlement Management Investigative Services Recoveries (subrogation, salvage, etc.) Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures This investment profile includes references to adjusted revenue, adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted EBITDAC margin, which are performance measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, GAAP information. Adjusted revenue is defined as revenue adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, and revenue from New Zealand earthquake claims administration. EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables. Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as EBITDAC adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, Heath Lambert integration costs, earnout related compensation charges, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, New Zealand earthquake claims administration costs, GAB Robins integration costs, South Australia ramp up costs, acquisition related adjustments and the impact of foreign currency translation, as applicable. Adjusted EBITDAC margin is defined as adjusted EBITDAC divided by adjusted revenue. For adjusted revenue and adjusted EBITDAC, the most directly comparable GAAP measures are revenue and earnings from continuing operations, respectively. For the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments on a combined basis, revenue was $1,653 million in 2008, $1,729 million in 2009, $1,803 million in 2010, $2,105 million in 2011 and $2,399 million in 2012 and earnings from continuing operations was $132 million in 2008, $154 million in 2009, $167 million in 2010, $174 million in 2011 and $198 million in 2012. Please see "Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Measures" on Gallagher's website at www.ajg.com under "Investor Relations" for the purpose of each non-GAAP measure used and an example of a reconciliation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure.
 
Corporate Segment Gallagher's debt, clean energy investments, external acquisition-related costs and other corporate costs are reported in this segment. CLEAN ENERGY INVESTMENTS Gallagher also owns 46.5% of Chem-Mod LLC which possesses Gallagher holds interests in various commercial operations that the rights, information and technologies used for the reduction of help coal-fired utilities reduce emissions. These operations consist emissions created during the combustion of coal. Refined coal of 29 commercial refined coal production plants, of which 14 production plants, including those in which Gallagher has invested, were built and began production in 2009 and 15 were built and license and use Chem-Mod's technologies in the production of began production in 2011. refined coal. 2009 Era Plants12 plants are currently under long-term To see management's latest guidance on these earnings and production contracts with utilities, and Gallagher is currently additional information on this investment, to go Gallagher's in negotiations for long-term production contracts for the fourth quarter 2012 supplemental quarterly financial information remaining two plants. at www.ajg.com. 2011 Era Plants7 plants are currently under long-term production contracts with utilities. Gallagher has signed long-term DEBT production contracts for two plants and is in negotiations for At December 31, 2012, Gallagher had $725 million of long-term long-term production contracts for two more plants. These borrowings and also maintains an unsecured line of credit of four plants may resume production in mid-2013. Gallagher is $500 million that expires July 14, 2014. There were $129 million currently seeking long-term utility customers for the remaining of borrowings outstanding under Gallagher's line of credit facility four plants. at December 31, 2012. Gallagher intends to borrow another $200 million of long-term debt by mid-2013 through a private Gallagher believes the refined coal produced at these plants placement, primarily to supplement cash generated by Gallagher qualifies for tax credits under Section 45 of the Internal that can be used to fund merger and acquisition activity. Although Revenue Code. Gallagher plans to use primarily cash and debt to fund 2013 mergers and acquisition activity, stock may be used for tax-free exchanges, if acquisition volume is high enough to warrant it, or if the merger partner has a strong desire to hold stock. Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements This investment profile contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this investment profile, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "see," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, (i) statements relating to dividends, (ii) anticipated areas of revenue growth with the Brokerage and Risk Management Segments, (iii) Gallagher's acquisition strategy and level of acquisition activity, (iv) anticipated future results or performance of any segment or Gallagher as a whole, and (v) developments relating to Gallagher's clean energy investments. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following: Changes in worldwide and national economic conditions (including an economic downturn and uncertainty regarding the European debt crisis), changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape, our inability to identify appropriate acquisition targets at the right price, and the difficulties inherent in combining the cultures and systems of different companies could impact (i)(iv) above; and Risks and uncertainties related to Gallagher's clean energy investmentsincluding uncertainties related to political and regulatory risks, including potential actions by Congress or challenges by the IRS eliminating or reducing the availability of tax credits under IRC Section 45 retroactively and/or going forward; the ability to maintain and find co-investors; the potential for divergent business objectives by co-investors and other stakeholders; plant operational risks, including supply-chain risks; utilities' future use of, or demand for, coal; the market price of coal; the costs of moving a clean coal plant; intellectual property risks; and environmental riskscould impact (v) above. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements.
 
Why Invest? Supplemental quarterly data as of December 31, 2012 is available at www.ajg.com. Brokerage and Risk Management Brokerage and Risk Management Adjusted EBITDAC Growth* Adjusted EBITDAC Margins (in millions) Dividends Per Share *See Non-GAAP disclosure on page 4. **IndicatedOn January 24, 2013, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.35 per share first quarter 2013 quarterly dividend. FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Marsha J. AkinDirector-Investor Relations 630.285.3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20130315160551.txt.gz
TIME:20130315160551
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On March 12, 2013, Ilene S. Gordon notified Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Gallagher) of her decision not to stand for re-election to the Board of Directors at Gallagher's 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders expected to be held on May 15, 2013. Ms. Gordon indicated that her decision was for personal reasons and not the result of any disagreement with Gallagher on any matter relating to Gallagher's operations, policies or practices. Ms. Gordon will continue to serve as a director of Gallagher and as a member of Gallagher's Compensation Committee until the expiration of her term at the 2013 Annual Meeting.
Gallagher gratefully acknowledges Ms. Gordon's distinguished service as a member of the Board of Directors since 1999.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20130430164955.txt.gz
TIME:20130430164955
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On April 30, 2013, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. issued a press release setting forth the company's financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2013. A copy of the company's press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL, April 30, 2013  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today reported its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2013. A printer-friendly format and supplemental quarterly data is available at www.ajg.com. For a description of the non-GAAP measures used to report financial results in this earnings release, please see "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" beginning on page 6.
"We had an excellent start to 2013" said J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and CEO. "In the first quarter, our combined Brokerage and Risk Management segments posted 16% growth in adjusted total revenues, 6.0% organic growth in base commission and fee revenues, 24% growth in adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted EBITDAC margins improved by 107 basis points."
 
 
 
"In the first quarter, we saw carriers continuing to ask for rate increases and our clients being cautiously optimistic about their business prospects. We also saw returns from our efforts to raise quality and increase productivity in our own businesses. Across the board, our operating units showed solid organic growth and improved margins."
The following provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2013 revenues, EBITDAC and diluted net earnings (loss) per share with the same period in 2012:
 
 
- The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2013 financial information with the same periods in 2012 (in millions):
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Brokerage Segment First Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
The following is a summary of brokerage acquisition activity for 2013 and 2012:
 
The following tables provide non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing certain 2013 financial information with the same periods in 2012 (in millions):
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Risk Management Segment First Quarter Highlights (continued)
 
 
 
- The following table provides non-GAAP information that management believes is helpful when comparing 2013 operating results for the Corporate Segment with the same periods in 2012 (in millions):
Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights
 
At March 31, 2013, Gallagher had $725.0 million of long-term borrowings outstanding under five private placement agreements, which are due and payable in various amounts in 2014 through 2023. Gallagher also maintains an unsecured line of credit of $500.0 million that expires July 14, 2014. There were $50.0 million of borrowings outstanding under Gallagher's line of credit facility at March 31, 2013. On March 27, 2013, Gallagher committed to borrowing an additional $200.0 million of private placement debt, which will have a maturity of nine years and an interest rate of 3.69%. Gallagher anticipates that this transaction will close in June 2013.
Debt, interest and banking -
 
Corporate Segment First Quarter Highlights (continued)
During the first quarter 2013, Gallagher purchased a portion of certain investments which own clean-energy plants from a co-investor. The transaction resulted in a fair-value step-up-in-basis after-tax gain of $5.8 million.
Clean energy investments
The following provides certain information related to Gallagher's investments in limited liability companies that own 29 refined coal production plants which produce refined coal using proprietary technologies owned by Chem-Mod. We believe these plants are qualified to receive refined coal tax credits under IRC Section 45 through 2019 for the 2009 Era Plants and through 2021 for the 2011 Era Plants. For investments where Gallagher has majority ownership interest, the investment's underlying operations are consolidated.
 
 
Gallagher's investment in Chem-Mod generates royalty income from clean energy plants owned by those limited liability companies in which it invests as well as refined coal production plants owned by other unrelated parties. Based on current production estimates provided by licensees, Chem-Mod could generate for Gallagher approximately $3.6 million of net after-tax earnings per quarter.
All estimates set forth above regarding the potential future earnings impact of our clean energy investments are subject to significant risks. Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact the information above.
- Consists mostly of external professional fees and other due diligence costs related to acquisitions.
Acquisition costs
Consists of overhead allocations mostly related to corporate staff compensation. First quarter 2013 expense is more than 2012 expense primarily due to increased incentive compensation, increased pension costs and increased costs incurred in connection with a biannual company-wide meeting.
Corporate
 
Income Taxes
Gallagher allocates the provision for income taxes to its Brokerage and Risk Management segments as if those segments were computing income tax provisions on a separate company basis. Gallagher historically has reported, and anticipates reporting for the foreseeable future, an effective tax rate of approximately 37% to 39% in both its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher's consolidated effective tax rate for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 and 2013 was 4.3% and 13.5%, respectively. Gallagher's tax rate for first quarter 2013 was lower than the statutory rate and was lower than the same period in 2012 due to the amount of IRC Section 45 tax credits earned in 2013 compared to 2012.
Webcast Conference Call
Gallagher will host a webcast conference call on Wednesday, May 1, 2013 at 9:00 a.m. ET/8:00 a.m. CT. To listen to this call, please go to . The call will be available for replay at such website for not less than 90 days.
www.ajg.com
About Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 19 countries and offers client-service capabilities in more than 140 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "see," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, (i) statements regarding the amount of, and potential uses for, investment returns generated by Gallagher's clean energy investments, (ii) our corporate income tax rate, (iii) the insurance premium rate environment, (iv) the strength of our clients' businesses, (v) prospects for our acquisition strategy and pipeline, (vi) drivers of organic growth in the Brokerage and Risk Management segments and (vii) anticipated future results or performance of any segment or the Company as a whole.
Gallagher's actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Readers are therefore cautioned against relying on any of the forward-looking statements, which are neither statements of historical fact nor guarantees or assurances of future performance. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the following:
 
 
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward-looking statements. Any forward-looking statement made by Gallagher in this press release speaks only as of the date on which it is made. Except as required by applicable law, Gallagher does not undertake to update the information included herein or the corresponding earnings release posted on Gallagher's website.
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
In addition to reporting financial results in accordance with GAAP, this press release provides information regarding EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin, diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, adjusted revenues, adjusted compensation and operating expenses, adjusted compensation expense ratio, adjusted operating expense ratio and organic revenue measures for each operating segment. These measures are not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided in this press release. Gallagher's management believes that these presentations provide useful information to management, analysts and investors regarding financial and business trends relating to Gallagher's results of operations and financial condition. Gallagher's industry peers may provide similar supplemental non-GAAP information related to organic revenues and EBITDAC, although they may not use the same or comparable terminology and may not make identical adjustments. The non-GAAP information provided by Gallagher should be used in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the GAAP information provided. Certain reclassifications have been made to the prior year amounts reported in this press release in order to conform them to the current year presentation.
 
Gallagher believes that the adjusted presentations of the 2013 and 2012 information, presented in this earnings release, provides stockholders and other interested persons with useful information regarding certain financial metrics of Gallagher that may assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future earnings outlook for Gallagher. The after-tax amounts related to the adjustments were computed using the normalized effective tax rate for each respective period.
Adjusted presentation
 
 
Gallagher believes that each of EBITDAC, EBITDAC margin, adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments, as defined below, provides a meaningful representation of its operating performance. Gallagher considers EBITDAC and EBITDAC margin as a way to measure financial performance on an ongoing basis. Adjusted EBITDAC, adjusted EBITDAC margin and diluted net earnings per share (as adjusted) for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments are presented to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability.
Earnings Measures
 
 
 
 
 
Organic change in base commission and fee revenues excludes the first twelve months of net commission and fee revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to help interested persons analyze the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, change in organic growth excludes the impact of supplemental commission and contingent commission revenues and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2013 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2012. For the Risk Management segment, organic change in fee revenues excludes South Australia ramp up fees, New Zealand earthquake claims administration and the period-over-period impact of foreign currency translation to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability or are due to the limited-time nature of these revenue sources.
Organic Revenues
 
These revenue items are excluded from organic revenues in order to determine a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that are expected to continue in 2013 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows readers of our financial statements to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
This press release includes tabular reconciliations to the most comparable GAAP measures, as follows: for EBITDAC (on page 9), for adjusted revenues, adjusted EBITDAC and adjusted diluted net earnings per share (on page 1), for organic revenue measures (on pages 2 and 3, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments), for adjusted compensation and operating expenses and adjusted EBITDAC margin (on pages 2, 3 and 4, respectively, for the Brokerage and Risk Management segments). Reported compensation and operating expense ratios can be found in the supplemental quarterly data available at .
Reconciliation of Non-GAAP Information Presented to GAAP Measures
www.ajg.com
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 6 of 11.
 
 
 
See "Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures" on page 6 of 11.
 
 
Contact: Marsha Akin
Director - Investor Relations
630-285-3501 or marsha_akin@ajg.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20130515120123.txt.gz
TIME:20130515120123
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07.    Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders on May 15, 2013 (the "Annual Meeting"). At the Annual Meeting, three items were submitted to Gallagher's stockholders. The items are described in more detail in Gallagher's definitive proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 25, 2013. The final voting results were as set forth below.
: Election of eight directors, each to serve for a one-year term until Gallagher's 2014 Annual Meeting of Stockholders:
Item 1
 
 
Item 7.01.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
The slides containing information presented at the Annual Meeting are furnished as Exhibit 99 to this report. This exhibit may also be accessed at Gallagher's website (www.ajg.com) under the heading Investor Relations.
Item 9.01.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99
 
2013 ANNUAL STOCKHOLDERS MEETING
WEDNESDAY, MAY 15, 2013
 
Please turn off all cell phones and PDAs at this time.
Thank you for your cooperation.
 
Stockholders' Meeting May 15, 2013
 -  2013 Annual Meeting
 -  Chairman's Remarks
??2012 Review
 -  Questions & Answers
 
2013 Board of Directors
 -  William L. Bax
 -  Frank E. English, Jr.
 -  Elbert O. Hand
 -  David S. Johnson
 -  Kay W. McCurdy
 -  Norman L. Rosenthal, Ph.D.
 -  James R. Wimmer
 
Tribute to James A. Gallagher, Jr.  Former CEO
Born on July 9, 1921 Attended Cornell University Enlisted in the Navy in 1942 Joined Gallagher in 1946 Former CEO
Implemented uses of technology Instrumental in hiring Sterling Bassett Spearheaded Gallagher's M&A initiatives Devoted family man and philanthropist Supported Catholic Charities Passed away January 4, 2013
 
Stockholders' Meeting May 15, 2013
 -  2013 Annual Meeting
 
Stockholders' Meeting May 15, 2013
 -  2013 Annual Meeting
 -  Chairman's Remarks
??2012 Review
 
Information Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This presentation contains "forward?looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this presentation, the words "anticipates," "believes," "contemplates," "see," "should," "could," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans" and variations thereof and similar expressions, are intended to identify forward?looking statements. Examples of forward?looking statements in this presentation include, but are not limited to, statements relating to: (i) our debt levels and plans to borrow; (ii) the state of the economy and our industry (including combined ratios for insurance companies, insurance rates, P&C pricing and the existence of a hard or firming market); (iii) drivers and expected levels of organic growth; (iv) our pace of, and expected sources of funding for, acquisition activity (including our pace of expansion outside the United States); (v) the revenue impact of acquisitions completed during the prior fiscal year; (vi) the integration of Heath Lambert (including the expected timeframe for completion and integration costs); (vii) our success in the healthcare reform arena; (viii) efficiencies and capabilities generated by system improvements; (ix) the revenue impact of a new account in Australia; (x) the impact of expense reduction initiatives; and (xi) the earnings impact of, and developments relating to, our clean energy investments. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward?looking statements include the following:
 -  Changes in worldwide and national economic conditions (including an economic downturn and uncertainty regarding the European debt crisis), changes in premium rates and in insurance markets generally, changes in the insurance brokerage industry's competitive landscape, changes in the regulatory environment, our inability to identify appropriate acquisition targets at the right price, and the difficulties inherent in combining the cultures and systems of different companies could impact (i)  (x) above; and
 -  Risks and uncertainties related to Gallagher's clean energy investments  including uncertainties related to political and regulatory risks, including potential actions by Congress or challenges by the IRS eliminating or reducing the availability of tax credits under IRC Section 45 retroactively and/or going forward; the ability to maintain and find co?investors; the potential for divergent business objectives by co?investors and other stakeholders; plant operational risks, including supply?chain risks; utilities' future use of, or demand for, coal; the market price of coal; the costs of moving a clean coal plant; intellectual property risks; and environmental risks  could impact (xi) above.
Please refer to Gallagher's filings with the SEC, including Item 1A, "Risk Factors," of its Annual Report on Form 10?K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2012, for a more detailed discussion of these and other factors that could impact its forward?looking statements.
 
Information Regarding Non-GAAP Measures
This presentation includes references to Adjusted EBITDAC, Adjusted EBITDAC margin, Adjusted Revenues, Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio, Organic Growth and Adjusted Cash Generation, which are measures not in accordance with, or an alternative to, the GAAP information provided herein.
Earnings Measures  Gallagher believes that Adjusted EBITDAC and Adjusted EBITDAC margin, as defined below, each provide a meaningful representation of its operating performance and improves the comparability of Gallagher's results between periods by eliminating the impact of certain items that have a high degree of variability.
Adjusted EBITDAC is defined as earnings from continuing operations before interest, income taxes, depreciation, amortization and the change in estimated acquisition earnout payables (EBITDAC), further adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business, supplemental commission timing amounts, Heath Lambert integration costs, earnout related compensation charges, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, New Zealand earthquake claims administration costs, GAB Robins integration costs, South Australia ramp up costs, acquisition related adjustments and the impact of foreign currency translation, as applicable.
Adjusted EBITDAC margin is defined as Adjusted EBITDAC divided by Adjusted Revenues (defined below).
The most directly comparable GAAP measure for these non?GAAP earnings measures is earnings from continuing operations. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, earnings from continuing operations were $140 million, $33 million, and $173 million, respectively, in 2011, and $156 million, $42 million and $198 million, respectively, in 2012.
Revenue and Expense Measures  Gallagher believes that Adjusted Revenues and Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio, each as defined below, provide stockholders and other interested persons with useful information that will assist such persons in analyzing Gallagher's operating results as they develop a future outlook for Gallagher. Gallagher believes that Organic Growth provides a comparable measurement of revenue growth that is associated with the revenue sources that will be continuing in 2013 and beyond. Gallagher has historically viewed organic revenue growth as an important indicator when assessing and evaluating the performance of its Brokerage and Risk Management segments. Gallagher also believes that using this measure allows financial statement users to measure, analyze and compare the growth from its Brokerage and Risk Management segments in a meaningful and consistent manner.
Adjusted Revenues is defined as revenues, adjusted to exclude gains realized from sales of books of business and revenue from New Zealand earthquake claims administration.
Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio is defined as operating expense, adjusted to exclude Heath Lambert and GAB Robins integration costs, South Australia ramp up costs, workforce related charges, lease termination related charges, acquisition related adjustments and the impact of foreign currency translation, as applicable, divided by Adjusted Revenues.
Organic Growth is defined as organic change in base commission and fee revenues, and excludes the first twelve months of net commission and fee revenues generated from acquisitions accounted for as purchases, and the net commission and fee revenues related to operations disposed of in each year presented. These commissions and fees are excluded from organic revenues in order to help interested persons analyze the revenue growth associated with the operations that were a part of Gallagher in both the current and prior year. In addition, change in organic growth excludes the impact of supplemental commission and contingent commission revenues, and the period?over?period impact of foreign currency translation. The amounts excluded with respect to foreign currency translation are calculated by applying 2012 foreign exchange rates to the same periods in 2011. For the Risk Management segment, organic change in base domestic and international fee revenues excludes international performance bonus fees and New Zealand earthquake claims administration to improve the comparability of our results between periods by eliminating the impact of the items that have a high degree of variability or due to the limited- time nature of these revenue sources.
The most directly comparable GAAP measure for Adjusted Revenues and Organic Growth is revenues. For the Brokerage Segment, the Risk Management Segment, and the two segments on a combined basis, revenues were $1,556 million, $549 million, and $2,105 million, respectively, in 2011, and $1,827 million, $572 million and $2,399 million, respectively, in 2012. For the Brokerage Segment, revenues were $533 million, $679 million, $783 million, $863 million, $946 million, $1,007 million, $1,114 million, $1,188 million, $1,276 million, $1,341 million, $1,556 million and $1,827 million, in 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012, respectively. The most directly comparable GAAP measure for Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio is operating expense, which was $247 million, $267 million and $313 million in 2008, 2011 and 2012, respectively.
Adjusted Cash Generation  Gallagher defines this measure as adjusted EBITDAC further adjusted to add back stock compensation expense (a non- cash charge) and to deduct capital expenditures, interest and banking costs, corporate and acquisition costs, and income taxes paid. Gallagher considers Adjusted Cash Generation as a way to measure net cash generated from its operations on an ongoing basis.
Reconciliations  Please see page 56 for a reconciliation of Adjusted Cash Generation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure. For all other measures, please see the examples set forth in "Reconciliation of Non- GAAP Measures and supplemental quarterly financial data " on Gallagher's Web site at www.ajg.com/IR.
 
Snapshot of Gallagher
Brokerage Segment
Risk
Segment
 - 3/4 of revenue
 -  We sell insurance and consult on insurance programs
 -  P&C and benefits
 -  Retail and wholesale
 -  1/4 of revenue
 -  We adjust claims and help companies reduce their losses
 -  Workers compensation, liability, managed care, property and auto
 -  Modest amount of storm/quake claims
10
 
Brokerage Segment Revenues
Retail-P/C/C
Domestic
80%
Wholesale 24%
Retail- Benefits 25%
International
20%
 
Risk Management Revenues
Workers Compensation 68%
Property 5%
Liability 27%
Domestic
79%
International
21%
 
Brokerage Segment  2012
Adjusted Revenues
$2,000 18%
$1,824
$1,750
$1,549
$1,500
$1,250
2011 2012
Adjusted EBITDAC 22%
$450
$415
$400 $350 $341 $300
2011 2012
Organic Growth in base commission & fees
6.0%
4.4%
4.0% 2.8% 2.0%
0.0%
2011 2012
Adjusted EDITDAC Margin
24.0%
23.0% 7%
22.0%
22.0%
21.0%
20.0%
2011 2012
(in $M) See important disclosures regarding Non?GAAP measures on Page 9.
13
13
 
Risk Management Segment  2012
Adjusted Revenues 7%
$575 563 $550
$527
$525 $500 $475
2011 2012
Adjusted EBITDAC 11%
$100 $95
$90 90
$85 $81 $80 $75
2011 2012
Organic Growth in base fees
8.0% 7.0%
6.0% .7%
4.9%
5.0% 4.0%
2011 2012
Adjusted EDITDAC Margin
17.0%
16.0%
16.0%
15.4%
15.0%
14.0%
2011 2012
(in $M) See important disclosures regarding Non?GAAP measures on Page 9.
14
14
 
Brokerage & Risk Mgmt Combined  2012
Adjusted Revenues 15%
$2,500 2,387 $2,250
$2,076
$2,000
$1,750
2011 2012
Adjusted EBITDAC
20%
$550
505
$500
$450 $422 $400
$350
2011 2012
(in $M)
Organic Growth in base commissions & fees
6.0%
. %
5.0%
4.0% 3.3% 3.0% 20% .
1.0%
2011 2012
Adjusted EDITDAC Margin
22.0%
.2%
21.0%
20.3%
20.0%
19.0%
2011 2012
See important disclosures regarding Non?GAAP measures on Page 9.
15
 
Net Earnings from Clean Energy Investments
$40.0
.7
$30.0
$20.0
$10.0 $7.5
$3.9
$0.0
-$4.8
-$10.0
2009 2010 2011 2012
(in $M)
16
 
Cash and Dividends
Adjusted Cash Generation
$400
$358 $313
$300
$264
$200
$100
2010 2011 2012
Dividends Declared as % of Adjusted Cash Generation
100%
75%
51%
48% 47%
50%
25%
0%
2010 2011 2012
See important disclosures regarding Non?GAAP measures on Page 9. 17
 
Dividends Per Share
$1.60
$1.40
$1.20
$1.00
$0.80
$0.60
$0.40
$0.20
$0.00
$1.40*
1984
2013
*Indicated  On January 24, 2013, Gallagher's Board of Directors declared a $.35 per share first quarter 2013 quarterly dividend.
18
 
Maintaining a Prudent Balance Sheet
Gallagher S&P 1000 Net Debt $694 Stockholders' Equity $1,659 Net Debt to Total Capital 29% 27% Net Debt to Adjusted EBITDAC 1.4x 1.8x
$s in millions. Using Gallagher's TTM combined Brokerage and Risk Management EBITDAC as of 12/31/12. Net Debt as of 12/31/12 for Gallagher reflects $725m in term notes and $129m on the line of credit less $160m of cash on hand available for general corporate purposes. Source for S&P 1000 data: Bloomberg as of 02/05/13.
Gallagher is borrowing an additional $200 million of 10-year notes by mid-year 2013.
See important disclosures regarding Non?GAAP measures on Page 9.
19
 
Environment
Economy Carrier Position Rates
20
 
Real GDP Growth Jobs
4% 140,000 3%
2% 135,000 1% 130,000 0% ?1% ?2% 125,000 ?3% 120,000 ?4% 115,000
Source for data: Bureau of Economic Analysis Total Nonfarm Employees (in thousands) seasonally adjusted. Source for data: Bureau of Labor Statistics.
Business Confidence Short?term Rates 75
6%
4%
50
2%
0%
25
Average Annual Effective Fed Funds Rates. Source for data: Bloomberg Purchasing Managers Index. Source for data: Institute for Supply Management. Green diamond depicts the January 2013 value of 53.1
21
 
Firming Indicators for Carriers  Yet Ample Capacity Remains
118.3 Combined Ratios
120 115
107.4 110 105 100
93.8 95 90
Source for calendar year combined ratio data: AM Best. Excludes certain large mortgage insurance and personal lines companies to better depict Gallagher's primary markets. Catastrophe & Prior Period Development impact on Combined Ratios based on public disclosures of larger U.S. commercial carriers where Gallagher places business.
Premium/Statutory Surplus
1.6x
1.4x
1.2x
1.0x
0.8x
0.6x
Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2001  2011. Prior to 2001, sources are A.M. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute.
Investment Yields
7.0%
6.5%
6.0%
5.5%
5.0%
4.5%
4.0%
3.5%
3.0%
Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2001  2011. Prior to 2001, sources are A.M. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute.
Statutory Surplus
$600 $500 $400 $300 $200 $100
($Billions)
Source for data : Total US P/C Industry from Best's Statement File P/C US for 2004  2011. Prior to 2004, sources are A.M. Best and ISO via the Insurance Information Institute.
22
 
So, A 100 Combined Ratio Isn't What It Once Was
ROE
110.0 15.9%
105.0
ROE 7.6%
100.0 95.0 90.0
85.0
Combined Combined Ratio Ratio
80.0
1979 2010
Extrapolating from this analysis, a combined ratio in the low 90s is required to generate risk appropriate ROEs in the current environment
* 2010 figures are a return on average surplus and exclude mortgage and financial guaranty insurers.
Source: Robert P. Hartwig's Insurance Information Institute presentation from 7/17/12 using A.M. Best and ISO data.
23
 
Carrier Response  Rate Change
.
CIAB ?Change in Average U.S. Commercial Rates
 
Commercial P&C Pricing
160
150
CPI
140
133
130
120
110 Rates
100 95
90
80
Commercial Rate Index reflects the cost of P&C premiums relative to the year 2000. Constructed using Counsel of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB) data. CPI index uses data from the Bureau of Labor Statistics.
25
25
 
Firming Market Versus Classic Hard Market
Classic Hard Market
Firming Market
1999 2005 2012
Small Accounts Midsized Accounts Large Accounts
Average Commercial Premium Rate Changes by Account Size
Source: The Council of Insurance Agents and Brokers (CIAB). Chart prepared by Barclays Research.
Captions in the above chart were overlaid by Gallagher and do not necessarily reflect the opinions of the CIAB and/or Barclays Research.
26
 
Firming Market Versus Classic Hard Market
Classic Hard Market
Short?lived radical price increases
Clients can't get coverage
Business forced chaotically into surplus lines
Carriers' urgent need to restore profitability
Lack of capacity
Firming Market
Moderate price increases for an extended period of time
Clients can still get coverage
Business moves more orderly into surplus lines
Carriers restore profitability orderly
Adequate capacity
27
 
Current Environment
Better for Clients Better for Carriers Better for Brokers
 
Plan For Growth  Organic
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Sales Focus Into
Mgmt. Cross Niches Tools and Selling Hire Training
Organic
Experienced
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Global Expansion
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Sales Focus Into
Mgmt. Cross Niches Selling Hire Training
Organic
Experienced
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Global Expansion
 
Driving Organic Growth
Grow Our
Provide Sales Focus Into
Mgmt. Cross Niches Selling Hire Training
Organic
Experienced
Teams Growth
Enhance Carrier Compensation
Global Expansion
32
 
Gallagher's Sales Culture Performs Throughout the Entire Cycle
Gallagher Organic CIAB ?Change in Avg. Commercial Rates
25.0%
Hard Market Soft Market Firm Market
19.8% 19.8% 20.0% 16.0% 14.0% 15.0%
10.0% Gallagher 10.0% Organic 5.0% 8.1% 4.4% 5.0% 3.1% 2.0% 2.0% 2.0% ?08% . CIAB* 0.0% ?1.7% ?2.4% 4.4% 0.2% ?5.0% ?4.1% ?5.2% ?5.4% ?5.6% ?10.0% ?8.0% ?11.0% ?15.0% ?12.1% 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012
Gallagher's Brokerage Segment Organic Growth including Supplemental Commissions. See important disclosures regarding non- GAAP measures on Page 9.
*Average change in Commercial Rates
33
 
Plan For Growth  M&A
 
M&A Looking Forward  Opportunities Continue
Gallagher's Vast Pipeline Gallagher Acquisition Limited Core Units Consolidators Competency Domestic and International Retail P&C
Markets Highly Fragmented
Wholesale Culture 18,000 agents/brokers Benefits in the U.S. Gallagher Proven History of International Doing the Baby boomers Deal looking for exit MGA strategy Ability to MGU
Integrate Need Gallagher's Expertise Captive
 
Current Gallagher U.S. Locations
 
Larger Cities With Expansion Potential
Cities with population of 100,000+ where Gallagher has no presence.
 
Gallagher International Offices and Correspondent Brokers
Client Capabilities in More Than 140 Countries
38
38
 
Strong Acquisition Momentum
Domestic Brokerage Intl Brokerage $300 Heath Lambert Risk Management
$250 $200 $150 $100 $50
$0
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012
Annualized revenues acquired (in $Ms).
 
Gallagher Heath Update
Heath Lambert Acquired May 2011
Positions Gallagher among top 10 U.K. brokers
Additional distribution network in 15 U.K. locations outside London
Added new retail capabilities to existing London wholesale operation
Executing:
 -  Bolt?on acquisition strategy  Getting access to deals not previously available
 -  Hiring Strategy  Attracting experienced producers and teams
Integration as planned and on schedule
Integration costs of about $.02 to $.03/quarter through mid- 2013
 
Productivity and Quality
 
Optimizing Productivity & Quality
Established
shore Controlling
ters of Headcoun
cellence
Utilizing
Leveraging Sourcing
Sales Force to Manage
Management Improving Expenses
Tools
Productivity and
Quality Building
Investing in Productivity
Business Tools  DMS
Intelligence and Workflow
Optimizing Standardizing
Real Estate Processes and
Footprint Systems
 
Reasons for Offshore Centers of Excellence
Reduce Costs
Foster Innovation
Increase Speed to Market
Focus on Core
Improve Quality
 
Back Office Infrastructure  2004
 
Back Office  Today
 
Current Front Office Activity
 
Reducing Adjusted Operating Expense Ratio
Brokerage
21.0% 20.8%
20.0%
19.0%
18.0%
17.0% 16.8% 16.7%
16.0%
2008 2011 2012
See important disclosures regarding Non?GAAP measures on Page 9.
Risk Management
27.5%
27.0%
26.5%
25.5%
24.5% 24.2%
24.0%
23.5%
22.5%
2008 2011 2012
47
 
AJG  2012 #1 Overall Client
Satisfaction for Large AJG Intl  2012 Best Broker Corporations  Greenwich M&A Deal of the Year 
Associates Reactions Magazine
Gallagher Singapore  2012 Best Trade Credit AJG Intl  2012 Ins Broking Insurance Broker  Asia/Pacific Company of the Year  Global Trade Review Magazine Reactions Magazine
GB 2012 Small & Mid?Market Firms AJG  2013 Ranked Top Ten Best Companies Buyers Choice TPA Overall Winner for Leaders  Chief Executive Magazine Business Insurance
Gallagher/Heath  2012 AJG Intl  2012 M&A GB UK  2012 Investor in People Commercial Lines Broker of Transaction of the Year UK National Standard the Year  Insurance Times  Insurance Day
 
Culture
 
Maintain Unique Culture
 
One of the World's Most Ethical Companies
as Recognized by Ethisphere Institute
 -  Industry- leading commitment to ethics and dedication to integrity
 -  Chosen for:
?Promoting ethical business standards and practices- Exceeding legal compliance standards- Innovating to benefit the public- Demonstrating that corporate citizenship is tied to company success
 -  Globally, only 145 organizations named
 
A Top Ten Best Company for Leadership Development
As Recognized by Chief Executive Magazine  2013
Recognized for:
?High percentage of senior and mid- manager positions filled internally
?Formal leadership process-Commitment to leadership development program
 
Momentum Into 2013
2012 Actions
Closed 60 acquisitions with $231m of acquired revenue
Completed 9 deals outside of the U.S. Heath Lambert integration efforts Favored cash in 4th quarter to fund M&A
Clean energy investment activity
2013 Impact
Incremental roll?in revenues of $134m Continuing our global expansion Will achieve anticipated profits
Will favor cash and debt
May generate $70m$80m of after tax earnings. Future earnings to be used for M&A.
53
 
Momentum Into 2013
2012 Actions
Rolled out our first Private Health Exchange
Consolidating agency management systems in our U.S. P&C operations
Rolled out the Gallagher Bassett client?centric Analytical Workbench
Sold and ramped up for a large account in Australia
2013 Impact
Provides a critical capability for clients
Enables increased productivity and higher quality
Provides market leading tool to clients
Expect $20m of new revenues
 
Why Invest?
Source for data: Bloomberg. Total returns from 1/1/2000  1/31/2013 include reinvesting all dividends at the ex?dividend date.
 
QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AJG/AJG-8K-20130617144253.txt.gz
TIME:20130617144253
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The information required by this item with respect to the Purchase Agreement (as defined below) is incorporated herein by reference to Item 2.03.
 
On June 14, 2013, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. ("Gallagher") and certain of its subsidiaries (collectively, the "Subsidiary Obligors") issued, in a private placement, $200 million aggregate principal amount of 3.69% Series G Senior Notes, due June 14, 2022 (collectively, the "Notes"). Interest on the Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on June 14 and December 14 of each year, beginning on December 14, 2013. Gallagher issued the Notes pursuant to the terms of a Note Purchase Agreement dated as of June 14, 2013 (the "Purchase Agreement") with certain accredited institutional investors (collectively, the "Purchasers"). The Notes are senior unsecured obligations of Gallagher and the Subsidiary Obligors and rank equal in right of payment with all other senior unsecured indebtedness of Gallagher and the Subsidiary Obligors.
The Purchase Agreement contains customary provisions for transactions of this type, including representations and warranties regarding Gallagher and its subsidiaries and various covenants, including covenants that require Gallagher to maintain specified financial ratios. The Purchase Agreement provides for customary events of default, generally with corresponding grace periods, including, without limitation, payment defaults with respect to the Notes, covenant defaults, cross-defaults to other agreements evidencing indebtedness of Gallagher or its subsidiaries, certain judgments against Gallagher or its subsidiaries and events of bankruptcy involving Gallagher or its material subsidiaries.
Under the terms of the Purchase Agreement, the Notes are redeemable, in whole or in part, at 100% of the principal amount being redeemed, together with accrued and unpaid interest and a "make-whole amount" (as defined in the Purchase Agreement) with respect to each Note. If within 90 days after a "change in control" Gallagher (or its successor) does not have an "investment grade rating", Gallagher is obligated to offer to prepay all of the outstanding Notes at the principal amount thereof plus accrued interest (but without any "make-whole amount") (as each term is defined in the Purchase Agreement).
The foregoing summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Purchase Agreement and form of the Notes, filed herewith as Exhibit 4.1 and Exhibit 4.2, respectively.
 
On June 17, 2013, Gallagher issued a press release announcing it had completed the issuance of the Notes. A copy of this press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 4.1
E C
XECUTION
OPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Dated as of June 14, 2013
T E P L
O
ACH
OF
THE
URCHASERS
ISTED
IN
  S A H:
CHEDULE
ERETO
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally agree with each of the Purchasers whose names appear in attached hereto (each, a and, collectively, the ) as follows:
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
Section 9.7,
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Schedule A
"Purchaser"
"Purchasers"
SECTION 1. Authorization of Notes.
The Obligors will authorize the issue and sale of $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.69% Senior Notes, Series G, due June 14, 2022 (the "Series G Notes" or the "Notes," such term to include any such notes issued in substitution therefor pursuant to ). The Series G Notes shall be substantially in the form set out in . Certain capitalized and other terms used in this Agreement are defined in ; and references to a "" or an are, unless otherwise specified, to a Schedule or an Exhibit attached to this Agreement.
Section 13
Exhibit 1
Schedule B
Schedule
"Exhibit"
SECTION 2. Sale and Purchase of Notes.
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Obligors will issue and sell to each Purchaser and each Purchaser will purchase from the Obligors, at the Closing provided for in , Series G Notes in the principal amount specified opposite such Purchaser's name in at the purchase price of 100% of the principal amount thereof. The Purchasers' obligations hereunder are several and not joint obligations and no Purchaser shall have any liability to any Person for the performance or non-performance of any obligation by any other Purchaser hereunder.
Section 2.1 Purchase and Sale of the Series G Notes.
Section 3
Schedule A
(a) The holders of the Notes acknowledge and agree that any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor (other than the Company) shall be automatically discharged and released from the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, pursuant to the written request of the Company, that (i) such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, has been released and discharged as a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of all Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to (x) the Bank Credit Agreement and (y) each Existing Note Agreement with respect to which such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligator, as the case may be, is a guarantor or obligor, and the Company so certifies to the holders of the Notes in a certificate which accompanies such request for release and discharge, (ii) any such release and discharge shall be expressly conditioned upon receipt by the holders of the Notes of a written agreement executed by the Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, to be released pursuant to which such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, shall agree that if, for any reason whatsoever, it thereafter becomes a guarantor or an obligor under and in respect of any Indebtedness of the Company at any time due and owing pursuant to (x) the Bank Credit Agreement or (y) any Existing Note Agreement, then such Subsidiary Guarantor or such Obligor, as the case may be, shall contemporaneously provide written notice thereof to the holders of the Notes accompanied by an executed (A) Subsidiary Guaranty or (B) Joinder Agreement, as the case may be, of such Subsidiary together with any other documents required to be delivered by such Subsidiary Guarantor in accordance with , and (iii) at the time of such release and discharge, the Company shall deliver a certificate of a Responsible Officer to the holders of the Notes to the effect that no Default or Event of Default exists; that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
Section 2.2 Release of Subsidiary Guarantors and Obligors.
provided
Section 9.7
provided
Section 10.5
(b) The Company agrees that it will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary or Affiliate to, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration or remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, to any creditor of the Company or of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any such creditor of any release or discharge of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, with respect to any liability of such Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor, as the case may be, as a guarantor or obligor under or in respect of Indebtedness of the Company, unless such consideration or remuneration is concurrently paid, on the same terms, ratably to the holders of all of the Notes then outstanding.
(c) Each holder of the Notes further acknowledges and agrees that following the release of an Obligor pursuant to this , if requested in writing by the Obligor Agent, that such holder of the Notes shall, at the cost and expense of the Obligors, within 20 Business Days following the date of such request, surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note and in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the remaining Obligors.
Section 2.2
 
SECTION 3. Closing.
The sale and purchase of the Notes to be purchased by each Purchaser shall occur at the offices of Schiff Hardin LLP, Suite 6600, 233 S. Wacker Dr., Chicago, Illinois 60606, at 10:00 .. Chicago time, at a closing (the ) on June 14, 2013. At the Closing, the Obligors will deliver to each Purchaser the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser in the form of a single Note to be purchased by such Purchaser (or such greater number of Notes in denominations of at least $100,000 as such Purchaser may request) dated the date of the Closing and registered in such Purchaser's name (or in the name of its nominee), against delivery by such Purchaser to the Obligors or their order of immediately available funds in the amount of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of immediately available funds for the account of the Company to account number 265-977-9, Account Name: Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.  Delaware Dividend Account, at Harris N.A., Chicago, IL (ABA No.: 071-000-288). If at the Closing the Obligors shall fail to tender such Notes to any Purchaser as provided above in this , or any of the conditions specified in shall not have been fulfilled to such Purchaser's satisfaction, such Purchaser shall, at its election, be relieved of all further obligations under this Agreement, without thereby waiving any rights such Purchaser may have by reason of such failure or such nonfulfillment.
A
M
"Closing"
Section 3
Section 4
SECTION 4. Conditions to Closing.
Each Purchaser's obligation to purchase and pay for the Notes to be sold to such Purchaser at the Closing is subject to the fulfillment to such Purchaser's satisfaction, prior to or at the Closing, of the following conditions:
. The representations and warranties of each Obligor in this Agreement shall be correct when made and at the time of the Closing.
Section 4.1 Representations and Warranties
. Each Obligor shall have performed and complied with all agreements and conditions contained in this Agreement required to be performed or complied with by it prior to or at the Closing, and after giving effect to the issue and sale of the Notes (and the application of the proceeds thereof as contemplated by ), no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 4.2 Performance; No Default
Section 5.14
.
Section 4.3 Compliance Certificates
(a) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser an Officer's Certificate, dated the date of the Closing, certifying that the conditions specified in , and have been fulfilled.
Officer's Certificate
Sections 4.1
4.2
4.9
(b) . Each Obligor shall have delivered to such Purchaser a certificate of its Secretary or Assistant Secretary, dated the date of Closing, certifying as to the resolutions attached thereto and other corporate proceedings relating to the authorization, execution and delivery of the Notes and this Agreement.
Secretary's Certificate
 
. Such Purchaser shall have received opinions in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser, dated the date of the Closing (a) from Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Obligors, in the form set forth in (and each Obligor hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) (b) from Walter D. Bay, Esq., General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, in the form set forth in (and the Company hereby instructs its counsel to deliver such opinion to the Purchasers) and (c) from Schiff Hardin LLP, the Purchasers' special counsel in connection with such transactions, substantially in the form set forth in and covering such other matters incident to such transactions as such Purchaser may reasonably request.
Section 4.4 Opinions of Counsel
Exhibit 4.4(a)
Exhibit 4.4(b)
Exhibit 4.4(c)
On the date of the Closing such Purchaser's purchase of Notes shall (a) be permitted by the laws and regulations of each jurisdiction to which such Purchaser is subject, without recourse to provisions (such as section 1405(a)(8) of the New York Insurance Law) permitting limited investments by insurance companies without restriction as to the character of the particular investment, (b) not violate any applicable law or regulation (including, without limitation, Regulation T, U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) and (c) not subject such Purchaser to any tax, penalty or liability under or pursuant to any applicable law or regulation, which law or regulation was not in effect on the date hereof. If requested by such Purchaser, such Purchaser shall have received an Officer's Certificate certifying as to such matters of fact as such Purchaser may reasonably specify to enable such Purchaser to determine whether such purchase is so permitted.
Section 4.5 Purchase Permitted by Applicable Law, Etc.
. Contemporaneously with the Closing, the Obligors shall sell to each other Purchaser, and each other Purchaser shall purchase, the Notes to be purchased by it at the Closing as specified in .
Section 4.6 Sale of Other Notes
Schedule A
. Without limiting the provisions of , the Obligors shall have paid on or before the Closing the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of the Purchasers' special counsel referred to in to the extent reflected in a statement of such counsel rendered to the Company at least one Business Day prior to the Closing.
Section 4.7 Payment of Special Counsel Fees
Section 15.1
Section 4.4
. A Private Placement Number issued by Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau (in cooperation with the Securities Valuation Office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) shall have been obtained for the Series G Notes.
Section 4.8 Private Placement Number
. No Obligor shall have changed its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization, as applicable, or been a party to any merger or consolidation or succeeded to all or any substantial part of the liabilities of any other entity, at any time following the date of the most recent financial statements referred to in .
Section 4.9 Changes in Corporate Structure
Schedule 5.5
At least three Business Days prior to the date of the Closing, each Purchaser shall have received written instructions signed by a Responsible Officer on letterhead of the Company confirming the information specified in including (a) the name and address of the transferee bank, (b) such transferee bank's ABA number and (c) the account name and number into which the purchase price for the Notes is to be deposited.
Section 4.10 Funding Instructions.
Section 3
 
. All corporate or limited liability company and other proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and all documents and instruments incident to such transactions shall be reasonably satisfactory to such Purchaser and its special counsel, and such Purchaser and its special counsel shall have received all such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as such Purchaser or such special counsel may reasonably request.
Section 4.11 Proceedings and Documents
SECTION 5. Representations and Warranties of the Obligors.
Each Obligor represents and warrants to each Purchaser as of the date hereof that:
. Such Obligor is a corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation or formation, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as the case may be, and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Such Obligor has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Notes and to perform the provisions hereof and thereof.
Section 5.1 Organization; Power and Authority
. This Agreement and the Notes have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of such Obligor, and this Agreement constitutes, and upon execution and delivery thereof each Note will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Obligor enforceable against such Obligor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (a) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (b) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
Section 5.2 Authorization, Etc
. This Agreement and the documents, certificates or other writings delivered to the Purchasers by or on behalf of the Company in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby and identified in , and the financial statements listed in (this Agreement, and such documents, certificates or other writings and such financial statements delivered to each Purchaser prior to June 14, 2013 being referred to, collectively, as the ), taken as a whole, do not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in light of the circumstances under which they were made. Since December 31, 2012, there has been no change in the financial condition, operations, business or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, except changes that individually or in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. There is no fact known to any Obligor that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect that has not been set forth herein or in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.3 Disclosure
Schedule 5.3
Schedule 5.5
"Disclosure Documents"
 
. (a)  contains (except as noted therein) complete and correct lists (i) of the Company's Subsidiaries, showing, as to each Subsidiary, the correct name thereof, the jurisdiction of its organization, the percentage of shares of each class of its capital stock or similar equity interests outstanding owned by the Company and each other Subsidiary and designation of whether or not such Subsidiary is an obligor or guarantor under the Bank Credit Agreement, (ii) of the Company's Affiliates, other than Subsidiaries, and (iii) of the Company's directors and senior officers.
Section 5.4 Organization and Ownership of Shares of Subsidiaries; Affiliates
Schedule 5.4
(b) All of the outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of each Subsidiary shown in as being owned by the Company and its Subsidiaries have been validly issued, are (in the case of capital stock) fully paid and nonassessable and are owned by the Company or another Subsidiary free and clear of any Lien (except as otherwise disclosed in ).
Schedule 5.4
Schedule 5.4 or Schedule 5.15(b)
(c) Each Subsidiary identified in is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each such Subsidiary has the corporate or other legal entity power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease and to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact other than that which could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Schedule 5.4
(d) No Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to, any legal, regulatory, contractual or other restriction (other than this Agreement, the agreements listed on and limitations imposed by law) restricting the ability of such Subsidiary to pay dividends out of profits or make any other similar distributions of profits to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that owns outstanding shares of capital stock or similar equity interests of such Subsidiary.
Schedule 5.4
. The Company has delivered to each Purchaser copies of the financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries listed on . All of said financial statements (including in each case the related schedules and notes) fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the respective dates specified in such financial statements and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the respective periods so specified and have been prepared in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the periods involved except as set forth in the notes thereto (subject, in the case of any interim financial statements, to normal year-end adjustments). To the knowledge of the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries do not have any Material liabilities that are not disclosed in such financial statements or otherwise disclosed in the Disclosure Documents.
Section 5.5 Financial Statements; Material Liabilities
Schedule 5.5
. The execution, delivery and performance by the Obligors of this Agreement and the Notes will not (a) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of
Section 5.6 Compliance with Laws, Other Instruments, Etc
 
any Lien in respect of any property of any Obligor or any Subsidiary under, any Material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, corporate charter or by-laws, or any other Material agreement or instrument to which such Obligor or any Subsidiary is bound or by which any Obligor or any Subsidiary or any of their respective properties may be bound or affected, (b) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary or (c) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to any Obligor or any Subsidiary.
. No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by the Obligors of this Agreement or the Notes.
Section 5.7 Governmental Authorizations, Etc
(a) Except as disclosed in the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 or the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013, there are no actions, suits, investigations or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of each of the Obligors, threatened against or affecting the Company or any Subsidiary or any property of the Company or any Subsidiary in any court or before any arbitrator of any kind or before or by any Governmental Authority that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.8 Litigation; Observance of Agreements, Statutes and Orders.
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default under any term of any agreement or instrument to which it is a party or by which it is bound, or any order, judgment, decree or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority or is in violation of any applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation (including without limitation Environmental Laws or the USA Patriot Act) of any Governmental Authority, which default or violation, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have filed all tax returns that are required to have been filed in any jurisdiction, and have paid all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes and assessments levied upon them or their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent such taxes and assessments have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent, except for any taxes and assessments (a) the amount of which is not individually or in the aggregate Material or (b) the amount, applicability or validity of which is currently being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and with respect to which the Company has established adequate reserves on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP. No Obligor knows of any basis for any other tax or assessment that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The charges, accruals and reserves on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries in respect of Federal, state or other taxes for all fiscal periods are, in the judgment of the Company, adequate. The Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries have been finally determined (whether by reason of completed audits or the statute of limitations having run) for all fiscal years up to and including the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009; , , that this sentence shall not apply to any Federal income tax liabilities of the Company and its Subsidiaries arising from an examination by a Governmental Authority of any of the investment partnerships of the Company.
Section 5.9 Taxes
provided
however
 
. The Company and its Subsidiaries have good and sufficient title to their respective properties that individually or in the aggregate are Material, including all such properties reflected in the most recent audited balance sheet referred to in or purported to have been acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary after said date (except as sold or otherwise disposed of in the ordinary course of business), in each case free and clear of Liens prohibited by this Agreement. All leases that individually or in the aggregate are Material are valid and subsisting and are in full force and effect in all material respects.
Section 5.10 Title to Property; Leases
Section 5.5
(a) The Company and its Subsidiaries own or possess all licenses, permits, franchises, authorizations, patents, copyrights, proprietary software, service marks, trademarks and trade names, or rights thereto, without known conflict with the rights of others, except those conflicts that, individually and in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.11 Licenses, Permits, Etc.
(b) To the knowledge of each Obligor, no product of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries infringes in any respect with any license, permit, franchise, authorization, patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned by any other Person, except to the extent any such infringement could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) To the knowledge of each Obligor, there is no Material violation by any Person of any right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any patent, copyright, proprietary software, service mark, trademark, trade name or other right owned or used by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
. (a) The Company and each ERISA Affiliate have operated and administered each Plan in compliance with all applicable laws except for such instances of noncompliance as have not resulted in and could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor any ERISA Affiliate has incurred any liability (other than liabilities for PBGC premiums that have been paid or will be paid on a timely basis) pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans (as defined in section 3 of ERISA), and no event, transaction or condition has occurred or exists that could reasonably be expected to result in the incurrence of any such liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate, in either case pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or to such penalty or excise tax provisions or to sections 412 or 430 of the Code or section 4068 of ERISA, other than such liabilities or Liens as would not be individually or in the aggregate Material.
Section 5.12 Compliance with ERISA
(b) The present value of the aggregate benefit liabilities under each of the Plans (other than Multiemployer Plans), determined as of the end of such Plan's most recently ended plan year on the basis of the actuarial assumptions specified for funding purposes in such Plan's most recent actuarial valuation report, did not exceed the aggregate current value of the assets of such Plan allocable to such benefit liabilities by more than $30,000,000. The term "benefit liabilities" has the meaning specified in Section 4001 of ERISA and the terms "current value" and "present value" have the meaning specified in section 3 of ERISA.
 
(c) In respect of each Plan, the Company and each other member of its Controlled Group has fulfilled its obligations under the minimum funding standards of ERISA and the Code to the extent applicable to it.
(d) The Company and its ERISA Affiliates have not incurred withdrawal liabilities (and are not subject to contingent withdrawal liabilities) under Section 4201 or 4204 of ERISA in respect of Multiemployer Plans that individually or in the aggregate are Material.
(e) The expected post retirement benefit obligation (determined as of the last day of the Company's most recently ended fiscal year in accordance with Accounting Standard Codification 715, formerly known as Financial Accounting Standards Board Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715-60, without regard to liabilities attributable to continuation coverage mandated by Section 4980B of the Code) of the Company and its Subsidiaries is not Material or has otherwise been disclosed in the financial statements set forth on .
Schedule 5.5
(f) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the issuance and sale of the Notes hereunder will not involve any transaction that is subject to the prohibitions of Section 406 of ERISA or in connection with which a tax could be imposed pursuant to Section 4975(c)(1)(A)-(D) of the Code. The representation by the Company in the first sentence of this is made in reliance upon and subject to the accuracy of such Purchaser's representation in as to the sources of the funds used to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser.
Section 5.12(f)
Section 6.2
. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has offered the Notes or any similar securities for sale to, or solicited any offer to buy any of the same from, or otherwise approached or negotiated in respect thereof with, any Person other than the Purchasers and not more than 10 other Institutional Investors, each of which has been offered the Notes at a private sale for investment. No Obligor nor anyone acting on its behalf has taken, or will take, any action that would subject the issuance or sale of the Notes to the registration requirements of Section 5 of the Securities Act or to the registration requirements of any securities or blue sky laws of any applicable jurisdiction.
Section 5.13 Private Offering by the Company
. The Obligors will apply the proceeds of the sale of the Notes to repay outstanding borrowings under the Bank Credit Agreement (without reducing the commitments thereunder) and for general corporate purposes, including the financing of acquisitions. No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of buying or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 CFR 221), or for the purpose of buying or carrying or trading in any securities under such circumstances as to involve the Company in a violation of Regulation X of said Board (12 CFR 224) or to involve any broker or dealer in a violation of Regulation T of said Board (12 CFR 220), in each case, in contravention of applicable margin stock regulations. Margin stock does not constitute more than 15% of the value of the consolidated assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries and the Company does not have any present intention that margin stock will constitute more than 15% of the value of such assets. As used in this , the terms "margin stock" and "purpose of buying or carrying" shall have the meanings assigned to them in said Regulation U.
Section 5.14 Use of Proceeds; Margin Regulations
Section 5.14
 
. (a)  sets forth the outstanding Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of March 31, 2013, which list is complete and correct in all material respects (including a description of the obligors and obligees, principal amount outstanding and collateral therefor, if any, and Guaranty thereof, if any), since which date there has been no Material change in the amounts, interest rates, sinking funds, installment payments or maturities of the Indebtedness of the Company or its Subsidiaries. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default and no waiver of default is currently in effect, in the payment of any principal or interest on any Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary and no event or condition exists with respect to any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary that would permit (or that with notice or the lapse of time, or both, would permit) one or more Persons to cause such Indebtedness to become due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment.
Section 5.15 Existing Indebtedness; Future Liens
Schedule 5.15(a)
(b) Except as disclosed in , neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has agreed or consented to cause or permit in the future (upon the happening of a contingency or otherwise) any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, to be subject to a Lien not permitted by .
Schedule 5.15(b)
Section 10.4
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is a party to, or otherwise subject to any provision contained in, any instrument evidencing Indebtedness of the Company or such Subsidiary, any agreement relating thereto or any other agreement (including, but not limited to, its charter or other organizational document) which limits the amount of, or otherwise imposes restrictions on the incurring of, Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary, except as specifically indicated in .
Schedule 5.15(c)
. (a) Neither the Company nor any Controlled Entity is (i) a Person whose name appears on the list of Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons published by the Office of Foreign Assets Control, United States Department of the Treasury ("") (an ""), (ii) an agent, department, or instrumentality of, or is otherwise beneficially owned by, controlled by or acting on behalf of, directly or indirectly, (x) any OFAC Listed Person or (y) any Person, entity, organization, foreign country or regime that is subject to any OFAC Sanctions Program, or (iii) otherwise blocked, subject to sanctions under or engaged in any activity in violation of other United States economic sanctions, including but not limited to, the Trading with the Enemy Act, the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, the Comprehensive Iran Sanctions, Accountability and Divestment Act ("") or any similar law or regulation with respect to Iran or any other country, the Sudan Accountability and Divestment Act, any OFAC Sanctions Program, or any economic sanctions regulations administered and enforced by the United States or any enabling legislation or executive order relating to any of the foregoing (collectively, "") (each OFAC Listed Person and each other Person, entity, organization and government of a country described in clause (i), clause (ii) or clause (iii), a ""). Neither the Company nor any Controlled Entity has been notified that its name appears or may in the future appear on a state list of Persons that engage in investment or other commercial activities in Iran or any other country that is subject to U.S. Economic Sanctions.
Section 5.16 Foreign Assets Control Regulations, Etc
OFAC
OFAC Listed Person
CISADA
U.S. Economic Sanctions
Blocked Person
 
(b) No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder constitutes or will constitute funds obtained on behalf of any Blocked Person or will otherwise be used by the Company or any Controlled Entity, directly or indirectly, (i) in connection with any investment in, or any transactions or dealings with, any Blocked Person, or (ii) otherwise in violation of U.S. Economic Sanctions.
(c) Neither the Company nor any Controlled Entity (i) has been found in violation of, charged with, or convicted of, money laundering, drug trafficking, terrorist-related activities or other money laundering predicate crimes under the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970 (otherwise known as the Bank Secrecy Act), the USA Patriot Act or any other United States law or regulation governing such activities (collectively, "") or any U.S. Economic Sanctions violations, (ii) to the Company's knowledge, is under investigation by any Governmental Authority for possible violation of Anti-Money Laundering Laws or any U.S. Economic Sanctions violations, (iii) has been assessed civil penalties under any Anti-Money Laundering Laws or any U.S. Economic Sanctions, or (iv) has had any of its funds seized or forfeited in an action under any Anti-Money Laundering Laws. The Company has established procedures and controls which it reasonably believes are adequate (and otherwise comply in all material respects with applicable law) to ensure to the extent necessary that the Company and each Controlled Entity is and will continue to be in compliance in all material respects with all applicable current and future Anti-Money Laundering Laws and U.S. Economic Sanctions.
Anti-Money Laundering Laws
(d)  (1) Neither the Company nor any Controlled Entity (i) has been charged with, or convicted of bribery or any other anti-corruption related activity under any applicable law or regulation in a U.S. or any non-U.S. country or jurisdiction, including but not limited to, the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the U.K. Bribery Act 2010 (collectively, ), (ii) to the Company's knowledge, is under investigation by any U.S. or non-U.S. Governmental Authority for possible violation of Anti-Corruption Laws, (iii) has been assessed civil or criminal penalties under any Anti-Corruption Laws or (iv) has been or is the target of sanctions imposed by the United Nations or the European Union;
"Anti-Corruption Laws"
(2) To the Company's knowledge, neither the Company nor any Controlled Entity has, within the last five years, directly or indirectly offered, promised, given, paid or authorized the offer, promise, giving or payment of anything of value to a Governmental Official or a commercial counterparty for the purposes of: (i) influencing any act, decision or failure to act by such Governmental Official in his or her official capacity or such commercial counterparty, (ii) inducing a Governmental Official to do or omit to do any act in violation of the Governmental Official's lawful duty, or (iii) inducing a Governmental Official or a commercial counterparty to use his or her influence with a government or instrumentality to affect any act or decision of such government or entity; in each case in order to obtain, retain or direct business or to otherwise secure an improper advantage in violation of any applicable law or regulation or which would cause any holder of a Note to be in violation of any law or regulation applicable to such holder of a Note; and
(3) No part of the proceeds from the sale of the Notes hereunder will be used, directly or indirectly, for any improper payments, including bribes, to any Governmental Official or commercial counterparty in order to obtain, retain or direct business or obtain any improper
 
advantage in violation of applicable law. The Company has established procedures and controls which it reasonably believes are adequate (and otherwise comply in all material respects with applicable law) to ensure that the Company and each Controlled Entity is and will continue to be in compliance with all applicable current and future Anti-Corruption Laws.
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is subject to regulation under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, the ICC Termination Act of 1995, as amended, or the Federal Power Act, as amended.
Section 5.17 Status under Certain Statutes
. The obligations of the Company under this Agreement and the Notes rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured Senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of the Company, including, without limitation, all senior unsecured Indebtedness of the Company described in hereto.
Section 5.18 Notes Rank Pari Passu
pari passu
Schedule 5.15(a)
. (a) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any claim or has received any notice of any claim, and no proceeding has been instituted raising any claim against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or other assets, alleging any damage to the environment or violation of any Environmental Laws, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.19 Environmental Matters
(b) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has knowledge of any facts which could reasonably be expected to give rise to any claim, public or private, of violation of Environmental Laws or damage to the environment emanating from, occurring on or in any way related to real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or to other assets or their use, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(c) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has stored any Hazardous Materials on real properties now or formerly owned, leased or operated by any of them or has disposed of any Hazardous Materials in a manner contrary to any Environmental Laws, in each case in any manner that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(d) All buildings on all real properties now owned, leased or operated by the Company or any Subsidiary are in compliance with applicable Environmental Laws, except where failure to comply could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
SECTION 6. Representations of the Purchasers.
. Each Purchaser severally represents that (a) it is purchasing the Notes for its own account or for one or more separate accounts maintained by such Purchaser or for the account of one or more pension or trust funds and not with a view to the distribution thereof; that the disposition of such Purchaser's or their property shall at all times be within such Purchaser's or such pension or trust fund's control and (b) is an "Accredited Investor" as defined in Regulation D of the Securities Act and an experienced and sophisticated investor with such knowledge and experience in financial and
Section 6.1 Purchase for Investment
provided
 
business matters as is necessary to evaluate the merits and risks of an investment in the Notes. Each Purchaser understands that the Notes have not been registered under the Securities Act and may be resold only if registered pursuant to the provisions of the Securities Act or if an exemption from registration is available, except under circumstances where neither such registration nor such an exemption is required by law, and that neither the Company nor any Obligor is required to register the Notes.
. Each Purchaser severally represents that at least one of the following statements is an accurate representation as to each source of funds (a ) to be used by such Purchaser to pay the purchase price of the Notes to be purchased by such Purchaser hereunder:
Section 6.2 Source of Funds
"Source"
(a) the Source is an "insurance company general account" (as the term is defined in the United States Department of Labor's Prohibited Transaction Exemption () 95-60) in respect of which the reserves and liabilities (as defined by the annual statement for life insurance companies approved by the NAIC (the ")) for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any employee benefit plan together with the amount of the reserves and liabilities for the general account contract(s) held by or on behalf of any other employee benefit plans maintained by the same employer (or affiliate thereof as defined in PTE 95-60) or by the same employee organization in the general account do not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total reserves and liabilities of the general account (exclusive of separate account liabilities) plus surplus as set forth in the NAIC Annual Statement filed with such Purchaser's state of domicile; or
"PTE"
NAIC Annual Statement"
(b) the Source is a separate account that is maintained solely in connection with such Purchaser's fixed contractual obligations under which the amounts payable, or credited, to any employee benefit plan (or its related trust) that has any interest in such separate account (or to any participant or beneficiary of such plan (including any annuitant)) are not affected in any manner by the investment performance of the separate account; or
(c) the Source is either (i) an insurance company pooled separate account, within the meaning of PTE 90-1, or (ii) a bank collective investment fund, within the meaning of the PTE 91-38 and, except as have been disclosed by such Purchaser to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (c), no employee benefit plan or group of plans maintained by the same employer or employee organization beneficially owns more than 10% of all assets allocated to such pooled separate account or collective investment fund; or
(d) the Source constitutes assets of an "investment fund" (within the meaning of Part VI of the QPAM Exemption) managed by a "qualified professional asset manager" or "QPAM" (within the meaning of Part VI of the QPAM Exemption), no employee benefit plan's assets that are included in such investment fund, when combined with the assets of all other employee benefit plans established or maintained by the same employer or by an affiliate (within the meaning of Section VI(c)(1) of the QPAM Exemption) of such employer or by the same employee organization and managed by such QPAM exceed 20% of the total client assets managed by such QPAM; the
 
conditions of Part I(c) and (g) of the QPAM Exemption are satisfied; as of the last day of its most recent calendar quarter, the QPAM does not own a 10% or more interest in the Company and no Person controlling or controlled by the QPAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section VI(e) of the QPAM Exemption) owns a 20% or more interest in the Company (or less than 20% but greater than 10%, if such person exercises control over the management or policies of the Company by reason of its ownership interest); and (i) the identity of such QPAM and (ii) the names of all employee benefit plans whose assets are included in such investment fund have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (d); or
(e) the Source constitutes assets of a "plan(s)" (within the meaning of Section IV of PTE 96-23 (the )) managed by an "in-house asset manager" or "INHAM" (within the meaning of Part IV of the INHAM Exemption), the conditions of Part I(a), (g) and (h) of the INHAM Exemption are satisfied, neither the INHAM nor a Person controlling or controlled by the INHAM (applying the definition of "control" in Section IV(d) of the INHAM Exemption) owns a 5% or more interest in the Company and (i) the identity of such INHAM and (ii) the name(s) of the employee benefit plan(s) whose assets constitute the Source have been disclosed to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (e); or
"INHAM Exemption"
(f) the Source is a governmental plan; or
(g) the Source is one or more employee benefit plans, or a separate account or trust fund comprised of one or more employee benefit plans, each of which has been identified to the Company in writing pursuant to this clause (g); or
(h) the Source does not include assets of any employee benefit plan, other than a plan exempt from the coverage of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code.
As used in this , the terms "employee benefit plan", "governmental plan", "party in interest" and "separate account" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in section 3 of ERISA.
Section 6.2
SECTION 7. Information as to the Company.
. The Company shall deliver to each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.1 Financial and Business Information
(a)  within 60 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each quarterly fiscal period in each fiscal year of the Company (other than the last quarterly fiscal period of each such fiscal year), duplicate copies of:
Quarterly Statements
"Form 10-Q"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as at the end of such quarter (compared to the previous fiscal year end), and
 
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such quarter and (in the case of the second and third quarters) for the portion of the fiscal year ending with such quarter (compared to the corresponding periods in the previous fiscal year),
all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP applicable to quarterly financial statements generally, and certified by a Senior Financial Officer as fairly presenting, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported on and their results of operations and cash flows, subject to changes resulting from year-end adjustments; that delivery within the time period specified above of copies of the Company's Form 10-Q prepared in compliance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-Q if it shall have timely made such Form 10-Q available on the SEC's "EDGAR" system (or any successor thereto) or any other publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web (at the date of this Agreement located at: http//www.ajg.com) and shall have given each holder of a Note prior notice of such availability on EDGAR (or any such successor thereto) or any other such publicly available database maintained by the SEC and on its home page on the worldwide web in connection with each delivery (such availability and notice thereof being referred to as );
provided
Section 7.1(a)
provided, further,
"Electronic Delivery"
(b)  within 120 days (or such shorter period as is 15 days greater than the period applicable to the filing of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K (the ) with the SEC regardless of whether the Company is subject to the filing requirements thereof) after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, duplicate copies of,
Annual Statements
"Form 10-K"
(i) a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries, as at the end of such year, and
(ii) consolidated statements of earnings, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows of the Company and its Subsidiaries, for such year,
setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all in reasonable detail, prepared in accordance with GAAP, and accompanied by an opinion thereon of independent public accountants of recognized national standing, which opinion shall state that such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the companies being reported upon and their results of operations and cash flows and have been prepared in conformity with GAAP, and that the examination of such accountants in connection with such financial statements has been made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, and that such audit provides a reasonable basis for such opinion in the circumstances, that the delivery within the time period specified above of the Company's Form 10-K for such fiscal year (together with the Company's annual report to stockholders, if any, prepared pursuant to Rule 14a-3 under the Exchange Act) prepared in accordance with the requirements therefor and filed with the SEC, shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this ; that the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such Form 10-K if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
provided
Section 7.1(b)
provided, further,
 
(c)  promptly upon their becoming available, one copy of (i) each financial statement, report, notice or proxy statement sent by the Company or any Subsidiary to its principal lending banks as a whole (excluding information sent to such banks in the ordinary course of administration of a bank facility, such as information relating to pricing and borrowing availability or to its public securities holders generally) and (ii) each regular or periodic report, each registration statement (without exhibits except as expressly requested by such holder and excluding registration statements on Form S-8), and each prospectus and all amendments thereto (excluding those related to plans or plan interests registered on a Form S-8 registration statement) filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC and of all press releases and other statements made available generally by the Company or any Subsidiary to the public concerning developments that are Material; that with respect to any such report, registration statement or prospectus filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the SEC, the Company shall be deemed to have made such delivery of such report, registration statement or prospectus if it shall have timely made Electronic Delivery thereof;
SEC and Other Reports
provided
(d)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of the existence of any Default or Event of Default or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default hereunder or that any Person has given any notice or taken any action with respect to a claimed default of the type referred to in , a written notice specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
Notice of Default or Event of Default
Section 11(f)
(e)  promptly, and in any event within five Business Days after a Responsible Officer becoming aware of any of the following, a written notice setting forth the nature thereof and the action, if any, that the Company or an ERISA Affiliate proposes to take with respect thereto:
ERISA Matters
(i) with respect to any Plan, any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA and the regulations thereunder, for which notice thereof has not been waived pursuant to such regulations as in effect on the date hereof; or
(ii) the taking by the PBGC of steps to institute, or the threatening by the PBGC of the institution of, proceedings under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Plan, or the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of a notice from a Multiemployer Plan that such action has been taken by the PBGC with respect to such Multiemployer Plan; or
(iii) any event, transaction or condition that could result in the incurrence of any liability by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, or in the imposition of any Lien on any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company or any ERISA Affiliate pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or such penalty or excise tax provisions, if such liability or Lien, taken together with any other such liabilities or Liens then existing, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(f)  promptly, and in any event within 30 days of receipt thereof, copies of any notice to any Obligor or any Subsidiary from any Federal or state Governmental Authority relating to any order, ruling, statute or other law or regulation that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
Notices from Governmental Authority
(g)  with reasonable promptness, such other data and information relating to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Obligors or any of their Subsidiaries or relating to the ability of the Obligors to perform their respective obligations hereunder and under the Notes as from time to time may be reasonably requested by any such holder of Notes.
Requested Information
. Each set of financial statements delivered to a holder of Notes pursuant to or shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer setting forth (which, in the case of Electronic Delivery of such financial statements, shall be by separate concurrent delivery of such certificate to each holder of Notes):
Section 7.2 Officer's Certificate
Section 7.1(a)
Section 7.1(b)
(a) the information (including detailed calculations) required in order to establish whether the Company was in compliance with the requirements of through , inclusive, during the quarterly or annual period covered by the financial statements then being furnished (including with respect to each such Section, where applicable, the calculations of the maximum or minimum amount, ratio or percentage, as the case may be, permissible under the terms of such Sections, and the calculation of the amount, ratio or percentage then in existence); , that such Senior Financial Officer's certificate as to such period shall include a reconciliation to GAAP (i.e., the amount, if any, by which any such financial information used in preparing such Senior Financial Officer's certificate differs from the most comparable GAAP line item or financial measure disclosed in such financial statements being delivered, which clause (i) through (iv) below is the basis for such difference and, in the event clause (iv) below is applicable, the nature of the variation from GAAP causing the difference) used in preparation of the financial statements delivered pursuant to or with respect to (i) any election by the Company or a Subsidiary to measure any financial liability using fair value (which election is being disregarded for purposes of determining compliance with certain provisions of this Agreement pursuant to ) as to the period covered by any such financial statement, (ii) if applicable, the exclusion of EBITDA of a Clean Energy Subsidiary from the calculation of EBITDA as set forth in the definition of "EBITDA" as to the period covered by any such financial statement, (iii) if applicable, the use of "estimated acquisition earnout payables" determined based upon GAAP in effect as of December 31, 2008 and (iv) any variation from GAAP used in preparation of such financial statements permitted pursuant to the second sentence of ; and
Covenant Compliance
Sections 10.1
Section 10.3
provided
Section 7.1(a)
7.1(b)
Section 22.3
Section 22.3(b)
 
(b)  a statement that such Senior Financial Officer has reviewed the relevant terms hereof and has made, or caused to be made, under his or her supervision, a review of the transactions and conditions of the Company and its Subsidiaries from the beginning of the quarterly or annual period covered by the statements then being furnished to the date of the certificate and that such review shall not have disclosed, to the best of such Senior Financial Officer's knowledge and belief, the existence during such period of any condition or event that constitutes a Default or an Event of Default or, if any such condition or event existed or exists (including, without limitation, any such event or condition resulting from the failure of the Company or any Subsidiary to comply with any Environmental Law), specifying the nature and period of existence thereof and what action the Company shall have taken or proposes to take with respect thereto.
Event of Default
. The Company shall permit the representatives of each holder of Notes that is an Institutional Investor:
Section 7.3 Visitation
(a)  if no Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of such holder and upon reasonable prior notice to the Company, to visit the principal executive office of the Company, to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with the Company's Senior Financial Officers, and (with the consent of the Company, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld) to visit during normal business hours the other offices and properties of the Company and each Subsidiary, all at such reasonable times and as often as may be reasonably requested in writing; and
No Default
(b)  if a Default or Event of Default then exists, at the expense of the Company, to visit and inspect any of the offices or properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, to examine all their respective books of account, records, reports and other papers, to make copies and extracts therefrom, and to discuss their respective affairs, finances and accounts with their respective Senior Financial Officers and independent public accountants (and by this provision the Company authorizes said accountants to discuss the affairs, finances and accounts of the Company and its Subsidiaries), all at such times and as often as may be requested, that prior to disclosure of any material non public information pursuant to this , the holders of the Notes shall, if requested by the Company, provide the Company with reasonable assurance that such disclosure will be held in confidence in accordance with the requirements of Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC, subject to the last sentence of .
Default
provided
Section 7.3
Section 20
SECTION 8. Prepayment of the Notes.
. The entire unpaid principal amount of the Series G Notes shall become due and payable on June 14, 2022.
Section 8.1
Maturity
. The Obligors may, at their option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the Notes at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, together with interest accrued thereon to the date of such prepayment, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount. If the entire principal amount of the Notes then outstanding are not being prepaid, then the Notes must be prepaid in an amount not less than 10% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding. The
Section 8.2 Optional Prepayments with Make-Whole Amount
 
Company will give each holder of the Notes written notice of each optional prepayment under this not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment. Each such notice shall specify such date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of Notes to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each Note held by such holder to be prepaid (determined in accordance with ), and the interest to be paid on the prepayment date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such prepayment, the Company shall deliver to each holder of a Note a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified prepayment date.
Section 8.2
Section 8.3
. Unless the Obligors are prepaying all of the Notes, in the case of each partial prepayment of Notes pursuant to , the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid shall be allocated pro rata among all holders of the Notes at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof.
Section 8.3 Allocation of Partial Prepayments
Section 8.2
. In the case of each prepayment of Notes pursuant to this , the principal amount of each Note to be prepaid shall mature and become due and payable on the date fixed for such prepayment (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any. From and after such date, unless the Obligors shall fail to pay such principal amount when so due and payable, together with the interest and Make-Whole Amount, if any, as aforesaid, interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. Any Note paid or prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Obligor Agent and cancelled and shall not be reissued, and no Note shall be issued in lieu of any prepaid principal amount of any Note.
Section 8.4 Maturity; Surrender, Etc
Section 8
. The Company will not and will not permit any Affiliate to purchase, redeem, prepay or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, any of the outstanding Notes or any part or portion thereof except (a) upon the payment or prepayment of such Notes in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and such Notes or (b) pursuant to an offer to purchase made by the Company or an Affiliate pro rata to the holders of all Notes at the time outstanding upon the same terms and conditions. Any such offer shall provide each holder with sufficient information to enable it to make an informed decision with respect to such offer, and shall remain open for at least 15 Business Days. If the holders of more than 10% of the principal amount of the Notes then outstanding accept such offer, the Obligor Agent shall promptly notify the remaining holders of Notes of such fact and the expiration date for the acceptance by holders of such Notes of such offer shall be extended by the number of days necessary to give each such remaining holder at least 5 Business Days from its receipt of such notice to accept such offer. The Obligor Agent will promptly cancel all Notes acquired by it or any Affiliate pursuant to any payment, prepayment or purchase of Notes pursuant to any provision of this Agreement and no Notes may be issued in substitution or exchange for any such Notes.
Section 8.5 Purchase of Notes
 
. The term means, with respect to any Note, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such Note over the amount of such Called Principal; that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Section 8.6 Make-Whole Amount
"Make-Whole Amount"
provided
means, with respect to any Note, the principal of such Note that is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Called Principal"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on such Note is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
"Discounted Value"
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, 0.50% (50 basis points) over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as "Page PX1" (or such other display as may replace Page PX1) on Bloomberg Financial Markets for the most recently issued actively traded on the run U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (or any comparable successor publication) for U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. In the case of each determination under clause (i) or clause (ii), as the case may be, of the preceding paragraph, such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond-equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the applicable U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable Note.
"Reinvestment Yield"
means, with respect to any Called Principal of any Note, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (a) such Called Principal into (b) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (i) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (ii) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
"Remaining Average Life"
 
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date; that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of such Note, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to or .
"Remaining Scheduled Payments"
provided
Section 8.2
12.1
means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Note, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to or has become or is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to , as the context requires.
"Settlement Date"
Section 8.2
Section 12.1
(a) . The Company will, within five Business Days after any Responsible Officer has knowledge of the occurrence of any Change in Control, give written notice of such Change in Control to each holder of Notes. If within 90 days after such Change in Control, the Company does not, for any reason, have an Investment Grade Rating, a "" shall be deemed to have occurred. If a Change in Control Event has occurred, the Company shall promptly give written notice thereof to the holders of Notes, and such notice shall contain and constitute an offer to prepay Notes as described in subparagraph (b) of this and shall be accompanied by the certificate described in subparagraph (e) of this .
Section 8.7 Mandatory Offer to Prepay Upon Change in Control.
Notice of Change in Control and Change in Control Event
Change in Control Event
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(b) The offer to prepay the Notes contemplated by subparagraph (a) of this shall be an offer to prepay, in accordance with and subject to this , all, but not less than all, the Notes held by each holder (in this case only, "" in respect of any Note registered in the name of a nominee for a disclosed beneficial owner shall mean such beneficial owner) on a date specified in such offer (the ""). Such date shall be a Business Day not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after the date of such offer.
Offer to Prepay Notes.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
holder
Proposed Prepayment Date
(c) A holder of Notes may accept the offer to prepay made pursuant to this by causing a written notice of such acceptance to be delivered to the Company not later than 15 days prior to the Proposed Prepayment Date. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond to the offer to prepay made pursuant to this within the specified time period shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder.
Acceptance/Rejection.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(d) Prepayment of the Notes to be prepaid pursuant to this shall be at 100% of the principal amount of such Notes, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment, but in no event with a Make-Whole Amount or other premium. The prepayment shall be made on the Proposed Prepayment Date. If such prepayment is made in accordance with this , such prepaid Notes shall thereafter be deemed paid in full and all obligations of the Obligors or any Subsidiary Guarantor with respect to the payment of principal of, interest on, or prepayment premium with respect to such prepaid Notes shall be discharged, whether or not such Notes have been delivered by the holders thereof to the Obligors.
Prepayment.
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
 
(e) . Each offer to prepay the Notes pursuant to this shall be accompanied by a certificate, executed by a Senior Financial Officer and dated the date of such offer, specifying: (i) the Proposed Prepayment Date; (ii) that such offer is made pursuant to this ; (iii) the principal amount of each Note offered to be prepaid; (iv) the interest that would be due on each Note offered to be prepaid, accrued to the Proposed Prepayment Date; (v) that the conditions of this have been fulfilled; (vi) in reasonable detail, the nature of the Change in Control Event; and (vii) any written response from the relevant rating agency.
Officer's Certificate
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
Section 8.7
(f) shall be deemed to have occurred if any person (as such term is used in Section 13(d) and Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) or related persons constituting a group (as such term is used in Rule 13d-5 under the Exchange Act):
Certain Definitions. "Change in Control"
(i) become the "beneficial owners" (as such term is used in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the total voting power of all classes then outstanding of the Voting Stock of the Company; or
(ii) acquire after the date of the Closing (x) the power to elect, appoint or cause the election or appointment of at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the Company, through beneficial ownership of the capital stock of the Company or otherwise, or (y) all or substantially all of the assets of the Company.
in respect of any Person means, at the time of determination, at least two of the following ratings of its senior, unsecured, non-credit enhanced, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money: (i) by Standard & Poor's Rating Services, or any successor thereof, "BBB-" or better, (ii) by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereof, "Baa3" or better, or (iii) by any other nationally recognized statistical rating agency, an equivalent or better rating.
"Investment Grade Rating"
(g) All calculations contemplated in this involving the capital stock of any Person shall be made with the assumption that all convertible Securities of such Person then outstanding and all convertible Securities issuable upon the exercise of any warrants, options and other rights outstanding at such time were converted at such time and that all options, warrants and similar rights to acquire shares of capital stock of such Person were exercised at such time.
Section 8.7
(a) . If an OFAC Event occurs, then (x) within five Business Days after any Responsible Officer has actual knowledge of an OFAC Event, the Company shall give written notice of such OFAC Event to all holders of Notes and such notice shall contain and constitute an offer to prepay Notes as described in subparagraph (b) of this and shall be accompanied by the certificate described in subparagraph (e) of this (such notice, an "") or (y) prior to the issuance of an OFAC Event Notice by the Company, any holder becoming subject to an OFAC Event (such holder being called an "") may give written notice of such OFAC Event to the Company (setting forth in reasonable detail such Affected Holder's basis for concluding that an OFAC Event has occurred and certifying that such Person is a Affected Holder as defined herein), in which case the Company shall promptly, and in any event within 10 Business Days, provide an OFAC Event Notice to all holders of Notes.
Section 8.8 Mandatory Offer to Prepay Upon Breach of Terrorism Sanctions Regulations.
Notice of OFAC Event
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
OFAC Event Notice
Affected Holder
 
(b) The offer to prepay the Notes contemplated by subparagraph (a) of this shall be an offer to prepay, in accordance with and subject to this , all, but not less than all, the Notes held by each Affected Holder (in this case only, the Affected Holder in respect of any Note registered in the name of a nominee for a disclosed beneficial owner shall mean such beneficial owner) on a date specified in such offer (the ""). Such date shall be a Business Day not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days after the date of such offer.
Offer to Prepay Notes.
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date
(c) An Affected Holder may accept the offer to prepay made pursuant to this by causing a written notice of such acceptance to be delivered to the Company not later than 15 days prior to the Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date. Delivery of a written notice of acceptance shall also be deemed a certification by such registered or beneficial owner of a Note that such Person is an Affected Holder as defined herein. A failure by any registered or beneficial owner of a Note to respond to the offer to prepay made pursuant to this within the specified time period shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such registered or beneficial owner of a Note.
Acceptance/Rejection.
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
(d) Prepayment of the Notes to be prepaid pursuant to this shall be at 100% of the principal amount of such Notes, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment, but in no event with a Make-Whole Amount or other premium. The prepayment shall be made on the Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date. If such prepayment is made in accordance with this , such prepaid Notes shall thereafter be deemed paid in full and all obligations of the Obligors or any Subsidiary Guarantor with respect to the payment of principal of, interest on, or prepayment premium with respect to such prepaid Notes shall be discharged, whether or not such Notes have been delivered by the holders thereof to the Obligors.
Prepayment.
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
(e) . Each offer to prepay the Notes pursuant to this shall be accompanied by a certificate, executed by a Senior Financial Officer and dated the date of such offer, specifying: (i) the Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date; (ii) that such offer is made pursuant to this ; (iii) the principal amount of each Note offered to be prepaid; (iv) the interest that would be due on each Note offered to be prepaid, accrued to the Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date; (v) that the conditions of this have been fulfilled; and (vi) in reasonable detail, the nature of the OFAC Event.
Officer's Certificate
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
(f) . Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraphs (b) and (d) of this , if an Affected Holder that has given written notice to the Company of its acceptance of the Company's prepayment offer in accordance with subparagraph (c) also gives notice to the Company prior to the relevant Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date that it has determined (in its sole discretion) that it requires clearance from any federal Governmental Authority in order to receive a prepayment pursuant to this , the principal amount of the Notes held by such Affected Holder, together with interest accrued thereon to the date of prepayment, shall become due and payable on the later of (i) such Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date and (ii) the date that is 10 Business Days after such Affected Holder gives notice to the Company that it is entitled to receive a prepayment pursuant to this (which may include payment to an escrow account designated by such Affected Holder to be held for the benefit of such Affected Holder pending any necessary clearance from such federal Governmental Authority, it being understood that payment to an escrow account of the full
Delay in Prepayment
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
Section 8.8
 
amount specified in this with repsect to any Note shall have the effect specified in the last sentence of with respect to such Note). Any delay in payment in accordance with clause (ii) of the immediately preceding sentence shall not be deemed to give rise to any Default or Event of Default.
Section 8.8
Section 8.8(d)
SECTION 9. Affirmative Covenants.
The Obligors, jointly and severally, covenant that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
. Without limiting , each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations to which each of them is subject, including, without limitation, ERISA, the USA Patriot Act and Environmental Laws, and will obtain and maintain in effect all licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations necessary to the ownership of their respective properties or to the conduct of their respective businesses, in each case to the extent necessary to ensure that non-compliance with such laws, ordinances or governmental rules or regulations or failures to obtain or maintain in effect such licenses, certificates, permits, franchises and other governmental authorizations could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.1 Compliance with Law
Section 10.9
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurers, insurance with respect to their respective properties and businesses against such casualties and contingencies, of such types, on such terms and in such amounts (including deductibles, co-insurance and self-insurance, if adequate reserves are maintained with respect thereto) as is customary in the case of entities of established reputations engaged in the same or a similar business and similarly situated.
Section 9.2 Insurance
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain and keep, or cause to be maintained and kept, their respective properties in good repair, working order and condition (other than ordinary wear and tear), so that the business carried on in connection therewith may be properly conducted at all times; that this shall not prevent any Obligor or any Subsidiary from discontinuing the operation and the maintenance of any of its properties if such discontinuance is desirable in the conduct of its business and the Company has concluded that such discontinuance could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.3 Maintenance of Properties
provided
Section 9.3
. Each Obligor will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, file all tax returns required to be filed in any jurisdiction and to pay and discharge all taxes shown to be due and payable on such returns and all other taxes, assessments, governmental charges, or levies imposed on them or any of their properties, assets, income or franchises, to the extent the same have become due and payable and before they have become delinquent and all claims for which sums have become due and payable that have or might become a Lien on properties or assets of any Obligor or any Subsidiary; that no Obligor nor any Subsidiary need pay any such tax, assessment, charge, levy or claim if (a) the amount, applicability or validity thereof is contested by such Obligor or such Subsidiary on a
Section 9.4 Payment of Taxes and Claims
provided
 
timely basis in good faith and in appropriate proceedings, and the Company or such Obligor or Subsidiary, as the case may be, has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Obligor or such Subsidiary or (b) the nonpayment of all such taxes, assessments, charges, levies and claims in the aggregate could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
. Subject to , the Company will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence. Subject to and , each Obligor will at all times preserve and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and that of each of its Subsidiaries (unless merged into the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary) and all rights and franchises of such Obligor and its Subsidiaries unless, in the good faith judgment of the Company, the termination of or failure to preserve and keep in full force and effect such legal existence, right or franchise could not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 9.5 Legal Existence, Etc
Section 10.5
Section 10.5
Section 10.6
The Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement are and at all times shall rank at least in right of payment with all other present and future unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Obligor which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other unsecured Indebtedness of each such Obligor.
Section 9.6 Notes to Rank Pari Passu.
pari passu
. The Company:
Section 9.7 Additional Obligors; Guaranty by Subsidiaries
(a) will cause each Subsidiary which becomes a guarantor or an obligor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement or an Existing Note Agreement after the date of Closing to concurrently enter into, in the case of a guarantor, a guaranty agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (as the same may be amended, modified, extended or renewed, the "") or, in the case of an additional obligor, a joinder agreement substantially in the form of attached hereto and made a part hereof (a ""); and
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
Subsidiary Guaranty
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
Joinder Agreement
(b) may cause any other Subsidiary which is not an obligor or guarantor of Indebtedness outstanding pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement or an Existing Note Agreement to enter into a Joinder Agreement;
and in any such case within three Business Days thereafter will deliver to each of the holders of the Notes the following items:
(i) an executed counterpart of, in the case of a guarantor, a Subsidiary Guaranty or, in the case of an additional obligor, a Joinder Agreement in respect of this Agreement and the Notes;
(ii) a certificate signed by the President, a Vice President or another authorized officer of such Subsidiary making representations and warranties to the effect of those contained in and , but with respect to such Subsidiary, and either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be;
Sections 5.1, 5.2, 5.6
5.7
 
(iii) such documents and evidence with respect to such Subsidiary as the Required Holders may reasonably request in order to establish the existence and good standing of such Subsidiary and the authorization of the transactions contemplated by either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be; and
(iv) an opinion of counsel satisfactory to the Required Holders to the effect that either (1) the Subsidiary Guaranty or (2) the Joinder Agreement, this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, have been duly authorized, executed and delivered and such agreement or agreements, as the case may be, constitute(s) the legal, valid and binding contract(s) and agreement(s) of such Subsidiary enforceable in accordance with its or their respective terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance, fraudulent transfer and other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors generally and by general principles of equity (whether considered in equity or at law) and will rank at all times at least in right of payment with all other unsecured and unsubordinated Indebtedness of such Subsidiary.
pari passu
(c) Promptly after each time an additional Obligor is added in respect of this Agreement and the Notes pursuant to this , the Obligor Agent shall, at its cost and expense, request in writing that each holder of a Note surrender each Note which it then holds and within twenty Business Days following the date of such request, each holder of a Note shall surrender each Note which it then holds in exchange for the receipt of a new Note and in an equal outstanding principal amount executed by the Obligors (including such additional Obligor) reflecting the addition of any Obligor pursuant to this .
Section 9.7
Section 9.7
. The Obligors will, and will cause each of their Subsidiaries to, maintain proper books of record and account and, in the case of the Company, in conformity with GAAP and all applicable requirements of any Governmental Authority having legal or regulatory jurisdiction over the Company, or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Section 9.8 Books and Records
SECTION 10. Negative Covenants.
The Company covenants that so long as any of the Notes are outstanding:
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of Consolidated Indebtedness as of the last day of the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended Excess Cash, as of the last day of the same such period, to EBITDA for such most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be greater than 3.25 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with GAAP.
Section 10.1 Cash Flow Leverage Ratio.
minus
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit the ratio of EBITDAR to Fixed Charges for the most recent four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company then ended to be less than 1.75 to 1.00, calculated in accordance with GAAP.
Section 10.2 Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio.
 
The Company will not, as at the end of any fiscal quarter, permit Consolidated Priority Indebtedness to exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with GAAP.
Section 10.3 Limitations on Consolidated Priority Indebtedness.
The Company will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary; that the foregoing shall not apply to nor operate to prevent (each of the following, a ):
Section 10.4 Limitation on Liens.
provided
"Permitted Lien"
(a) Liens for taxes, assessments, governmental charges or levies; that payment thereof is not at the time required by ;
provided
Section 9.4
(b) Liens arising under statutes or by operation of law, Liens in connection with worker's compensation, unemployment insurance, social security and other similar laws (including, without limitation, pledges or deposits securing liability to insurance carriers under insurance or self-insurance arrangements), Liens to secure the performance of bids, tenders, trade, government or other similar contracts, obligations for utilities, leases, licenses, statutory obligations, completion guarantees, surety, judgment, appeal or performance bonds, or other similar bonds, or other Liens of like general nature, in any such case incurred in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness; that (i) any such Lien secures only amounts not due and payable or the payment of which is being contested in good faith by appropriate actions or proceedings and (ii) any such Lien does not materially impair the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole or the value of the related property for the purposes of such business;
provided
(c) mechanics', workmen's, materialmen's, attorney's, landlords', carriers' or other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business and not in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness and in each such case with respect to obligations which are not due or that are bonded or that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
(d) Liens of or resulting from any court proceeding, judgment or award, (i) the time for the appeal or petition for rehearing of which shall not have expired, or (ii) in respect of which the Company or a Subsidiary shall be prosecuting an appeal or proceeding for a review and in respect of which a stay of execution pending such appeal or proceeding for review shall have been secured; that the Company or such Subsidiary (1) is contesting such proceeding, judgment or award on a timely basis, in good faith and by appropriate proceedings, and (2) has established adequate reserves therefor in accordance with GAAP on the books of the Company or such Subsidiary, as the case may be;
provided
(e) Liens securing Indebtedness of a Subsidiary to the Company or to another Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
 
(f) Liens existing as of the date of the Closing and described on hereto;
Schedule 5.15(b)
(g) Liens on property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries created solely for the purpose of securing purchase money indebtedness (including in connection with the acquisition, construction or improvement of property) or Capitalized Lease Obligations and, representing or incurred to finance, refinance or refund the purchase price of property; that no such Lien shall extend to or cover other property of the Company or such Subsidiary other than the respective property so acquired, constructed or improved, and the principal amount of indebtedness secured by any such Lien shall at no time exceed the total purchase price (or cost of construction or improvement) of such property;
provided
(h) Liens existing on property of a Person at the time such Person is consolidated with or merged into the Company or a Subsidiary or becomes a Subsidiary, or any Lien existing on any property acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary at the time such property is so acquired (whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby shall have been assumed); that (i) no such Lien shall have been created or assumed in contemplation of such consolidation or merger or such Person's becoming a Subsidiary or such acquisition of property, (ii) each such Lien shall extend solely to the item or items of property so acquired and, if required by the terms of the instrument originally creating such Lien, other property which is an improvement to or is acquired for specific use in connection with such acquired property;
provided
(i) customary rights of set off, revocation, refund or chargeback under deposit agreements or under the Uniform Commercial Code in favor of banks or other financial institutions where the Company or any Subsidiary maintains deposits in the ordinary course of business;
(j) Liens constituting (i) survey restrictions, encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, condemnations, easements, encroachments, covenants, rights of way, defects, irregularities and rights or restrictions of record on the title or use of real property, and (ii) leases, subleases, licenses or sublicenses granted to others in the ordinary course of business and Liens covering property subject to any lease which was not entered into in violation of this Agreement securing the interest of the lessor or other Person under such lease, which in any such case does not materially detract from the value of the subject property or materially impair the use thereof in the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole;
(k) any encumbrance or restriction (including, but not limited to, put and call agreements, rights of first refusal, and voting or equity holder agreements) with respect to equity or ownership interests in any joint venture or similar arrangement pursuant to any joint venture or similar agreement in any such case not entered into in connection with the creation or incurrence of Indebtedness;
(l) Liens other than those permitted by any of the foregoing subsections (a) through (k); provided that all Indebtedness secured by any such Liens, in the aggregate with all other Consolidated Priority Indebtedness at such time, does not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Capitalization, calculated in accordance with GAAP; and
 
(m) any extension, renewal or replacement of any Lien permitted by the preceding clauses (e), (f), (g) and (h) of this ; provided that (i) no additional property (other than improvements thereon) shall be encumbered by such Liens, (ii) the unpaid principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not be increased on or after the date of such extension, renewal or replacement and (iii) at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default would exist, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the extension, renewal or replacement of such Lien.
Section 10.4
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Company covenants that it will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur or permit to exist any Lien of any kind on any property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary to secure any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary under the Bank Credit Agreement or an Existing Note Agreement unless the Notes and all other respective obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and of the Subsidiary Guarantors under any Subsidiary Guaranty, as applicable, are secured on a pari passu basis (together with any other Indebtedness so secured, which may include any Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary under the Bank Credit Agreement and/or any or all Existing Note Agreements and related notes issued thereunder) by a lien on such property pursuant to documentation, including an intercreditor agreement, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders.
The Company will not consolidate with or merge with any other Person or convey, transfer, sell or lease all or substantially all of its assets in a single transaction or series of transactions to any Person unless:
Section 10.5 Mergers, Consolidations, Etc
.
(a) the successor formed by such consolidation or the survivor of such merger or the Person that acquires by conveyance, transfer, sale or lease all or substantially all of the assets of the Company as an entirety, as the case may be, is a solvent corporation or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the United States or any state thereof (including the District of Columbia), and, if the Company is not such successor or survivor, such successor or survivor (i) shall have executed and delivered to each holder of any Notes its assumption of the due and punctual performance and observance of each covenant and condition of this Agreement and the Notes and (ii) shall have caused to be delivered to each holder of any Notes an opinion of nationally recognized independent counsel or other independent counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Required Holders, to the effect that all agreements or instruments effecting such assumption are enforceable in accordance with their terms and comply with the terms hereof;
(b) each Subsidiary Guarantor and each Obligor (other than the Company) shall have affirmed in writing its obligations under the Subsidiary Guaranty to which it is a party or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be (unless and to the extent any
 
such Subsidiary Guaranty or the obligations of any such Obligor, as the case may be, have been discharged or released as expressly permitted by or otherwise in accordance with the terms of this Agreement); and
Section 2.2(a)
(c) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such transaction.
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
Except as permitted by , the Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of, including by way of merger (collectively a ), any assets, including capital stock of Subsidiaries, in one or a series of transactions, to any Person, other than:
Section 10.6 Sale of Assets.
Section 10.5
"Disposition"
(a) Dispositions in the ordinary course of business;
(b) Dispositions by a Subsidiary to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary or by the Company to a Wholly-owned Subsidiary;
(c) Dispositions of the Company's interest in Chem-Mod LLC, Chem-Mod International LLC, C-Quest Technologies LLC or C-Quest Technologies International LLC; or
(d) Dispositions not otherwise permitted bythrough, inclusive, provided that:
Sections 10.6(a)
10.6(c)
(i) in the good faith opinion of the Company, the Disposition is in exchange for consideration having a fair market value at least equal to that of the property exchanged and is in the best interest of the Company or such Subsidiary;
(ii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, no Default or Event of Default shall exist, including, without limitation, under , and , with any calculation of compliance therewith to be made as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal quarter after giving pro forma effect to the consummation of such Disposition; and
Sections 10.1
10.2
10.3
(iii) immediately after giving effect to the Disposition, the aggregate net book value of all assets that were the subject of any Disposition occurring in the then current fiscal year would not exceed 15% of Consolidated Total Assets as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal year of the Company, calculated in accordance with GAAP.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may, or may permit a Subsidiary to, make a Disposition and the assets subject to such Disposition shall not be subject to or included in the foregoing limitation and computation contained in clause (iii) of the preceding sentence if, within 365 days of such Disposition:
 
(1) the net proceeds from such Disposition are reinvested in productive assets to be used in the existing business of the Company or a Subsidiary; or
(2) the net proceeds from such Disposition are applied to the payment or prepayment of the Notes or any other outstanding Indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary ranking with or senior to the Notes (other than Indebtedness of the Company owing to a Subsidiary or an Affiliate or Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or an Affiliate).
pari passu
For purposes of foregoing clause (2), the Obligors shall offer to prepay (on a Business Day not less than 30 or more than 60 days following such offer) the Notes on a pro rata basis with any such other Indebtedness that the Company elects to include in such offer at a price of 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be prepaid, together with interest accrued and unpaid on such Notes to the date of prepayment (but in no event with a Make Whole Amount or other premium); provided that if any holder of the Notes declines or rejects such offer, the net proceeds that would have been paid to such holder may be used by the Company for general corporate purposes. A failure by a holder of Notes to respond in writing not later than fifteen Business Days prior to the proposed prepayment date to an offer to prepay made pursuant to this shall be deemed to constitute a rejection of such offer by such holder. To the extent that any holder of the Notes rejects or is deemed to have rejected such offer of prepayment, the Company may use the aggregate amount of such prepayments so rejected for general corporate purposes.
Section 10.6
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to enter into directly or indirectly any Material transaction or Material group of related transactions (including without limitation the purchase, lease, sale or exchange of properties of any kind or the rendering of any service) with any Affiliate (other than the Company or another Subsidiary), except upon terms and conditions which are no less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than would be obtainable in a comparable arm's-length transaction with a Person not an Affiliate and except for benefit and compensation plans and arrangements approved by the Board of Directors (or similar governing body) of the Company or any such Subsidiary that is not a Domestic Subsidiary.
Section 10.7 Transactions with Affiliates
. The Company will not and will not permit any Subsidiary to engage in any business if, as a result, the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, would then be engaged would be substantially changed from the general nature of the business in which the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, are engaged on the date of this Agreement.
Section 10.8 Line of Business
. The Company will not and will not permit any Controlled Entity:
Section 10.9 Terrorism Sanctions Regulations
(a) to become (including by virtue of being owned or controlled by a Blocked Person), own or control a Blocked Person or any Person that is the target of sanctions imposed by the United Nations or by the European Union, or
(b) to directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the sale of the Notes if such use of proceeds (i) would cause any holder of the Notes to be in violation of any law or regulation applicable to such holder, or (ii) is prohibited by or subject to sanctions under any U.S. Economic Sanctions, or
 
(c) to have any investment in or engage in any dealing or transaction with any Person if such investment, dealing or transaction is prohibited by or subject to sanctions under any U.S. Economic Sanctions, or
(d) to engage, nor shall any Affiliate of either knowingly engage, in any activity that could subject such Person to sanctions under CISADA or any similar law or regulation with respect to Iran or any other country that is subject to U.S. Economic Sanctions;
that any failure of the Company to comply with clause (b)(i) of this or any failure by the Company to comply with clause (c) or (d) of this that causes a holder of the Notes to be in violation of any law or regulation applicable to such holder or that subjects such holder to sanctions under CISDA or any similar law or regulation with respect to Iran or any other country that is subject to U.S. Economic Sanctions (any of the foregoing being called an "") shall not constitute a default under or breach of this Agreement but rather shall be addressed solely through the mandatory offer to prepay provisions in unless, in the case of an OFAC Event arising in connection with clause (c) or (d) of this no Affected Holder accepts the prepayment offer resulting from such OFAC Event.
provided
Section 10.9
Section 10.9
OFAC Event
Section 8.8
Section 10.9,
SECTION 11. Events of Default.
An shall exist if any of the following conditions or events shall occur and be continuing:
"Event of Default"
(a) the Obligors default in the payment of any principal or Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Note when the same becomes due and payable, whether at maturity or at a date fixed for prepayment or by declaration or otherwise; or
(b) the Obligors default in the payment of any interest on any Note for more than five Business Days after the same becomes due and payable; or
(c) the Company defaults in the performance of or compliance with any term contained in or or; or
Section 7.1(d)
Sections 10.1, 10.2
10.3
(d) the Obligors default in the performance of or compliance with any term contained herein (other than (i) those referred to in  constituting an OFAC Event with respect to which an Affected Holder has accepted an offer to prepay under the Company's failure to comply with the terms of Section 10.9(b)(i) for which shall serve as the exclusive remedy hereunder or, and ) and such default is not remedied within 45 days after the earlier of (x) a Responsible Officer obtaining actual knowledge of such default and (y) the Company receiving written notice of such default from any holder of a Note (any such written notice to be identified as a "notice of default" and to refer specifically to this ); or
Section 10.9(c) or (d)
Section 8.8, (ii) 
Section 8.8
(iii) Sections 11(a)
(b) 
(c)
Section 11(d)
 
(e)  (i) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of the Company or by any officer of the Company in this Agreement or in any writing furnished by the Company pursuant to this Agreement, proves to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made, (ii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of an Obligor (other than the Company) or by any officer of an Obligor (other than the Company) in this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement or in any writing furnished by an Obligor (other than the Company) pursuant to this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or (iii) any representation or warranty made in writing by or on behalf of a Subsidiary Guarantor or by any officer of a Subsidiary Guarantor in any Subsidiary Guaranty or in any writing furnished by a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to any Subsidiary Guaranty, proves in any such case to have been false or incorrect in any material respect on the date as of which made and such falsity or incorrectness could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(f)  (i) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default (as principal or as guarantor or other surety) in the payment of any principal of or premium or make-whole amount or interest on any Indebtedness that is outstanding in an aggregate principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets beyond any period of grace provided with respect thereto, or (ii) the Company or any Subsidiary is in default in the performance of or compliance with any term of any evidence of any Indebtedness in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets or of any mortgage, indenture or other agreement relating thereto or any other condition exists, and as a consequence of such default or condition such Indebtedness has become, or has been declared, due and payable before its stated maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment, or (iii) as a consequence of the occurrence or continuation of any event or condition (other than the passage of time or the right of the holder of Indebtedness to convert such Indebtedness into equity interests), the Company or any Subsidiary has become obligated to purchase or repay Indebtedness before its regular maturity or before its regularly scheduled dates of payment in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets; or
(g) any Obligor or any Material Subsidiary (i) is generally not paying, or admits in writing its inability to pay, its debts as they become due, (ii) files, or consents by answer or otherwise to the filing against it of, a petition for relief or reorganization or arrangement or any other petition in bankruptcy, for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar law of any jurisdiction, (iii) makes an assignment of any substantial part of its property for the benefit of its creditors, (iv) consents to the appointment of a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, (v) is finally adjudicated as insolvent or to be liquidated, or (vi) takes corporate action for the purpose of any of the foregoing; or
 
(h) a court or Governmental Authority of competent jurisdiction enters an order appointing, without consent by any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, a custodian, receiver, trustee or other officer with similar powers with respect to it or with respect to any substantial part of its property, or constituting an order for relief or approving a petition for relief or reorganization or any other petition in bankruptcy or for liquidation or to take advantage of any bankruptcy or insolvency law of any jurisdiction, or ordering the dissolution, winding-up or liquidation of any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries, or any such petition shall be filed against any Obligor or any of its Material Subsidiaries and such petition shall not be dismissed within 60 days; or
(i) a final judgment or judgments for the payment of money aggregating in excess of the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets (excluding for purposes of such determination such amount of any insurance proceeds paid by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of such judgment or judgments or unconditionally acknowledged in writing to be payable by the insurance carrier that issued the related insurance policy) are rendered against one or more of the Company and its Subsidiaries and which judgments are not, within 60 days after entry thereof, bonded, discharged or stayed pending appeal, or are not discharged within 60 days after the expiration of such stay; or
(j) if (i) any Plan shall fail to satisfy the minimum funding standards of ERISA or the Code for any plan year or part thereof or a waiver of such standards or extension of any amortization period is sought or granted under section 412 or 430 of the Code, (ii) a notice of intent to terminate any Plan shall have been or is reasonably expected within the immediately following two-month period, to be filed with the PBGC or the PBGC shall have instituted proceedings under ERISA Section 4042 to terminate or appoint a trustee to administer any Plan or the PBGC shall have notified the Company or any ERISA Affiliate that a Plan may become a subject of any such proceedings, (iii) the aggregate "amount of unfunded benefit liabilities" (within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(18) of ERISA) under all Plans, determined in accordance with Title IV of ERISA, shall exceed the greater of $25,000,000 or 1% of Consolidated Total Assets, (iv) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate shall have incurred or is reasonably expected to incur any liability pursuant to Title I or IV of ERISA or the penalty or excise tax provisions of the Code relating to employee benefit plans, (v) the Company or any ERISA Affiliate withdraws from any Multiemployer Plan, or (vi) the Company or any Subsidiary establishes or amends any employee welfare benefit plan that provides post-employment welfare benefits in a manner that would increase the liability of the Company or any Subsidiary thereunder; and any such event or events described in clauses (i) through (vi) above, either individually or together with any other such event or events, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; or
(k) any Subsidiary Guaranty (once in full force and effect) shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such Subsidiary Guaranty is invalid, void or unenforceable or any Subsidiary Guarantor which is a party to such Subsidiary Guaranty shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under such Subsidiary Guaranty, but excluding any Subsidiary Guaranty which ceases to be in full force and effect in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement; or
Section 2.2
 
(l) the obligations of any Obligor shall cease to be in full force and effect for any reason whatsoever, including, without limitation, a determination by any Governmental Authority that such obligations are invalid, void or unenforceable or any Obligor shall contest or deny in writing the validity or enforceability of any of its obligations under this Agreement or the Notes, but excluding any Obligor which is released in accordance with and by reason of the express provisions of or is otherwise released in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 2.2
As used in , the terms "employee benefit plan" and "employee welfare benefit plan" shall have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in Section 3 of ERISA.
Section 11(j)
SECTION 12. Remedies on Default, Etc.
. (a) If an Event of Default with respect to an Obligor described in or  (other than an Event of Default described in clause (i) of or described in clause (vi) of by virtue of the fact that such clause encompasses clause (i) of ) has occurred, all the Notes then outstanding shall automatically become immediately due and payable.
Section 12.1 Acceleration
Section 11(g)
(h)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
Section 11(g)
(b) If any other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Required Holders may at any time at their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes then outstanding to be immediately due and payable.
(c) If any Event of Default described in or has occurred and is continuing, any holder or holders of Notes at the time outstanding affected by such Event of Default may at any time, at its or their option, by notice or notices to the Company, declare all the Notes held by it or them to be immediately due and payable.
Section 11(a) 
(b)
Upon any Note becoming due and payable under this , whether automatically or by declaration, such Note will forthwith mature and the entire unpaid principal amount of such Note, plus (i) all accrued and unpaid interest thereon (including, but not limited to, interest accrued thereon at the Default Rate) and (ii) the Make-Whole Amount determined in respect of such principal amount (to the full extent permitted by applicable law), shall all be immediately due and payable, in each and every case without presentment, demand, protest or further notice, all of which are hereby waived. Each Obligor acknowledges, and the parties hereto agree, that each holder of a Note has the right to maintain its investment in the Notes free from repayment by any Obligor or Obligors (except as herein specifically provided for), and that the provision for payment of a Make-Whole Amount by the Obligors in the event that any Notes are prepaid or are accelerated as a result of an Event of Default, is intended to provide compensation for the deprivation of such right under such circumstances.
Section 12.1
. If any Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, and irrespective of whether any Notes have become or have been declared immediately due and payable under , the holder of any Note at the time outstanding may proceed to protect and enforce the rights of such holder by an action at law, suit in equity or other appropriate proceeding, whether for the specific performance of any agreement contained herein or in any Note, or for an injunction against a violation of any of the terms hereof or thereof, or in aid of the exercise of any power granted hereby or thereby or by law or otherwise.
Section 12.2 Other Remedies
Section 12.1
 
. At any time after any Notes have been declared due and payable pursuant to or , the Required Holders, by written notice to the Company, may rescind and annul any such declaration and its consequences if (a) the Obligors have paid all overdue interest on such Notes, all principal of and Make-Whole Amount, if any, on any Notes that are due and payable and are unpaid other than by reason of such declaration, and all interest on such overdue principal and Make-Whole Amount, if any, and (to the extent permitted by applicable law) any overdue interest in respect of such Notes, at the Default Rate, (b) the Obligors shall not have paid any amounts which have become due solely by reason of such declaration, (c) all Events of Default and Defaults, other than non-payment of amounts that have become due solely by reason of such declaration, have been cured or have been waived pursuant to , and (d) no judgment or decree has been entered for the payment of any monies due pursuant hereto or to such Notes. No rescission and annulment under this will extend to or affect any subsequent Event of Default or Default or impair any right consequent thereon.
Section 12.3 Rescission
Section 12.1(b)
(c)
Section 17
Section 12.3
. No course of dealing and no delay on the part of any holder of any Note in exercising any right, power or remedy shall operate as a waiver thereof or otherwise prejudice such holder's rights, powers or remedies. No right, power or remedy conferred by this Agreement or by any Note upon any holder thereof shall be exclusive of any other right, power or remedy referred to herein or therein or now or hereafter available at law, in equity, by statute or otherwise. Without limiting the obligations of the Obligors under , the Obligors will pay to the holder of each Note on demand such further amount as shall be sufficient to cover all costs and expenses of such holder incurred in any enforcement or collection under this , including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees, expenses and disbursements.
Section 12.4 No Waivers or Election of Remedies, Expenses, Etc
Section 15
Section 12
SECTION 13. Registration; Exchange; Substitution of Notes
. The Obligor Agent shall keep at its principal executive office a register for the registration and registration of transfers of Notes. The name and address of each holder of one or more Notes, each transfer thereof and the name and address of each transferee of one or more Notes shall be registered in such register. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Person in whose name any Note shall be registered shall be deemed and treated as the owner and holder thereof for all purposes hereof, and the Obligor Agent shall not be affected by any notice or knowledge to the contrary. The Obligor Agent shall give to any holder of a Note that is an Institutional Investor promptly upon request therefor, a complete and correct copy of the names and addresses of all registered holders of Notes.
Section 13.1 Registration of Notes
. Upon surrender of any Note to the Obligor Agent at the address of the Company and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in ) for registration of transfer or exchange (and in the case of a surrender for registration of transfer accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed by the registered holder of such Note or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing and accompanied by the relevant name, address and other information for notices of each
Section 13.2 Transfer and Exchange of Notes
Section 18(iii)
 
transferee of such Note or part thereof), within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, execute and deliver, at the Obligors' expense (except as provided below), one or more new Notes (as requested by the holder thereof) in exchange therefor and in an aggregate principal amount equal to the unpaid principal amount of the surrendered Note. Each such new Note shall be payable to such Person as such holder may request and shall be substantially in the form of . Each such new Note shall be dated and bear interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on the surrendered Note or dated the date of the surrendered Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon. The Obligor Agent may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any stamp tax or governmental charge imposed in respect of any such transfer of Notes. Notes shall not be transferred in denominations of less than $100,000; that if necessary to enable the registration of transfer by a holder of its entire holding of Notes, one Note may be in a denomination of less than $100,000. Any transferee, by its acceptance of a Note registered in its name (or the name of its nominee), shall be deemed to have made the representations set forth in and with respect to the Notes and, in addition, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption.The Obligors shall not, however, be required to register any transfer of a Note if, acting in its reasonable discretion, the Obligor Agent believes such transfer is in violation of applicable law or the representations of the transferee set forth in and are not true and correct.
Exhibit 1
provided
Section 6.1
Section 6.2
Sections 6.1
6.2
. Upon receipt by the Obligor Agent at the address and to the attention of the designated officer (all as specified in ) of evidence reasonably satisfactory to it of the ownership of and the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any Note (which evidence shall be, in the case of an Institutional Investor, notice from such Institutional Investor of such ownership and such loss, theft, destruction or mutilation), and
Section 13.3 Replacement of Notes
Section 18(iii)
(a) in the case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it ( that if the holder of such Note is, or is a nominee for, an original Purchaser or another holder of a Note with a minimum net worth of at least $50,000,000 or a Qualified Institutional Buyer, such Person's own unsecured agreement of indemnity shall be deemed to be satisfactory), or
provided
(b) in the case of mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation thereof,
within ten Business Days thereafter, the Obligor Agent shall, and shall cause each of the other Obligors to, at their own expense, execute and deliver, in lieu thereof, a new Note, dated and bearing interest from the date to which interest shall have been paid on such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note or dated the date of such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note if no interest shall have been paid thereon.
 
SECTION 14. Payments on Notes.
. Subject to , payments of principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest becoming due and payable on the Notes shall be made in Itasca, Illinois at the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction. The Company may at any time, by notice to each holder of a Note, change the place of payment of the Notes so long as such place of payment shall be either the principal office of the Company in such jurisdiction or the principal office of a bank or trust company in Chicago, Illinois.
Section 14.1 Place of Payment
Section 14.2
. So long as any Purchaser or its nominee shall be the holder of any Note, and notwithstanding anything contained in or in such Note to the contrary, the Obligors will pay all sums becoming due on such Note for principal, Make-Whole Amount, if any, and interest by the method and at the address specified for such purpose below such Purchaser's name in , or by such other method or at such other address as such Purchaser shall have from time to time specified to the Company in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of such Note or the making of any notation thereon, except that upon written request of the Company made concurrently with or reasonably promptly after payment or prepayment in full of any Note, such Purchaser shall surrender such Note for cancellation, reasonably promptly after any such request, to the Obligor Agent at the Company's principal executive office or at the place of payment most recently designated by the Company pursuant to . Prior to any sale or other disposition of any Note held by a Purchaser or its nominee, such Purchaser will, at its election, either endorse thereon the amount of principal paid thereon and the last date to which interest has been paid thereon or surrender such Note to the Obligor Agent in exchange for a new Note or Notes pursuant to . The Obligors will afford the benefits of this to any Institutional Investor that is the direct or indirect transferee of any Note purchased by a Purchaser under this Agreement and that has made the same agreement relating to such Note as the Purchasers have made in this .
Section 14.2 Home Office Payment
Section 14.1
Schedule A
Section 14.1
Section 13.2
Section 14.2
Section 14.2
SECTION 15. Expenses, Etc.
. Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby are consummated, the Obligors will pay all reasonable costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees of a special counsel and, if reasonably required by the Required Holders, local or other counsel) incurred by the Purchasers and each other holder of a Note in connection with such transactions and in connection with any amendments, waivers or consents under or in respect of this Agreement, any Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty (whether or not such amendment, waiver or consent becomes effective), including, without limitation: (a) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in enforcing or defending (or determining whether or how to enforce or defend) any rights under this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty or in responding to any subpoena or other legal process or informal investigative demand issued in connection with this Agreement, the Notes or any Subsidiary Guaranty, or by reason of being a holder of any Note, (b) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the insolvency or bankruptcy of any Obligor or any Subsidiary or in connection with any work-out or restructuring of the transactions contemplated hereby and by the Notes, and (c) the reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the delivery of any Subsidiary Guaranty or Joinder Agreement as contemplated by . The Obligors will pay, and will save each Purchaser and each other holder of a Note harmless from, all claims in respect of any fees, costs or expenses, if any, of brokers and finders (other than those, if any, retained by a Purchaser or other holder in connection with its purchase of any Notes).
Section 15.1 Transaction Expenses
Section 9.7
 
. The obligations of the Obligors under this will survive the payment or transfer of any Note, the enforcement, amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any Notes, and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 15.2 Survival
Section 15
SECTION 16. Survival of Representations and Warranties; Entire Agreement.
All representations and warranties contained herein shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Notes, the purchase or transfer by any Purchaser of any Note or portion thereof or interest therein and the payment of any Note, and may be relied upon by any Obligor and any subsequent holder of a Note, regardless of any investigation made at any time by or on behalf of such Purchaser or any other holder of a Note. All statements contained in any certificate or other instrument delivered by or on behalf of any Obligor pursuant to this Agreement shall be deemed representations and warranties of the Obligors under this Agreement. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement and the Notes embody the entire agreement and understanding between each Purchaser and the Obligors and supersede all prior agreements and understandings (written or oral) relating to the subject matter hereof.
SECTION 17. Amendment and Waiver.
. This Agreement, the Notes, any Joinder Agreement and any Subsidiary Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof or of any Joinder Agreement, Subsidiary Guaranty or the Notes may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively and for a specified time period or permanently), with (and only with) the written consent of the Obligors and the Required Holders, except that (a) no amendment or waiver of any of the provisions of or hereof, or any defined term (as it is used therein), will be effective as to any Purchaser unless consented to by such Purchaser in writing, and (b) no such amendment or waiver may, without the written consent of the holder of each Note at the time outstanding affected thereby, (i) subject to the provisions of relating to acceleration or rescission, change the amount or time of any prepayment or payment of principal of, or reduce the rate or change the time of payment or method of computation of interest or of the Make-Whole Amount on, the Notes, (ii) change the percentage of the principal amount of the Notes the holders of which are required to consent to any such amendment or waiver, or (iii) amend any of or .
Section 17.1 Requirements
Section 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
21
Section 12
Section 8, 11(a), 11(b), 12, 17
20
.
Section 17.2 Solicitation of Holders of Notes
(a) . The Company will provide each holder of the Notes (irrespective of the amount then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof, of the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement. The Company will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this to each holder of outstanding Notes promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the requisite holders of Notes as specified in .
Solicitation
Section 17
Section 17.1
 
(b) . None of the Obligors will directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of supplemental or additional interest, fee or otherwise, or grant any security or provide other credit support, to any holder of Notes as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any holder of Notes of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof or of any Note or any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted or other credit support concurrently provided, on the same terms, ratably to each holder of Notes then outstanding even if such holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
Payment
(c) Any consent made pursuant to this by the holder of any Note that has transferred or has agreed to transfer such Note to any of the Obligors, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate of the Obligors and has provided or has agreed to provide such written consent as a condition to such transfer, shall be void and of no force except solely as to such holder, and any amendments effected or to be effected or granted that would not have been or would not be so effected or granted but for such consents or waivers granted (and the consents of all other holders of Notes that were acquired under the same or similar conditions) shall be void and of no force except solely as to such transferring holder.
Consent in Contemplation of Transfer.
Section 17.2
. Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all holders of Notes and is binding upon them and upon each future holder of any Note and upon the Obligors without regard to whether such Note has been marked to indicate such amendment or waiver. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant, agreement, Default or Event of Default not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Obligors and the holder of any Note nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder, under any Note or under any Subsidiary Guaranty shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any holder of such Note. As used herein, the term "this Agreement" and references thereto shall mean this Agreement as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 17.3 Binding Effect, Etc
Section 17
. Solely for the purpose of determining whether the holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Agreement, the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement, or have directed the taking of any action provided herein, in the Notes, any Subsidiary Guaranty or any Joinder Agreement to be taken upon the direction of the holders of a specified percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Obligor or any of its Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
Section 17.4 Notes Held by the Obligors, Etc
SECTION 18. Notices.
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(i) if to any Purchaser or its nominee, to such Purchaser or nominee at the address specified for such communications in , or at such other address as such Purchaser or nominee shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing,
Schedule A
 
(ii) if to any other holder of any Note, to such holder at such address as such other holder shall have specified to the Obligor Agent in writing, or
(iii) if to any of the Obligors, c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning hereof to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as the Company shall have specified to the holder of each Note in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 18
SECTION 19. Reproduction of Documents.
This Agreement or any Subsidiary Guaranty and all documents relating thereto, including, without limitation, (a) consents, waivers and modifications that may hereafter be executed, (b) documents received by any Purchaser at the Closing (except the Notes themselves), and (c) financial statements, certificates and other information previously or hereafter furnished to any Purchaser, may be reproduced by such Purchaser by any photographic, photostatic, electronic, digital or other similar process and such Purchaser may destroy any original document so reproduced. Each Obligor agrees and stipulates that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, any such reproduction shall be admissible in evidence as the original itself in any judicial or administrative proceeding (whether or not the original is in existence and whether or not such reproduction was made by such Purchaser in the regular course of business) and any enlargement, facsimile or further reproduction of such reproduction shall likewise be admissible in evidence. This shall not prohibit the Obligors or any other holder of Notes from contesting any such reproduction to the same extent that it could contest the original, or from introducing evidence to demonstrate the inaccuracy of any such reproduction.
Section 19
SECTION 20. Confidential Information.
For the purposes of this , means information delivered to any Purchaser by or on behalf of any Obligor or any Subsidiary in connection with the transactions contemplated by or otherwise pursuant to this Agreement and not previously disclosed in any filings by the Company with the SEC; that such term does not include information that (a) was publicly known or otherwise known to such Purchaser prior to the time of such disclosure, (b) subsequently becomes publicly known through no act or omission by such Purchaser or any Person acting on such Purchaser's behalf, (c) otherwise becomes known to such Purchaser other than through disclosure by an Obligor or any Subsidiary, or is known by such Purchaser to be under an obligation not to transmit such information to such Purchaser or (d) constitutes financial statements delivered to such Purchaser under that are otherwise publicly available. Each Purchaser will maintain the confidentiality of such Confidential Information in accordance with procedures adopted by such Purchaser in good faith to protect confidential information of third parties delivered to such Purchaser; that such Purchaser may deliver or disclose Confidential Information to (i) its directors, trustees, officers, employees, agents, attorneys and Affiliates (to the extent such disclosure reasonably relates to the administration of the investment represented by its Notes), (ii) its financial advisors and other professional advisors who agree to hold confidential the Confidential Information substantially in accordance with the terms of this , (iii) any other holder of any Note, (iv) any Institutional Investor to which it sells or offers to sell such Note or any part thereof or
Section 20
"Confidential Information"
provided
Section 7.1
provided
Section 20
 
any participation therein (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (v) any Person from which it offers to purchase any security of an Obligor (if such Person has agreed in writing prior to its receipt of such Confidential Information to be bound by the provisions of this ), (vi) any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over such Purchaser, (vii) the NAIC or the SVO or, in each case, any similar organization, or any nationally recognized rating agency that requires access to information about such Purchaser's investment portfolio or (viii) any other Person to which such delivery or disclosure may be necessary or appropriate (w) to effect compliance with any law, rule, regulation or order applicable to such Purchaser, (x) in response to any subpoena or other legal process, (y) in connection with any litigation to which such Purchaser is a party or (z) if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, to the extent such Purchaser may reasonably determine such delivery and disclosure to be necessary or appropriate in the enforcement or for the protection of the rights and remedies under such Purchaser's Notes and this Agreement. Each holder of a Note, by its acceptance of a Note, will be deemed to have agreed to be bound by and to be entitled to the benefits of this as though it were a party to this Agreement. On reasonable request by the Company in connection with the delivery to any holder of a Note of information required to be delivered to such holder under this Agreement or requested by such holder (other than a holder that is a party to this Agreement or its nominee), such holder will, as a condition precedent to receiving such information, enter into an agreement with the Company embodying the provisions of this and providing the Company assurances that such holder will enter into further agreements with language no more burdensome on the holder than the language contained in this as reasonably requested by the Company in order to comply with Regulation FD promulgated by the SEC. The Obligors shall reimburse such holder's reasonable expenses incurred in connection with entering into any such agreement.
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
Section 20
SECTION 21. Substitution of Purchaser.
Each Purchaser shall have the right to substitute any one of its Affiliates as the purchaser of the Notes that it has agreed to purchase hereunder, by written notice to the Obligors, which notice shall be signed by both such Purchaser and such Affiliate, shall contain such Affiliate's agreement to be bound by this Agreement and shall contain a confirmation by such Affiliate of the accuracy with respect to it of the representations set forth in . Upon receipt of such notice, any reference to such Purchaser in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall be deemed to refer to such Affiliate in lieu of such original Purchaser. In the event that such Affiliate is so substituted as a Purchaser hereunder and such Affiliate thereafter transfers to such original Purchaser all of the Notes then held by such Affiliate, upon receipt by the Company of notice of such transfer, any reference to such Affiliate as a "Purchaser" in this Agreement (other than in this ) shall no longer be deemed to refer to such Affiliate, but shall refer to such original Purchaser, and such original Purchaser shall again have all the rights of an original holder of the Notes under this Agreement.
Section 6
Section 21
Section 21
SECTION 22. Miscellaneous.
. All covenants and other agreements contained in this Agreement by or on behalf of any of the parties hereto bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns (including, without limitation, any subsequent holder of a Note) whether so expressed or not.
Section 22.1 Successors and Assigns
 
. Anything in this Agreement or the Notes to the contrary notwithstanding (but without limiting the requirement in that the notice of any optional prepayment specify a Business Day as the date fixed for such prepayment), any payment of principal of or Make-Whole Amount or interest on any Note that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; that if the maturity date of any Note is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
Section 22.2 Payments Due on Non-Business Days
Section 8.4
provided
.
Section 22.3 Accounting Terms
(a) Subject to all accounting terms used herein which are not expressly defined in this Agreement have the meanings respectively given to them in accordance with GAAP. Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Section 22.3(b),
(b) Notwithstanding any calculation required by, or for the purposes of determining compliance with, Sections 10.1, 10.2, 10.3, 10.4 and 10.6 (i) shall be calculated in accordance with the specific terms of this Agreement, including without limitation, this and, where applicable, the EBITDA Adjustment Provisions, (ii) "estimated acquisition earnout payables" shall be determined by applying GAAP as in effect as of December 31, 2008 and (iii) any election by the Company to measure an item of Indebtedness using fair value (as permitted by Accounting Standard Codification 825-10-25, formerly known as Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 159, or any similar accounting standard) shall be disregarded and such determination shall be made as if such election had not been made. In the event of any change in GAAP after the date hereof, and if such change would affect the method of calculation of, or compliance with, any covenant set forth herein, upon the written request of the Company or any holder of a Note, the Company and the holders of the Notes agree to endeavor in good faith to agree upon an amendment to this Agreement that would revise such covenant or method of calculation (which may include revisions to defined terms used herein) in a manner that would preserve the original effect thereof, but would allow the method of calculation and/or compliance with such covenant to be determined in accordance with GAAP as so changed, , until such covenant is so amended and subject to the foregoing in this sentence, such method of calculation and/or covenant shall continue to be calculated in accordance with GAAP prior to such change in GAAP. No delay by the Company or any holder of Notes in requiring such negotiation process shall limit such party's right to so require such negotiation process at any time after such a change in GAAP.
Section 22.3(a),
Section 22.3(b)
provided that
. Any provision of this Agreement that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.4 Severability
 
. Each covenant contained herein shall be construed (absent express provision to the contrary) as being independent of each other covenant contained herein, so that compliance with any one covenant shall not (absent such an express contrary provision) be deemed to excuse compliance with any other covenant. Where any provision herein refers to action to be taken by any Person, or which such Person is prohibited from taking, such provision shall be applicable whether such action is taken directly or indirectly by such Person.
Section 22.5 Construction, Etc
For the avoidance of doubt, all Schedules and Exhibits attached to this Agreement shall be deemed to be a part hereof.
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
Section 22.6 Counterparts
. This Agreement shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the parties shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinoisexcluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit the application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
Section 22.7 Governing Law
,
(a) Each Obligor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the Notes. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Obligor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
Section 22.8 Jurisdiction and Process; Waiver of Jury Trial.
(b) Each Obligor consents to process being served by or on behalf of any holder of Notes in any suit, action or proceeding of the nature referred to in by mailing a copy thereof by registered or certified mail (or any substantially similar form of mail), postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to it at its address specified in or at such other address of which such holder shall then have been notified pursuant to said Section. Each Obligor agrees that such service upon receipt (i) shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon it in any such suit, action or proceeding and (ii) shall, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, be taken and held to be valid personal service upon and personal delivery to it. Notices hereunder shall be conclusively presumed received as evidenced by a delivery receipt furnished by the United States Postal Service or any reputable commercial delivery service.
Section 22.8(a)
Section 18
(c) Nothing in this shall affect the right of any holder of a Note to serve process in any manner permitted by law, or limit any right that the holders of any of the Notes may have to bring proceedings against an Obligor in the courts of any appropriate jurisdiction or to enforce in any lawful manner a judgment obtained in one jurisdiction in any other jurisdiction.
Section 22.8
 
(d) T A, N .
HE
PARTIES
HERETO
HEREBY
WAIVE
TRIAL
BY
JURY
IN
ANY
ACTION
BROUGHT
ON
OR
WITH
RESPECT
TO
THIS
GREEMENT
THE
OTES
OR
ANY
OTHER
DOCUMENT
EXECUTED
IN
CONNECTION
HEREWITH
OR
THEREWITH
. (a) The obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement and the Notes are joint and several primary obligations of each Obligor regardless of which Obligor actually receives the proceeds of any Notes or the manner in which the Obligors, any Purchaser or any holder thereof accounts for such Notes on its books and records.
Section 22.9 Nature of Obligations
(b) Each Obligor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such holder of Notes upon this Agreement (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in this Agreement or the Notes shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Agreement and the Notes);
(2) demand of payment by any holder of Notes from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any holder of Notes or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Obligor.
The obligations of each Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes and the rights of any holder of Notes to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under this Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, the obligations of the Obligors hereunder and under the Notes shall be binding upon the Obligors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due under this Agreement shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Obligors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of any Obligor or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of any Obligor to issue the Notes or any Obligor to execute and deliver this Agreement or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of any Obligor or any other Person as a legal entity; or
 
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of any Obligor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor or any other Person; or
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of any Obligor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other , whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
force majeure
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under this Agreement, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Obligor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement; or
 
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Obligor of failure of an Obligor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor or to any other Person or to any other Agreement or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other agreement, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor or any other Person or any release of any Obligor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, this Agreement or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Obligor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Obligor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Obligor or other Person under this Agreement or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Agreement and the Notes and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Obligor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and this Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may
provided
 
be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or this Agreement and that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
(d) To the extent of any payments made under this Agreement, each Obligor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Obligors, but such Obligor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the holder of Notes for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Obligor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under this Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(e) Each Obligor agrees that to the extent an Obligor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Obligors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Obligors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any holder of a Note from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
(f) No holder of a Note shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Obligors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Obligors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Obligors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Obligors' burden, any right to which each Obligor hereby expressly waives.
(g) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, including this , all obligations and liabilities of an Obligor under this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Obligor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement by reason of the express provisions of of this Agreement or is otherwise released from this Agreement, the Notes and any Joinder Agreement in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 22.9
Section 2.2
. (a) Each Obligor (other than the Company) by its execution of this Agreement or a Joinder Agreement irrevocably appoints the Company to act on its behalf as its agent (the ) in relation to this Agreement and the Notes and irrevocably authorizes:
Section 22.10 Obligor Agent
"Obligor Agent"
 
(i) the Company on its behalf to supply all information concerning itself contemplated by this Agreement to the holders of a Note and to give all notices and instructions, to execute on its behalf any Joinder Agreement, to make such agreements and to effect the relevant amendments, supplements and variations capable of being given, made or effected by any Obligor notwithstanding that they may affect the Obligor, without further reference to or the consent of that Obligor; and
(ii) each holder of a Note to give any notice, demand or other communication to that Obligor pursuant to the this Agreement and the Notes to the Company,
and in each case the Obligors shall be bound as though that Obligor itself had given the notices and instructions or executed or made the agreements or effected the amendments, supplements or variations, or received the relevant notice, demand or other communication.
(b) Every act, omission, agreement, undertaking, settlement, waiver, amendment, supplement, variation, notice or other communication given or made by the Obligor Agent or given to the Obligor Agent under this Agreement and the Notes on behalf of another Obligor or in connection with this Agreement and the Notes (whether or not known to any other Obligor and whether occurring before or after such other Obligor became an Obligor under this Agreement and the Notes) shall be binding for all purposes on that Obligor as if that Obligor had expressly made, given or concurred with it. In the event of any conflict between any notices or other communications of the Obligor Agent and any other Obligor, those of the Obligor Agent shall prevail.
 
If you are in agreement with the foregoing, please sign the form of agreement on a counterpart of this Agreement and return it to the Company, whereupon this Agreement shall become a binding agreement between you and the Obligors.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
1095 Avenue of the Americas
New York, New York 10036
(Securities to be registered in the name of )
Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
 
Bank Name: JPMorgan Chase Bank
      ABA Routing #:            021-000-021
      Account No.:
      Account Name:            Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
      Ref:            Arthur J. Gallagher & Co 3.69% due 6/14/2022
with sufficient information to identify the source and application of such funds, including issuer, PPN , interest rate, maturity and whether payment is of principal, interest, make whole amount or otherwise.
For all payments other than scheduled payments of principal and interest, the Company shall seek instructions from the holder, and in the absence of instructions to the contrary, will make such payments to the account and in the manner set forth above.
 
Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
Facsimile (973) 355-4250
With a copy to:
OTHER than with respect to deliveries of financial statements
Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Chief Counsel-Securities Investments (PRIV)
Email: sec_invest_law@metlife.com
 
Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
Securities Investments, Law Department
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Thomas Pasuit, Esq.
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
4-1-3, Taihei, Sumida-ku
Tokyo, 130-0012 JAPAN
(Securities to be registered in the name of )
MetLife Alico Life Insurance K.K.
 
Bank Name:    Citibank New York
111 Wall Street, New York, New York 10005 (USA)
ABA Routing #:            021000089
Acct No./DDA:
Acct Name:     METLIFE ALICO PP NON-GGA
Ref:                 Arthur J Gallagher & Co 3.69% due 6/14/2022
with sufficient information to identify the source and application of such funds, including issuer, PPN , interest rate, maturity and whether payment is of principal, interest, make whole amount or otherwise. For all payments other than scheduled payments of principal and interest, the Company shall seek instructions from the holder, and in the absence of instructions to the contrary, will make such payments to the account and in the manner set forth above.
 
Alico Asset Management Corp. (Japan)
Administration Department
ARCA East 7F, 3-2-1 Kinshi
Sumida-ku, Tokyo 130-0013 Japan
Attention: Administration Dept. Manager
Email:
saura@metlife.co.jp
With a copy to:
MetLife Investment Management, LLC
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
Facsimile: (973) 355-4250
 
With another copy OTHER than with respect to deliveries of financial statements to:
MetLife Investment Management, LLC
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Chief Counsel-Securities Investments (PRIV)
Email:
sec_invest_law@metlife.com
 
MetLife Investment Management, LLC
Securities Investments, Law Department
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Thomas Pasuit, Esq.
 
 
Schedule A
 
C/O Jane Kipper
5700 Broadmoor, Suite 1000
Mission, KS 66202
(Securities to be registered in the name of
Hare & Co.)
 
 
with sufficient information to identify the source and application of such funds, including issuer, PPN , interest rate, maturity and whether payment is of principal, interest, make whole amount or otherwise. For all payments other than scheduled payments of principal and interest, the Company shall seek instructions from the holder, and in the absence of instructions to the contrary, will make such payments to the account and in the manner set forth above.
 
Union Fidelity Life Insurance Company
c/o MetLife Investment Management, LLC
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902, 10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
Facsimile (973) 355-4250
 
With a copy OTHER than with respect to deliveries of financial statements to:
Union Fidelity Life Insurance Company
c/o MetLife Investment Management, LLC
P.O. Box 1902, 10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Chief Counsel-Securities Investments (PRIV)
Email: sec_invest_law@metlife.com
 
Bank of New York Mellon
1 Wall Street, 3
rd
Floor Window A
New York, NY 10286
Attention: Anthony Saviano
212-635-6764
With COPIES OF THE NOTES emailed to tpasuit@metlife.com
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
Schedule A
 
 
 
As used herein, the following terms have the respective meanings set forth below or set forth in the Section hereof following such term:
is defined in Section .
"Affected Holder"
8.8(a)
means, at any time, and with respect to any Person, any other Person that at such time directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries Controls, or is Controlled by, or is under common Control with, such first Person, and with respect to the Company, shall include any Person beneficially owning or holding, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests of the Company or any Subsidiary or any corporation of which the Company and its Subsidiaries beneficially own or hold, in the aggregate, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of any class of voting or equity interests. As used in this definition, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise. Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to an is a reference to an Affiliate of the Company.
"Affiliate"
"Control"
"Affiliate"
"" means this Note Purchase Agreement among the Obligors and the Purchasers dated June 14, 2013.
Agreement
means Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
"AJG Brokerage"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation.
"AJG Illinois"
"Anti-Corruption Laws" is defined in .
Section 5.16(d)
"Anti-Money Laundering Laws" is defined in .
Section 5.16(c)
means Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010, among the Obligors, the lenders from time to time party thereto, Bank of Montreal, as administrative agent, Bank of America, N.A., Citibank N.A. and Barclays Bank PLC, as co-syndication agents, and JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. and U.S. Bank National Association, as documentation agents, as the same may from time to time be amended, modified, supplemented, renewed, extended, refinanced or replaced.
"Bank Credit Agreement"
is defined in .
"Blocked Person"
Section 5.16(a)
means (a) for the purposes of only, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed, and (b) for the purposes of any other provision of this Agreement, any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in Chicago, Illinois or New York, New York are required or authorized to be closed.
"Business Day"
Section 8.6
means any lease of property which, in accordance with GAAP, is required to be capitalized on the balance sheet of the lessee.
"Capital Lease"
 
means the amount of the liability shown on the balance sheet of any Person in respect of a Capital Lease as determined in accordance with GAAP.
"Capitalized Lease Obligation"
is defined in
"Change in Control"
Section 8.7(f).
"Change in Control Event" is defined in .
Section 8.7(a)
is defined in .
"CISADA"
Section 5.16(a)
"Closing" is defined in .
Section 3
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time.
"Code"
means Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation, or any successor that becomes such in the manner prescribed in .
"Company"
Section 10.5
is defined in .
"Confidential Information"
Section 20
means, without duplication, all Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis eliminating intercompany items.
"Consolidated Indebtedness"
means, at any time the same is to be determined, the total stockholders' equity (including capital stock, additional paid-in capital and retained earnings after deducting treasury stock, but excluding minority interests in Subsidiaries) which would appear on the balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
"Consolidated Net Worth"
means, without duplication, all Priority Indebtedness of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis eliminating inter-company items.
"Consolidated Priority Indebtedness"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, total assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
"Consolidated Total Assets"
means, as of the date of any determination thereof and without duplication, the sum of (a) Consolidated Indebtedness (b) Consolidated Net Worth.
"Consolidated Total Capitalization"
plus
means any of the Subsidiaries of the Company and any of their or the Company's respective Controlled Affiliates (but in no event shall include any shareholder of the Company). As used in this definition, "Control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise.
"Controlled Entity"
means, with respect to the Company, all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades and businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control which, together with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
"Controlled Group"
 
means an event or condition the occurrence or existence of which would, with the lapse of time or the giving of notice or both, become an Event of Default.
"Default"
means, for each Note, that rate of interest stated in clause (b) of the first paragraph of such Note.
"Default Rate"
is defined in .
"Disclosure Documents"
Section 5.3
"Disposition" is defined in .
Section 10.6
means each Subsidiary of the Company which is organized under the laws of the United States of America or any state thereof.
"Domestic Subsidiary"
means, for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of:
"EBITDA"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Solely for the purposes of calculating EBITDA pursuant to , if during any period the Company or any Subsidiary shall have completed an acquisition, disposition, merger, consolidation, business combination or other similar transaction or has reported in its financial statements required to be delivered pursuant to or  any discontinued operations (as defined under GAAP), then EBITDA for such period shall be adjusted on a pro forma basis to include or exclude, as appropriate, the EBITDA relating to such acquisition, disposition, consolidated or merged business or entity, combined business or other similar transaction or such discontinued operations, in each case assuming that all such acquisitions dispositions, mergers,
Section 10.1
Section 7.1(a)
(b)
 
consolidations, business combinations or other similar transactions and discontinuations had occurred on the first day of such period. Any such pro forma adjustment shall be made in good faith by a responsible financial or accounting officer of the Company. The calculations included in the Senior Financial Officer's certificate delivered pursuant to shall set forth as a separate line item the net amount of any pro forma adjustments made pursuant to this paragraph. The Company agrees to provide any additional information relating to such pro forma adjustment as a holder of Notes may reasonably request.
Section 7.2(a)
Solely for the purposes of (i) calculating EBITDA pursuant to and(and the defined terms of this Agreement as used in such calculation) and (ii) any pro forma adjustment to EBITDA as provided in this Agreement, no Clean Energy Subsidiary shall be deemed to be a Subsidiary of the Company (and shall be excluded from the calculation of EBITDA) if, during the relevant period, the aggregate tax credits generated by the Clean Energy Subsidiaries exceed the aggregate pre-tax losses generated by the Clean Energy Subsidiaries. "" shall mean (1) AJG Financial Services, LLC, (2) each of the direct and indirect Subsidiaries of AJG Financial Services, LLC and (3) any Person not constituting a Subsidiary to the extent an investment in such Person is accounted for in the Net Income of a Clean Energy Subsidiary; that such Clean Energy Subsidiary is principally engaged in the business of clean energy-related ventures; that neither the Company nor any Subsidiary not constituting a Clean Energy Subsidiary shall be permitted to transfer, sell, assign (including by way of merger, liquidation or dissolution) any asset or business (other than any clean energy-related assets or business) to any Clean Energy Subsidiary.
Section 10.1
Section 10.2
Clean Energy Subsidiary
provided
provided further
The provisions of the two immediately preceding paragraphs (the "") shall cease to be of any further force or effect at the time of the extension of the "Termination Date" (as defined in the Bank Credit Agreement as in effect on June 14, 2013 (the "")) for the Current Credit Agreement, or any amendment to, or the replacement or refinancing of, the Current Credit Agreement, unless the terms of the Current Credit Agreement, after giving effect to such extension or amendment, or the terms of the Bank Credit Agreement that replaces or refinances the Current Credit Agreement, as the case may be, provides for adjustments substantially similar to the EBITDA Adjustment Provisions for the purposes of determining compliance by the Company with any financial covenants therein that are comparable to the provisions of and (which, in the case of the Current Credit Agreement, are Sections 9.7 and 9.8 of the Current Credit Agreement), and the EBITDA Adjustment Provisions shall thereafter continue in force and effect only so long as the Bank Credit Agreement as in effect from time to time continues to include adjustments substantially similar to the EBITDA Adjustment Provisions.
EBITDA Adjustment Provisions
Current Credit Agreement
Section 10.1
Section 10.2
means, for any period, EBITDA , to the extent deducted in determining Net Income, Rental Expense.
"EBITDAR"
plus
is defined in .
"Electronic Delivery"
Section 7.1(a)
means any and all Federal, state, local, and foreign statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances, rules, judgments, orders, decrees, permits, concessions, grants, franchises, licenses, agreements or governmental restrictions relating to pollution and the protection of the environment or the release of any materials into the environment, including but not limited to those related to Hazardous Materials.
"Environmental Laws"
 
means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"ERISA"
means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that is treated as a single employer together with the Company under Section 414 of the Code.
"ERISA Affiliate"
is defined in .
"Event of Default"
Section 11
means 25% of cash and cash equivalents as set forth on the consolidated balance sheet of the Company delivered pursuant to but not including the amounts set forth in the "Restricted cash" line item of such consolidated balance sheet of the Company); that if, at the time of the extension of the "Termination Date" (as defined in the Current Credit Agreement) for the Current Credit Agreement, or any amendment to, or the replacement or refinancing of, the Current Credit Agreement, the terms of the Current Credit Agreement, after giving effect to such extension or amendment, or the terms of the Bank Credit Agreement that replaces or refinances the Current Credit Agreement, as the case may be, do not provide for a definition of Excess Cash (as defined in the Current Credit Agreement or any comparable term used in the Bank Credit Agreement) that is substantially similar as the foregoing definition, or if the Current Credit Agreement or other Bank Credit Agreement is amended such that it no longer provides for a such a substantively similar definition, then "Excess Cash" shall mean, as of any date the same is to be determined, all cash on the books of the Company and its Domestic Subsidiaries which is maintained in accounts located in the United States of America and which is in excess of $25,000,000, but excluding restricted cash as set forth in the financial statements of the Company delivered pursuant to .
"Excess Cash"
Section 7.1 (
provided,
Section 7.1
means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Exchange Act"
mean the (i) Amended and Restated Note Purchase Agreement dated December 19, 2007 by and among the Obligors and Gallagher Re, Inc., on one hand, and the Purchasers (as defined therein) listed on Schedule A thereto, on the other hand, as amended, modified, supplemented or restated from time to time, (ii) Note Purchase Agreement dated November 30, 2009 by and among the Obligors, on one hand, and the Purchasers (as defined therein) listed on Schedule A thereto, on the other hand, as amended, modified, supplemented or restated from time to time, (iii) Note Purchase Agreement dated February 10, 2011 by and among the Obligors, on one hand, and the Purchasers (as defined therein) listed on Schedule A thereto, on the other hand, as amended, modified, supplemented or restated from time to time and (iv) Note Purchase Agreement dated July 10, 2012 by and among the Obligors, on one hand, and the Purchasers (as defined therein) listed on Schedule A thereto, on the other hand, as amended, modified, supplemented or restated from time to time.
"Existing Note Agreements"
means for any period, the sum, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, without duplication, for the Company and its Subsidiaries of Interest Expense paid or payable in cash for such period and Rental Expense for such period.
"Fixed Charges"
 
is defined in .
"Form 10-K"
Section 7.1(b)
is defined in .
"Form 10-Q"
Section 7.1(a)
means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect from time to time in the United States of America.
"GAAP"
means Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Bassett"
means Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
"Gallagher Benefit"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"Gallagher Risk"
means Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC a Delaware limited liability company.
"Gallagher Service"
means:
"Governmental Authority"
(a) the government of
(i) the United States of America or any State or other political subdivision thereof, or
(ii) any other jurisdiction in which the Company or any Subsidiary conducts all or any part of its business, or which asserts jurisdiction over any properties of the Company or any Subsidiary, or
(b) any entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions of, or pertaining to, any such government.
means any governmental official or employee, employee of any government-owned or government-controlled entity, political party, any official of a political party, candidate for political office, official of any public international organization.
"Governmental Official"
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any obligation (except the endorsement in the ordinary course of business of negotiable instruments for deposit or collection) of such Person guaranteeing or in effect guaranteeing any Indebtedness, dividend or other obligation of any other Person in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, including (without limitation) obligations incurred through an agreement, contingent or otherwise, by such Person:
"Guaranty"
(a) to purchase such Indebtedness or obligation or any property constituting security therefor;
(b) to advance or supply funds (i) for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation, or (ii) to maintain any working capital or other balance sheet condition or any income statement condition of any other Person or otherwise to advance or make available funds for the purchase or payment of such Indebtedness or obligation;
 
(c) to lease properties or to purchase properties or services primarily for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation of the ability of any other Person to make payment of the Indebtedness or obligation; or
(d) otherwise to assure the owner of such Indebtedness or obligation against loss in respect thereof.
In any computation of the Indebtedness or other liabilities of the obligor under any Guaranty, the Indebtedness or other obligations that are the subject of such Guaranty shall be assumed to be direct obligations of such obligor.
means any and all pollutants, toxic or hazardous wastes or any other substances, including all substances listed in or regulated in any Environmental Law as posing a hazard to health and safety, the removal of which is required or the generation, manufacture, refining, production, processing, treatment, storage, handling, transportation, transfer, use, disposal, release, discharge, spillage, seepage, or filtration of which is or shall be restricted, regulated, prohibited or penalized by any applicable law including, but not limited to, asbestos, urea formaldehyde foam insulation, polychlorinated biphenyls, petroleum, petroleum products, lead based paint, radon gas or similar restricted, prohibited or penalized substances.
"Hazardous Materials"
means, with respect to any Note, the Person in whose name such Note is registered in the register maintained by the Obligor Agent pursuant to .
"holder"
Section 13.1
means for any Person (without duplication) (a) all indebtedness created, assumed or incurred in any manner by such Person representing money borrowed (including by the issuance of debt securities), (b) all indebtedness for the deferred purchase price of property or services (other than (i) trade accounts payable arising in the ordinary course of business which are not more than 90 days past due and (ii) obligations to make earn-out payments payable (including at the election of the Company) in capital stock of the Company pursuant to acquisitions by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), (c) all indebtedness secured by any Lien upon property of such Person, whether or not such Person has assumed or become liable for the payment of such indebtedness, (d) all Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person, (e) all obligations of such Person on or with respect to letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and other extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money, excluding, in each case, indebtedness which is non-recourse to such Person and its subsidiaries and (f) any Guaranty of such Person with respect to liabilities of a type described in any of clauses (a) through (e) hereof.
"Indebtedness"
"" is defined in
INHAM Exemption
Section 6.2(e).
means (a) any purchaser of a Note, (b) any holder of a Note holding (together with one or more of its Affiliates) more than 5% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding, (c) any bank, trust company, savings and loan association or other financial institution, any pension plan, any investment company, any insurance company, any broker or dealer, or any other similar financial institution or entity, regardless of legal form, and (d) any Related Fund of any holder of any Note.
"Institutional Investor"
 
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the sum of all interest charges (including imputed interest charges with respect to Capitalized Lease Obligations and all amortization of debt discount and expense) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period (after eliminating intercompany items) determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
"Interest Expense"
is defined in .
"Investment Grade Rating"
Section 8.7(f)
means a joinder agreement substantially in the form of .
"Joinder Agreement"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(ii)
means, with respect to any Person and without duplication, any mortgage, lien, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance, or any interest or title of any vendor, lessor, lender or other secured party to or of such Person under any conditional sale or other title retention agreement or Capital Lease, upon or with respect to any property or asset of such Person (including in the case of stock, stockholder agreements, voting trust agreements and all similar arrangements).
"Lien"
is defined in .
"Make-Whole Amount"
Section 8.6
means material in relation to the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
"Material"
means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes, or (c) the ability of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than the Company) to perform its obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, when taken together with the Company's ability to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Notes and the other Subsidiary Guarantors' and the Obligors' (other than the Company) ability to perform their obligations under any Subsidiary Guaranty or this Agreement and the Notes, as the case may be, or (d) the validity or enforceability against the Company of this Agreement or the Notes or (e) the validity or enforceability against the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Obligors (other than the Company), taken as a whole, of any Subsidiary Guaranty and this Agreement and the Notes.
"Material Adverse Effect"
means a Subsidiary of the Company whose assets represent more than 5% of the Consolidated Total Assets.
"Material Subsidiary"
means any Plan that is a "multiemployer plan" (as such term is defined in section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA).
"Multiemployer Plan"
means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any successor thereto.
"NAIC"
" is defined in .
"NAIC Annual Statement
Section 6.2(a)
means, for any Person and with reference to any period, the net income (or net loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries for such period as computed on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, and, without limiting the foregoing, after deduction from gross income of all expenses and reserves, including reserves for all taxes on or measured by income.
"Net Income"
 
means, with respect to any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of the assets or property of any Person, an amount equal to the (a) aggregate amount of the value of the consideration received by such Person in respect thereof (the value of any consideration which is not cash to be determined in good faith by a Senior Financial Officer) (b) the sum of (i) all out-of-pocket costs and expenses actually incurred by such Person and its Affiliates in connection with such sale, lease, transfer or other disposition and (ii) all state, federal or foreign taxes incurred or to be incurred by such Person or its Affiliates (assuming the highest marginal rate were applicable thereto) in connection therewith.
"net proceeds"
minus
is defined in .
"Notes"
Section 1
and are defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement and shall include any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of ; that the Company, or any successor that becomes an Obligor in place of the Company in the manner prescribed in , shall in any and all events and at all times remain an Obligor.
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
Section 9.7
provided
Section 10.5
means, the Company, as agent and attorney-in-fact for the other Obligors pursuant to of this Agreement.
"Obligor Agent"
Section 22.10
is defined in .
"OFAC"
Section 5.16(a)
is defined in .
"OFAC Event"
Section 10.9
is defined in .
"OFAC Event Notice"
Section 8.8(a)
is defined in .
"OFAC Listed Person"
Section 5.16(a)
means any economic or trade sanction that OFAC is responsible for administering and enforcing. A list of OFAC Sanctions Programs may be found at http://www.treasury.gov/resource-center/sanctions/Programs/Pages/Programs.aspx.
"OFAC Sanctions Program"
means a certificate of a Senior Financial Officer or of any other officer of the Company or an Obligor, as the case may be, whose responsibilities extend to the subject matter of such certificate.
"Officer's Certificate"
means, as to any Person, any lease of property (whether real, personal or mixed) by such Person as lessee that is not a Capital Lease.
"Operating Lease"
means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA or any successor thereto.
"PBGC"
"Permitted Lien" is defined in .
Section 10.4
means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization, business entity or Governmental Authority.
"Person"
 
means an "employee benefit plan" (as defined in section 3(3) of ERISA) subject to Title I of ERISA that is or, within the preceding five years, has been established or maintained, or to which contributions are or, within the preceding five years, have been made or required to be made, by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate or with respect to which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate may have any liability.
"Plan"
means, without duplication (a) any Indebtedness of the Company or a Subsidiary secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of and (b) any Indebtedness of the Company's Subsidiaries; that there shall be excluded from any calculation of Priority Indebtedness: (i) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Obligor (other than Indebtedness of any Subsidiary Guarantor or Obligor secured by a Lien created or incurred within the limitations of ), (ii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary owing to the Company or a Wholly-owned Subsidiary of the Company, (iii) the Indebtedness of any Subsidiary outstanding on the date of Closing and described on hereto and any extension, renewal or refunding of any such Indebtedness, and (iv) the Indebtedness of any Person which becomes a Subsidiary after the date of Closing and any extension, renewal or refunding thereof; that such Indebtedness was not incurred in contemplation of such Person becoming a Subsidiary.
"Priority Indebtedness"
Section 10.4(l)
provided
Section 10.4(l)
Schedule 5.15(a)
provided
or means any interest in any kind of property or asset, whether real, personal or mixed, or tangible or intangible.
"property"
"properties"
is defined in .
"Proposed Prepayment Date"
Section 8.7(b)
is defined in .
"Proposed OFAC Prepayment Date"
Section 8.8(b)
is defined in .
"PTE"
Section 6.2(a)
is defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement.
"Purchaser"
means Prohibited Transaction Class Exemption 84-14 issued by the United States Department of Labor, as amended effective November 3, 2010.
"QPAM Exemption"
means any Person who is a "qualified institutional buyer" within the meaning of such term as set forth in Rule 144A(a)(1) under the Securities Act.
"Qualified Institutional Buyer"
means, with respect to any holder of any Note, any fund or entity that (a) invests in Securities or bank loans, and (b) is advised or managed by such holder, the same investment advisor as such holder or by an Affiliate of such holder or such investment advisor.
"Related Fund"
means, with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries for any period, the aggregate amounts payable with respect to Operating Leases of the Company and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
"Rental Expense"
means, at any time, the holders of at least 51% in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding (exclusive of Notes then owned by an Obligor or any of its Affiliates).
"Required Holders"
means any Senior Financial Officer and any other officer of the Company with responsibility for the administration of the relevant portion of this Agreement.
"Responsible Officer"
 
means Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation.
"RPS"
shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, or any successor thereto.
"SEC"
or shall have the same meaning as in Section 2(1) of the Securities Act.
"Securities"
"Security"
means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"Securities Act"
means the chief financial officer, chief accounting officer or treasurer of the Company.
"Senior Financial Officer"
means all Indebtedness of the Company which is not expressed to be subordinate or junior in rank to any other Indebtedness of the Company.
"Senior Indebtedness"
is defined in .
"Series G Notes"
Section 1
is defined in .
"Source"
Section 6.2
means, as to any Person, any other Person in which such first Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries owns sufficient equity or voting interests to enable it or them (as a group) ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, to elect a majority of the directors (or Persons performing similar functions) of such second Person, and any partnership or joint venture if more than a 50% interest in the profits or capital thereof is owned by such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries (unless such partnership can and does ordinarily take major business actions without the prior approval of such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries). Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, any reference to a "Subsidiary" is a reference to a Subsidiary of the Company.
"Subsidiary"
means any Subsidiary which is required to deliver a Subsidiary Guaranty in compliance with the requirements of .
"Subsidiary Guarantor"
Section 9.7
means a guaranty substantially in the form of (as the same may be amended from time to time).
"Subsidiary Guaranty"
Exhibit 9.7(a)(i)
means the Securities Valuation Office of the NAIC or any successor to such Office.
"SVO"
means United States Public Law 107-56, Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism (USA P A) Act of 2001, as amended from time to time, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time in effect.
"USA Patriot Act"
ATRIOT
CT
is defined in .
"U.S. Economic Sanctions"
Section 5.16(a)
 
means Securities of any class or classes of a Person, the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to elect the corporate directors (or persons performing similar functions) of such Person.
"Voting Stock"
means, at any time, any Subsidiary of which all of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (other than directors' qualifying shares as required by law) or other equity interests are owned by any one or more of the Company and the Company's other Wholly-owned Subsidiaries.
"Wholly-owned Subsidiary"
 
1. Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, as filed by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 8, 2013.
2. Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013, as filed by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 1, 2013.
3. Current Reports on Form 8-K, as filed by Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 7, 2012, March 15, 2013 and May 15, 2013.
 
 
In the following list of subsidiaries of the Company, those companies that are indented represent subsidiaries of the Company under which they are indented. Except for directors' qualifying shares, 100% of the voting stock of each of the subsidiaries listed below, other than those indicated by footnote, is owned of record or beneficially by its indicated parent. None of the subsidiaries listed below is a guarantor under the Bank Credit Agreement. Each subsidiary listed below that is an obligor under the Bank Credit Agreement is indicated by an * after its name.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
According to form Schedules 13G filed with the SEC by Capital Research Global Investors and Capital World Investors on February 12, 2013 and February 13, 2013, respectively, Capital Research Global Investors owns 14,460,866 shares of the common stock of the Company, which represented 11.4% of the outstanding common stock of the Company as of March 31, 2013.
 
Directors:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr.
William L. Bax
Frank E. English, Jr.
Elbert O. Hand
David S. Johnson
Kay W. McCurdy
Norman L. Rosenthal
James R. Wimmer
Senior Officers:
J. Patrick Gallagher, Jr., Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer
Walter D. Bay, Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
James W. Durkin, Jr., Vice President
James S. Gault, Vice President
Douglas K. Howell, Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Scott R. Hudson, Vice President
Susan E. McGrath, Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer
David E. McGurn, Jr., Vice President
 
None.
 
None.
 
1. The financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries contained in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012.
2. The financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries contained in the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois)
Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC
Risk Placement Services, Inc.
Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc.
Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc.
Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc.
Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC
 
1. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of November 30, 2009, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
2. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of February 10, 2011, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
3. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2012, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
 
 
1. Multicurrency Credit Agreement, dated as of July 15, 2010, among Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., as Borrower, the other Borrowers named therein, the several financial institutions from time to time party to the Agreement, as Lenders, Bank of Montreal, as Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A., Citibank N.A. and Barclays Bank PLC, as Co-Syndication Agents, and JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. and U.S. Bank National Association, as Documentation Agent.
2. 6.26% Amended and Restated Senior Notes, Series A, due August 3, 2014
3. 6.44% Amended and Restated Senior Notes, Series B, due August 3, 2017
4. Amended and Restated Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 19, 2007, among the Obligors and the Noteholders named therein.
5. 5.85% Senior Notes, Series C, due November 30, 2019
6. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of November 30, 2009, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
7. 5.18% Senior Notes, Series D, due February 10, 2021
8. 5.49% Senior Notes, Series E, due February 10, 2023
9. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of February 10, 2011, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
10. 3.99% Senior Notes, Series F, due July 10, 2020
11. Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2012, among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein.
 
 
 
F V R, the undersigned, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ), jointly and severally, hereby promise to pay to             , or registered assigns, the principal sum of              D (or so much thereof as shall not have been prepaid) on J 14, 2022 with interest (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months) on the unpaid balance hereof at the rate of (a) 3.69% per annum from the date hereof payable semi-annually on the 14
OR
ALUE
ECEIVED
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
OLLARS
UNE
th
day of December and June in each year commencing with the December 14 or June 14 next succeeding the date hereof, until the principal shall have become due and payable, and (b) to the extent permitted by law, on any overdue payment of principal, on any overdue payment of interest and, during the continuance of an Event of Default, on such unpaid balance and on any overdue payment of any Make-Whole Amount, at a rate per annum from time to time equal to 5.69% payable semiannually as aforesaid (or, at the option of the registered holder hereof, on demand).
Payments of principal of, interest on and any Make-Whole Amount with respect to this Note are to be made in lawful money of the United States of America at Chicago, Illinois or at such other place as the Company shall have designated by written notice to the holder of this Note as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement referred to below.
This Note is one of a series of Senior Notes (herein called the ) issued pursuant to the Note Purchase Agreement dated as June 14, 2013 (as from time to time amended, the ), among the Obligors and the Purchasers named therein and is entitled to the benefits thereof. Each holder of this Note will be deemed, by its acceptance
"Notes"
"Note Purchase Agreement"
 
 
hereof, to have (i) agreed to the confidentiality provisions set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and (ii) made the representations set forth in of the Note Purchase Agreement and, in addition, in the case of a transferee, shall be deemed to represent that either (a) the transferee is not, and is not acting on behalf of, an employee benefit plan or plan subject to ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, or (b) the transfer of the Note to, and the holding of the Note by, the transferee is exempt from the prohibited transaction provisions of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Code as a result of an applicable class or statutory prohibited transaction exemption. Unless otherwise indicated, capitalized terms used in this Note shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 20
Section 6
This Note is a registered Note and, as provided in the Note Purchase Agreement, upon surrender of this Note for registration of transfer, duly endorsed, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer duly executed, by the registered holder hereof or such holder's attorney duly authorized in writing, a new Note for a like principal amount will be issued to, and registered in the name of, the transferee. Prior to due presentment for registration of transfer, the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor may treat the person in whose name this Note is registered as the owner hereof for the purpose of receiving payment and for all other purposes, and the Obligors and any Subsidiary Guarantor will not be affected by any notice to the contrary.
This Note is subject to optional prepayment, in whole or from time to time in part, at the times and on the terms specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, but not otherwise.
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the principal of this Note may be declared or otherwise become due and payable in the manner, at the price (including any applicable Make-Whole Amount) and with the effect provided in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Pursuant to of the Note Purchase Agreement, an Obligor (other than the Company) may from time to time be discharged and released from its obligations under this Note on the terms and with the effect specified in the Note Purchase Agreement.
Section 2.2
 
This Note shall be construed and enforced in accordance with, and the rights of the Obligors and the holder of this Note shall be governed by, the law of the State of Illinois, excluding choice-of-law principles of the law of such State that would permit application of the laws of a jurisdiction other than such State.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
To the Purchasers Listed
on Schedule I hereto
Re:
$200,000,000 3.69% Senior Notes, Series G, due June 14, 2022
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as counsel to (i) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), (ii) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (""), (iii) Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), (iv) Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), (v) Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vi) Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vii) Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), and (viii) Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("", and, collectively with the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit and Gallagher Risk, the ""), in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of that certain Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ""), among the Purchasers listed on Schedule I hereto (the "") and the Obligors, pursuant to which the Obligors are issuing to the Purchasers $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.69% Senior Notes, Series G, due June 14, 2022 (the ""). This opinion letter is being delivered to you at the request of the Obligors pursuant to Section 4.4(a) of the Agreement.
Company
AJG Illinois
AJG Brokerage
RPS
Gallagher Bassett
Gallagher Benefit
Gallagher Risk
Gallagher Service
Obligors
Agreement
Purchasers
Notes
In connection with this opinion letter, we have examined originals, or copies certified or otherwise identified to our satisfaction, of:
(a) the Agreement; and
(b) the Notes being delivered to the Purchasers on the date hereof.
We also have examined originals, or copies of originals certified to our satisfaction, of such agreements, documents, certificates and other statements of government officials and other instruments, have examined such questions of law and have satisfied ourselves as to such matters of fact as we have considered relevant and necessary as a basis for this opinion letter. We have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the legal capacity of all natural persons, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals and the conformity with the original documents of all documents submitted to us as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission. As to facts relevant to the opinions expressed herein, we have relied, without independent investigation or verification, upon, and assumed the accuracy and completeness of, the representations and warranties made in the Agreement and upon certificates and oral and written statements of officers of the Obligors.
 
 
Based on and subject to the foregoing and the other limitations, qualifications, exceptions and assumptions set forth herein, this will advise you that in the opinion of the undersigned:
1. The Agreement constitutes a valid and binding obligation of each Obligor, enforceable against each Obligor in accordance with its terms.
2. The Notes, when delivered to and paid for by the Purchasers in accordance with the terms of the Agreement, will constitute valid and binding obligations of each Obligor, enforceable against each Obligor in accordance with their respective terms.
3. Assuming the accuracy of the representations and warranties and compliance with the agreements of the Obligors and the Purchasers in the Agreement, it is not necessary, in connection with the offer and sale of the Notes by the Obligors to the Purchasers in the manner contemplated by the Agreement, to register the Notes under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or to qualify an indenture under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended.
4. Based upon the Officer's Certificate of the Company dated the date hereof and attached hereto, the issuance of the Notes in accordance with the provisions of and as contemplated by the Agreement does not violate Regulation U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
The foregoing opinions are subject to the following qualifications, exceptions, assumptions and limitations:
A. The foregoing opinions are limited to matters arising under the federal laws of the United States of America and the laws of the State of Illinois. We express no opinion as to the laws, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction, or as to the municipal laws or the laws, rules or regulations of any local agencies or governmental authorities of or within the State of Illinois, or in each case as to any matters arising thereunder or relating thereto.
B. Our opinions in paragraph 1 and 2 above are subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium, fraudulent conveyance, fraudulent transfer and other similar laws relating to or affecting the rights and remedies of creditors generally and to general principles of equity (whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law), including concepts of commercial reasonableness, good faith and fair dealing and the possible unavailability of specific performance or injunctive relief.
C. We express no opinion as to any provision of any instrument, agreement or other document regarding (i) severability of the provisions thereof or (ii) providing that the assertion or employment of any right or remedy shall not prevent the concurrent assertion or employment of any other right or remedy, or that every right and remedy shall be cumulative and in addition to every other right and remedy, or that any delay or omission to exercise any right or remedy shall not impair any right or remedy or constitute a waiver thereof.
D. With respect to the Agreement and the Notes (collectively, the ""), we have assumed, to the extent relevant to the opinions set forth herein, that (i) each party to such Transaction Document (if not a natural person) was duly formed or organized, as the case may be, and was at all relevant times and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation or organization, as the case may
Transaction Documents
 
be, and had at all relevant times and has the full right, power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under such Transaction Document, (ii) such Transaction Document has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by each party thereto, (iii) such Transaction Document was at all relevant times and is the valid, binding and enforceable agreement or obligation, as the case may be, of each party thereto in accordance with its terms, provided that we make no such assumption in this clause (iii) insofar as such matters relate to any of the Obligors and is expressly covered by our opinions in paragraph 1 or 2 above, and (iv) the terms and provisions of such Transaction Document do not, and the execution, delivery and performance thereof by each of the parties to such Transaction Document do not and will not, violate the respective organizational documents of any of the parties to such Transaction Document or any law, order or decree of any court, administrative agency or other governmental authority binding on any such party, or result in a breach of or cause a default under any contract, instrument or agreement to which each party to such Transaction Document is a party or by which any such party is bound.
    This opinion letter is being rendered and delivered solely to and for the benefit of the persons to whom it is addressed in connection with the matters described above; accordingly, it may not be quoted or otherwise delivered to or relied upon by any other person or used for any other purpose without our prior written consent. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence: (i) you may make available a copy of this opinion letter to any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over you (as well as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) or any prospective purchaser of the Notes that is an Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement), provided that such recipient shall not be entitled to rely on this opinion letter; and (ii) any Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement) who purchases a Note may rely on this opinion letter as of the date hereof (and any reliance after the date hereof shall not be deemed to be an updating or re-delivery of the opinions expressed in this opinion letter). We assume no obligation to notify you or any such Institutional Investor or to supplement this opinion letter to reflect any facts or circumstances which may hereafter come to our attention with respect to the opinions expressed herein, including any changes in applicable law which may hereafter occur.
Very truly yours,
 
 
THE PRUDENTIAL INSURANCE COMPANY OF AMERICA
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
THE GIBRALTAR LIFE INSURANCE CO., LTD.
Prudential Private Placement Investors, L.P.
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
PRUDENTIAL ARIZONA REINSURANCE CAPTIVE COMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
THE LINCOLN NATIONAL LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
Prudential Private Placement Investors, L.P.
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
 
FARMERS INSURANCE EXCHANGE
Prudential Private Placement Investors, L.P.
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
MID CENTURY INSURANCE COMPANY
The Prudential Insurance Company of America
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
PHYSICIANS MUTUAL INSURANCE COMPANY
The Prudential Insurance Company of America
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
METROPOLITAN LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
With a copy to:
Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Chief Counsel-Securities Investments (PRIV)
 
METLIFE ALICO LIFE INSURANCE K.K.
Alico Asset Management Corp. (Japan)
Administration Department
ARCA East 7F, 3-2-1 Kinshi
Sumida-ku, Tokyo 130-0013 Japan
Attention: Administration Dept. Manager
Email: saura@metlife.co.jp
With a copy to:
MetLife Investment Management, LLC
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
Facsimile: (973) 355-4250
UNION FIDELITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
c/o MetLife Investment Management, LLC
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902, 10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
Facsimile (973) 355-4250
With a copy to:
Union Fidelity Life Insurance Company
c/o MetLife Investment Management, LLC
P.O. Box 1902, 10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Chief Counsel-Securities Investments (PRIV)
Email: sec_invest_law@metlife.com
N Y L I C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
 
N Y L I A C I O L I S A (BOLI 3)
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A (BOLI 30C)
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A (BOLI 3-2)
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
 
 
To the Purchasers Listed
on Schedule I hereto
Re:
$200,000,000 3.69% Senior Notes, Series G, due June 14, 2022
Ladies and Gentlemen:
I am General Counsel of (i) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ""), (ii) Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (""), (iii) Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), (iv) Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), (v) Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vi) Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), (vii) Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (""), and (viii) Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("", and, collectively with the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit and Gallagher Risk, the ""), in connection with the preparation, execution and delivery of that certain Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of the date hereof (the ""), among the Purchasers listed on hereto (the "") and the Obligors, pursuant to which the Obligors are issuing to the Purchasers $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.69% Senior Notes, Series G, due June 14, 2022 (the ""). This opinion letter is being delivered to you pursuant to Section 4.4(b) of the Agreement.
Company
AJG Illinois
AJG Brokerage
RPS
Gallagher Bassett
Gallagher Benefit
Gallagher Risk
Gallagher Service
Obligors
Agreement
Schedule I
Purchasers
Notes
I have reviewed the following documents and all exhibits thereto for the purposes of rendering the opinions expressed herein:
 
 
I have also examined originals, or copies of originals certified to my satisfaction, of such agreements, documents, certificates and other statements of government officials and other instruments, have examined such questions of law and have satisfied myself as to such matters of fact as I have deemed relevant and necessary as a basis for this opinion letter. I have assumed the authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals, the conformity with the original documents of all documents submitted to me as certified or photostatic copies or by facsimile or other means of electronic transmission for my examination and the legal capacity of all natural persons.
 
Based on and subject to the foregoing and the other limitations, qualifications, exceptions and assumptions set forth herein, this will advise you that in the opinion of the undersigned:
1. The Company is validly existing as a corporation and is in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. The Company has the corporate power and authority to execute and perform its obligations under the Agreement and to issue the Notes and has the corporate power and authority to conduct the activities in which it is now engaged and is duly licensed or qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation in each jurisdiction in which the character of the properties owned or leased by it or the nature of the business transacted by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed, qualified or in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
2. Each Obligor other than the Company is validly existing as a corporation or limited liability company and is in good standing under the laws of its state of incorporation or formation. Each Obligor other than the Company has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to execute and perform its obligations under the Agreement and has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to conduct the activities in which it is now engaged and is duly licensed or qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation or limited liability company in each jurisdiction in which the character of the properties owned or leased by it or the nature of the business transacted by it makes such licensing or qualification necessary, except where the failure to be so licensed, qualified or in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole. All of the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock or limited liability company interests of each Obligor other than the Company have been duly issued, are (in the case of shares of capital stock) fully paid and non-assessable and are owned by the Company, by one or more subsidiaries of the Company, or by the Company and one or more of its subsidiaries, free and clear of any lien, mortgage, pledge, charge, security interest or other encumbrance.
3. All necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of each Obligor has been taken to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of the Agreement by such Obligor, and the Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Obligor.
4. All necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of each Obligor has been taken to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of the Notes by such Obligor, and the Notes have been duly executed and delivered by each Obligor.
5. No consent, approval, authorization or other order of any federal regulatory body, federal administrative agency or other federal governmental body of the United States of America or any state regulatory body, state administrative agency or other state governmental body is required under Applicable Laws for the execution, delivery or performance of the Agreement or the Notes by the Obligors or the issuance and sale of the Notes to the Purchasers as contemplated by the Agreement. As used in this opinion letter, "" means the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, those state laws of the State of Illinois and those federal laws of the United States of America which a lawyer in the relevant jurisdiction exercising customary diligence would reasonably recognize as being applicable to transactions of the type contemplated by the Agreement; provided, that the term "Applicable Laws" shall not include
Applicable Laws
 
federal or state securities or blue sky laws (including, without limitation, the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, or the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or in each case any rules or regulations thereunder).
6. The execution and delivery by each Obligor of the Agreement and the Notes do not, and the performance by each Obligor of the Agreement and the Notes (including the issuance and sale of the Notes) will not, (i) violate the certificate or articles of incorporation, certificate of formation, by-laws or limited liability company agreement, as applicable, of such Obligor, (ii) result in a violation by such Obligor of any of the terms and provisions of any Applicable Laws or (iii) result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any lien or encumbrance in respect of any property of such Obligor under, any agreement or other instrument known to me to which such Obligor is a party or by which such Obligor may be bound, including, without limitation, the agreements set forth in Schedule 5.15(c) to the Agreement.
7. No Obligor is an "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an "investment company" under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
8. To my knowledge after due inquiry, except as disclosed in the Company's reports, documents or other materials filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, there are no legal, governmental or regulatory investigations, actions, suits or proceedings pending to which any Obligor is a party or to which any property of any Obligor is the subject which, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to have a materially adverse effect on the business or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or which would impair the ability of the Obligors to issue and deliver the Notes or to comply with the provisions of the Agreement or the Notes or which challenges the legal, valid and binding nature of the Agreement or the Notes; and to my knowledge, no such investigations, actions, suits or proceedings are threatened or contemplated by any governmental or regulatory authority or threatened by others.
As to facts relevant to the opinions expressed herein, I have reviewed originals of each of the Agreement and the Notes (collectively, the "") and have relied, without independent investigation or verification, upon, and assumed the accuracy and completeness of, the representations and warranties made in the Agreement.
Relevant Documents
I am the Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of the Company, and I am delivering this opinion letter only in such capacity.
This opinion letter is subject to the following qualifications:
(A) In rendering the opinions set forth in paragraphs 1 and 2 above with respect to the Obligors' valid existence and good standing and license or qualification to transact business as a foreign corporation or limited liability company, as applicable, I have relied solely on certificates of government officials, in each case as of a recent date prior to the date hereof.
(B) I express no opinion in paragraph 6(iii) above as to any breach of or default under any financial covenant or any provision requiring a mathematical, accounting or financial computation or determination.
 
(C) Any opinion herein which is expressed to be "to my knowledge" or "known to me" or is otherwise qualified by words of like import means that I have no actual knowledge of any facts or information contrary to such opinion. I have not undertaken any independent investigation, beyond that mentioned in paragraph 8 of this opinion letter, to determine the accuracy of any such facts or information, and no inference as to my knowledge of any matters bearing on the accuracy of any such facts or information should be drawn solely from the fact of my employment by the Company or the rendering of this opinion letter.
(D) This opinion letter is limited to matters arising under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, the laws of the State of Illinois and the federal laws of the United States of America. I express no opinion as to the laws, rules or regulations of any other jurisdiction or, in the case of Delaware, any other Delaware laws, rules or regulations, or as to the municipal laws or the laws, rules or regulations of any local agencies or governmental authorities of or within the State of Illinois, or in each case as to any matters arising thereunder or relating thereto. I express no opinion as to matters relating to securities or blue sky laws of any jurisdiction.
This opinion letter is being rendered and delivered solely to and for the benefit of the persons to whom it is addressed in connection with the matters described above; accordingly, it may not be quoted or otherwise delivered to or relied upon by any other person or used for any other purpose without my prior written consent. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence: (i) you may make available a copy of this opinion letter to any federal or state regulatory authority having jurisdiction over you (as well as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) or any prospective purchaser of the Notes that is an Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement), provided that such recipient shall not be entitled to rely on this opinion letter; and (ii) any Institutional Investor (as defined in clause (c) of the definition thereof set forth in Schedule B to the Agreement) who purchases a Note may rely on this opinion letter as of the date hereof (and any reliance after the date hereof shall not be deemed to be an updating or re-delivery of the opinions expressed in this opinion letter). I assume no obligation to notify you or any such Institutional Investor or to supplement this opinion letter to reflect any facts or circumstances which may hereafter come to my attention with respect to the opinions expressed herein, including any changes in applicable law which may hereafter occur.
 
 
THE PRUDENTIAL INSURANCE COMPANY OF AMERICA
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
THE GIBRALTAR LIFE INSURANCE CO., LTD.
Prudential Private Placement Investors, L.P.
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
PRUDENTIAL ARIZONA REINSURANCE CAPTIVE COMPANY
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
THE LINCOLN NATIONAL LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
Prudential Private Placement Investors, L.P.
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
 
FARMERS INSURANCE EXCHANGE
Prudential Private Placement Investors, L.P.
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
MID CENTURY INSURANCE COMPANY
The Prudential Insurance Company of America
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
PHYSICIANS MUTUAL INSURANCE COMPANY
The Prudential Insurance Company of America
c/o Prudential Capital Group
Two Prudential Plaza
180 N. Stetson Avenue
Suite 5600
Chicago, Illinois 60601
Attention: Managing Director, Corporate Finance
METROPOLITAN LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
With a copy to:
Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Chief Counsel-Securities Investments (PRIV)
 
METLIFE ALICO LIFE INSURANCE K.K.
Alico Asset Management Corp. (Japan)
Administration Department
ARCA East 7F, 3-2-1 Kinshi
Sumida-ku, Tokyo 130-0013 Japan
Attention: Administration Dept. Manager
Email: saura@metlife.co.jp
With a copy to:
MetLife Investment Management, LLC
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902
10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
Facsimile: (973) 355-4250
UNION FIDELITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY
c/o MetLife Investment Management, LLC
Investments, Private Placements
P.O. Box 1902, 10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Director
Facsimile (973) 355-4250
With a copy to:
Union Fidelity Life Insurance Company
c/o MetLife Investment Management, LLC
P.O. Box 1902, 10 Park Avenue
Morristown, New Jersey 07962-1902
Attention: Chief Counsel-Securities Investments (PRIV)
Email: sec_invest_law@metlife.com
N Y L I C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
OMPANY
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
 
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 3)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 30C)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
N Y L I A C I O L I S A
EW
ORK
IFE
NSURANCE
AND
NNUITY
ORPORATION
NSTITUTIONALLY
WNED
IFE
NSURANCE
EPARATE
CCOUNT
(BOLI 3-2)
c/o New York Life Investment Management LLC
51 Madison Avenue
2
nd
Floor, Room 208
New York, New York 10010
 
The closing opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP, special counsel to the Purchasers, called for by Section 4.4(c) of the Agreement, shall be dated the date of the Closing and addressed to the Purchasers, shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Purchasers and shall be to the effect that:
1. The Company is a corporation validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.
2. Each Obligor other than the Company is validly existing as a corporation or limited liability company and is in good standing under the laws of its state of incorporation or formation.
3. The Company and each other Obligor has the corporate or limited liability company power and authority to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under the Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance thereof by the Company and each other Obligor has been duly authorized by all necessary corporate or limited liability company action on the part of the Company and each other Obligor, as the case may be, and the Agreement and the Notes have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each of the other Obligors.
4. The Agreement and the Notes constitute the legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company and each other Obligor enforceable against such Person in accordance with its terms.
5. In view of the circumstances surrounding the sale and delivery of the Notes and on the basis of the representations made by the Company and each other Obligor in Section 5.13 of the Agreement and by you in Section 6.1 of the Agreement, it is not necessary in connection with the offering, issuance and delivery of the Notes under the circumstance contemplated by the Agreement to register the Notes under the Securities Act or to qualify and indenture in respect of the Notes under the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended and now in effect.
The opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP shall also state that the opinions of Sidley Austin LLP and Walter D. Bay, General Counsel of the Company, are each satisfactory in scope and form to Schiff Hardin LLP and that, in their opinion, the Purchasers are justified in relying thereon.
In rendering the opinion set forth in paragraphs 1 and 2 above, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely, as to matters referred to in paragraphs 1 and 2, solely upon an examination of certificates of government officials, in each case as of a recent date prior to the date hereof. In rendering the opinion set forth in paragraph 3 above, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely upon the opinions of Sidley Austin LLP and Walter D. Bay, General Counsel of the Company. The opinion of Schiff Hardin LLP is limited to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, the Limited Liability Company Act of the State of Delaware, the laws of the State of Illinois and the federal laws of the United States of America.
 
With respect to matters of fact upon which such opinion is based, Schiff Hardin LLP may rely on appropriate certificates of public officials and officers of the Obligors and upon representations of the Obligors and the Purchasers delivered in connection with the issuance and sale of the Notes.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Re: $200,000,000 3.69% Senior Notes, Series G, Due June 14, 2022
This G A dated as of ___________, ______ (the or this ) is entered into on a joint and several basis by each of the undersigned (which parties are hereinafter referred to individually as a and collectively as the ).
UARANTY
GREEMENT
"Guaranty"
"Guarantor"
"Guarantors"
A. Each Guarantor is a Subsidiary (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ).
"Company"
B. For the purpose set forth in Section 5.14 thereof, the Company has entered into that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of June 14, 2013 (the ) among the Company, Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each, together with any Subsidiary which is required to become an Obligor in compliance with the requirements of Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement, hereinafter individually referred to as an and collectively as the ) and each of the purchasers named on Schedule A thereto (the ; the Initial Note Purchasers, together with their successors, assigns or any other future holder of the Notes (as hereinafter defined), the ), providing for, inter alia, the issue and sale by the Company to the Initial Note Purchasers of $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount of their 3.69% Senior Notes, Series G, due June 14, 2022 ( the "").
"Note Purchase Agreement"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Obligor"
"Obligors"
"Initial Note Purchasers"
"Holders"
Notes
C. The Initial Note Purchasers have required as a condition to their purchase of the Notes that the Company cause each Subsidiary that after the date of Closing delivers a guaranty pursuant to the Bank Credit Agreement or any Existing Note Agreement to enter into this Guaranty, as security for the Notes. The Company owns 100% of the equity interests of the Guarantors.
D. Each of the Guarantors has derived substantial direct and indirect benefit from the sale of the Notes to the Initial Note Purchasers.
N, , as required by Section 9.7 of the Note Purchase Agreement and in consideration of the premises and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency whereof are hereby acknowledged, each Guarantor does hereby covenant and agree, jointly and severally, as follows:
OW
THEREFORE
 
SECTION 1. Definitions.
Capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Note Purchase Agreement unless herein defined or the context shall otherwise require.
SECTION 2. Guaranty of Notes and Note Purchase Agreement.
(a) Subject to the limitation set forth in hereof, each Guarantor jointly and severally does hereby irrevocably, absolutely and unconditionally guarantee unto the Holders: (1) the full and prompt payment of the principal of, premium (including, without limitation, any Make-Whole Amount), if any, and interest on the Notes and any other amounts from time to time outstanding under the Note Purchase Agreement or the Notes, as and when such payments shall become due and payable whether by lapse of time, upon redemption or prepayment, by extension or by acceleration or declaration or otherwise (including (to the extent legally enforceable) interest due on overdue payments of principal, premium, if any, or interest at the rate set forth in the Notes and interest accruing at the then applicable rate provided in the Notes after the filing of any petition in bankruptcy, or the commencement of any insolvency, reorganization or like proceeding, relating to an Obligor, whether or not a claim for post-filing or post-petition interest is allowed in such proceeding) in Federal or other immediately available funds of the United States of America which at the time of payment or demand therefor shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, (2) the full and prompt performance and observance by the Obligors of each and all of the obligations, covenants and agreements required to be performed or owed by the Obligors under the terms of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and (3) the full and prompt payment, upon demand by any Holder, of all costs and expenses, legal or otherwise (including reasonable attorneys' fees), if any, as shall have been expended or incurred in the protection or enforcement of any rights, privileges or liabilities in favor of the Holders under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or under this Guaranty or in any consultation or action in connection therewith or herewith and in each and every case irrespective of the validity, regularity, or enforcement of any of the Notes or Note Purchase Agreement or any of the terms thereof or any other like circumstance or circumstances.
Section 2(b)
(b) The liability of each Guarantor under this Guaranty shall not exceed an amount equal to a maximum amount as will, after giving effect to such maximum amount and all other liabilities of such Guarantor, contingent or otherwise, result in the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder not constituting a fraudulent transfer, obligation or conveyance.
SECTION 3. Guaranty of Payment and Performance.
This is a guarantee of payment and performance and each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any right to require that any action on or in respect of any Note or the Note Purchase Agreement be brought against an Obligor or any other Person or that resort be had to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. Any Holder may, at its option, proceed hereunder against any Guarantor in the first instance to collect monies when due, the payment of which is guaranteed hereby, without first proceeding against an Obligor or any other Person and without first resorting to any direct or indirect security for the Notes or for this Guaranty or any other remedy. The liability of each Guarantor hereunder shall in no way be affected or impaired by any acceptance by any Holder of
 
any direct or indirect security for, or other guaranties of, any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or any other Person to any Holder or by any failure, delay, neglect or omission by any Holder to realize upon or protect any such guarantees, Indebtedness, liability or obligation or any notes or other instruments evidencing the same or any direct or indirect security therefor or by any approval, consent, waiver, or other action taken, or omitted to be taken by any such Holder.
The covenants and agreements on the part of the Guarantors herein contained shall take effect as joint and several covenants and agreements, and references to the Guarantors shall take effect as references to each of them and none of them shall be released from liability hereunder by reason of the guarantee ceasing to be binding as a continuing security on any other of them.
SECTION 4. General Provisions Relating to the Guaranty.
(a) Each Guarantor hereby consents and agrees that any Holder or Holders from time to time, with or without any further notice to or assent from any other Guarantor may, without in any manner affecting the liability of any Guarantor under this Guaranty, and upon such terms and conditions as any such Holder or Holders may deem advisable:
(1) extend in whole or in part (by renewal or otherwise), modify, change, compromise, release or extend the duration of the time for the performance or payment of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of any Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligations of such Obligor on the Notes, or waive any Default or Event of Default with respect thereto, or waive, modify, amend or change any provision of any other agreement or this Guaranty; or
(2) sell, release, surrender, modify, impair, exchange or substitute any and all property, of any nature and from whomsoever received, held by, or for the benefit of, any such Holder as direct or indirect security for the payment or performance of any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of an Obligor or of any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes; or
(3) settle, adjust or compromise any claim of an Obligor against any other Person secondarily or otherwise liable for any Indebtedness, liability or obligation of such Obligor on the Notes.
Each Guarantor hereby ratifies and confirms any such extension, renewal, change, sale, release, waiver, surrender, exchange, modification, amendment, impairment, substitution, settlement, adjustment or compromise and that the same shall be binding upon it, and hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any and all defenses, counterclaims or offsets which it might or could have by reason thereof, it being understood that such Guarantor shall at all times be bound by this Guaranty and remain liable hereunder.
 
(b) Each Guarantor hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law:
(1) notice of acceptance of this Guaranty by the Holders or of the creation, renewal or accrual of any liability of an Obligor, present or future, or of the reliance of such Holders upon this Guaranty (it being understood that every Indebtedness, liability and obligation described in hereof shall conclusively be presumed to have been created, contracted or incurred in reliance upon the execution of this Guaranty);
Section 2
(2) demand of payment by any Holder from an Obligor or any other Person indebted in any manner on or for any of the Indebtedness, liabilities or obligations hereby guaranteed; and
(3) presentment for the payment by any Holder or any other Person of the Notes or any other instrument, protest thereof and notice of its dishonor to any party thereto and to such Guarantor.
The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty and the rights of any Holder to enforce such obligations by any proceedings, whether by action at law, suit in equity or otherwise, shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination (other than by indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes and the obligations of the Obligors under the Note Purchase Agreement), whether by reason of any claim of any character whatsoever or otherwise and shall not be subject to any defense, set-off, counterclaim (other than any compulsory counterclaim), recoupment or termination whatsoever.
(c) The obligations of the Guarantors hereunder shall be binding upon the Guarantors and their successors and assigns, and shall remain in full force and effect until the entire principal, interest and premium, if any, on the Notes and all other sums due pursuant to Section 2 shall have been paid and such obligations shall not be affected, modified or impaired upon the happening from time to time of any event, including without limitation any of the following, whether or not with notice to or the consent of the Guarantors:
(1) the genuineness, validity, regularity or enforceability of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or any of the terms of any thereof, the continuance of any obligation on the part of the Obligors, any other Guarantors or any other Person on or in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or the power or authority or the lack of power or authority of the Obligors to issue the Notes or the Obligors to execute and deliver the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement or of any other Guarantors to execute and deliver this Guaranty or any other agreement or to perform any of its obligations hereunder or the existence or continuance of the Obligors or any other Person as a legal entity; or
(2) any default, failure or delay, willful or otherwise, in the performance by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of any obligations of any kind or character whatsoever under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(3) any creditors' rights, bankruptcy, receivership or other insolvency proceeding of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or in respect of the property of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of or winding up of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person; or
 
(4) impossibility or illegality of performance on the part of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its obligations under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreements; or
(5) in respect of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, any change of circumstances, whether or not foreseen or foreseeable, whether or not imputable to an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person, or other impossibility of performance through fire, explosion, accident, labor disturbance, floods, droughts, embargoes, wars (whether or not declared), civil commotion, acts of God or the public enemy, delays or failure of suppliers or carriers, inability to obtain materials, action of any Federal or state regulatory body or agency, change of law or any other causes affecting performance, or any other force majeure, whether or not beyond the control of an Obligor, any other Guarantors or any other Person and whether or not of the kind hereinbefore specified; or
(6) any attachment, claim, demand, charge, Lien, order, process, encumbrance or any other happening or event or reason, similar or dissimilar to the foregoing, or any withholding or diminution at the source, by reason of any taxes, assessments, expenses, Indebtedness, obligations or liabilities of any character, foreseen or unforeseen, and whether or not valid, incurred by or against an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person or any claims, demands, charges or Liens of any nature, foreseen or unforeseen, incurred by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person, or against any sums payable in respect of the Notes or under the Note Purchase Agreement or this Guaranty, so that such sums would be rendered inadequate or would be unavailable to make the payments herein provided; or
(7) any order, judgment, decree, ruling or regulation (whether or not valid) of any court of any nation or of any political subdivision thereof or any body, agency, department, official or administrative or regulatory agency of any thereof or any other action, happening, event or reason whatsoever which shall delay, interfere with, hinder or prevent, or in any way adversely affect, the performance by an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person of its respective obligations under or in respect of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement; or
(8) the failure of any Guarantor to receive any benefit from or as a result of its execution, delivery and performance of this Guaranty; or
(9) any failure or lack of diligence in collection or protection, failure in presentment or demand for payment, protest, notice of protest, notice of default and of nonpayment, any failure to give notice to any Guarantor of failure of an Obligor, any Guarantor or any other Person to keep and perform any obligation, covenant or agreement under the terms of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or failure to resort for payment to an Obligor, any other Guarantor or to any other Person or to any other guaranty or to any property, security, Liens or other rights or remedies; or
 
(10) the acceptance of any additional security or other guaranty, the advance of additional money to an Obligor or any other Person, the renewal or extension of the Notes or amendments, modifications, consents or waivers with respect to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, or the sale, release, substitution or exchange of any security for the Notes; or
(11) any merger or consolidation of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person into or with any other Person or any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition of any of the assets of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person to any other Person, or any change in the ownership of any shares of an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person or any release of any other Guarantor; or
(12) any defense whatsoever that: (i) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the payment of the Notes (principal, premium, if any, or interest), other than indefeasible payment thereof in Federal or other immediately available funds, or (ii) an Obligor or any other Person might have to the performance or observance of any of the provisions of the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement or any other agreement, whether through the satisfaction or purported satisfaction by an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person of its debts due to any cause such as bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership, merger, consolidation, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, winding-up or otherwise, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes; or
(13) any act or failure to act with regard to the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty or any other agreement or anything which might vary the risk of any Guarantor or any other Person; or
(14) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Guarantor or any other Person in respect of the obligations of any Guarantor or other Person under this Guaranty or any other agreement, other than the defense of indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Notes;
that the specific enumeration of the above-mentioned acts, failures or omissions shall not be deemed to exclude any other acts, failures or omissions, though not specifically mentioned above, it being the purpose and intent of this Guaranty and the parties hereto that the obligations of each Guarantor shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be discharged, impaired or varied except by the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes in accordance with their respective terms whenever the same shall become due and payable as in the Notes provided and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement, at the place specified in and all in the manner and with the effect provided in the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement, as each may be amended or modified from time to time. Without limiting the foregoing, it is understood that repeated and successive demands may be made and recoveries may be had hereunder as and when, from time to time, an Obligor shall default under or in respect of the terms of the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement and
provided
 
that notwithstanding recovery hereunder for or in respect of any given default or defaults by an Obligor under the Notes or the Note Purchase Agreement, this Guaranty shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to each and every subsequent default.
(d) All rights of any Holder may be transferred or assigned at any time and shall be considered to be transferred or assigned at any time or from time to time upon the transfer of such Note whether with or without the consent of or notice to the Guarantors under this Guaranty or to the Obligors.
(e) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, the Guarantors shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holder or Holders upon whose Notes such payment was made, but each Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of subrogation shall be junior and subordinate in right of payment to the prior indefeasible final payment in cash in full of all amounts due and owing by the Obligors with respect to the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and by the Guarantors under this Guaranty, and the Guarantors shall not take any action to enforce such right of subrogation, and the Guarantors shall not accept any payment in respect of such right of subrogation, until all amounts due and owing by the Obligors under or in respect of the Notes and the Note Purchase Agreement and all amounts due and owing by the Guarantors hereunder have indefeasibly been finally paid in cash in full. If any amount shall be paid to any Guarantor in violation of the preceding sentence at any time prior to the indefeasible payment in cash in full of the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Notes, the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Holders and shall forthwith be paid to the Holders to be credited and applied to the amounts due or to become due with respect to the Notes and all other amounts payable under the Note Purchase Agreement and this Guaranty, whether matured or unmatured. Each Guarantor acknowledges that it has received direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by the Note Purchase Agreement and that the waiver set forth in this is knowingly made as a result of the receipt of such benefits.
paragraph (e)
(f) To the extent of any payments made under this Guaranty, each Guarantor making such payment shall have a right of contribution from the other Guarantors, but such Guarantor covenants and agrees that such right of contribution shall be subordinate in right of payment to the rights of the Holders for which full payment has not been made or provided for and, to that end, such Guarantor agrees not to claim or enforce any such right of contribution unless and until all of the Notes and all other sums due and payable under the Note Purchase Agreement have been fully and irrevocably paid and discharged.
(g) Each Guarantor agrees that to the extent an Obligor, any other Guarantor or any other Person makes any payment on any Note, which payment or any part thereof is subsequently invalidated, voided, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside, recovered, rescinded or is required to be retained by or repaid to a trustee, receiver, or any other Person under any bankruptcy code, common law, or equitable cause, then and to the extent of such payment, the obligation or the part thereof intended to be satisfied shall be revived and continued in full force and effect with respect to the Guarantors' obligations hereunder, as if said payment had not been made. The liability of the Guarantors hereunder shall not be reduced or discharged, in whole or in part, by any payment to any Holder from any source that is thereafter paid, returned or refunded in whole or in part by reason of the assertion of a claim of any kind relating thereto, including, but not limited to, any claim for breach of contract, breach of warranty, preference, illegality, invalidity, or fraud asserted by any account debtor or by any other Person.
 
(h) No Holder shall be under any obligation: (1) to marshal any assets in favor of the Guarantors or in payment of any or all of the liabilities of any Obligor under or in respect of the Notes or the obligations of the Guarantors hereunder or (2) to pursue any other remedy that the Guarantors may or may not be able to pursue themselves and that may lighten the Guarantors' burden, any right to which each Guarantor hereby expressly waives.
(i) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank in right of payment with all other Indebtedness of such Guarantor which is not secured or which is not expressly subordinated in right of payment to any other Indebtedness of such Guarantor.
pari passu
(j) A Guarantor shall be automatically discharged and released from this Guaranty pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
SECTION 5. Representations and Warranties of the Guarantors.
Each Guarantor represents and warrants to each Holder that:
(a) Such Guarantor is a corporation or other legal entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, and is duly qualified as a foreign corporation or other legal entity and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (1) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of such Guarantor and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (2) the ability of such Guarantor to perform its obligations under this Guaranty, or (3) the validity or enforceability of this Guaranty (herein in this , a ). Such Guarantor has the power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Guaranty and to perform the provisions hereof.
Section 5
"Material Adverse Effect"
(b) This Guaranty has been duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of such Guarantor, and this Guaranty constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Guarantor enforceable against such Guarantor in accordance with its terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by (1) applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding in equity or at law).
(c) The execution, delivery and performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty will not (1) contravene, result in any breach of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation of any Lien in respect of any property of such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries under any material indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan, purchase or credit agreement, lease, charter document or by-law, or any other material agreement or instrument to which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries is bound or by which such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or any of
 
their respective properties may be bound or affected, (2) conflict with or result in a breach of any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any order, judgment, decree, or ruling of any court, arbitrator or Governmental Authority applicable to such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries or (3) violate any provision of any statute or other rule or regulation of any Governmental Authority applicable to the such Guarantor or any of its subsidiaries.
(d) No consent, approval or authorization of, or registration, filing or declaration with, any Governmental Authority is required in connection with the execution, delivery or performance by such Guarantor of this Guaranty.
(e) Such Guarantor is solvent, has capital not unreasonably small in relation to its business or any contemplated or undertaken transaction and has assets having a value both at fair valuation and at present fair salable value greater than the amount required to pay its debts as they become due and greater than the amount that will be required to pay its probable liability on its existing debts as they become absolute and matured. Such Guarantor does not intend to incur, or believe or should have believed that it will incur, debts beyond its ability to pay such debts as they become due. Such Guarantor will not be rendered insolvent by the execution and delivery of, and performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty. Such Guarantor does not intend to hinder, delay or defraud its creditors by or through the execution and delivery of, or performance of its obligations under, this Guaranty.
(f) The obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty rank at least in right of payment with all other unsecured senior Indebtedness (actual or contingent) of each Guarantor.
pari passu
SECTION 6. Guarantor Covenants.
From and after the date of issuance of the Notes by the Obligors and continuing so long as any amount remains unpaid thereon each Guarantor agrees to comply with the terms and provisions of Sections 9.1, 9.2, 9.3, 9.4, 9.5 and 9.8 of the Note Purchase Agreement, insofar as such provisions apply to such Guarantor, as if said Sections were set forth herein in full.
SECTION 7. [Reserved].
SECTION 8. Governing Law.
(a)
THIS GUARANTY SHALL BE CONSTRUED AND ENFORCED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, AND THE RIGHTS OF THE PARTIES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS, EXCLUDING CHOICE-OF-LAW PRINCIPLES OF THE LAW OF SUCH STATE THAT WOULD PERMIT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF A JURISDICTION OTHER THAN SUCH STATE.
(b) Each Guarantor irrevocably submits to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any Illinois State or federal court sitting in Cook County, Illinois over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guaranty. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, such Guarantor irrevocably waives and agrees not to assert, by way of motion, as a defense or otherwise, any claim that it is not subject to the jurisdiction of any such court, any objection that
 
it may now or hereafter have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court and any claim that any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
(c) The parties hereto waive any right to have a jury participate in resolving any dispute, whether sounding in contract, tort, or otherwise, between them arising out of, connected with, related to or incidental to the relationship established between them in connection with this Guaranty, any financing agreement, any loan party document or any other instrument, document or agreement executed or delivered in connection herewith or the transactions related hereto. The parties hereto hereby agree and consent that any such claim, demand, action or cause of action shall be decided by court trial without a jury and that any of them may file an original counterpart or a copy of this Guaranty with any court as written evidence of the consent of the parties hereto to the waiver of their right to trial by jury.
SECTION 9. [Reserved].
SECTION 10. Amendments, Waivers and Consents.
(a) This Guaranty may be amended, and the observance of any term hereof may be waived (either retroactively or prospectively), with (and only with) the written consent of each Guarantor and the Required Holders.
(b) The Guarantors will provide each Holder (irrespective of the amount of Notes then owned by it) with sufficient information, sufficiently far in advance of the date a decision is required, to enable such Holder to make an informed and considered decision with respect to any proposed amendment, waiver or consent in respect of any of the provisions hereof. The Guarantors will deliver executed or true and correct copies of each amendment, waiver or consent effected pursuant to the provisions of this Section 10 to each Holder promptly following the date on which it is executed and delivered by, or receives the consent or approval of, the Required Holders.
(c) The Obligors will not directly or indirectly pay or cause to be paid any remuneration, whether by way of fee or otherwise, or grant any security, to any Holder as consideration for or as an inducement to the entering into by any Holder of any waiver or amendment of any of the terms and provisions hereof unless such remuneration is concurrently paid, or security is concurrently granted, on the same terms, ratably to each Holder even if such Holder did not consent to such waiver or amendment.
(d) Any amendment or waiver consented to as provided in this applies equally to all Holders and is binding upon them and upon each future holder and upon the Guarantors. No such amendment or waiver will extend to or affect any obligation, covenant or agreement not expressly amended or waived or impair any right consequent thereon. No course of dealing between the Guarantors and any Holder nor any delay in exercising any rights hereunder shall operate as a waiver of any rights of any Holder. As used herein, the term "this Guaranty" and references thereto shall mean this Guaranty as it may from time to time be amended or supplemented.
Section 10
 
(e) Solely for the purpose of determining whether the Holders of the requisite percentage of the aggregate principal amount of Notes then outstanding approved or consented to any amendment, waiver or consent to be given under this Guaranty, Notes directly or indirectly owned by any Guarantor, any Obligor or any of their respective subsidiaries or Affiliates shall be deemed not to be outstanding.
SECTION 11. Notices.
All notices and communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and sent (a) by telefacsimile if the sender on the same day sends a confirming copy of such notice by a recognized overnight delivery service (charges prepaid), or (b) by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested (postage prepaid), or (c) by a recognized overnight delivery service (with charges prepaid). Any such notice must be sent:
(1) if to an Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee, to such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee at the address specified for such communications in Schedule A to the Note Purchase Agreement, or at such other address as such Initial Note Purchaser or such Initial Note Purchaser's nominee shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing,
(2) if to any other Holder, to such Holder at such address as such Holder shall have specified to any Guarantor or the Company in writing, or
(3) if to any Guarantor, to such Guarantor c/o the Company at its address set forth at the beginning of the Note Purchase Agreement to the attention of Treasurer, with a copy to the General Counsel, or at such other address as such Guarantor shall have specified to the Holders in writing.
Notices under this will be deemed given only when actually received.
Section 11
SECTION 12. Miscellaneous.
(a) No remedy herein conferred upon or reserved to any Holder is intended to be exclusive of any other available remedy or remedies, but each and every such remedy shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to every other remedy given under this Guaranty now or hereafter existing at law or in equity. No delay or omission to exercise any right or power accruing upon any default, omission or failure of performance hereunder shall impair any such right or power or shall be construed to be a waiver thereof but any such right or power may be exercised from time to time and as often as may be deemed expedient. In order to entitle any Holder to exercise any remedy reserved to it under the Guaranty, it shall not be necessary for such Holder to physically produce its Note in any proceedings instituted by it or to give any notice, other than such notice as may be herein expressly required.
(b) The Guarantors will pay all sums becoming due under this Guaranty by the method and at the address specified in the Note Purchase Agreement, or by such other method or at such other address as any Holder shall have from time to time specified to the Guarantors in writing for such purpose, without the presentation or surrender of this Guaranty or any Note.
 
(c) Any provision of this Guaranty that is prohibited or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions hereof, and any such prohibition or unenforceability in any jurisdiction shall (to the full extent permitted by law) not invalidate or render unenforceable such provision in any other jurisdiction.
(d) If the whole or any part of this Guaranty shall be now or hereafter become unenforceable against any one or more of the Guarantors for any reason whatsoever or if it is not executed by any one or more of the Guarantors, this Guaranty shall nevertheless be and remain fully binding upon and enforceable against each other Guarantor as if it had been made and delivered only by such other Guarantors.
(e) This Guaranty shall be binding upon each Guarantor and its successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of each Holder and its successors and assigns so long as its Notes remain outstanding and unpaid.
(f) This Guaranty may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which together shall constitute one instrument. Each counterpart may consist of a number of copies hereof, each signed by less than all, but together signed by all, of the parties hereto.
SECTION 13. Indemnity.
To the fullest extent of applicable law, each Guarantor shall indemnify and save each Holder harmless from and against any losses which may arise by virtue of any of the obligations hereby guaranteed being or becoming for any reason whatsoever in whole or in part void, voidable, contrary to law, invalid, ineffective or otherwise unenforceable by the Holder or any of them in accordance with its terms (all of the foregoing collectively, an "Indemnifiable Circumstance"). For greater certainty, these losses shall include without limitation all obligations hereby guaranteed which would have been payable by the Obligors but for the existence of an Indemnifiable Circumstance, net of any withholding or deduction of or on account of any tax; provided, however, that the extent of the Guarantor's aggregate liability under this Section 13 shall not at any time exceed the amount (but for any Indemnifiable Circumstance) otherwise guaranteed pursuant to Section 2.
SECTION 14. Termination.
This Guaranty shall automatically, without any action on the part of any party hereto, terminate and be void and of no further force and effect with respect to any Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) if and when such Guarantor (or any successor thereto or assign thereof) is released from this Guaranty by reason of the express provisions of Section 2.2 of the Note Purchase Agreement or is otherwise released from this Guaranty in accordance with the terms of the Note Purchase Agreement.
 
I W W, the undersigned has caused this Guaranty to be duly executed by an authorized representative as of this     _ day of                     ,             .
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
T J A, dated as of [            ], is made by [            ], a [            ] (the ) in favor of the holders of the Notes (as defined in the hereinafter defined Note Purchase Agreement) under the Note Purchase Agreement (as hereinafter defined).
HIS
OINDER
GREEMENT
"New Obligor"
A. Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., a Delaware corporation (the ), Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois), an Illinois corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Brokerage & Risk Management Services, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (), Risk Placement Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation (), Gallagher Bassett Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Gallagher Benefit Services, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc., an Illinois corporation () and Arthur J. Gallagher Service Company, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (; the Company, AJG Illinois, AJG Brokerage, RPS, Gallagher Bassett, Gallagher Benefit, Gallagher Risk and Gallagher Service are each hereinafter individually referred to as an, collectively as the ) are parties to that certain Note Purchase Agreement dated as of June 14, 2013 (as amended, the "") with the Purchasers named therein.
"Company"
"AJG Illinois"
"AJG Brokerage"
"RPS"
"Gallagher Bassett"
"Gallagher Benefit"
"Gallagher Risk"
"Gallagher Service"
"Existing Obligor"
"Existing Obligors"
Note Purchase Agreement
B. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement, the New Obligor desires to become an obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes.
N T, for and in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement, and other valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, each undersigned hereby consents and agrees as follows:
OW
HEREFORE
1. Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Note Purchase Agreement.
2. Without in any manner affecting the Existing Obligors' joint and several liability under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, the New Obligor hereby assumes and agrees to perform all of the terms, restrictions, obligations and conditions of an "Obligor" under the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes, and, by execution of this Joinder Agreement, is hereby designated an "Obligor" for purposes of, and agrees to be bound by, each and all terms of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes. Without limiting the generality of the forgoing, the New Obligor hereby (a) expressly agrees that it is jointly and severally liable for and assumes all obligations of an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party, and (b) agrees to perform for the holders' benefit and be bound by the terms and covenants applicable to an Obligor under the Note Purchase Agreement, the Notes and all other related documents to which any Existing Obligor is a party.
 
3. The undersigned is the duly elected             of the New Obligor, a Subsidiary of the Company, and is duly authorized to execute and deliver this Joinder Agreement to each of you. The execution by the undersigned of this Joinder Agreement shall evidence its consent to and acknowledgment and approval of the terms set forth herein and in the Note Purchase Agreement and by such execution the New Obligor shall be deemed to have made in favor of the holders the representations and warranties set forth in Section 5 of the Note Purchase Agreement.
4. Upon execution of this Joinder Agreement, the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes shall be deemed to be amended as set forth above. Except as amended herein, the terms and provisions of the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes are hereby ratified, confirmed and approved in all respects.
5. Any and all notices, requests, certificates and other instruments (including the Notes) may refer to the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes without making specific reference to this Joinder Agreement, but nevertheless all such references shall be deemed to include this Joinder Agreement unless the context shall otherwise require.
6. This Joinder Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument, and any of the parties hereto may execute this Joinder Agreement by signing any such counterpart.
 
I W W, the parties hereto have caused this Joinder Agreement to be executed as of the date and year first above written.
N
ITNESS
HEREOF
 
 
Each of the undersigned consents to the terms of this Joinder Agreement and reaffirms, ratifies and confirms in all respects each and every obligation and covenant made by it in the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes executed by each of the undersigned in favor of the holders and that the Note Purchase Agreement and the Notes remain the legal, valid and binding obligation of the undersigned enforceable against the undersigned in accordance with their terms.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99
 
NEWS RELEASE
ITASCA, IL., June 17, 2013  Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (NYSE: AJG) today announced that the company has completed a private placement of $200 million of senior unsecured Series G notes bearing interest at 3.69% due in 2022. The company intends to use the net proceeds of the debt transaction to fund acquisitions and for general corporate purposes.
The notes have not been registered under the Securities Act or any state securities laws and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements. This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the notes, nor shall it constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale is unlawful.
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., an international insurance brokerage and risk management services firm, is headquartered in Itasca, Illinois, has operations in 19 countries and offers client service capabilities in over 140 countries around the world through a network of correspondent brokers and consultants.
CONTACT: Marsha Akin
Director  Investor Relations
630-285-3501/
marsha_akin@ajg.com


</DOCUMENT>
